George W. Bush
George Walker Bush (born July 6, 1946) is the current President of the United States of America. He is a Republican, and Dick Cheney is his Vice President. He is from Midland, Texas. He has a ranch in Crawford, Texas, which is near Waco.
He is the son of former U.S. President George H. W. Bush. Before he was President, George Bush was Governor of Texas. He is married to Laura, and they have twin daughters, Jenna and Barbara.
Early years.
Bush was born in Connecticut. He went to school at Yale University, which is famous for a high standard of education. He lived briefly in Midland, Texas on a ranch. He joined the Texas Air National Guard (part of the United States National Guard) during the Vietnam War, but did not fight in Vietnam.
2000 election.
During the 2000 United States presidential election, Florida was a state where the election was not clear. It took more than a month to know who won. The Supreme Court made a decision to stop recounting votes, and at that time Bush was ahead by only 537 votes and declared the winner. The election is still controversial.
2004 election.
In the 2004 presidential election, Bush won again. His opponent was Massachusetts Senator John Kerry, a Democrat.
Iraq.
After the attacks of September 11 2001, Bush ordered an invasion of Afghanistan. Later he wanted something done about Iraq. Bush asked the United Nations to take away all Iraq's Weapons of Mass Destruction. The United Nations refused because there was no proof Iraq had any weapons. He sent the United States Army into Iraq on March 20, 2003 and took control of the country. Saddam Hussein was captured and Iraq killed him as punishment for War Crimes. Even today, no weapons of mass destruction have been found. Elections happened for the first time in the country, but violence continues.
Bushisms.
Bush sometimes has trouble speaking in public. He would sometimes make a mistake or say something opposite to what he means. These mistakes have led to the creation of the phrase "Bushism". Many websites on the Internet collect Bushisms.
Controversy.
A lot of people have made arguments against Bush because of his views, mainly on the War in Iraq.

Tony Blair
Anthony Charles Lyton Blair usually called Tony Blair is the most recent former Prime Minister of the United Kingdom. He was born in Edinburgh and became the Prime Minister in 1997. He retired in June 2007 and was succeeded by the former Chancellor of the Exchequer, James Gordon Brown.
As leader of the Labour party, he won three general elections in the UK, in 1997, 2001 and 2005. He is married to Cherie Booth, who is a lawyer, who graduated from the London School of Economics with a first class honours degree. Blair himself left Oxford University with a second class degree. They have four children, Euan, Nicky, Kathryn, and Leo.

Adolf Hitler
Adolf Hitler (April 20, 1889 in Braunau am Inn, Austria - April 30, 1945 in Berlin) was a German politician who was the leader of the Nazi party. He became Chancellor of Germany in 1933 and became dictator of Germany in 1934. He called himself "Führer" (leader) of the German Empire. He ruled until 1945 when he killed himself.
When Hitler was ruler, Nazis created the dictatorship of the so-called Third Reich. In 1933, they blocked out all the other political parties. Their enemies were killed or arrested. Hitler and his men also took the civil rights of European Jews and other ethnic, religious or political minorities. In what is called The Holocaust, the Nazis killed many of them. They also started World War II, which destroyed Europe. Because of Hitler, at least 44 million people were killed, about 6 million of them were Jews.
Hitler's Life story.
Adolf Hitler was born on April 20, 1889 at Braunau am Inn, a small town near Linz in the province of Upper Austria, close to the German border, in what was then Austria-Hungary.
Hitler failed high school admission tests in Linz twice. He became interested in the anti-Semitic (anti-Jewish), Pan-German teachings of Professor
Leopold Poetsch.
In 1907, Hitler's mother died and because of that he was very depressed.
In 1909, Hitler went to Vienna to study art. He was not good enough for the Academy of Arts.
In 1913, Hitler was 24 years old. At that time, all young Austrian men had to join the army. Hitler did not like the Austrian army, so he left Austria for Germany. He lived in a German city, Munich.
In 1914, Hitler joined the German army. He fought for Germany in the First World War. He was wounded in the war. The government gave him the Iron Cross as a reward for fighting hard in the war.
In 1919, Hitler joined a small political party called the German Workers Party. He soon won the support of the party members. Two years later, he became the leader of the party. He renamed the party the National Socialist German Workers Party. It became known as the Nazi Party.
In 1923, Hitler tried to overthrow the Weimar Republic government (1918-36) in the Beer Hall Putsch. The putsch failed. The government killed 16 of his men (the 16 dead men were later declared saints in Nazi ideology). They also put Hitler in the Landsberg Prison. They said that he would stay in prison for 5 years, but they let him leave after 9 months. While he was in prison, he wrote a book with the help of his friend Rudolf Hess. At first, Hitler wanted to call the book "Four and a Half Years of Struggle against Lies, Stupidity and Cowardice". In the end, he called the book "Mein Kampf" or My Struggle. The book said that Germany would take land from Poland and Russia. It also had many anti-semitic comments, and called for the murder and expulsion of Jews from Germany.
In 1933 Hitler was elected into the German government. He ended freedom of speech, and put his enemies in jail or killed them. He did not allow any other party except the Nazi party. Hitler and his propaganda minister, Joseph Goebbels, spread extreme nationalism within Germany. All media had to praise the Nazis. Also, more people were born because Hitler wanted more people of the "master race" (by that he meant Aryan, or those with blue eyes and blond hair). He made Germany a totalitarian Nazi state. Aryanism was a myth, but Hitler and his friends believed it. They thought that people like the Jews and Slavs were inferior (less valuable) and should be killed.
World War II.
Hitler started World War II by ordering the German Army to invade Poland. His army conquered most of the Europe including Poland, France, and a large part of the Soviet Union. During the war he ordered the Nazis to kill many people, including women and children. The Nazis killed 6 million Jews, in The Holocaust. Other people that the Nazis killed were Roma (Gypsies), homosexuals, Slavs such as Russians and Poles, and his political opponents.
Finally the other countries in the world worked together to defeat Germany. Hitler lost all of the land that he had taken, and millions of Germans were killed. At the end of World War II, Hitler wanted everyone to die, including himself. He committed suicide (killed himself) in Berlin in 1945.

Ronald Reagan
Ronald Wilson Reagan (February 6, 1911 - June 5, 2004) was the 40th (1981-1989) President of the United States and the 33rd Governor of California. Reagan was born in Tampico, Illinois. Reagan was also an actor in films before entering politics. Reagan had a successful career in Hollywood as a second-rank leading man. He was the oldest elected President (69 years, 349 days). He is known as the "Great Communicator" because he was a good public speaker.
Childhood.
Ronald "Dutch" Reagan was born on February 6, 1911 to Jack and Nelle Reagan. He was their second child. His father was a Roman Catholic, and his mother was a Protestant. While Ronald Reagan was a child, his family moved to different places in Illinois. His family was very poor and Ronald did not have much as a child. In high school Reagan loved to act.
Radio career.
After Reagan finished college he became a sports announcer at WHO. He was known for being good at recreating baseball games and making them interesting. At this time all they would get is the scores so it would have been very hard for someone to come up with what happened in the game. He was fired for not telling people who the sponsors were but was quickly re-hired because they could not find anyone as good as him to re-create the baseball games. He would send some money back to his parents to help them out because it was the Great Depression.
Governor of California.
At the age of 54 Ronald Reagan ran as a Republican against the then governor, Pat Brown. When Reagan was governor he brought the state out of debt, made tougher water laws, and had the government give more money to the most poor. He ran for a second term and won. Ronald Reagan was a very popular governor.
President.
As president, Ronald Reagan made the economy more free, made the army bigger, and is given credit for ending the Cold War. Ronald Reagan believed that the government should be small, not big - this means that the government should not interfere in people's lives very much or interfere with what businesses do. Reagan still remains one of the most popular presidents in American history.
Notable speeches.
Reagan's speech was delivered at the Brandenburg Gate in what was then West Berlin, Germany on June 12, 1987. In the speech he expressed the desire of the western allies to make peace with the Soviet Union. Referring to the Soviet's SS-20 nuclear weapons, Reagan spoke of the possibility of "eliminating, for the first time, an entire class of nuclear weapons from the face of the earth." The title of this speech comes from a challenge delivered in the speech to then General Secretary of the {USSR] Mikhail Gorbachev. Reagan challenged Gorbachev, if he was serious about peace, to remove open East Berlin and remove the restrictions on travel. Referring to the Brandenburg Gate and the Berlin Wall he said,
Audio and text of this speech is available.
Reagan's speech was delivered to the National Association of Evangelicals in Orlando, Florida. It is his first recorded use of the phrase. Speaking about the nuclear arms race he depicted the Soviet Union as evil.
Audio and text of this speech is available.

Gerhard Schröder
Gerhard Schröder was Chancellor of Germany from 1998 to 2005.
He was born on April 7, 1944 in Mossenberg (North Rhine-Westphalia).
After school he learned retail sales in a Lemgo from 1958 to 1961.
After that he made his abitur (highest school exam in Germany) in Bielefeld. Then he studied laws in Göttingen.
After that he worked as a lawyer.
He joined the Social Democratic Party of Germany in 1963 and became chairman of its youth organisation in 1978.
In 1986 he became member of the State Parliament of Lower Saxony.
In 1990 he was elected as Prime-Minister of Lower Saxony.
He became the chancellor of Germany in 1998. After elections in 2005, he was replaced by Angela Merkel. He is a member of the SPD (Social Democratic Party of Germany).

Saddam Hussein
Saddam Hussein Abd al-Majid al-Tikriti (April 28 1937 - December 30 2006), was the President of Iraq, from July 16 1979 to April 9 2003, when he was removed from his position during the War in Iraq led by the United States.
Saddam as a young man.
Saddam Hussein was born in the village of Al-Awja, in the Tikrit in Iraq. He never knew his father, Hussein 'Abd al-Majid, who disappeared five months before Saddam was born. Shortly before Saddam was born, Saddam's twelve-year-old brother died of cancer, leaving his mother very depressed in the final months of the pregnancy. She tried to kill herself near the end of the pregnancy, and did not want to care for Saddam when he was born. Saddam was sent to the family of an uncle, Khairallah Tulfah, until he was three.
At ten, Saddam ran away from the family to return to live with his uncle, who was a devout Sunni Muslim, in Baghdad. According to Saddam, in 1957, at the age of 20, Saddam became part of the Ba'ath Party.
Saddam's rise in the Ba'ath party.
A year after Saddam had joined the Ba'ath party, army officers led by General Abdul Karim Qassim got rid of Faisal II of Iraq. The Ba'athists opposed the new regime, and in 1959, Saddam was involved in the attempted murder of Prime Minister Qassim. Saddam was shot in the leg, but managed to get away to Syria, later he moved to Egypt. He was sentenced to death. In exile he attended the University of Cairo law school.
Army officers, including some with the Ba'ath party, came to power in Iraq in a military coup in 1963. However, the new regime was kicked out quickly. Saddam returned to Iraq, but was imprisoned in 1964 when an anti-Ba'ath group led by Abdul Rahman Arif took power. He escaped from jail in 1967 and became one of the leading members of the party.
Saddam gains power.
In 1976 Saddam was appointed as a general in the Iraqi army. He quickly became the most important person of the regime. He slowly began to gain more power over Iraq's government and the Ba'ath party. As Iraq's weak and old President Ahmed Hassan al-Bakr became more unable to do the duties of his office, Saddam began to become an larger important role as the head of the Iraqi government. He soon became the creator of Iraq's foreign policy and represented the nation in all diplomatic situations.
Iraq-Iran War.
In 1979 Iran's Shah Mohammad Reza Pahlavi was overthrown by the Islamic Revolution,giving way to an Islamic republic led by the Ayatollah Khomeini. The influence of revolutionary Shi'ite Islam grew in the region, particularly in countries with large Shi'ite populations, especially Iraq. Saddam feared that radical Islamic ideas—hostile to his rule— were rapidly spreading inside his country among the most of the Shi'ite people
There had also been bitter rivalry between Saddam and Khomeini since the 1970s. Khomeini, having been exiled from Iran in 1964, took up living in Iraq, at the Shi'ite holy city of An Najaf. There he involved himself with Iraqi Shi'ites and developed a strong, worldwide religious and political following. Under pressure from the Shah, who had agreed to a rapprochement between Iraq and Iran in 1975, Saddam agreed to expel Khomeini in 1978. After the Islamic Revolution, Khomeini maybe regarded toppling Saddam's government as a goal second only to consolidating power in Iran.
After Khomeini gained power, skirmishes between Iraq and revolutionary Iran occurred for ten months over the sovereignty of the disputed Shatt al-Arab waterway, which divides the two countries. Iraq and Iran entered into warfare on September 22, 1980. The pretext for war with Iran was this territorial dispute, but the war was more likely an attempt by Saddam, helped by both the United States and the Soviet Union, to have Iraq form a bulwark against the expansion of radical Iranian-style revolution.
In the first days of the war, there was heavy ground fighting around major ports as Iraq launched an attack on Iran's oil-rich, Arab-populated province of Khuzestan. After making some gains, Iraq's troops began to suffer losses from human-wave attacks by Iran. By 1982 Iraq was looking to end the war.
During the war, Iraq used chemical weapons against Iranian forces and Kurdish separatists. On March 16, 1988 Iraqi troops, on orders from Saddam to stop a Kurdish uprising, attacked the Kurdish town of Halabjah with a mix of poison gas and nerve agents killing 5000 people, mostly women and children.
Saddam reached out to other Arab governments for cash and political help. The Iranians, hoping to bring down Saddam's secular government and start a Shi'ite rebellion in Iraq, refused a cease-fire until 1988.
The bloody eight-year war ended in a tie. There were hundreds of thousands of casualties. Perhaps 1.7 million died on both sides. Both economies, previously healthy and expanding, were left in ruins.
Saddam was also stuck with a debt of roughly $75 billion. Borrowing money from the U.S. was making Iraq into its client state, embarrassing a strongman who had sought to define and dominate Arab nationalism. Saddam also borrowed a large amount of money from other Arab states during the 1980s to fight Iran. Faced with rebuilding Iraq's infrastructure, Saddam desperately sought out cash once again, this time for postwar reconstruction.
Tensions with Kuwait.
Saddam was pressuring Kuwait to forgive its share of his debt, some $30 billion. He argued that since the struggle with Iran had been fought for the benefit of the other Gulf Arab states as much as for Iraq that a share of Iraqi debt should be forgiven.
Saddam had pushed oil-exporting countries to raise oil prices and cut back production, but on top of Kuwaiti refusals to do so, Kuwait helped spearhead OPEC's opposition to the production cuts that Saddam had requested. Kuwait was pumping large amounts of oil, and keeping prices low, when Iraq needed to sell high-priced oil from its wells to pay off a huge debt.
Of course, the colossal extent of Kuwaiti oil reserves intensified tensions in the region. The oil reserves of Kuwait (with a population of a mere 2 million next to Iraq's 25) were roughly equal to those of Iraq. Taken together Iraq and Kuwait sat on top of 20 percent of the world's known oil reserves.
The Kuwaiti monarchy further angered Saddam by drilling oil out of Iraqi wells. At the time, Saddam's regime was not know as a pariah state. Saddam complained about the drilling to the U.S. State Department. Although this had gone on for years, Saddam now needed oil money to get rid of a looming economic crisis. Saddam still had an experienced and well-equipped army, which he used to influence regional affairs. He later ordered troops to the Iraq-Kuwait border.
As Iraq-Kuwait relations rapidly grew worse, Saddam was getting conflicting information about how the U.S. would respond to an invasion. Washington had been taking measures to start a good relationship with Iraq for roughly a decade. The Reagan administration gave Saddam roughly $40 billion worth of arms in the 1980s to fight Iran, nearly all of it on credit. The U.S. also sent billions of dollars of food and arms to Saddam to keep him from forming a strong alliance with the Soviets.
The U.S. ambassador to Iraq, April Glaspie, met with Saddam in an meeting on July 25, where the Iraqi leader said he wanted to continue talks. U.S. officials attempted to maintain a conciliatory line with Iraq, indicating that while Bush and Baker did not want force to be used, they would not take any position on the Iraqi-Kuwait dispute and did not want to become involved. Later, Iraq and Kuwait then met for a final negotiation session, which failed. Saddam then sent his troops into Kuwait.
Gulf War.
In August 2, 1990, Saddam invaded and Kuwait, thus making an international crisis. The invasion of Kuwait gave Iraq, with its own substantial oil fields, control of 20 percent of the Persian Gulf oil. The U.S. helped Saddam Hussein in the war with Iran, but with Iraq's take over of the oil-rich emirate of Kuwait in August of 1990 the United States led a United Nations attempt that drove Saddam from Kuwait in February 1991.
Cooperation between the United States and the Soviet Union made possible the passage of resolutions in the United Nations Security Council and gave Iraq a deadline to leave Kuwait.
Saddam ignored the Security Council deadline. Helped by the Security Council, a U.S.-led coalition launched missile attacks on Iraq, January 16, 1991. The United States and a group of allies it had hastily rounded up, including Egypt, Syria and Saudi Arabia, made Saddam's army move from Kuwait in January 1991. ("see" Gulf War).
Israel, though subjected to attack by Iraqi missiles, refrained from retaliating in order not to anger Arab states into leaving the coalition. But Saddam had focused attention on the Palestinian problem by promising to make his forces leave from Kuwait if Israel would leave the occupied territories in the West Bank, the Golan Heights, and the Gaza Strip. Saddam's proposal further split the Arab world, pitting U.S.- and Western-supported Arab states against the Palestinians.
175,000 Iraqis were taken prisoner and the dead were estimated to be 85,000. As part of the cease-fire agreement, Iraq agreed to get rid of all poison gas and germ weapons and allow UN observers to inspect the sites.
After the War.
All of the different religions and the violence of the war that this had created, caused after-war rebellions. After the war, fighting between Shi'ite Muslims, Kurds, and dissident military units was bad. This was a problem to Saddam's rule. Saddam acted by stopping all rebellions in their tracks, especially in the North.
The United States did not help the rebellions, although they had wanted Iraqis to rise up against Saddam. Turkey - a friend of the US - was against Kurdish independence, which would have stopped the fighting. This was because the Saudis and old-fashioned Arab states were afraid of a change like what happened in Iran with the Shiites. Saddam survived these problems that happened right after the war. He was then left completely in control of Iraq. The country never recovered from the Gulf War, economically or with the army. Hussein often showed his "proof" that Iraq had won the Gulf War, and the USA had lost. This made Saddam popular in many parts of the Arab world.
Saddam liked to show himself as a strict Muslim. This was to calm down the religious parts of the society. Some parts of the Sharia law were brought back. This included the 2001 law imposing the death penalty for homosexuality (gay people.) The phrase "Allahu Akbar" ("God is great"), in Saddam's handwriting, was added to the Iraq national flag.
1991-2003.
Relations between the United States and Iraq remained tense following the Gulf War. The U.S. launched a missile attacked aimed at Iraq's intelligence headquarters in Baghdad June 26, 1993, believing evidence that Iraq had sponsored a plot to kill former President George Bush.
The UN placed a trade embargo on Iraq, blocking Iraqi oil exports. This caused hardship in Iraq and almost destroyed the Iraqi economy and state infrastructure. Only smuggling across the Syrian border, and humanitarian aid kept Iraq from crisis. Later, limited amounts of income from the United Nations oil-for-food program started flowing into Iraq. On December 9, 1996 the United Nations allowed Baghdad to begin selling limited amounts of oil for food and medicine.
U.S. officials continued to accuse Saddam of violating the terms of the Gulf War's cease fire, by developing weapons of mass destruction and other banned weaponry, and violating the UN-imposed sanctions and "no fly zones." Isolated military strikes by U.S. and British forces continued on Iraq, the largest being Operation Desert Fox in 1998.
After two years of intermittent activity, U.S. and British warplanes struck harder at sites near Baghdad in February, 2001.
Saddam's base of Tikriti tribesmen, family members, and other supporters was divided after the war, and in the following years, adding to the regime's increasingly repressive and arbitrary nature. Domestic repression inside Iraq grew worse, and Saddam's sons, Uday Hussein and Qusay Hussein, became increasingly powerful and carried out a private reign of terror. They likely had a leading hand when, in August 1995, two of Saddam Hussein's sons-in-law, who held high positions in the Iraqi military, defected to Jordan. Both were killed after returning to Iraq the following February.
2003 invasion of Iraq.
The main reason for the invasion was the claim by the Bush administration that Saddam has WMD.
He was seen as a major threat to Western allies such as oil-rich Saudi Arabia and Israel, to Western oil supplies from the Gulf states, and to Middle East stability generally. Bush's successor, U.S. President Bill Clinton (1993-2001), maintained sanctions and made occasional air strikes in the "Iraqi no-fly zones" or other restrictions, in the hope that Saddam would be overthrown by his many political enemies.
The domestic political equation changed in the U.S. after the September 11, 2001 attacks, which added to the influence of the neoconservative faction in the presidential administration and throughout Washington. In his January 2002 state-of-the-union message to Congress, George W. Bush (the son of George H.W. Bush) spoke of an "axis of evil" comprising Iran, North Korea, and Iraq.
As the war was looming on February 24, 2003, Saddam Hussein talked with CBS News anchor Dan Rather for more than three hours—his first interview with a U.S. reporter in over a decade. CBS aired the taped interview later that week.
The Iraqi government and military collapsed in three weeks of the beginning of the U.S.-led 2003 invasion of Iraq on March 20. The United States made at least two attempts to kill Saddam with targeted air strikes, but both failed to hit their target. By the beginning of April Coalition forces had much of Iraq. The resistance of the much-weakened Iraqi Army either crumbled or shifted to guerrilla tactics, and it appeared that Saddam had lost control of Iraq. He was last seen in a video which showed him in the Baghdad suburbs surrounded by supporters. When Baghdad fell to the Coalition on April 9, Saddam was nowhere to be found.
Saddam was also accused by the Bush administration of being part of Al Qaeda. That has never been proven and there is no evidence Saddam ever had any ties. People in the Bush administration, including the Vice President Dick Cheney will forever claim otherwise. Mostly to justify the largely perceived illegal invasion.
Pursuit and capture.
Even when Baghdad was taken over, and most of the fighting had stopped, people still didn't know where Saddam was. For a few weeks, some people said they saw Saddam, and some videotapes of Saddam talking came out, but still nobody knows if they were true or not.
Although Saddam was placed at the top of the "most-wanted list," he could not be found, even when the other leaders of the Iraqi regime were arrested. His sons and political heirs, Uday and Qusay, were killed in July 2003 in a clash with U.S. forces after a tip from an Iraqi.
On December 14, 2003, the Islamic Republic News Agency (IRNA) of Iran first reported that Saddam Hussein had been arrested. These reports were soon confirmed by other members of the Governing Council, by U.S. military sources, and by British Prime Minister Tony Blair. In a press conference in Baghdad, shortly afterwards, the U.S. Civil Administrator in Iraq Paul Bremer officially announced the capture of Saddam by saying, "Ladies and gentlemen, we got him!" He was found at around 8:30 PM Iraqi time on December 13, in an underground "spider hole" at a farmhouse in ad-Dawr near his home town Tikrit, in what was called Operation Red Dawn.
The first photos taken of Saddam after the soldiers found him didn't look like the photos taken when he was president of Iraq. He had grown long hair and a long beard. Later on, he cut off his hair and beard. The DNA tests came back and showed that he really was Saddam Hussein. People who talked with him after the soldiers found him said he was healthy, and wanted to talk to people and do what they told him to do. Paul Bremer said that Saddam would have a trial, but that he didn't know yet what kind of trial.
The Iraqi Special Tribunal was in charge of Saddam Hussein's trial, and the trials of some people that helped him to be president of Iraq.
In November, 2006, Saddam Hussein was found guilty of 148 murders, and on December 30, 2006, he was put to death. The hanging, recorded by officials of the government, and secretly recorded by a member of the witnesses with a cell phone camera - with sound - showed Saddam being calm, as he was prepared for his final moments. Both witnesses and exectutioners could be heard teasing him as the rope was placed on his head, and he was put on the trap door. He was in the middle of a prayer, when the trap door beneath him opened, and his life ended. Later pictures and live video of Saddam's taunting and execution, of his dead corpse were shown on many internet sites.
Personal.
Saddam has been married three times. His first marriage was to his first cousin Sajida Talfah. This union with the eldest daughter of Khairallah Talfah, Saddam's uncle, produced two sons, (Uday Saddam Hussein and Qusay Hussein) and three daughters, Rana, Raghad and Hala. Sajida was put under house arrest in early 1997, along with daughters Raghad and Rana, because of suspicions of their involvement in an attempted assassination on Uday in December 12, 1996. General Adnan Khairallah Tuffah, who was Sajida's brother and Saddam Hussein's boyhood friend, was allegedly executed because of his growing popularity.
Saddam Hussein also married two other women: Samira Shahbandar, whom he married in 1986 after forcing her husband to divorce her (she is said to be his favourite wife), and Nidal al-Hamdani, the general manager of the Solar Energy Research Center in the Council of Scientific Research, whose husband apparently was also persuaded to divorce his wife.
In August 1995, Rana and her husband Hussein Kamel al Majid and Raghad and her husband, Saddam Kamel Majid, defected to Jordan, taking their children with them. They returned to Iraq when they received assurances that Saddam Hussein would pardon them. Within three days of their return in February 1996, both of the Majid brothers were executed.
Saddam's daughter Hala is married to Jamal Mustafa, the deputy head of Iraq's Tribal Affairs Office. Neither has been known to be involved in politics. Another cousin was Ali Hassan al-Majid, also known in the United States as "Chemical Ali," who was accused of ordering the use of poison gas in 1988.
Death.
Saddam was scheduled to die on Thursday night, December 28, 2006. Because of last minute legal appeals in the American federal court, Saddam's execution came about 40 hours later. Saddam Hussein was hanged on December 30, 2006, at 6:05 AM, Iraqi time. Saddam refused to wear a hood. The execution was performed by the Shiites. He was pronounced dead at 6:10 AM Baghdad time. Baghdad had curfews on those days, policy regulation required people to be off the streets by evening. His motionless body was allowed to dangle on the rope for about 10 minutes. Many Shiites danced around his corpse.
Notes.
2 See PBS Frontline (2003), "The survival of Saddam: secrets of his life and leadership: interview with Saïd K. Aburish" at.
3 From Elisabeth Bumiller's interview of Jerrold M. Post, the founder of the Center for the Analysis of Personality and Political Behavior at the CIA in the "New York Times' (May 15, 2004) on the importance of events during Saddam Hussein's youth. It can be read online at.
8 The full text of Bush's 2002 State of the Union address can be read online (BBC News) at.

Vladimir Lenin
Vladimir Ilyich Ulyanov (Russian: Влади́мир Ильи́ч Улья́нов, IPA: vla'dʲimʲr ilj'itʂ ul'janʌf), better known as (Ленин)) (April 22, 1870 - January 21, 1924) was a Russian revolutionary and the leader of the Bolsheviks party. He was the first leader of the Soviet Union. Soviet Union is the other name of the Union of the Soviet Socialist Republics (USSR). Lenin is also known as the maker of Leninism, which was later called Marxism-Leninism by Josif Stalin.
At school, Lenin was very good at the Latin and Greek languages. But in 1887 he was thrown out from Kazan State University because he was too radical and protested against the Tsar, who was the king of Russia at that time. In that year, Lenin's brother Alexander Ulyanov was hanged for his part in a bomb plot to kill Tsar Alexander III. Lenin continued to study by himself, and in 1891 he got a license to be a lawyer.
While he studied Law in the then Russian capital, St. Petersburg, he learned about the thoughts of Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels. Because Marxism was not allowed in Russia, Lenin was arrested and put in prison for a year, then he was sent to exile in Siberia.
In July 1898, when he was still in Siberia, Lenin married a socialist woman, Nadezhda Krupskaya. In 1899, he wrote a book. It was called "The Development of Capitalism in Russia". In 1900, Lenin was released from Siberia.
After he was allowed to leave, Lenin travelled around Europe. He began to publish a Marxist newspaper called "Iskra", the Russian word for "spark". He became a leading member of the Russian Social Democratic Labour Party, or RSDLP.
In 1903, Lenin had a dispute with an other leader of the RSDLP, Julius Martov. This dispute, which was about the organization of the Party, divided the party in two. Lenin wanted a strict, centralised, and disciplined model. Martov wanted a less strict, less centralised one. Martov's helpers became known as Mensheviks (meaning "those who are less"). Lenin's supporters were called Bolsheviks ("those who are more").
Lenin went to Finland in 1907, because it was safer for Marxists in Finland than in Russia. He travelled around Europe and visited many socialist meetings and events. During this time he lived in different places like London, Paris and, during World War I, in Geneva. At the beginning of the war, a big meeting, theSecond International that included the Bolsheviks, broke down, when various member Parties helped their countries in the war, going away from the Marxist idea of internationalism. Lenin and the Bolsheviks were one of only a handful of groups and people who stood against the war for Marxist reasons.
1917.
After Tsar Nicholas II was removed from office during the The February Revolution, Lenin went back to Russia. He became an important Bolshevik leader, and made public the "April Theses" about what he said were mistakes of the new middle class government of Kerensky, and he called for a Workers' Revolution to overthrow the government. Lenin also talked about the mistakes of many members of the Bolshevik Central Committee (including Zinoviev, Kamenev and Stalin) who helped the government to continue to fight the war against Germany, against the wishes of the Leninists.
During July 1917, when people said that Lenin had got money from the Germans; he was afraid and had to flee to Finland.
In October 1917, the Bolsheviks under Lenin and Trotsky headed the Petrograd Soviet and other Soviets all over Russia in a taking of power from Kerensky's Government, known as the October Revolution ended up in the making of the first Marxist Communist State in world history.
On November 8, 1917, Lenin was chosen Chairman of the Council of People's Commissars by the Russian Soviet Congress. This means that he was the leader of Russia.
Because he was shocked by the German invasion, he signed the Treaty of Brest-Litovsk. Russia lost a lot of land, but the Germans stopped the invasion.
During the Russian Civil War, Lenin started war communism. But after the war, Lenin brought the New Economic Policy. Some private enterprise was allowed, but not much at all. Businessmen, known as nepmen, can own only light industry, not heavy.
After Kaplan shot Lenin, he started having many strokes. By May 1922, he was badly paralysed. After a stroke in March 1923, he could not speak or move. Lenin's fourth stroke killed him in January 1924.
The city of St. Petersburg had been renamed by the Tsar to Petrograd in 1914, but was renamed Leningrad in Lenin's honour in 1924. But after the end of soviet socialism, in 1991, it was called St. Petersburg again.
Before Lenin died, he said he wanted to be buried beside his mother. When he died, the communists let the people of Russia come to look at him. Because people kept coming, they decided not to bury him. A building was built, in Red Square, Moscow, over Lenin's body, so that people could see him. Lenin's body was mummied (became mummy). It is called the Lenin mausoleum (a mausoleum is a building for dead people). It is a situated in Moscow, Russia, and many people still go there to see him.

Lady Jane Grey
Lady Jane Grey was born in October 12, 1537 at her family home of Bradgate Park, Leicestershire, England.
Family.
She was the daughter of Henry Grey, Duke of Suffolk, and Lady Frances Brandon. Frances Brandon (July 16, 1517 – November 20, 1559), the daughter of Henry VIII's sister, Mary. Jane had two younger sisters, Katherine (b. 1540) and Mary (b. 1545). Jane's exact date of birth is not known. She was probably named after Jane Seymour (c. 1508 or 1509 – October 24, 1537)).
Early Life.
Jane's parents were very strict and often abused Jane at a young age. This was probably because they were disappointed that Jane was not a boy. Her bold and cruel mother, Frances was upset because Jane was calm, shy, and not interested in sports. Jane was educated at about four. But if she messed up on her studies or did other common problems her mother would slap her or beat her. She found love with her nurse Mrs. Ellen but otherwise lived a sad childhood.
In 1545 or 1546, when Jane was nine, she was sent to Court to learn manners with Henry VIII's sixth wife and eventual widow, Catherine Parr. Jane liked Catherine a lot and found love with her, which she had not received from her parents. It was obvious that Catherine liked Jane back.
Jane also found friendship with her cousin and king Edward VI. They often studied together.
Education.
Jane was well educated as a child and learned to read in Latin, Greek, French and Italian, as well as English. Later in her life, she also learned Hebrew.
In 1549, when Jane was 12 years old, John Aylmer became her tutor. (Before that, John Aylmer taught Jane but Dr. Harding served as her tutor.) Jane liked Aylmer a lot because he was nice and at times funny. This was a big change from her parents. Some scholars also believe that Aylmer fell in love with Jane while teaching her, because of what he wrote in some of his letters to her. This fact is unknown though.
Early uses.
Jane's parents also wanted to use her to gain power. This was especially true in her mother, who was greedy.
After the births of her sisters Catherine in 1540 and Mary in 1545, Jane's parents tried to marry her off to her cousin King Edward VI. They let Catherine Parr's new husband, Thomas Seymour try to arrange a marriage. It is likely that King Edward loved Jane. However, he decided to arranged a marriage with a foreign princess.
In 1548, Jane was sent to Chelsea to be with Catherine Parr and Thomas Seymour.Catherine Parr became pregnant that year and they went to Sudeley Castle in June of 1548. In August, Catherine Parr died of childbirth in 1548. Jane served as chief mourner in Catherine's funeral.
In 1549, Thomas Seymour was arrested on charges of treason (or being disloyal). Jane was sent back to her angered parents. They knew that their hopes of marriage to the king was gone. They punished her badly for this, even though it was not her fault.
Youth.
In 1551 Jane's mother, Frances, lost her two half-brothers (they died of the Sweating Sickness). Since Frances's father was dead, she became Duchess of Suffolk. Jane's father also became Duke of Suffolk. In the same year John Dudley was made the Duke of Northumberland and the chief councilor to Edward VI of England. This made Dudley a powerful man.
John Dudley's plot.
In April 1552 Edward became sick with the measles and soon caught tuberculosis as well. By next year, Edward was so ill that he was weak and spitting up blood or something that was greenish-yellow. It was obvious that he was going to die soon.
Dudley was an ambitious man and realised that if either of Edward's half-sisters, Mary or Elizabeth, gained the throne, he would not be powerful anymore and may be executed. Dudley plotted with Jane's equally ambitious parents and arranged that Jane became his ward, and also that she marry his son, Guildford Dudley. Jane's mother decided to give up her claim to be queen for Jane. This did not mean that Frances was any less greedy, however. This meant that Jane would become Frances and Dudley's puppet. Now Jane would be the next in line to the throne if the rights of the princesses Mary and Elizabeth were ignored.
Marriage.
When Jane's mother and father told her that Jane was going to get married, Jane refused. She said that Guildford was ugly, stupid, and arrogant. She also hated John Dudley. When Jane refused, Frances and Henry swore at Jane and slapped her. This did not work, so Frances gave Jane a brutal whipping. Finally, Jane agreed.
The wedding between Jane and Guildford took place on 25 May, 1553. This became a triple marriage because Jane's sister, Katherine, was married at this time to Lord Herbert and Guildford's sister, Katherine, was also married to Lord Hastings.
At first, they were all forbidden to "consummate" (or to have sexual intercourse) their marriages. This probably made Katherine Grey and William Herbert unhappy. It is not known if they liked each other, but it was obvious that they wanted to consummate the marriage.
On the other hand, Jane and Guildford hated each other. They ignored each other for most of the time. But they consummated the marriage later (Some scholars think that Guildford did it so violently that Jane described it as rape).
Accession.
On July 6, 1553, King Edward VI died. Dudley's plan to make Jane queen was starting to unfold. Edward's death was kept secret for a few days until Jane could be brought to be proclaimed queen.
Jane was told by her parents and John Dudley that she was queen. She became sick with fright and fainted. She refused to take the crown.
"The crown is not my right. It pleaseth me not. The Lady Mary is the rightful heir," Jane said. Her parents swore at her and John Dudley told her that she "doth wrong to herself and her house". Under pressure, Jane finally relented. But she never forgave herself for doing this.
Meanwhile, news was spreading the Jane had been proclaimed the new queen. Although the people liked Jane, they loved Mary and Elizabeth more. They also hated John Dudley. In East Anglia, Mary was gaining support and planning to march into London. Dudley tried to enforce a counter-attack but to no avail. On July 19 Mary became queen. Jane was queen for nine days.
Imprisonment.
Jane returned all the crown jewels and clothes. She was then brought into the Tower of London. There, she was kept in a cell for the next few months. She was allowed to walk in the garden, however. She wrote many letters and read many books while at the tower of London. She wrote a letter to Queen Mary saying that she never wanted the crown.
Queen Mary believed Jane and refused to execute her cousin. Many people pressured Mary, but she was stubborn. She still ordered that a trial be held for traditional purposes. Jane was found guilty but the Queen pardoned her.
But the next year, 1554, a group of rebels under Thomas Wyatt, including Jane's father Henry Grey, led a rebellion against Queen Mary because she was planning to marry prince Phillip II of Spain. It was quickly put down. Although Jane had nothing to do with it and Mary was didn't want to kill her cousin, her advisors told her that Phillip would only come if Jane was killed. So, with a heavy heart (sadly), Queen Mary signed the death warrant. Jane was going to be beheaded.
Effects.
When Jane was told that her head was going to be cut off, she was very scared. Nonetheless, she was happy that her "sad and woeful days" of life were finally coming to an end.
Meanwhile, Mary still didn't want to kill her cousin. So she sent a Catholic priest Dr. Feckenham to try to convert Jane to Catholicism. That way, Jane wouldn't be a threat. But Jane was a firm Protestant and refused to become a Catholic. Jane's execution was postponed from February 9 to February 12 to try and make her a Catholic. The night before the execution, Jane wrote many letters to her family and prepared her neck for the block. The next morning, her hair was tied back and she watched Guilford go very unwillingly to the block. Then, nervously, it was her turn.
Execution.
On February 12, 1554 at the Tower of London, Jane was sent to the scaffold. She calmly climbed the scaffold and said a speech. She said the Psalm 51 in "the most devout manner". She then knelt by the block and tied a piece of cloth around her eyes.
When the executioner told her to put her head on the block, she reached out but could not find the block since she was very nervous. She cried for help until someone grabbed her hands and helped her find the block. Jane then put her neck above the block and slowly lowered it onto the block, pressed her neck against the wood and fit her chin in the hold. Then she brought her arms around her. Before she was executed she cried out "Lord, into thy hands, I commend my spirit!"
Jane is beheaded.
The crowd watched as the executioner raised the axe high in the air. Jane was shivering badly but her neck stayed perfectly still. Then, the executioner quickly swung the axe down perfectly at the middle of Jane's neck, which was severed in a single stroke. Jane's severed head fell to the straw in front of the block while huge amounts of blood splattered across the scaffold. The executioner then grabbed Jane's head by her red hair and lifted it up to show the crowd. He shouted "So perish all the Queen's enemies! Behold the head of a traitor!"
Burial.
After the crowd left, the blood was removed, and Jane's body and it was brought to the church St. Peter ad Vincula. Since the church had just become Catholic and Jane was Protestant, they had to get permission from Queen Mary to bury her. Jane's headless body lay unexposed for four hours until her maids finally were allowed to prepare her body for burial. Jane's body was buried between former Queens Anne Boleyn and Catherine Howard. It is unknown what happened to her severed head.

Louis XIV of France
Louis XIV (Louis-Dieudonné) (5 September 1638–1 September 1715) was the King of France and King of Navarre from 14 May 1643 until his death.
While he became king on May 14, 1643, he was only four years old so he had to wait 16 years until he could rule. He was 21 years old when he started ruling.
Louis' parents were Louis XIII and Anne of Austria. Because Louis XIV was too young to rule, his mother ruled France with Cardinal Mazarin until Louis turned 21. He was known as the Sun King, because he believed his splendor and power was as bright as the sun.
Louis revoked, or ended, the Treaty of Nantes. This Treaty said that there would be freedom of religion in France. This means that everybody in France could worship the way they wanted to. When Louis revoked the Treaty of Nantes, he said that all people in France must be Catholic. Because of this, 50 thousand Protestant workers left France and went to America, England, and Germany.
While Louis ruled, France became the most powerful country in all of Europe, and many other countries copied the French people's way of dressing and thinking. Louis found a hunting lodge at Versailles, and changed it into a palace for him and his noblemen to live in. He also encouraged people to explore Canada, and tried very hard to make France larger. Louis spent a lot of money on wars, and France went into deep debt because of him.
French kings after Louis XIV taxed a lot of money from the poor people to try and pay off the debt. This is part of what led to the French Revolution.

George Washington
George Washington (February 22, 1732 – December 14, 1799) was the first President of the United States from 1789 to 1797. He was also the commander of all American forces during the American Revolutionary War.
Early years.
His mother was Mary Ball and his father was Augustine Washington. They were teachers at the local university. They lived in Virginia. As a child, Washington did not attend school for very long.
Before the Revolutionary War.
Washington was a farmer like his father. His large farm, or plantation, was called Mount Vernon.
Washington began his army career during the French and Indian War. He first was a messenger for Virginia. He later led troops against the French. The British did not think soldiers from the colonies were as good as they were, so Washington went home and started to farm again.
In 1759, Washington married Martha Custis Washington. They did not have any children.
The Revolution.
Washington wanted the Thirteen Colonies to be independent. Washington was chosen by the Second Continental Congress to be the commanding general of the Continental Army. Washington led the army until the end of the war in 1783. He is noted for leading troops across the Delaware River on Christmas Day, 1777, in a surprise attack on German mercenaries at Trenton, New Jersey. The British had many more troops and more supplies than Washington. However, Washington kept his troops together. He did not win many battles, but he never let the British destroy his army. With the help of the French navy, Washington made the British surrender at Yorktown, Virginia in 1781. The war officially ended with the Treaty of Paris in 1783.
After the war.
When the Revolutionary war ended, Washington went home to Mount Vernon. He wanted the colonies to have a strong government. Washington was voted president of the Constitutional Convention in 1787. Washington wanted the states to ratify the Constitution of the United States and they did.
Presidency.
Washington was the first President of the United States. Washington helped the government get started. Washington did not belong to a political party. He was re-elected to a second term, but chose not to run for a third term. Because of this, other presidents chose to follow this tradition of not running for a 3rd term. However, President Franklin Roosevelt did run for a 3rd and 4th term. After he died, the Constitution was changed so it is now illegal for anyone to run for president for a 3rd term.
Retirement.
Washington had return home to Mount Vernon after his second term ended in 1797. He died on December 14, 1799, in Mount Vernon at the age of 67. He was the only leader of the early United States who decided in his will that his slaves were to be freed once he himself and his wife had passed away. Washington, D.C. and the state of Washington are named after him. He is on the one dollar bill and the quarter.

Abraham Lincoln
Abraham Lincoln (February 12, 1809 - April 15, 1865) was the 16th President of the United States between 1861 to 1865. In 1865, after the Civil War ended, he was shot and killed when he was still President.
Life.
Abraham Lincoln was born on February 12, 1809, in Hardin (now Larry County, Kentucky). His parents were Thomas Lincoln, a farmer, and Nancy Hanks. His family was poor. Abraham had 1 brother and 1 sister. His brother died in childhood. They grew up in a small log cabin, with just one room inside. His father refused to own slaves as a religious Baptist, although Kentucky was then a state where slavery was allowed. When Abraham was 7 years old, his family moved to Indiana. In his childhood he helped his father on the farm, but when he was 22 years old he left his parents and moved to New Salem, in Illinois, to work as a salesman. Later, he said that he had gone to school for just one year, but that was enough to learn how to read, write, and do simple math. In 1842, he married Mary Todd Lincoln. They had four children, but three of them died when they were very young. Abraham Lincoln was sometimes called Abe Lincoln and nicknamed Honest Abe and the Great Emancipator, because of his great efforts in 1863 to emancipate (or free) the African-Americans held as slaves by the Confederate States, even though he never actually freed the slaves that were still in the United States. His efforts were rewarded after his death in 1865, when slavery was completely abolished in the United States of America as well.
Early political career.
Abraham started his career in 1832 when he ran for the Illinois General Assembly, but he lost the election. He served as captain in the army during the Black Hawk War, a war against a Native American tribe. When he moved to Springfield, he began to work as a lawyer. Soon he became one of the most highly respected lawyers in Illinois. In 1837, he protested for the first time against slavery, yet defended slave owners in Illinois to have their runaway slaves returned. In 1846, Lincoln joined the Whig Party. He was elected to one term in the House of Representatives, but when his term ended, he ignored his political career and turned his energies to being a successful railroad lawyer. Twelve years later, he wanted to become senator; although this was unsuccessful, the debates drew national attention to him. The Republican Party nominated him for the Presidential election of 1860.
Presidency.
Lincoln was elected as the 16th president of the United States, because the Northern States had stopped slavery and the Republican Party was against slavery extension.
But in 1863, he signed the Emancipation Proclamation, which freed slaves only in the Confederate states while allowing slavery to continue in the northern states of Delaware, Kentucky, and Missouri, as well as all captured southern territories at that time. The Proclamation was enacted, in part, to prevent foreign (namely Great Britain and France) powers from helping the Confederate States and ending the war, and possibly incite a slave revolt. Slavery was not abolished by law until the 13th Amendment in 1865.
Lincoln made a famous speech after the Battle of Gettysburg in 1863 called the Gettysburg Address.
Lincoln was reelected president in 1864. Lincoln saw the South was going to lose. He proposed laws to make the nation become one again quickly.
Death.
While attending a play at Ford Theatre in Washington DC, Lincoln was shot and killed by John Wilkes Booth. He was the first American president to be assassinated.

Calvin Coolidge
John Calvin Coolidge (July 4, 1872 - January 5, 1933) was the 30th President of the United States between 1923 to 1929.
Early years.
He was married to Grace Coolidge and had 2 children: John (born 6 September, 1906 - died 2000) and Calvin Jr. (born 13 April 1908 - died 1924). His younger son Calvin Jr. died at 16 while playing tennis at the White House. He was wearing shoes without socks and died from a toe infection. He was buried at the foot of Hill Cemetery.
Political career.
Coolidge served as the Mayor of Northampton, Massachusetts. He later served as the Governor of Massachusetts. In 1920, he was nominated Vice President under Warren G.Harding. The Harding-Coolidge team won easily. Their main opponents were Democrats James M. Cox and Franklin D. Roosevelt.
Harding died in 1923 and Coolidge became the next President.

Harry S. Truman
Harry S. Truman (May 8, 1884 - December 26, 1972) was the 33rd President of the United States, from 1945 to 1953. His spouse was Bess Wallace Truman.
Harry S. Truman made the decision to drop the two atomic bombs on Japan (Manhattan Project) ending WWII.

John Adams
John Adams (October 30, 1735 – July 4, 1826) was the second President of the United States (1797–1801), and father of the sixth President, John Quincy Adams. He was also the first Vice President of the United States (1789–1797).
Early years.
Adams was born in Braintree, Massachusetts. He went to Harvard College. He married Abigail Adams in 1764. He was a cousin of another patriot, Samuel Adams.
Revolution years.
Adams wanted the Thirteen Colonies to be free from Great Britain. However, Adams was fair and thought every person should be treated fairly. Even though he did not want British soldiers in Boston, he was the lawyer who defended the British soldiers who were involved in the Boston Massacre.
Adams was a representative from Massachusetts during the Second Continental Congress. He helped Thomas Jefferson write the United States Declaration of Independence. During the American Revolutionary War, Adams helped make peace with Great Britain.
Vice President and President.
Adams was the first vice president under George Washington. After Washington chose not to run again, Adams won the 1796 election. Adams is thought to have been the first president to belong to a political party, but like George Washington, he thought himself above any particular party. He ran for president on the Federalist ticket. He beat Thomas Jefferson of the Democratic-Republican Party. President candidates and vice president candidates did not run together like they do today. Since Jefferson got the second highest number of votes, he became vice president.
Adams kept the United States out of war with both Great Britain and France. He also passed the Alien and Sedition Acts. Many people did not like those acts. Adams was not re-elected president. The Federalist Party was not as popular as it was when Adams was elected. One of his last acts as president was to make John Marshall the Chief Justice of the United States. This made sure that the Federalist Party would still be important.
Later years.
Adams retired to Quincy, Massachusetts. He died on July 4, 1826, 50 years after the Declaration of Independence was signed. Thomas Jefferson died on the same day.

Bill Clinton
William Jefferson Clinton (born August 19, 1946), better known as Bill Clinton, was the 42nd president of the United States. He served from 1993 to 2001. He was 46 years old when he was elected. His major opponents were George H. W. Bush and Bob Dole. Clinton was the first president from the Baby Boom generation and was the third youngest president in the U.S. He is a Democrat. Clinton's supporters say he helped bring the economic boom of the 1990s. His presidency was very controversial to most Republicans, who did not agree with what he did.
Before he was president, Clinton was also governor of Arkansas (1979-1981 and 1983-1993).
In 1994, during Clinton's first term in office, the Congress switched to a Republican majority. However, Clinton still beat Republican Bob Dole in the 1996 election.
President Clinton was accused of wrongdoing by the U.S. House of Representatives in December 1998 during the Monica Lewinsky scandal. Although he lied that she did not give him oral sex, he was found to have done nothing wrong by the U.S. Senate in February 1999. The scandal had little effect on his popularity, and he left office with some of the highest approval ratings of any president.
He is married to Senator Hillary Clinton and now lives in New York.

Malcolm IV of Scotland
Malcolm IV of Scotland (c. 1141- December 9, 1165) was the grandson of David I of Scotland. He succeeded his grandfather as King of Scotland in 1153. He never married or had children. Not much is known about him.

David I of Scotland
David I of Scotland (b. 1084 - d. May 24, 1153) was the son of Malcolm Canmore and Saint Margaret.

Alexander I of Scotland
Alexander I of Scotland (c. 1078 - 23 April, 1124) was the son of Malcolm Canmore and Saint Margaret. He became the King of Scotland in 1107. In the same year he married Sybilla, who was an illegitimate daughter of Henry I of England.

Henry I of England
Henry I of England (c. 1068 C.E. - 1 December 1135 C.E.) was the King of England from 1100 until his death in 1135. Henry was born in Selby, Yorkshire. He was the third son of William the Conqueror and Queen Matilda of Flanders.
He became King when his brother, William II, died in a hunting accident. As King, Henry tried to make social reforms. He issued the Charter of Liberties which is considered a predecessor of the Magna Carta. He put back in place some of the laws of Edward the Confessor.
Henry and his wife had two children, Matilda and William Adelin. He also fathered more illegitimate children than any other English King. Guesses place the number between 20 and 25.
Henry died in 1135 while visiting his daughter and grandchildren in Normandy. After his death, his daughter Mathilda and his nephew, Stephen, argued over who would become the ruler of England, and started a civil war.

William I of England
William I of England (c. 1027 - September 9 1087), also known as William the Conqueror, was King of England from 1066 until 1087.
William was born in Falaise, which is in Normandy, France. He became Duke of Normandy in 1047 when he a won a battle at Caen.
William married his cousin Matilda of Flanders in either 1050 or 1051.
William became the King of England after he invaded England and won the Battle of Hastings in 1066 against King Harold.
William died when he was in Rouen, France from injuries he had received from falling off a horse. He was succeeded by his son William II of England.

Robert II of France
Robert II of France (March 27, 972 - July 20, 1031) was born in Orleans, France. He was the son of Hugh Capet and Adelaide of Aquitaine. He was married to Constance of Arles.
Robert was succeeded by his son Henry I of France. Robert is buried in the Saint Denis Basilica.

Elizabeth I of England
Elizabeth I of England (September 7, 1533 - March 24, 1603) was the Queen of England from November 17, 1558 until she died in 1603. She has also been called "The Virgin Queen" or "Good Queen Bess". Many people think that she was the greatest monarch ever to rule England.
Early life.
Elizabeth was born in the Palace of Placentia in Greenwich, England. She was the daughter of King Henry VIII of England and his second wife, Anne Boleyn. When she was very young, she lost her right to be called a princess, because her mother was found guilty of having lovers and was executed. After Anne's death, the king said she should no longer be treated as his daughter. Her half-sister Mary was in the same position. Mary was much older than Elizabeth, but her mother had been divorced by King Henry and she was also being treated as if she was not the King's daughter.
After Anne Boleyn died, King Henry married Jane Seymour, who became queen. Jane had a baby son, who was named Edward. Men were thought to make better rulers than women, so Edward became heir to the throne as soon as he was born.
Elizabeth was taken away from the royal court and was looked after by other people. She was given a good education. Elizabeth could speak and read six languages: her native English, as well as French, Italian, Spanish, Greek, and Latin.
When she was thirteen, King Henry died. Elizabeth's younger half-brother, Edward, became King even though he was only a child. He was called King Edward VI of England. Because King Henry had no other children, he left a will saying that, if Edward had no children of his own, Mary would be queen after him, and Elizabeth would be queen after Mary. At the time no one thought this would ever happen, but Edward died when he was only fifteen. Mary then became queen, and was called Queen Mary I of England.
During Mary's reign, life became difficult for Elizabeth. When King Henry VIII divorced Mary's mother, he had quarrelled with the Pope and most people in England had turned away from the Roman Catholic religion. Mary had been loyal to the old religion, and, as soon as she became queen, she married King Philip II of Spain, who was a Roman Catholic. This marriage made her unpopular because Spain and England were old enemies. Mary wanted everyone else in England to be Roman Catholic again, so she tried to make Elizabeth attend Roman Catholic services. Elizabeth pretended to believe the same as Mary, but she was not really a Catholic. Because of the argument over religion, many people in the country preferred Elizabeth to Mary and wanted to make her queen. She was accused of trying to take Mary's throne, and was even put into the Tower of London for a while.
Elizabeth became the Queen of England in 1558 after her half-sister, Queen Mary, died. She was crowned on January 15, 1559 at Westminster Abbey. She was crowned by Owen Oglethorpe, Bishop of Carlisle. Her father Henry VIII made a new law, the Act of Supremacy, in 1534. Supremacy means top and power. This law decided that the king was the head of the church in England. Elizabeth tried to bring Catholics and Protestants together. She did not believe that people should be punished for what they believed in, but she was strict about people keeping to the rules of the church.
Elizabeth has been called the "Virgin Queen", because she never married. It is not clear why Elizabeth never married. Because Elizabeth was a woman, many people believed that she would do whatever her husband told her. Mary's marriage to Philip of Spain had caused a lot of problems, and Elizabeth did not want to make the same mistake in marrying a foreign ruler. If she married one person, she would form an alliance with one country, but could make many enemies. Politics would become uneasy and England would be opposed by other countries. This was probably one of the reasons that she refused all of the marriages proposed to her.
If Elizabeth had married a man who was not a prince or king, that might also have caused problems because other people would have been jealous of her husband. Most people believe that she was in love with Robert Dudley, the 1st Earl of Leicester. She had first met Robert Dudley when they were both prisoners in the Tower of London during Queen Mary's reign. However, Robert Dudley was already married to a woman called Amy Robsart. After Elizabeth became queen, there was gossip about her friendship with Robert Dudley. Not long afterwards, Amy died in an accident. It seems that she fell down stairs, but her body was not found until later. Some people said that her husband had arranged for her to be killed, so that he would be free to marry Queen Elizabeth. All this gossip made it impossible for Elizabeth to marry him. When Elizabeth found she could not marry the man she loved, she may have decided that she would not marry at all.
Elizabeth I caught smallpox in 1562. This scared Parliament, because they did not know who would be the King or Queen after her. They asked Elizabeth I to name an heir, but she did not.
The most likely person to follow Elizabeth to the throne of England was her cousin, Mary Stuart, who was already Queen of Scotland. Mary Stuart and Elizabeth were rivals, but Mary was a Catholic and Elizabeth was a Protestant. Mary married a French prince and became the French queen was well as the Queen of Scots. Some people wanted to force Elizabeth off the throne and replace her with Mary. This made Mary a danger to Elizabeth.
Because many Scottish people were Protestants, they did not like Mary and wanted to get rid of her. She was put in prison, but in 1568, she escaped and ran away to England, to ask for help from Elizabeth. Elizabeth kept her as a prisoner for many years. In 1578, Elizabeth was told that Mary had been plotting to kill her and become queen in her place. Mary was put on trial and found guilty, and Elizabeth agreed to put Mary to death. This action was popular with Elizabeth's court, but it made her enemies in the Catholic countries of Europe, such as France and Spain.
Foreign wars.
In 1572 Elizabeth I made an alliance with France. She even agreed to marry one of their princes, but later changed her mind. In 1580, Pope Gregory XIII sent an army into Ireland to help with a rebellion against Elizabeth, but this failed.
After the death of Mary Stuart, the trouble with Spain became serious. Elizabeth did not like King Philip of Spain, who had been married to her elder sister, and she had helped the Netherlands fight against Spain for their independence. An attempted Spanish invasion in 1588 (see Spanish Armada) failed, and this made Queen Elizabeth I very popular.
End of Elizabeth's reign.
After the death of her friend Robert Dudley, Elizabeth was very upset and turned to Dudley's stepson, the Earl of Essex, who was a young man and not always very sensible. He let Elizabeth down several times. In the end, she sent him away from the royal court. Essex behaved very stupidly by getting a gang of his friends together and trying to take over the country. Not many people supported them, and they were all executed. Elizabeth was very hurt by the way he had behaved, and she was even more upset at having to agree to his execution.
Elizabeth I fell ill in February 1603, suffering from physical weakness and insomnia. She had no children, so she decide that James VI to be the next king of England. James VI was the son of Mary Stuart, but he was a Protestant.
Elizabeth I died at the age of 69, on March 24, 1603. She had managed to keep peace in the country and to keep the independence of England. These were thought to be great achievements.
Legacy.
There have been many films about Elizabeth I.

Richard Nixon
Richard Milhous Nixon (January 9, 1913 – April 22, 1994) was the 37th President of the United States and the only president to resign.
Early life.
Nixon was born in 1913 in his family's home in Yorba Linda, California. He was born and raised as a Quaker. Herbert Hoover was the only other United States President to belong to the Quaker faith. He served in the Navy during World War II. He went to school at Duke University. Later, he got married and had 2 daughters.
Early political career.
Nixon was elected to the House of Representatives in 1946. He was later elected a Senator, and then the vice president under Dwight D. Eisenhower. As the vice president, he was very busy and traveled across the world to places like South America.
In the presidential election of 1960, he ran against Democrat John F. Kennedy. At first, Nixon was winning, but on election day, Kennedy won because Nixon was sick on the first televised debate. Later Nixon lost another election for governor of California to Pat Brown. At that point, many experts say that Nixon's political career was over but they were wrong.
Presidency.
Nixon was elected president in 1968 against Vice President Hubert Humphrey. The race was very close.
Nixon was very successful in foreign affairs. He traveled to many different countries, including China and the Soviet Union. He made peace with China and communism.
He won the election of 1972 with one of the biggest landslides in American history, during that election his opponent was George McGovern, a Democrat. But later, because of the Watergate crisis, Nixon was forced to resign because he would have been impeached (put on trial in the Senate) if he did not resign.
Post-Presidency.
Nixon's second vice president, Gerald Ford, gave Nixon a pardon of any crimes Nixon committed during Watergate. Ford wanted to end the crisis as quickly as possible, because the nation faced more important problems. Many people blamed Ford for letting Nixon go unpunished, and voted against him when he ran in the 1976 election.
Nixon's public image never recovered, but he remained as a consultant to later Presidents, and to other people in government and the media. His memoirs were considered important reading. His work in negotiating with China in the early 1970s was praised for improving relations between his country and theirs.
Nixon died in 1994, about a year after his wife Pat died. The house where he was born is now part of the Richard M. Nixon Presidential Library and Museum. He was buried at the library.

Gerald Ford
Gerald Rudolph Ford (July 14, 1913—December 26, 2006) was the 38th President of the United States. He was from the state of Michigan but he lived his later years in California where he died.
Ford served 25 years in the United States House of Representatives and was Minority Leader for many years. When Richard Nixon was President, his first Vice President was Spiro Agnew, but Agnew resigned in 1973 because he took bribes while he was Governor of Maryland in the late 1960's. Nixon then chose Ford to be his next Vice President. Ford had to be approved by Congress since there was no Presidential election that year. Because he had been in Congress for a long time, other Congressmen knew him well and were happy to approve him as Vice President because they thought he was honest.
However, Ford was not Nixon's first choice. Some of his first choices were John Connally (the former Governor of Texas), Nelson Rockefeller (the Governor of New York), and Ronald Reagan (the former Governor of California). But, Nixon was worried that these other men might have trouble getting approved by Congress. All of them had also run for President already or were planning to run soon. Nixon did not want to help pick who would be the top Republican candidate in 1976 and Ford promised him that he was not interested in being President. Ford always told reporters that he always dreamed of being Speaker of the House instead.
Because of the Watergate scandal, Nixon resigned on August 8, 1974. Ford became the President. He is the only President of the United States not to be elected to either the office of President or Vice President. Once he became President, he realized he could do a good job and decided to run for a full term in 1976.
Ford had pardoned Nixon for his crimes in 1974. Many experts say that is one of the reasons why Ford lost to Jimmy Carter in the 1976 election, which was very close. Other reasons for the loss were a bad economy with a lot of inflation, the Mayagüez incident, and the last U.S. soldiers leaving Vietnam followed by Saigon and the rest of South Vietnam being taken over by the North Vietnamese, both in 1975.
Ford was adopted at a young age. His birth name was Leslie King, Jr.
Ford died in his home in California on December 26, 2006.

John Kerry
John Forbes Kerry (born December 11, 1943) is a Senator from Massachusetts and the Democratic nominee for President in 2004. He lost to George W. Bush. He has served in the senate for 23 years and has also served as the lieutenant governor of Massachusetts under Michael Dukakis. Kerry is married to Teresa Heinz-Kerry.
Campaign for President.
Kerry's vice presidential candidate was John Edwards. The ticket lost the election when George W. Bush got the most votes of anyone ever running for president.

Gangnihessou
Gangnihessou was the first of twelve kings of Dahomey in Africa. Gangnihessou might have been the king around the year 1620. One of his symbols was a bird called "gangnihessou" after his name. His other symbols were a drum, and sticks used for throwing or hunting. He had a younger brother called Dakodonou, who was a king. Some historians thing instead of being a king himself, Gangnihessou might have led people by giving advice to his brother.

Leon Trotsky
(Russian: Лев Давидович Троцкий; also transliterated "Leo", "Lev", "Trotskii", "Trotski", "Trotskij" and "Trotzky") (October 26 (O.S.) = November 7 (N.S.), 1879 - August 21, 1940) was the public name of Leib or Lev Davidovich Bronstein. He was a Russian Revolutionary and Political Theoretician.
Trotsky was a socialist and a Marxist. In 1905 there was a revolution in Russia. Trotsky helped organize a committee of workers in St Petersburg which was called the Soviet. When the leader of the Soviet was arrested, Trotsky became leader of the Soviet in his place. Trotsky helped to expand on the idea of Permanent Revolution, which is a theory originally thought up by Karl Marx.
After the revolution Trotsky left Russia for his own safety. In 1917 he returned to Russia because of the Russian Revolution. He helped to bring about communism in Russia and defend it during the Russian Civil War. He was in charge of the army at this time. When the leader of the Bolsheviks (the party who lead the revolution) Vladimir Lenin died, Trotsky became involved in a power struggle with Joseph Stalin for the leadership of the party. He lost, and Stalin came to power. He had to leave Russia because of Stalin, who was now his own enemy and he wanted to harm Trotsky. Stalin had a spy murder Trotsky in Mexico in 1940.
People who believe in Trotsky's ideas are called Trotskyists and follow Trotskyism. Trotskyism is seen as being a more democratic form of communism than others, such as Stalinism and Maoism. The main Trotskyist organization today is the Socialist Workers Party in the UK and the International Socialist Tendency worldwide.
In the novel Animal Farm by George Orwell Trotsky is represented by Snowball the pig.

Ariel Sharon
Ariel Sharon (born February 27 1928) a former Prime Minister of the state of Israel.
Ariel Sharon was in the Israel Army for many years. He fought in numerous battles, and in 1974 he left the army as General. After the army he decided to go to politics.
In 1977, he became Minister of Agriculture. In 1981 he became the Minister of Defence.
In 1983, he was sent away from the government as Minister of Defence after he was found to be guilty for not preventing a massacre in Lebanon where many hundreds of civilians were killed by other civilians.
In 2001, he was elected for Prime Minister after the war between Israel and Palestine started.
In 2004, he surprised many people when he said that Israel will get out of the Gaza Strip, which is the place where many Palestine people live.
In December 2005, Sharon was taken into hospital. On January 4, 2006, Sharon was again taken to the hospital. He had a big stroke (bleeding in the brain). Rumours spread immediately of his death, though these were denied by his physicians. Ehud Olmert, another member of Sharon's newly formed "Kadima" party, was acting Prime Minister until elections were held in Israel, after which Olmert became Prime Minister of Israel.

Genghis Khan
Genghis Khan (c. 1155/1162/1167 - August 18, 1227) was a great military leader who unified the Mongol tribes and founded the Mongol Empire. The khans, who came after him, would make Mongolia into the largest empire on earth.
Genghis Khan was the grandfather of Kublai Khan, who was the first emperor of the Yuan Dynasty in China. No one knows exactly where Genghis is buried.

Joseph Stalin
(Russian, in full: Иосиф Виссарионович Сталин (Iosif Vissarionovich Stalin), born Джугашвили (Dzhugashvili), Georgian:(Ioseb Jughashvili); (December 18 [O.S. December 6] 1878 – March 5, 1953) was an adopted name of the Communist dictator, Iosev Jugashvili (December 18, 1878 – March 5, 1953). He was the second political leader of the Soviet Union, after Vladimir Lenin. He was a totalitarian ruler, and he is famous in history. He started a purge, and caused millions to be put to death.
He started his own form of communism, Stalinism.
Stalin cooperated with Hitler before the World War II and finally in 1939 they both made an agreement to conquer Poland and divide it between themselves. This is how World War II broke out.
But later on, in 1941, Hitler turned against Stalin and attacked the Soviet Union, trying to conquer it. After this happened, the USSR began working with the Allies to defeat Germany. Ultimately, Germany lost, but USSR had more casualties than any other country during the war.
When the World War II was over, the Soviet army ended up occupying many countries in Europe, such as Poland, Czechoslovakia, Hungary, and part of Germany, imposing communism on these countries.
Stalin continued to rule over the Soviet Union until he died. Stalin also militarized Russia, by focusing the country's time and energy towards weapons, vehicles, and the armed forces.
Stalin died of a stroke in the year 1953, due to warfarin. He was followed by Lavrentiy Beria, Nikita Khrushchev, and Georgi Malenkov. The three of them began a process called "De-Stalinization", which involved removing the political system that Stalin created.

Jan Peter Balkenende
Jan Peter Balkenende (born 7 May 1956 in Kapelle) is a Dutch politician. He has been the Prime Minister of the Netherlands since 2002. He is a member of the Christian CDA party.
In other countries, he is perhaps most famous because he looks like Harry Potter. This makes him popular with young children, but many Dutch make jokes about it and call him "Jan Potter Balkenende" and other names like that.
Balkenende lives in Capelle aan den IJssel.

William the Silent
William I of Orange-Nassau, (April 24, 1533 – July 10, 1584) was an important leader of the Dutch rebellion against the Spanish in the Eighty Years' War. He was the first leader of the Netherlands.
William of Orange is better known as William the Silent (in Dutch: "Willem de Zwijger"). It is not sure how he got this name. One story tells that when the kings of France and Spain proposed to William to kill all Protestants in his area, William didn't reply.
William was born in Nassau in Germany. The king of Spain made him stadtholder (a sort of leader) about several Dutch provinces. But William converted to Protestantism, the religion of the Dutch people and joined their struggle for independence. The king of Spain offered a reward for the person who would kill William. In 1584 William was shot by Balthasar Gerards in his house in Delft. William's last words were in French: "Mon Dieu, mon Dieu, ayez pitié de moi et de ton pauvre peuple" (My Lord, My Lord, have pity on me and your poor people). Balthasar Gerards never received his reward, because he was killed by the angry Dutch.
In the Netherlands, people often call him "Father of the fatherland". The Dutch national anthem, the Wilhelmus, is about William.

Simón Bolívar
Simón Bolívar (1783 - 1830) was a Venezuelan military commander. He was born in Caracas, Venezuela. He liberated many countries in South America from Spain. For a few years he was president of Gran Colombia, a country that no longer exists. The country Bolivia is named after Bolívar.

Franklin D. Roosevelt
Franklin Delano Roosevelt (January 30, 1882 - April 12, 1945) was a Governor of New York and the 32nd President of the United States.
Early political career.
Roosevelt was the Assistant Secretary of the Navy under Woodrow Wilson. He was nominated the vice presidential candidate under James M. Cox in 1920. Cox and Roosevelt lost to Warren Harding and Calvin Coolidge.
Roosevelt was elected the Governor of New York in 1928.
Presidency.
Roosevelt was elected to be president in 1932, against incumbent (sitting president) Herbert Hoover, who was very unpopular because of the Great Depression. Roosevelt led the United States through the Depression, and was very popular. He started a series of popular programs known as the New Deal, which attempted to reverse the effects of the Great Depression. Because of this, he was re-elected in a landslide victory in 1936. He was re-elected two more times (in 1940 and 1944) and led the U.S. through World War II.
He contracted a crippling form of polio, a disease which makes it hard for people to use their muscles. His wife Eleanor Roosevelt nursed him back to health to the best of her abilities. Unfortunately, he ended up never having the use of his legs again.
While still president, he died April 12, 1945.

Moctezuma II
Moctezuma II, also known as Motecuhzoma Xocoyotzin (1466-1520) and often called Montezuma in English, was the Aztec emperor ("tlahtoani") from 1502 to 1520. His name comes from the Nahuatl "Motecuhzoma", it means "he who is leader because of his fury". In Spanish, he is called Moctezuma.
When Hernán Cortés arrived in Mexico in 1519, Moctezuma thought he was the god Quetzalcoatl, and didn't want to fight against him. Cortés took Moctezuma prisoner. When the Aztecs wanted Cortés to get out of their capital Tenochtitlan in 1520, Cortes told Moctezuma to calm down his people. When doing that he died. The Spaniards said he was killed by the Aztecs, while the Aztecs said Cortés killed him. The Spanish said that the Aztec people threw rocks at him, killing him. The Aztecs said that they found his body in the streets with a lot of cuts made with a sword after the Spanish left.
His own tribe killed the first Moctezuma

Antonio López de Santa Anna
Antonio López de Santa Anna Pérez de Lebrón (February 21, 1794 - 21 June 1876) was a Mexican general and dictator. Under his rule of Mexico, it lost half its territory. Santa Anna was 11 times president. He fought two wars against the United States. In the first war (1836) he won the famous battle of the Alamo, but later he lost the war and was taken prisoner by the Americans. He also lost the second war (1846-1848),

Tutankhamun
Tutankhamun (sometimes called King Tut) was a Pharaoh (like a king) of Ancient Egypt from about 1334 BC to 1323 BC. He became Pharaoh of the 18th dynasty during the New Kingdom at 9 years old. Tutankhamun ruled only 9 years and died very young, at 18, so he is known as The Boy King. He was married to his half-sister Ankhesenamun, daughter of Queen Nefertiti.
Some scientists and historians think Tutankhamun was killed by someone else. When his mummy was examined by a CAT scan in January 2005, a very bad break in the leg was found. This may have been from a riding accident. Most scientists now think that Tutankhamun died because his broken leg got infected. Others believe that his vizier, Ay, murdered him, because Ay also succeeded him as Pharaoh. Because of this, Tut was buried in Ay's tomb and Ay in his.
The tomb was discovered in November 1922 by a man named Howard Carter.

Louis Bonaparte
Louis Bonaparte ("Lodewijk Napoleon" in Dutch) (1779-1884), was a brother of Napoleon Bonaparte, who made him King of the Kingdom of Holland in 1806 and deposed him as King in 1810.
He was also the father of Emperor Napoleon III of France.

Abdou Diouf
Abdou Diouf (born September 7, 1935) was president of Senegal from 1981 to 2000. He was the second president since the country became independent.

Viktor Yushchenko
Viktor Andriyovych Yushchenko (Віктор Андрійович Ющенко) (born February 23, 1954) is the President of Ukraine. On November 26, 2004, he lost the Ukrainian presidential election. However, he and his followers argued that the election had been corrupted. They argued that the election results had been falsified by the Ukrainian government, in support of the opposing candidate Victor Yanukovych. They organized political demonstrations in autumn-winter 2004 that gathered millions of people all over the country. They called the demonstrations "The Orange Revolution". The Constitutional Court ordered a second round of elections, which Yuschenko won.
Yushchenko claimed to have been poisoned by political enemy's. Certainly, he was hospitalized and his appearance shows signs of a grave illness.
His political party is now part of the government with the political party of his old ally Yulia Tymoshenko. She is the leader of the government.

Viktor Yanukovych
Viktor Fedorovych Yanukovych (Віктор Федорович Янукович) (born 1950), was Prime Minister of Ukraine from November 2002 until December 2004 (he was forced to resign (leave office early) on 31 December 2004). He again was Prime Minister of Ukraine from August 4, 2006 till December 18, 2007.
In November 2004, he won the presidential election. Viktor Yushchenko, his opponent, said the result was false. Large daily demonstrations suporting Viktor Yushchenko followed. They where named "The Orange Revolution". Ukrainian Judges decided that there would be new elections in December 2004. Victor Yuschenko won those elections and is now president of Ukraine.
Yanukovych was supported by Vladimir Putin of Russia and by the former Ukrainian president Leonid Kuchma.
Yushchenko claimed to have been poisoned in a bid to silence his "orange power" base. Certainly, he was hospitalized and his appearance showed signs of a grave illness.

Nezahualcoyotl
Nezahualcoyotl (1402 - 1472) was king of Texcoco, a part of the Aztec empire. He was also a famous poet.
The name Nezahualcoyotl is Nahuatl, it means "hungry coyote".

Kofi Annan
Kofi Annan (born April 8 1938 in Ghana) was the Secretary-General of the United Nations. His term began in January 1, 1997 and ended on January 1 2007. He was replaced by Ban Ki-moon.
Life.
The United Nations is where all member countries meet to talk about things with each other, to prevent wars. Annan has been Secretary-General of the United Nations since 1997. The Secretary-General is like the president of the United Nations.
Annan was born on April 8, 1938 in Kumasi, Ghana, to an elite family. His parents, Henry Reginald and Victoria Annan, are from the two major ethnic groups that make up the Akan -- one of the groups of indigenous people of Ghana.
His father was half Asante and half Fante; his mother was Fante. The Asante were gold merchants while the Fante tribe were the middlemen in the gold trade between the Asante and the British.
Annan, whose first name means "born on a Friday," also had a twin sister, who died in 1991 from a still yet unknown disease. In Ghanaian culture, twins are considered special and are adored.
Annan probably got his first lessons in politics and diplomacy early on from his family. Both of Annan's grandfathers and his uncle were tribal chiefs. Upon his retirement, Annan's father, who worked as an export manager for the cocoa exporter Lever Brothers, was elected governor of Ghana's Asante province.
In 1954, Annan attended Mfantsipim School, an elite Methodist boarding school in central Ghana established under British rule. The Secretary-General credits the school with teaching him "that suffering anywhere concerns people everywhere." At Mfantsipim, Annan led the student body in a hunger strike to get better food from the school cafeteria. It was a success.
In the early 1950s, while Annan was at boarding school, Ghana was undergoing radical changes. Under the leadership of Kwame Nkrumah, a movement for independence was gaining ground and by 1957 Ghana had become the first British African colony to gain independence. "It was an exciting period," Annan told The New York Times, "People of my generation, having seen the changes that took place in Ghana, grew up thinking all was possible."
His works at United Nations.
Annan became Secretary-General of the United Nations in January of 1997, succeeding Boutros Boutros-Ghali of Egypt. Annan was a U.N. veteran who took his first job with the organization in 1962 and worked his way up through various posts including Deputy Director to the U.N. High Commissioner for Refugees (1980-83) and head of the U.N.'s peacekeeping efforts (1995-96). Annan was the first Secretary-General chosen from the ranks of the U.N.'s staff. He is also the first black man to hold the post and the second African (after Boutros-Ghali). In 2001 he and the United Nations were awarded the Nobel Peace Prize for their ongoing work in global peace and cooperation. His second term began in 2002 and runs through the end of 2006.
Extra credit: Annan attended Macalaster College in St. Paul, Minnesota, graduating in 1961... He was a Sloan Fellow at MIT in 1971-72, receiving a master's degree in management... His wife Nane Annan, a lawyer and artist, is from Sweden...

Andris Piebalgs
Andris Piebalgs (born September 17 1957 in Valmiera) is a Latvian politician. Since 22 November 2004 he has been the European Commissioner for Energy.
He was born in Valmiera and was educated at the University of Latvia in Riga. He worked as a teacher in Valmiera in the 1980s. After Latvia became independent from the USSR he was education minister (in charge of schools) from 1990 to 1993, and finance minister (in charge of money) from 1994 to 1995. He was Latvia's ambassador to Estonia from 1995 to 1997, and to the European Union from 1998 to 2003, when he helped Latvia join the EU. He also helped to start a political party called the Latvian Way.
He speaks Latvian, English, German, French, and Russian, and some Estonian.
Before he was made a European Commissioner Piebalgs worked for Sandra Kalniete, a member of the last Commission.

Augusto Pinochet
General Augusto José Ramón Pinochet Ugarte (November 25, 1915 - December 10, 2006) was leader of the military government that ruled Chile from 1973 to 1990. He became leader after he overthrew Salvador Allende, a socialist president.
About 3,000 Chilean people died because of Pinochet's rule and many other people were tortured.
Pinochet introduced many neoliberal free market policies.
The coup d'état that was launched to overthrow Allende and put Pinochet in power was supported by the United States, as was Pinochet's regime.
In 1990 he lost power, but he made himself senator, in order to keep from being arrested. He was forced to leave the senate in 2002, but he once again was not arrested, this time because it was said he suffered from dementia. In May 2004 judges said that was not true. On December 13 he was placed under house arrest, after Dr. Martin Cordero, Chile's top neurologist, examined Pinochet and was convinced that Pinochet was actually lying about his dementia. This went against the judgements of two other doctors, but the judge in charge of the case decided in favour of Dr. Cordero. Key evidence in this case was the fact that Pinochet had made statements to Cuban reporters which clearly contradicted his claims of dementia, recollecting his years in power.
He died from heart failure on December 10, 2006, having had a heart attack a week earlier.

Benito Mussolini
Benito Amilcare Andrea Mussolini (29 July 1883 - 28 April 1945) ruled Italy as a dictator from 1922 to 1943.
Mussolini's Life.
Benito Mussolini was named after Benito Juarez in Mexican history. Before being involved in politics, Mussolini was a newspaper editor (where he learned all his propaganda skills).
At first Mussolini was a socialist, but when he wanted Italy to join the First World War he was thrown out of the socialist party. He 'invented' a new ideology, Fascism. Fascism means a system where the state controls very much. Therefore it is called a totalitarian ideology. In 1922, he let his "black shirts" march on Rome. King Vittorio Emanuele III allowed him to form a government, and made him prime minister.
Mussolini wanted Italy to become a new Roman Empire. In 1923, he attacked the island of Corfu, and in 1924, he occupied the city state of Fiume. In 1935, he attacked the African country Abyssinia (now called Ethiopia). The breakout took place in Uol-Uol(source: H.A.Batowski "Between The Wars 1919-1939") His forces occupied it in 1936. Italy was thrown out of the League of Nations because of this aggression. In 1939, he occupied the country Albania.
In 1936, Mussolini signed an alliance with Adolf Hitler, the dictator of Germany. In 1940, he sent Italy into the Second World War on the side of the Axis countries. Mussolini attacked Greece, but he failed to conquer it. In 1943, the Allies landed in Southern Italy. King Vittorio Emanuel III deposed Mussolini and put him in jail, but he was set free by the Germans, who made him ruler of the Italian Social Republic puppet state. When the war was almost over, Mussolini tried to flee to Switzerland with his mistress, Clara Petacci, but he was captured and shot by partisans. Mussolini's dead body was hanged upside-down, together with some of Mussolini's helpers, in Milan.

Vittorio Emanuele III
Vittorio Emanuele III (11 November, 1869 – 28 December, 1947) was king of Italy from 1900 to 1946.
Vittorio Emanuele III was the son of Umberto I. He became king, at age 31, after his father was killed in 1900. Because people said Vittorio Emanuele had worked together with Benito Mussolini too much, Italy became a republic in 1946.

Jacques Chirac
Jacques René Chirac (born November 29, 1932 in Paris) was the President of the French Republic from 1995 until 2007. He was re-elected in 2002. Before that, he was Prime Minister of France twice.

Fidel Castro
Fidel Alejandro Castro Rúz (born August 13, 1926) has been in power in Cuba since 1959. He was prime minister of Cuba until 1976, when he became President of Cuba. He temporarily gave power to his brother Raúl Castro while recovering from surgery in summer of 2006. On February 19. 2008, he announced that he would not return to power
Fidel Castro has a doctorate of law from the University of Havana. He was trained as a military lawyer.
He came to power after he and his guerrilla soldiers overthrew the dictatorship of General Fulgencio Batista.
Fidel Castro is a communist, and he made Cuba the first socialist country of the Americas. During the Cold War he was a friend of the Soviet Union, and he depended on their help until the USSR collapsed. An important moment of the Cold War was the Cuban Missile Crisis of 1962. In 1961 the United States of America discovered that the Soviet Union was placing missiles on Cuba, close to the United States. After very tense talking, a big nuclear war was avoided between the Soviet Union and the USA.
Some people call Castro a dictator. They criticize him, because they think he has ignored some human rights, for example, torture, murder and oppression of freedom of speech, both at home and in African countries where he sent Cuban soldiers to spread Communism. Other people do not think this is true. For example, Nelson Mandela has spoken in support of Castro and has thanked him for aid to Africa. Amnesty International criticized Cuba's human rights record but noted slow progress in July of 2002. Supporters of Castro say he gave Cuba the best health care and education of Latin America and created equality between the poor and the rich.

United Kingdom Independence Party
The United Kingdom Independence Party (often called UKIP, said "yoo-kip") is a political party that wants Britain to leave the European Union.
Current Members.
There are currently about 25,000 people who are members of the UKIP. Of these, some are politicians. Ten of them are members of the European Parliament.

George VI of the United Kingdom
George VI (December 14, 1895 – February 6, 1952) was the King of the United Kingdom from 11 December 1936 until he died on 6 February 1952. In 1923, he married Elizabeth Bowes-Lyon.
He was followed by his daughter Queen Elizabeth II.

Jumanji
"Jumanji" is a 1995 movie starring Robin Williams, which was based loosely on a 1982 children's book of the same name by Chris Van Allsburg. It is about a boy who gets trapped in a game for 30 years, and must finish playing the game when he gets out. Other stars include Kirsten Dunst.
The game in the movie (titled Jumanji) has been made into a real game.

Paul Martin Jr.
Paul Martin Jr. (born August 28, 1938) was the 21st Prime Minister of Canada. He was also the leader Liberal Party of Canada. He became prime minister December 12, 2003, when Jean Chrétien stepped down. He won an election on June 28, 2004, because the Liberals won more seats than the other political parties; but they did not win a majority of the seats, so he led a minority government. There was another election on January 23, 2006; his party lost this election, so the next prime minister will be Stephen Harper.
Martin was greatly respected, as a Finance Minister, around the world for his fiscal management because, of the growth in the economy and taking the government out of deficit.
His tenure as Prime Minister is generally seen as a disaster by the majority of Canadians.
Martin was born in Windsor, Ontario. His father was for thirty-three years as a member the Canadian House of Commons and was a part of the cabinet. He graduated from the University of Toronto in 1961 with a B.A. in history and philosophy and from the University of Toronto Law School in 1965. He married Sheila Martin in 1965.
He was elected to parliament from the riding of LaSalle-Émard in Montreal, Quebec in 1988. He was finance minister from 1993 until 2002. He became known for balancing the budget (ending government borrowing of money). In 2003, he was elected leader of the Liberal party and was appointed one month later prime minister.
Mr. Martin's government made same-sex marriage legal. It also had problems with the Sponsorship scandal in 2004. In 2006, Parliament passed a vote of no confidence, which forced a national election to be held on January 23. The Liberals lost the election and Martin lost his position as prime minister. Soon afterwards, he resigned his position as leader of the Liberal Party.
After fourteen months in office, Paul Martin got the nickname "Mr. Dithers". He was called so by magazine "The Economist". They say this is because he changed his opinion too often.

Thomas Jefferson
Thomas Jefferson (April 13, 1743 - July 4, 1826) was the third President of the United States, and author of the Declaration of Independence.
Early life.
Jefferson was born in Shadwell, Virginia. His parents were farmers. Jefferson was very smart and studied many things at school and college. He designed his own home, called Monticello. It was very advanced for that period of time.
Jefferson married Martha Wayles Skelton in 1772.
Political life.
Jefferson wanted the Thirteen Colonies to be independent of Great Britain. He was a leader of those who wanted the same thing. He was a member of the Second Continental Congress. He was chosen to be on the committee that wrote the Declaration of Independence and was its main writer.
Jefferson served as a legislator in Virginia and as Governor of Virginia.
Jefferson was minister to France from 1785-1789.
Jefferson was selected by George Washington as the first Secretary of State. Jefferson thought that the federal government should be small. He had the opposite view of Secretary of the Treasury Alexander Hamilton. He led the party that opposed Hamilton and the Federalist Party. This party was called the Anti-Federalist Party and would become the Democratic-Republican Party.
Jefferson ran for president against John Adams. He got the second highest number of votes and as was the law at the time, became vice-president.
Presidency.
Jefferson ran again as the Democratic-Republican candidate in 1800 and gained a narrow victory over Aaron Burr. He was reelected in 1804. Jefferson made the Louisiana Purchase. Jefferson sent the Lewis and Clark Expedition to explore the land gained by the Louisiana Purchase.
Jefferson had to deal with the threat of war during his second term. Great Britain and France were at war for almost all of Jefferson's time as president. Each side did things that could have made the United States enter the war. Jefferson worked to keep the United States out of the war and neutral.
Later years.
Jefferson created the University of Virginia.
The British burned Washington D.C. during the War of 1812. When they did, many books in the Library of Congress were burned. Jefferson sold his own personal library to replace the lost books.
Jefferson died on July 4, 1826, on the 50th anniversary of the ratification of the Declaration of Independence, the same day as John Adams. He is considered one of the greatest United States Presidents.

Aquilino Pimentel, Jr.
Aquilino Q. Pimentel, Jr. (born December 11, 1933), also known as Nene, is a politician in the Philippine. He was first elected as a delegate to the 1971 Constitutional Convention. He then went into exile when President Ferdinand Marcos declared martial law. He came back in 1980 and was elected as mayor of Cagayan de Oro City in Misamis Oriental but removed as mayor 1982. He returned as mayor again in 1984. He was elected as an Assemblyman in the Batasang Pambansa (National Assembly), serving from 1984-1986. After the EDSA Revolution, President Corazon Aquino appointed him as Minister of Local Government and Presidential advisor/chief negotiator with the Muslim insurgents in Mindanao. He then was elected Senator (1987-1992). As senator, he authored the seminal Local Government Code. He then launched a bid for the vice presidency in 1992, running under the Liberal Party with Jovito Salonga running for president, finishing fifth among the vice presidential candidates by garnering 9.9% of the vote. He was cheated of victory in the 1995 national elections after running for another term as senator; he took the case to the Supreme Court eventually winning the suit in 2004. In 1998, he ran successfully for another term in the Senate of the Philippines, from 1998-2004. He was also elected as the 19th Senate President, serving from 2000-2001. Most recently he won another seat in the Senate in the recently-concluded May 10 National Elections.
As chair of the Blue Ribbon Committee, he has recommended the prosecution of top government officials of previous administrations in relation to the Expo Pilipino centennial scam and the misuse of the funds of the Retirement and Separation Benefits Systems of the Armed Forces. He has also recommended the prosecution of certain personnel of the Land Registration Administration for involvement in faking of land titles. Recently his committee also conducted series of investigations into the allegation of Governor Luis "Chavit" Singson on jueteng scandal. As Chair of the Committee on Local Government, he has supported far-reaching amendments to further strengthen the role of local government units in national development. He has also gotten senate approval to return the police to the supervision of LGUs and has authored a law to fix the date for elections of ARMM officials.
He is the president and founder of the PDP-Laban party.

Alabama Song
The "Alabama Song" comes from the 1930 operetta "Rise and Fall of the City of Mahagonny". The music is by Kurt Weill; officially the lyrics are by Bertolt Brecht, but were probably actually written by Elisabeth Hauptmann. The lyrics for the "Alabama Song" are in English (although a specific type of English) and are performed in that language even when the opera is performed in its original German.
The song has often been covered, perhaps most famously in 1967 by The Doors; unsurprisingly, Jim Morrison changed the lyric "Show us the way to the next pretty boy" to "Show me the way to the next little girl."

Mikhail Gorbachev
Mikhail Sergeyevich Gorbachyov (Gorbachev) (Russian: Михаи́л Серге́евич Горбачёв; Pronunciation: mih-kha-ILL ser-GHE-ye-vich gor-bah-CHOFF) (born March 2, 1931), was the leader of the Soviet Union from 1985 until 1991. His attempts at reform led to the end of the Cold War, but although he was not trying to, this helped cause the end of the political supremacy of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union (CPSU), and the break-up of the Soviet Union into smaller countries. He was good friends with Ronald Reagan.
He was awarded the Nobel Peace Prize in 1990.

Jimmy Carter
James Earl "Jimmy" Carter, Jr. (born October 1, 1924) was the 39th President of the United States from 1977 to 1981. He was a member of the Democratic Party. Carter was born in Plains, Georgia. He was a state senator and later the governor of Georgia. At this time he worked to stop racial discrimination. He was famous for his peanut growing business which made him rich.
Carter tried to help with the problem between Israel and Palestine. He also tried to reach an agreement with the USSR about nuclear weapons. This did not work because he was not prepared to compromise. He did help Egypt and Israel sign a peacetreaty. He was followed as President by Ronald Reagan. Jimmy Carter is still alive and is often in foreign countries as an independent observer of elections.
While Carter was President, some people took over the U.S. Embassy in Iran. They kept Americans in the embassy as hostages. The hostages were not released until the last day Carter was president.
Jimmy Carter also had to deal with many problems in the United States. During his presidency, the nation had an energy and economic crisis. The fact that he could not fix these problems led the way for Ronald Reagan to take the role of President.

Theodore Roosevelt
Theodore "Teddy" Roosevelt (1858–1919), was the 26th president of the United States. He was born in New York. He was a member of the Republican Party. Roosevelt passed many laws when he was president to help ordinary people. He used his power to stop big companies and rich people who owned them from making life hard for their workers.
As president, he was interested in what happened in other countries. In 1905, he helped end the war between the Russian and Japanese empires. He won a Nobel Peace Prize for it in 1906.
The popular stuffed animal doll, the "Teddy bear", was named after Roosevelt. He was so popular that his face was put on Mount Rushmore.

Henry VIII of England
Henry VIII (June 28, 1491 – January 28, 1547) was the King of England from 1509 until his death. He is best remembered for having had six wives.
Henry was born in Greenwich Palace on June 28, 1491 and was the second son of Henry VII of England and Elizabeth of York. He had one brother, who was called Arthur, Prince of Wales, and two sisters, who were called Margaret and Mary. Arthur should have been king after their father died, but Arthur died before his father, making Henry next in line for the throne. Henry ended up marrying Arthur's widow.
The most important event that happened in England when Henry was the king was the country's change in religion from Roman Catholic to Protestant. Because his first wife Catherine of Aragon had only had one daughter, and they did not have any sons to be his heirs, Henry asked the Pope to give them a divorce. The Pope did not want to do this, because he was afraid of what would happen next. Catherine's nephew was Charles V, Emperor of the Holy Roman Empire, and he was very powerful. Also, Catherine's family ruled Spain, and Spain was the largest Catholic country. Henry then chose a new Archbishop of Canterbury, a man called Thomas Cranmer. Henry knew that Cranmer would do what he wanted, and Cranmer agreed that Henry could have a divorce from Catherine. The Pope was so angry that he excommunicated Henry, meaning Henry was thrown out of the church. Henry fought back. In 1534, he passed the Act of Supremacy, which meant that the king, not the pope, was the head of the church in England. He then forced all priests and bishops to accept him as the new leader. Anyone who refused was punished.
Protestants thought that monasteries, in which Roman Catholic monks and nuns lived, had more money and land than the monks and nuns needed. Henry forced the monks and nuns to move out of the monasteries. Then Henry gave the money and land of the monasteries to men who supported him. Most of the men who received money and land from the closed monasteries were Protestants. This event was called the Dissolution of the monasteries.
After his divorce from Catherine of Aragon, Henry VIII married Anne Boleyn, who was younger than Catherine and still able to have children. When Anne, just like Catherine, only had a daughter and no sons, Henry soon grew tired of her and started looking for another wife. Henry's most loyal official, Thomas Cromwell, helped him to find a way to get rid of Anne, by finding people who said that she had been the lover of several other men. Anne was put on trial and found guilty, and she was executed by having her head chopped off.
Henry's third wife was Jane Seymour. She soon gave birth to a son called Edward. This made Henry very happy, but, after a few days, Jane died. Henry had loved her very much and he never got over his sadness at her death. He lost interest in everything, and became very fat. He became angry with Thomas Cromwell when Cromwell suggested that he should get married again after Jane's death.
After a while, Henry changed his mind. Because he still only had one son, he realised that it might be a good idea to marry again, and he agreed to marry Anne of Cleves, a German princess. When Anne arrived, Henry did not think she was as pretty as she looked in the pictures he had seen, and he was not satisfied with her. Anne was also unhappy, and agreed to be divorced from Henry after only a few months. In the meantime, Henry had noticed a young lady at court, called Catherine Howard, and thought that she might make a good wife. Catherine Howard was a cousin of Henry's second wife, Anne Boleyn. Henry and Catherine got married in 1540, but Catherine was much younger than Henry and she soon got tired of him and started to flirt with other men. After they had been married for just over a year, Henry found out that Catherine had been having an affair with someone else. She was found guilty of treason and was executed, just like Anne Boleyn had been a few years before.
Henry's sixth and last wife was called Catherine Parr. She was a woman in her thirties who had already been married twice. Her first two husbands had been much older than her, and both had died. Henry thought that she would be more sensible and faithful than his previous wives, and he turned out to be right. Catherine Parr stayed married to Henry for over three years, until he died, but they did not have any children.
Henry died on 28 January 1547. He was buried in Windsor Castle. Henry was the father of two queens and one king. They were Mary I of England, Elizabeth I of England and Edward VI of England. None of them had any children of their own.

Andrew Jackson
Andrew Jackson (March 15, 1767 – June 8, 1845) was a hero in the War of 1812. He became the seventh President of the United States of America. He was the first Democrat and is on the Twenty Dollar Bill.
He is famous for forcing Native Americans to move west in the Trail of Tears. He opposed the Bank of the United States. He is one of Bill Clinton's favorite historical figures.

Vladimir Putin
(Russian: Влади́мир Влади́мирович Пу́тин, "Vladímir Vladímirovich Pútin") (born October 7, 1952 in Leningrad) is a Russian politician. He was been the President of Russia since January 2000-May 2007. Before becoming President of Russia, Putin was the Prime Minister of Russia. He had worked for the KGB, and was a lawyer. He is a member of the Russian Orthodox Church. Putin is married to Lyudmila Putina and has two daughters.
From 1985 to 1990 the KGB stationed Putin in Dresden, East Germany. Putin thinks of this as a minor position.
Following the collapse of the East German regime, Putin was recalled to the Soviet Union and returned to Leningrad, where in June 1990 he assumed a position with the International Affairs section of Leningrad State University, reporting to the Vice-Rector. In June 1991, he was appointed head of the International Committee of the St. Petersburg Mayor's office, with responsibility for promoting international relations and foreign investments.
The amount of the actual psychological, financial and, possibly, physical damages that he must have caused to the dissidents in the former Soviet Union and in East Germany is not a matter of any public records at present.
Putin formally gave up his position in the state security services on August 20, 1991, during the KGB-supported abortive putsch against Soviet President Mikhail Gorbachev. In 1994 he became First Deputy Chairman of the city of Saint Petersburg, a position he retained until he was called to Moscow, in August 1996, to serve in a variety of senior positions in Yeltsin's second Administration. He was head of the FSB (the successor agency to the KGB) from July 1998 to August 1999, and also served as Secretary of the Security Council from March to August 1999.
Mr. Putin pledged his support for United Russia party but is not a member of any party at all.

Henry VII of England
Henry the VII or Henry Tudor (January 28, 1457 – April 21, 1509) was king of England from 1485 to 1509. He founded the Tudor dynasty.
Biography.
Henry VII was born in 1457 to Edmund Tudor and Margaret Beaufort. His father died two months before he was born, leaving his 13-year-old mother as his only parent. After Henry's birth, he spent a lot of time with his uncle Jasper Tudor. Jasper took Henry to France, where he spent most of his youth. Henry had a claim to the throne of England, but it was not a very good one, and he had to wait a long time for a chance to take the throne. In 1483, a new king came to the throne in England, called Richard III. King Richard was not popular with everyone, because it was thought that he had stolen the throne from his young nephews and had killed them. This gave Henry the chance he had been waiting for. With help from the French, he raised an army. They landed in Pembrokeshire, close to where Henry had been born, so he was able to gather more supporters on the way.
On August 22 1485, Henry's army defeated Richard III's army at the Battle of Bosworth. When Richard III died in this battle, Henry VII became king. There were other people who had a claim on the throne, and Henry did his best to stop them from taking it from him, either by executing them, putting them in prison, or trying to make friends of them, as he did with the Earl of Lincoln. Another step he took was to marry Elizabeth of York, the niece of King Richard III, who would herself have been the heir to the throne if she had not been a girl.
There were also people who pretended to be long-lost members of the royal family, so that they could try to take the throne. One of these was a little boy called Lambert Simnel, who looked very like Edward, Earl of Warwick. The real Earl of Warwick was Henry's prisoner, but this did not stop other people from believing that Lambert Simnel was him. The Earl of Lincoln rebelled against King Henry and raised an army to make Lambert Simnel king, thinking that he himself could rule the country. There was a battle, and the Earl of Lincoln was killed. Lambert Simnel was captured, but, because he was only a child, Henry spared his life and he became a royal servant.
Death.
After Henry VII died in 1509, his son became king as Henry VIII. Henry VII was buried in Westminster Abbey.

John F. Kennedy
John Fitzgerald Kennedy (May 29, 1917 - November 22, 1963), also known as JFK, was the 35th president of the United States of America. He held office from 1961 until he was assassinated (shot dead) in 1963. He was the youngest president ever elected and the only Roman Catholic president.
JFK was friends with a pretty actress called Marilyn Monroe, and one day she sang "Happy Birthday, Mr President" for him for his birthday. This song is very famous.
When JFK was killed it was a great mystery. Police say that a man called Lee Harvey Oswald killed JFK, but some people think that some people in the American government killed him instead. Some people think that two shots were fired, and there are many stories about what really happened. People call this the greatest conspiracy theory ever in the whole world, as there are so many different stories and so many people believe that something strange happened.
An airport was named after JFK, because he was so famous. Many other places were named after JFK too.
The Kennedys were a rich and influencal Irish-Catholic family, many of them did great things, but lots of sad things happened to many of them, JFK's brother Bobby Kennedy was also a famous politician. Bobby Kennedy was also killed and it is also a great mystery.

Salvador Allende
Salvador Allende Gossens (June 26, 1908 – September 11, 1973) was a physician, senator, minister of health and the President of Chile from November 3, 1970 until his murder on September 11, 1973.
Family and early life.
Allende was born on June 26 of 1908 in the port city of Valparaiso, Chile. Like many Chileans Allende had a mestizo (mixed) racial background (European and other races mixed with Native Americans), his father Salvador Allende (senior) was of Basque descent and his mother Laura Gossens had a Jewish background (though converted to Catholicism).
School.
In 1918 his father sent Allende to study at the "Instituto Nacional" (National Institute) in Santiago, after completing his secondary schooling he does his compulsory military service. After completing his military service he enters the University of Chile to study medicine. Allende was a gifted, friendly and popular student; a great debater and public speaker and quickly becomes a student leader and vice-president of the FECH. (Student Federation of Chile). He graduated with a medical degree in 1933.
Distinguished political career.
He was one of the founders of the Socialist Party of Chile and in 1938 became a minister of health. He was a senator from 1945 until 1969 and was President of the Chilean Senate from 1966 until 1969.
Elections.
Allende first run for the presidency in 1952 but failed. Determined to succeed and win an election he tried again in 1958 and then in 1964. In both instances he failed again.
Allende would tour Chile from Iquique to Magallanes, for example one end to the other, speaking to peasants in the south and miners in the north and held rallies in the big cities. Allende found it hard to win an election because of the successful scare campaigns launched by opposing parties, many financed by large multi-national corporations and powerful national institutions such as private banks and schools.
Results.
Finally, and to the surprise of many working people - who had voted for him in previous elections and felt he would never win - in 1970 he won and became the President of Chile.
Goals.
Allende always ran for election on the same socialist platform (plan) proposing the same resolutions (things to be done), focusing on the persistent inequality in the country and the underdevelopment (poverty for large part of the population) which Allende saw as being rooted in the lack of control the Chilean people had over their natural resources and vital industries. (e.g. Banks, Copper mines, Electricity Companies etc.).
Allende promised that he would nationalize (put under control of government) vital industries and then create an advanced public health system and educational system that would be free and accessible to all. During the cold war (between the U.S. and the former U.S.S.R) many people feared that Chile would fall under the influence of the USSR and after the 1960s under the influence of Cuba.
Revolutionary change.
Allende’s speeches were also very radical (extreme) and Allende’s vision for Chile seemed completely different to the Chile that most people were familiar with. For example: Allende was an atheist and Marxist, for example he did not believe in Jesus or God and considered economic planning more important than anything else. This was odd in a country that was very catholic, held traditional family values, and in which people were taught that political freedoms (the freedom to elect politicians from different parties) was more important than solving problems such as extreme poverty or economic inequality (division between the poorest and the wealthiest people).
Allende also wanted revolutionary change, ie. he wanted deep changes to Chilean society very quickly, such forms of changes have always tended to cause great divisions in society between those who oppose the changes (called reactionaries) and those who support the drastic changes (revolutionaries). Through history such situation tends to always end up resolved violently. For example civil war (where one group of people fight another group of people of the same country), or military coup (when a government is overthrown before it finishes his term).
Results.
As a result many Chileans, especially professionals like University professors, doctors and business people left the country–this had a negative effect on Allende’s reforms. Eg. Allende increased health services and places at Universities for the underprivileged while many professors, specialists and doctors were leaving the country.
Peaceful revolution.
However, Allende was unique in that he did all he could to prevent this sort of violence, calling his revolution a “peaceful one within democracy” or calling it “the Chilean road to socialism.” In 1973 Allende’s enemies accused him of preparing a secret war and that his supporters were hoarding stocks of illegal weapons (in shanty towns and in rural areas) that were being sent from communist Cuba. To prove that this was not true, Allende allowed the Chilean Army to enforce a “weapons control’s law” that allowed the Chilean military to search and comb for any illegal weapons anywhere in the country. The Chilean army confirmed that after thoroughly searching for such weapons throughout the country they had found no significant stocks as the opposition was claiming. This ended up creating more support for Allende and allowed Allende to begin to focus on the upcoming election.
Allende's Mandate.
Allende came to power with a socialist plan. His vision for Chile was one in which the country's resources and wealth would be owned by Chileans and distributed more democratically. Allende started his program by nationalizing (put under control of government) major industries. Such as, Chile's copper mines (Chile had one of the largest copper mines in the World) but these mines were not owned by Chileans but by very powerful U.S. business people.
This created a serious problem with the U.S. government who saw Allende's nationalisation as an attack on U.S. interest and a threat to U.S. money investments in South America.
The coup, September 11, 1973.
The American Central Intelligence Agency was involved in the overthrowing of his government. Allende was a socialist. Many of his reforms and programs revolved around socialism. He created universal health care for all, made education better, and took a stronger level of control within the economy. He died in 1973. His death has been disputed for years; some feel that he took his own life by committing suicide, but others feel that he was murdered by Augusto Pinochet's militia. Pinochet would then become dictator of Chile.
Death and myth.
Allende was replaced by those who bombed him out of his post as president. The new ruling Junta justified their coup claiming that “Chile could no longer tolerate the cancer of Marxism”. The Pinochet regime claimed Allende had violated the Chilean Constitution–strange considering that Pinochet ended up writing a completely new one.
Legacy and place in history.
Allende became of interest to people all over the world because he was the first democratically elected socialist in Chile and the first democratically elected Marxist in the world. Many people felt Allende was the beginning of a new era in which great changes to society - especially in developing countries - could be brought about peacefully through an election

Winston Churchill
Winston Leonard Spencer Churchill was an English politician, who was Prime Minister of the United Kingdom during and after the World War II. Many people say that he is the greatest British leader of the twentieth century. He was also a soldier, journalist, and author. He won the Nobel Prize for literature.
He was born on 30 November, 1874 at Blenheim Palace, Oxfordshire, England, and died on 24 January 1965. His family was rich and well known. His father, Lord Randolph Churchill, was a politician. His mother was American.
He went to a famous school named Harrow. He didn't get good results, but he was good at fighting.
He joined the British Army in 1893. He fought in a war in Sudan in 1898 as an officer in the cavalry. In 1899 he went to the Boer War in South Africa, to be a newspaper reporter. He was captured by the Boers, but managed to escape.
In 1900 he became a politician in the Conservative Party, and was elected to Parliament. In 1904 he changed parties and joined the Liberal Party, but later returned to the Conservative Party.
He married Clementine Hozier in 1908, and had 5 children named Diana, Randolph, Sarah, Marigold and Mary.
World War I.
In 1910 Churchill became Home Secretary, one of the most important members of the government. In 1911 he was made First Lord of the Admiralty, which made him in charge of the Navy. When World War I broke out, he stayed in that job. He organized an invasion in Gallipoli which went wrong, and because of this, he was made to leave the government. He joined the army and was sent to fight in France, although he was still a Member of Parliament. In 1917 he was made minister in charge of military supplies.
Between the wars.
After World War I Churchill was put in charge of war. In 1919 he was in charge of aircraft. In 1921 he was in charge of the colonies. Soon after, in 1922 he lost in an election. In 1924 he became a member of Parliament again, this time not as a member of any party. In 1925 he joined the Conservative Party again. He became Chancellor of the Exchequer (Minister of Finance) in 1924.
After 1929 Churchill disagreed with many things the Conservative party believed in. He was not given any job in the government. Instead he wrote books. One was called "Marlborough: His Life and Times", about his famous ancestor John Churchill, 1st Duke of Marlborough; another was "A History of the English Speaking Peoples", which was not published until after World War 2.
When Adolf Hitler came to power in Germany, Churchill warned that Britain should strengthen its military and oppose Hitler. However hardly any leaders agreed with him.
World War II.
At the start of World War II, Churchill was again put in charge of the Navy. In 1940 the war was going badly for Britain, and the Prime Minister resigned. Churchill was given the job. Some people thought that Britain could not win the war, and that they should make peace with Hitler. Churchill was sure that Britain could win and promised to continue the fight. He made famous speeches which are still remembered today.
He was friends with the President of the United States, Franklin D. Roosevelt. He persuaded Roosevelt to give supplies to Britain, and to help Britain out without fighting themselves. He had many meetings with Roosevelt and with Joseph Stalin, the leader of the Soviet Union, after they came into the war. They were called the "Big Three".
In 1945 his Conservative party lost an election. He stopped being Prime Minister.
In 1951 he became Prime Minister again.
In 1953 he became Sir Winston, and also won the Nobel Prize for Literature.
In 1955 he retired from being Prime Minister.
In 1964 he retired from Parliament.
In 1965 he died at the age of 90 with his wife Lady Clementine Churchill and other members of the family at his bedside.

Nelson Mandela
Nelson Rolihlahla Mandela (born 18 July, 1918) was the first President of South Africa to be elected in a fully-represented democratic election.
Mandela was born in the Transkei region of South Africa. After his father died when Nelson was 7 years old he lived with the local regent, who sent him to school. After he left Fort Hare University in 1941, he went to Johannesburg. In 1944, he helped start the African National Congress Youth League. He was soon a leader in the group. The government saw him as a threat to their policy of apartheid, and they made it very hard for him to keep leading. He was put in jail for this in 1964. In 1990, he was let out of prison after 27 years. He got the Nobel Peace Prize in 1993 together with former President Frederik Willem de Klerk. Mandela was the president of South Africa from 10 May 1994 until 1999. He was considered one of South Africa's greatest leaders of all time and is respected around the world.
He wanted to free South Africa without violence, but when the government started killing and hurting protestors, he started Umkhonto we Sizwe (English: "Spear of the Nation", also MK) with Walter Sisulu and other people in the African National Congress. He admires Mahatma Ghandi and follows many of his teachings.
Mandela is a hero in South Africa and in most of the world because he helped end apartheid. He is also an example of racial equality.
"We stand here today as nothing more than a representative of the millions of our people who dared to rise up against a social system whose very essence is war, violence, racism, oppression, repression and the impoverishment of an entire people."

George H. W. Bush
George Herbert Walker Bush (born June 12, 1924) was President of the United States between 1989 and 1993. He was born in Milton, Massachusetts and was a politician in Texas.
During World War II, he was a crewman on a TBM Avenger. He had survived many crashes and sunk a Japanese ship.
He was the vice-president when Ronald Reagan was President.
When he ran for re-election in 1992, he lost. The person who won was Bill Clinton.
He is the father of George W. Bush, the current President, and Jeb Bush, the governor of Florida. He has two other sons. His wife is Barbara Bush.
Because he has the same first and last names as his son, he is often called George H. W. Bush or George Bush Sr. (George Bush senior). Some people call him "41", because he was the 41st President.

Göran Persson
Göran Persson (born January 20 1949) was the Prime minister of Sweden between 1996 and 2006. He was the leader of the Social Democratic political party, but quit in March 2007. He was replaced by Mona Sahlin as leader of the party, the partys first woman to do so.

Silvio Berlusconi
Silvio Berlusconi (born September 29, 1936 in Milan) is an Italian politician, leader of a right-wing coalition named "Casa delle Libertà" (House of Freedoms) and leader of the right-wing party "Forza Italia".
He has been Head of the Italian Government in 1994 and a second time since 2001 until 2006, when he was defeated at the political elections by Romano Prodi, leader of the left-wing coalition named "L'unione" (The Union). This coalition won the elections only for few votes: 24,000 at the "Camera dei Deputati", one of the two Chambers of the Italian Parliament, and only 4 senators more than Berlusconi in the Senate.
Silvio Berlusconi is also the owner of many Italian enterprises, for instance the television network "Mediaset".

Javier Solana
Dr. Javier Solana Madariaga (born July 1942) is the former Secretary General of the North Atlantic Treaty Organisation (NATO) and the current European Union foreign policy chief. Born in Madrid, Spain he became a physicist, studying in both the United Kingdom and the United States before returning to Spain with Nicolás Cabrera, and becoming a Profesor of solid state physics in the Complutense University.
Having already joined the banned PSOE left-wing party in 1964, he became one of its leaders when it became legal in 1977. He became a Cabinet Minister, serving first as Minister for Culture and party spokesman, then Minister for Education, then Minister for Foreign Affairs, before being made NATO boss in December 1995, just as the Dayton agreement saw the IFOR NATO peacekeeping mission enter the former Yugoslavia. He was also involved in the Kosovo bombings, and the negotiations that led to an eventual peace.

United Russia
United Russia (Russian: "Единая Россия") is a Russian political party, which usually labels itself centrist. It backs the president Vladimir Putin and can be seen as his vehicle in the Duma.

Woodrow Wilson
Dr. Thomas Woodrow Wilson (December 28, 1856 – February 3, 1924) was born in Virginia in 1856 and grew up in Georgia. He later became the 28th president of the United States of America between 1913 and 1921. He died in 1924.
He grew up as a Presbyterian and his family sided with the Confederacy in 1851. When he was elected President, he fought hard for what he believed in. One of those things was the League of Nations, which was something he liked a lot. The world saw him as a peacemaker. He wanted World War I to be the biggest war ever fought. With this, he thought he could bring an end to war forever.

Angela Merkel
Dr Angela Dorothea Merkel (born 17 July 1954, in Hamburg) is a German politician, and the Chancellor of Germany since 22 November 2005.
She was born in Hamburg, and grew up in the German Democratic Republic (which was the old East Germany, before the two Germanys became one) where she lived until the Reuniting of Germany in 1990. Merkel is now married to Joachim Sauer, a professor of chemistry. Angela Merkel currently chairs (is in charge of) the German conservative party, the Christian Democratic Union of Germany (CDU).
Merkel became Germany's first female chancellor on 22 November 2005 in a coalition of the two biggest German political parties CDU/CSU and SPD.

Haile Selassie I of Ethiopia
Haile Selassie I of Ethiopia (July 23 1892-August 26, 1975) was the Emperor of Ethiopia. He is also known as the religious symbol for God incarnate (in the flesh) among members of the Rastafari movement, who call themselves by his name before becoming Emperor - Ras Tafari.
Tafari was made into local governor of Sidamo in 1907, and Harar province in 1911. As governor of Harar, he had a huge following, but he agreed not to remove Lij Iyasu from power as regent, in exchange for Lij Iyasu not removing him as governor of Harer. However, Iyasu became a Muslim, and also he did try to remove Tafari as governor, breaking the agreement. Tafari said that now the agreement was broken, he did not have to keep it either, and so he did remove Iyasu as regent. Because Iyasu had gone over to Islam, the nobles replaced him with Empress Zauditu on September 27, 1916 and made Tafari regent. From this time onward, he controlled Ethiopia. He was made "negus" (king) in 1928, and was crowned "Haile Selassie I, King of Kings of Ethiopia, Conquering Lion of the Tribe of Judah, Elect of God" on November 2, 1930. His coronation was given widespread publicity throughout the world, especially through two TIME Magazine articles in a row. This publicity created interest on the far-away island of Jamaica, where a belief in his divinity (Godliness) soon arose because of his titles, and because they saw him as a symbol of black liberation.
In 1936 he left Ethiopia after the invasion by Mussolini's Italy. He gave a speech at the League of Nations, asking the world to stop the Italians, but they failed to act. With the help of the British in World War Two, he was able to return to Ethiopia in 1941. In 1963, the Emperor did everything he could to help start the Organisation of African Unity (OAU) with its headquarters in Addis Ababa. In 1966, he visited Jamaica, where he met the Rastafarian community of Jamaica. On September 12, 1974, he was overthrown by a Marxist coup, and, they said, died of natural causes the following August. However, there is some disagreement around why he died, and many Rastafarians claim he is still alive.

Dominique de Villepin
Dominique Marie François René Galouzeau de Villepin (born November 14, 1953), simply known as Dominique de Villepin, was appointed Premier (or Prime Minister) of France on May 31, 2005. He was made Premier by Jacques Chirac after the French President removed Jean-Pierre Raffarin from the premiership. Raffarin failed to gain the support of the French people for the European Constitution. Villepin stepped down as Prime Minister on May 17, 2007.
Dominique de Villepin said that his government's most important task would be job creation. He knew that the French people were concerned about the condition of the French economy. This was one of the reasons they had voted against the European Constitution in the referendum on May 29, 2005,

Lyndon B. Johnson
Lyndon B. Johnson (August 27, 1908 – January 22, 1973) was the 36th president of the United States. He is probably best known for increasing U.S. involvement in Vietnam.
Johnson took over the presidency when President Kennedy was killed in November 1963.

Hillary Rodham Clinton
Hillary Diane Rodham Clinton (born October 26, 1947) is the junior United States Senator from New York and President-elect Barack Obama's nominee for United States Secretary of State. She is married to the former President of the United States Bill Clinton. When her husband was president, she was given the title of First Lady of the United States. She was a candidate in the 2008 election of a new President. She is a member of the Democratic Party.
She is a lawyer and was the First Lady of Arkansas before being First Lady of the United States. She began her first term as Senator January 3, 2001.
Hillary Clinton was the first First Lady to win election to public office. She ran for re-election to the Senate in 2006, which she won, and was considered by many in the media and politics as having a good chance to win in the race for the Democratic Party's US presidential nomination in 2008, but she lost to Barack Obama.
Early life and education.
Hillary Diane Rodham was born in Chicago, Illinois. Her father's name is Hugh Rodham, Sr., and her mother is Dorothy Emma Howell Rodham. She has two brothers, Hugh and Tony.
She studied at Maine East High School and Maine South High School. She completed her schooling in 1965, and enrolled at Wellesley College in Massachusetts.
In 1969, Rodham entered Yale Law School. She received a Juris Doctor (J.D.) degree from Yale in 1973. Then, she began a year of post-graduate study on children and medicine at the Yale Child Study Center.
Marriage and family.
While working as a faculty member at the Law School of the University of Arkansas, she married Bill Clinton. Bill Clinton was also working as a faculty at the same university. Both knew each other and were classmates at the Yale Law School. Their only child is Chelsea Clinton, born on 27 February 1980.
First Lady of the United States.
When she was First Lady, she tried to change the health care system. Some people didn't like it when the planning meetings were kept secret away from the public. In the end, too many people did not want the changes that she wanted.
Another major event during the time she was First Lady was when the public found out that Bill Clinton was with another woman, Monica Lewinsky. There was stress in the marriage partly because Bill Clinton had to go to trial (impeachment) because he was accused of lying to the court (during a deposition).
Senate.
When she decided that she wanted to be Senator, she chose New York even though she never lived there. Some accused her of "carpetbagging" because of this. She went on to win the election and won a second term in 2006.
When the war between the United States and Iraq was about to start, she voted in favor of the war. Now she is opposed to the war and wants American troops to stop fighting rebel Iraqis.
Presidential campaign.
Hillary Clinton had raised more money than anybody else in the 2008 Presidential campaign, but later had big money problems for her campaign by May 7. She did not get picked by her party, the person who did was Barack Obama, but she campaigned for Obama after this.
United States Secretary of State nomination.
In mid-November 2008, Obama and Clinton talked about whether she could be the next U.S. Secretary of State in his presidency. On November 21, there were reports that said Hillary Clinton had accepted his offer.
On December 1, President-elect Obama announced that Clinton would be his nominee for Secretary of State.

Barry Switzer
Barry Switzer (born October 5, 1937 in Crossett, Arkansas) was an American football coach. He coached both professional and college football between 1962 and 1997. Switzer is one of only two head coaches to win both a college football national championship and a Super Bowl. He has one of the highest winning percentages in the history of college football.
After high school, Switzer went to the University of Arkansas. He played football there from 1956 to 1960. After graduation, Switzer join the US Army for a short time. After the Army, he returned to the University of Arkansas to work as an assistant coach.
After the 1966 season, Switzer became an assistant coach at the University of Oklahoma. He became head coach there in 1973. During his first two years as head coach, Oklahoma did not lose any games and won the national championship two time. They won the championship a third time in 1985. Switzer left Oklahoma in 1989. His record there was 157 wins, 29 losses and 4 ties.
In 1994, Switzer became the coach for the Dallas Cowboys. He led them to a win in Super Bowl XXX during the 1995 season. Switzer retired from coaching after the following season.
In 2002, Switzer was elected into the College Football Hall of Fame. On September 9, 2007, he began working with the FOX television network on its NFL pre-game show.

Kim Il-sung
Kim Il-Sung (April 15, 1912 - July 8, 1994) was the first Communist leader (from 1948 until his death) of North Korea. His son Kim Jong-il is the current ruler of North Korea.

Henry IV of France
Henry IV of France (December 13, 1553 - May 14, 1610) was born in Pau. He was the son of Antoine de Bourbon and Jeanne of Navarre.
On August 18, 1572, Henry married Margaret of Valois. She was the sister of Charles IX. He became the King of Navarre in the same year.
Henry's children were Louis XIII and Henrietta Maria of France, who married Charles I and became the Queen of England.
Henry died on May 14, 1610. He was a friend of Michel of Montaigne.

Philip II of Spain
Philip II of Spain (May 21, 1527 – September 13, 1598) was, starting in 1556, king of Spain, Italy and Burgundy, the Netherlands, Franche-Comté, Naples, and overseas Spanish America. He was born at Valladolid, and was the only son of Holy Roman Emperor Charles V and his wife to live until he was an adult. He was Catholic. His rule was filled with troubles that caused him to be harsh on his people and other nations.
Childhood.
For the first seven years of his life, Philip moved between different castles with his mother. In 1534 he moved into a private house in Salamanca to start his schooling. His mother died in 1539 and he brought her body to Granada, where her grandparents Ferdinand and Isabella were buried. He left Spain in 1547 and moved to the Netherlands, where his father's family was from. His father wanted him to become more European but the people there thought he was too cold and serious.

William II of England
William II of England (c. 1056 – 2 August 1100) was the second son of William the Conqueror and Matilda of Flanders. He was King of England from 1087 until 1100. He was a harsh ruler and was not very liked. He did not have a wife or any children. He died on the 2nd August in the New Forest when he was shot by an arrow while hunting with his brother in law, Walter Tirel (Tryyel) and other friends.

Mary I of England
Mary I of England (February 18, 1516 – November 17, 1558), also known as Mary Tudor, was the queen of England. She was the daughter of Henry VIII and his first wife, Catherine of Aragon. She was known as "Bloody Mary" because she was a Roman Catholic and executed a number of Protestants. After her death her half-sister, Elizabeth became queen.
Childhood.
Although she was not the heir Henry VIII was looking for, she was beloved by her parents. But when she was about eleven, Henry decided to divorce Mary's mother, Catherine of Aragon, to marry Anne Boleyn. After Anne Boleyn had Elizabeth Mary had to become one of Elizabeth's servants. Then, after Anne Boleyn was executed by the King, Mary's half-sister suffered the same fate as Mary. A month later, Henry VIII was married to Jane Seymour, who became Queen Jane. She gave birth to Edward, Prince of Wales. Two weeks later, Queen Jane died. Mary lost a faithful friend and also her pride. She had signed the documents acknowledging her parents' marriage as invalid and herself an illegitimate daughter of Catherine and Henry. The rest of Mary's life with Henry VIII living saw through a quick succession of step-mothers. Henry VIII died soon after marrying his last wife, Catherine Parr. His will had declared that the young prince was to succeed him. If he left no legitimate heirs, his older half-sister, Mary, was to succeed. If Mary didn't produce legitimate heirs, then the Lady Elizabeth, Mary's half-sister was to inherit the throne. After Elizabeth and her heirs, would come Henry's sister Mary Tudor's side of the family.
Edward succeeded to the throne as King Edward VI of England and I of Ireland. When Edward began to show signs of a coughing disease, the courtiers begun to dread the day when the Catholic Princess Mary would become Queen. Edward himself did not want Mary to succeed him, he had always wanted Elizabeth to become Queen after him. Instead of passing the crown directly to the Lady Elizabeth, Edward went ahead with a plan devised by the Lord Protector, John Dudley, to bypass all his sisters and let his Protestant cousin Lady Jane Grey become Queen after he died. Unfortunately for this nine days queen, Mary Tudor was determined to get back her crown and rightful place as Queen of England. Mary executed Jane Grey and married Philip II of Spain. Elizabeth was imprisoned many times under the suspicion of the new Queen.
In her desperate wishes to have children and prevent the Protestant Elizabeth from ascending to the throne, the Catholic Queen suffered from two phantom pregnancies. In the end, the lady who had suffered so, would still not get her wish come true. Elizabeth finally succeeded to the throne, becoming the new Queen Elizabeth I of England.
Bloody Mary in folklore.
Over time children began to make a game called "Bloody Mary". They said you must light 3 candles, leave the water running, turn off the lights in the bathroom, spin around saying "Bloody Mary" or "I stole your baby Bloody Mary" 3 times and then look in the mirror. A number of terrible things could then happen to you. It is not known whether this game was actually about Mary Tudor. Other variations of the game are about a witch, Mary Worth, or a pregnant noble woman Elizabeth Bathory. A modern version has "Bloody Mary" being a victim in a car accident. All the games have the spinning and chanting.

Edward VI of England
Edward VI of England (12 October 1537 – 6 July 1553) was King of England and King of Ireland from 28 January 1547 until his death. He was the son of Henry VIII of England and Jane Seymour.
His mother (Jane Seymour) died 12 days after his birth. He became king at the age of 9 when his father, Henry VIII, died. He was a young King, not very well known in history. He died when he was only 15 years old. His successor was his cousin Lady Jane Grey.
In the fictional story "The Prince and the Pauper" by Mark Twain, Edward VI is one of the main characters (the 'prince').

Richard I of England
Richard I of England (September 8, 1157 – April 6, 1199) was the king of England from 1189 to 1199. He is sometimes called Richard the Lionheart. Richard was the son of Henry II of England and Eleanor of Aquitaine, two famous people in the history of England. In 1168 he became Duke of Aquitaine. He was one of the leaders of the third crusade against Saladin. He was stopped many times on his journey to Jerusalem, which never actually succeeded. During his journey, he conquered Sicily and Cyprus. He may have been a homosexual, and was punished for sodomy twice. He fought in the Battle of Acre and the Battle of Arsuf. He was shot with an arrow in the arm. A doctor tried to help him, but the shot became infected. He died as a result. He was considered a very brave and noble king, but he did not spend a lot of time in England. He is buried at Fontevraud Abbey near Saumur in France, as are his father and mother.
On his way back from the Crusade. Richard was captured by the Germans the English people had to pay a huge ransom to set him free.

Louis XII of France
Louis XII of France (June 27, 1462 – January 1, 1515) was the son of Charles, Duke of Orleans and Mary of Cleves. He was born on June 27, 1462 in the Chateau de Blois, France.
Louis's first wife was Jeanne of France, who was the daughter of Louis XI of France. At the time, Louis was not expected to become King of France. The King, Charles VIII, was a young man and could still have had children, but Charles had an accident and died suddenly. Charles was Jeanne's brother. Louis was Charles's cousin and next in line to the throne. When he became king, he had to end his marriage to Jeanne, partly because she was disabled and could not have children.
Louis's second wife was Anne of Brittany, who was the daughter of Francis II, Duke of Brittany. Anne had been married to King Charles VIII until his death, but all of their children had died. As a result of her marriage to Charles, the dukedom of Brittany had become part of the kingdom of France. Louis wanted to keep Brittany, but in order to do so he had to marry Anne. After her marriage to Louis, Anne had two daughters, who were called Claude and Renee.
In France, women were not allowed to rule the country, so Louis still wanted a son to become king after him. After Anne died, Louis married for a third time. His last wife was Mary Tudor, the sister of Henry VIII of England. She was many years younger than him. Louis lived for only three months after their marriage. Because Louis had no sons, the throne went to Francis, the husband of his daughter Claude.

Louis XIII of France
Louis XIII of France was King of France from 1610 to 1643.

Claude of France
Claude of France (October 14, 1499 – July 20, 1524) was the daughter of Louis XII of France and Anne of Brittany. Claude had no brothers, but was not allowed to be the Queen of France in her own right after her father died because of the Salic Law. Instead she became the Queen consort of France by marrying the next King of France, Francis I of France.
Henry II of France was Claude's son.
After she got married Claude spent the rest of her life having babies. She died when she was only 24.

Henry II of France
Henry II of France (March 31, 1519 – July 10, 1559) was a King of France and a member of the house of Valois. Henry was crowned King in Rheims, France, on July 25, 1547.
Birth.
Henry was born in Saint-Germain-en-Laye, France, on March 31, 1519. His parents were Francis I of France and Claude of France.
Marriage.
Henry did not love Catherine of Medici. He spent most of his time with his mistress, who was called Diane de Poitiers.
Death.
Henry died on July 10, 1559 after a jousting accident. He is buried in the Saint Denis Basilica. The next King was Francis II of France.

Francis I of France
Francis I of France (September 12, 1494 - July 31, 1547) was a King of France and a member of the house of Valois.
Birth.
Francis was born in Cognac, France on September 12, 1494. His parents were Charles, Duke of Angouleme and Louise of Savoy.
Art.
Francis was very interested in art and liked the artist Leonardo da Vinci.
Death.
Francis died on July 31, 1547. He is buried in the Saint Denis Basilica.

Wilhelm II of Germany
Friedrich Wilhelm Viktor Albert von Hohenzollern, Wilhelm II of Prussia and Germany, (January 27 1859 – June 4, 1941) was the last German Emperor and the last King of Prussia, ruling from 1888 to 1918.
After he abdicated (resigned) as King and Emperor he went to live in the Netherlands. He died at Huis Doorn and is buried there because he ordered that he did not want to be buried in Nazi Germany.

Catherine of Medici
Catherine of Medici (April 13, 1519 – January 5, 1589) was the wife of Henry II of France.
Catherine was the daughter of Lorenzo II de' Medici. She was born in Florence, Italy.
Catherine is buried in the Saint Denis Basilica.

Francis II of France
Francis II of France (January 19, 1544 – December 5, 1560) was a King of France and a member of the House of Valois.
Birth.
Francis was born in Fontainbleau, France, on September 12, 1494. His parents were Henry II of France and Catherine of Medici.
Marriage.
Francis was married to Mary I of Scotland on April 24, 1558. They had no children.
Death.
Francis died in Orleans, France, on December 5, 1560 because of an ear infection. He is buried in the Saint Denis Basilica, next to King Charles IX of France.

Stephen of England
Stephen of England (c. 1096 – 25 October 1154) was King of England from 1135 until 1154. He became the King after the death of his uncle Henry I. Stephan was the King until his own death in Dover, Kent. Stephen was crowned at Westminster Abbey on the 26 December 1135. Stephen is buried at the Clunaic Monastery in Faversham, Kent.
King Stephan was born in Blois, France, in 1096. He was the son of Stephen, Count of Blois and Adela of Normandy. His mother, Adela, was the daughter of William I of England and Matilda of Flanders. Stephen married Matilda of Boulogne in about 1125. They had five children. He fought a civil war with Henry I's only daughter, Matilda, from 1139-1153. This ended with the Treaty of Wallingford in 1153 after the death of Stephen's son and heir, Eustace IV. The treaty said that Stephen would be King for the rest of his lifetime. After his death, the throne would passes to Henry, son of Matilda, and not Stephen's other son William.

Eleanor of Aquitaine
Eleanor of Aquitaine (c. 1122 – March 31, 1204) was the daughter of William X of Aquitaine. She had a younger sister called Petronilla of Aquitaine. She brought the province of Aquitaine to England when she married Henry II of England. It stayed under English control for 300 years.
The marriage was later annulled.
Eleanor was also greatly known for her work in the Second Crusade, for she inspired many people to join. So many extra people decided to join that St. Bernard ran out of crosses to give out, therfore he had to start to rip off chunks of his robe.

John of England
John of England (December 24, 1166 – October 18, 1216) was the son of Henry II of England and Eleanor of Aquitaine. He reigned as King of England from 6 April, 1199, until his death. He followed on the throne as the younger brother of King Richard I (known in later times as "Richard the Lionheart").

Václav Klaus
Václav Klaus (born June 19, 1941) is the president of the Czech Republic.

Robert Peel
Sir Robert Peel (February 5 1788 – July 2 1850) was an important British politician. He established many well-known laws in Britain including the police force and had a brief term as Prime Minister.
In 1835 he published the Tamworth Manifesto, which told people how he wanted the government to be run. He came to power in 1841, defeating the Whig government of Lord Melbourne, and ruled the country until 1846. During this time, Peel's popularity with other party members became lower because many of them thought he was too proud, and disliked the way he changed his mind over many important issues, often without telling them first. The defeat of his Conservative Party in 1846 was followed by a brief period in the House of Commons until his death in 1851, in a horse riding accident.
Peel is one of the famous people who appears on the cover of The Beatles, Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band album.

Zachary Taylor
Zachary Taylor (November 24, 1784 - July 9, 1850) was the 12th President of the United States. He was the second cousin to James Madison.
Taylor was a general in the United States Army. He led an army during the Mexican-American War. He was selected by the Whigs to be their candidate only because he was a famous general.
Taylor became the second United States President to die while in office.

Robert Mugabe
Robert Gabriel Mugabe KCB (born February 21, 1924) has been the President of Zimbabwe since 1987. Before that time, he was Prime Minister of the country. Especially in the last few years, Mr. Mugabe has ruled his country in the style of a dictator.
His first years as leader were prosperous. He introduced land reforms, which were supposed to give the land claimed by white people back to the (original) black owners. This has had a serious impact on how the country is seen from outside. The reforms were done in 1998. In 2001, the United Nations imposed sanctions against Zimbabwe. This was done because human rights abuses came to the attention of the United Nations.
At present, people are unsure how the country can tackle its problems. Also, it is unclear what will happen after Mr. Mugabe dies, as there seems to be a vacuum. A struggle for who is to come after him would begin. The disastrous Socialist economic policies that Mugabe has adopted have produced extreme poverty, widespread suffering 1200% inflation and 80% unemployment.

Herbert Hoover
Herbert Clark Hoover (August 10, 1874 – October 20, 1964), the 31st president of the United States from 1929–1933. He was a world-famous mining engineer and humanitarian administrator. As a United States Commerce Secretary in the 1920s under Presidents Warren G. Harding and Calvin Coolidge, he promoted economic modernization. In the presidential election of 1928, Hoover easily won the Republican nomination. The nation was prosperous and optimistic, leading to a landslide for Hoover over the Democrat Al Smith.
Hoover deeply believed in the Efficiency Movement. He argued that there were technical solutions to all social and economic problems. That position hard to have because of the Great Depression, which began in 1929, the first year of his presidency. He tried hard to end the depression with many new programs, such as the Reconstruction Finance Corporation. But none of them worked, since he and Congress failed to learn of the bad effects of the Smoot-Hawley Tariff Act of 1930. The consensus among historians is that Hoover's defeat in the 1932 election was caused mostly by failure to end the stop deep depression, compounded by popular opposition to prohibition, Hoover's lack of charisma in relating to voters, and his poor skills in working with politicians.

James A. Garfield
James Abram Garfield (November 19 1831 - September 19 1881) was the 20th (1881) President of the United States and the 2nd President to be assassinated (killed while in office). President Garfield was in office from March to September of 1881. He was in office for a total of six months and fifteen days.
Early life.
Garfield was born in Orange Township, now Moreland Hills, Ohio. His father died in 1833, when James Abram was 18 months old. He grew up cared for by his mother and an uncle.
In Orange Township, Garfield attended school, a predecessor of the Orange City Schools. From 1851 to 1854, he attended the Western Reserve Eclectic Institute (later named Hiram College) in Hiram, Ohio. He then transferred to Williams College in Williamstown, Massachusetts, where he was a brother of Delta Upsilon. He graduated in 1856 as an outstanding student who enjoyed all subjects except chemistry. He then taught at the Eclectic Institute. He was an instructor in classical languages for the 1856-1857 academic year, and was made principal of the Institute from 1857 to 1860.
On November 11, 1858, he married Lucretia Rudolph. They had seven children (five sons and two daughters): Eliza A. Garfield (1860-63); Harry A. Garfield (1863-1942); James R. Garfield (1865-1950); Mary Garfield (1867-1947); Irvin M. Garfield (1870-1951); Abram Garfield (1872-1958); and Edward Garfield (1874-76). One son, James Rudolph Garfield, followed him into politics and became Secretary of the Interior under President Theodore Roosevelt.
Garfield decided that the academic life was not for him and studied law privately. He was admitted to the Ohio bar in 1860. Even before admission to the bar, he entered politics. He was elected an Ohio state senator in 1859, serving until 1861. He was a Republican all his political life.

John Quincy Adams
John Quincy Adams (July 11, 1767 – February 23, 1848) was the sixth President of the United States and first President who was the son of a President, John Adams.
Early life.
He was born in Braintree, Massachusetts, in 1767. He watched the Battle of Bunker Hill, a fight of the American Revolutionary War, from his family's farm. When his father, John Adams, was in Europe, John Quincy went with him as his secretary. He became good at speaking other languages.
He went to Harvard College and became a lawyer. At age 26 he was appointed Minister to the Netherlands and then he went to Berlin. In 1802 he was elected to the United States Senate. Six years later President James Madison appointed him Minister to Russia.
Adams was Secretary of State when James Monroe was President. He organized joint control of Oregon with England and helped get Florida from Spain. Adams helped make the Monroe Doctrine.
Presidency.
Adams was elected president by the United States House of Representatives after the 1824 election that had no one get a majority of electoral votes. People who wanted future president Andrew Jackson to win said there was a deal between Adams and Speaker of the House Henry Clay. Adams made Clay his Secretary of State.
Adams was able to pass some law that made new roads and canals in the United States. Adams fought Congress many times as many supporters of Andrew Jackson did not like his support of a national bank and tariffs (taxes on trade).
Adams lost the 1828 election to Jackson. The election was noted for the personal attacks made by the candidates against each other.
Later life.
Adams returned to Massachusetts for a short time after he was lost. He returned to Washington D.C. in 1831 after being elected to the United States House of Representatives. He was a leading opponent of slavery. He remained in Congress until his death on February 23, 1848.

Ulysses S. Grant
Ulysses S. Grant (April 27, 1822 - July 23, 1885), born Hiram Ulysses Grant, was the general who won the American Civil War and later became the 18th President of the United States (1869-1887).
Before becoming the president he was the top general in the Union Army. Since he was able to do well fighting in the American Civil War he gained popularity which would helped him to become president later on.
His presidency suffered from a number of scandals and is thought to be one of the worst by many historians.

Horst Köhler
Horst Köhler (born February 22, 1943 in Skierbieszów, Poland) became president of the Federal Republic of Germany July 1, 2004. Before that he was the director of the International Monetary Fund (IMF).
On March 4, 2004 he was nominated by members of the German political parties CDU, CSU, and FDP. They wanted him to be their common candidate for the presidential election on May 23, 2004. For this reason he gave up his position as director of the IMF.
Before his nomination he worked outside of Germany, so only 20% of the Germans knew him, and a German newspaper called 'Bild' headlined 'Horst Wer???' which means 'Horst Who???'.
On May 23, 2004 the German "Bundesversammlung" (Federal Assembly), which consist of 1.205 members, chose Horst Köhler as the new "Bundespräsident" (President of Germany) with 604 votes. That was one vote more than the needed absolute majority.

Kim Jong-nam
Kim Jong-nam (born May 10, 1971) is the oldest son of Kim Jong-il, leader of North Korea and some say he is expected to follow his father.

Jeb Bush
Jeb Bush (born February 11, 1953) was a Governor of Florida. He is the brother of President George W. Bush and son of former President George H. W. Bush.

James Buchanan
James Buchanan (April 23, 1791 - June 1, 1868) was the 15th President of the United States. He is most famous as being the only President not to have married. His niece, Harriet Lane, stood in as First Lady.

Carlos Menem
Carlos Saúl Menem (born in La Rioja, July 2, 1930) was the president of Argentina from July 8, 1989 to December 10, 1999.

Victor Hugo
Victor Hugo (February 26 1802 – May 22 1885) was the most important romantic writer of the French language.

Barbara Bush
Barbara Bush (born June 8, 1925) is the wife of George H. W. Bush, the 41st President of the United States. She acted as the First Lady of the United States from 1989 to 1993. She is the mother of current U.S. President George W. Bush and Former Governor of Florida, Jeb Bush. She is the sister of Scott Pierce.
Her birthplace is Rye, New York, near New York City. Her birth name is Barbara Pierce. Her parents were Pauline Robinson (1896-1949) and her husband, Marvin Pierce (1893-1969). Her mother died in a car accident. Her ancestor Thomas Pierce, an early New England colonist, was also an ancestor of Franklin Pierce, the 14th President of the United States.
She spent her early childhood in Rye, New York. She began her studies in a school in Rye, New York. Then she studied in a boarding school at Ashley Hall in Charleston, South Carolina.
In a dance party she met George H. W. Bush. At that time she was a girl of 17 years, and Bush was a student at Phillips Academy in Andover, Massachusetts. They got engaged just before Bush went to fight in the Second World War. He was a torpedo bomber of the United States Navy. Bush named three of his airplanes after Barbara: "Barbara," "Barbara II", and "Barbara III". In December 1944, Bush returned to the USA on leave. Two weeks later, they married on 6th January 1945. After the Second World War, Bush graduated from the Yale University. They moved to Midland, Texas, Texas.
Over the years, the Bush family had moved 29 times. George H. W. Bush had become a successful person and had founded Zapata Corporation. He served in a variety of government jobs. In 1989, he became the 41st president of the United States of America. Barbara Bush became the First Lady. She did her role as the First Lady in a nice way.
After, her husband retired as the president, they moved to Houston, Texas. There they live in a big house in Kennebunkport, Maine. Several schools bear the name of Barbara Bush. Sometimes, Barbara Bush had given sharp comments on certain matters.

Republican Party (United States)
The United States Republican Party is one of the two biggest political parties in the United States of America. The other large party is the Democratic Party. The United States also has many other small parties known as third parties.
The Republican National Committee coordinates most of the activities of the Republican Party in all 50 states.
The Republicans are often called "the right" or "conservatives". The Republican Party itself is also known as the G.O.P., which stands for "Grand Old Party."
The symbol of the republican party is the elephant. This symbol was first used in 1874 in a political cartoon "(pictured)".
Traditionally, the Republican Party has supported conservative causes, and has wanted to lower taxes and to make the government smaller.
U.S. presidents.
The last United States president, George W. Bush, was a Republican.

Dick Cheney
Richard Bruce "Dick" Cheney (born January 30, 1941) is the current Vice President of the United States of America. A Republican, he ran in the 2000 US Presidential Election with George W. Bush, and successfully won re-election in the 2004 US Presidential Election. Cheney is from Wyoming and an active hunter. In 2006 he shot his friend by mistake. He did not run for President in 2008. Cheney is popular among the Bush family, and served in the George H. W. Bush administration from 1989-1993 as a cabinet member. Cheney is the head of the Senate and has cast six tie-breaking votes.

Bob Dole
Robert Joseph Dole (born July 22, 1923) is a former United States Senator from Kansas. He was the Republican leader of the Senate from 1985 until 1996. In 1996, he ran against Bill Clinton for President, and lost. After that, he retired from politics at age 72.
In 1976, President Gerald Ford chose him to be his Vice Presidential choice for the November, 1976 election. They lost the election so Bob Dole never became Vice President.
Shortly after the 1996 election, he famously appeared in a Pepsi commercial, saying, "I just cannot win". He has also done commercials for Viagra.
Bob Dole has a habit of talking in the third person, or using his own name instead of "I" when he talks about himself. This habit is the basis for many jokes about Dole.
An episode of "The Simpsons" had Bob Dole in it. The episode takes place during the election of Bill Clinton and Bob Dole, and they get abducted by aliens.

James Madison
James Madison (March 16, 1751 – June 28, 1836) was the fourth President of the United States.
Family.
He was the oldest of twelve children. His mother and father were James Madison Sr. and Eleanor Rose "Nellie" Conway.
Madison married Dolley Todd Madison in 1794.
Political life.
Madison started his career in the Virginia state legislature. Madison learned many things from Thomas Jefferson. Madison wanted a strong federal government. He was a member of the meeting that formed the current United States Constitution. Madison is called the "Father of the Constitution" because he helped write a large part of it. Madison helped to get people to approve the Constitution.
Madison was elected to the United States House of Representatives. Madison helped write the first laws for the United States. Madison also was the main writer of the Bill of Rights, the first 10 amendments to the Constitution.
Madison and Jefferson were good friends and helped create the Democratic-Republican Party who wanted a weak federal government.
Madison was selected by Jefferson to be his Secretary of State.
Presidency.
Madison was selected by his political party to be the Democratic-Republican candidate for president in 1808. He won that election and the next election in 1812.
The War of 1812 started while Madison was president. Madison still hoped for peace, but Congress wanted war so he gave in and approved a declaration of war against Britain on June 18, 1812. The war caused Madison to want a stronger government than he had before.
Later life.
Madison retired to Virginia after his second term. Madison died on June 28, 1836.

James Monroe
James Monroe (April 28, 1758 – July 4, 1831) was the fifth President of the United States.
Early life.
Monroe was born in Virginia. His father died at age 16. At age 18, he joined the Continental Army. He later studied law with Thomas Jefferson.
He married Elizabeth Kotright in 1789.
Political life.
Monroe did not want the United States Constitution to pass. He was elected to the United States Senate in 1790. He helped form the Democratic-Republican Party with Jefferson and James Madison.
Monroe was Governor of Virginia from 1799 - 1802.
Monroe negotiated the Louisiana Purchase.
Monroe was Madison's Secretary of State and Secretary of War.
Presidency.
Monroe was president from 1817 to 1825. With his Secretary of State John Quincy Adams, Monroe got Spain to give the United States Florida. Monroe and Adams also created the Monroe Doctrine, which was a policy that said that the United States did not want Europe to be involved in the Western Hemisphere anymore.
Monroe signed the Missouri Compromise. The compromise was delay the slavery issue in the United States.
Monroe was the last president to have fought in the American Revolutionary War.
Post-presidency.
Monroe retired to Virginia. After his wife's death he moved to New York where he died on July 4, 1831.

Martin Van Buren
Martin Van Buren (December 5, 1782 – July 24, 1862) was the eighth President of the United States. He was the first president born after the United States Declaration of Independence, making him the first to have never been a British citizen.
Other Sources.
Martin Van Buren's formal education was acquired at the local village academy, from which he was graduated at the age of 14. Later he was placed in the law office of Francis Sylvester. There he swept floors, ran errands, and copied documents. Presumably through this exposure to the legal profession a young apprentice could learn enough law to gain admission to the practice of law.

Rosa Luxemburg
Rosa Luxemburg (March 5, 1870 or 1871 - January 15, 1919) was a Polish-born German Marxist. Her birth name was Rosalia "Luxenburg". She was born into a Jewish family. She was the fifth child of her parents. Her father was a wood trader/timber trader. His name was Eliasz Luxemburg III. Her mother's name was Line (maiden name: Löwenstein). She organised a socialist uprising in Germany but was killed by the fascists.

William Henry Harrison
William Henry Harrison (born February 9, 1773, died April 4, 1841) was the 9th President of the United States. He was president in 1841 for only one month, because he caught a cold, got sick and later died. He was the first President to die in office.

Margaret Thatcher
Margaret Hilda Thatcher, "Baroness Thatcher LG, OM, PC, FRS " (born Margaret Hilda Roberts October 13, 1925) was the first woman Prime Minister of the United Kingdom from 1979 to 1990. Leader of the Conservative Party, she is often remembered by her nickname, "the Iron Lady". She also directed British troops in 1982 to recapture the Falkland Islands from Argentina, which had captured them for a short time, in the Falklands War. Also, she had the second longest single term in history. She also married Sir Dennis Thatcher.
She suffered from very strong opposition during the miner`s strike and also when she attempted to introduce a poll tax into Britain. This caused widespread rioting across the country. This is one of the reasons why she was replaced in 1990 by John Major.

Alexander Hamilton
Alexander Hamilton (born January 11, year unknown - probably 1755 or 1757–died July 12, 1804) was the United States' first Secretary of the Treasury, and was known for the creation of a national bank.
Early Life.
Hamilton was not born in the United States. He was from the Carribean island of Nevis. His father was named James Hamilton and his mother was named Rachel Fawcett Lavien. Hamilton's mother had a child from a previous marriage that she left behind when she moved to Nevis. At the time, this meant that Hamilton was illegitimate since his mother and father were not legally married. He was very sensitive about this fact.
Education.
Hamilton graduated from Columbia University, which was known then as Kings College. He wanted to go to Princeton but wasn't accepted.
Legacy.
Hamilton is shown on the face of the U.S. Ten dollar bill. He is one of only two non-Presidents (the other is Benjamin Franklin) honored on commonly used notes.

Mohammad Khatami
Seyyed Mohammad Khatami (سید محمد خاتمی), born October 14, 1943 was President of Iran from August 2, 1997 to August 2, 2005 and was followed by Mahmoud Ahmadinejad. He was heralded as a reformist, but was unable to change much under the regime of Khamenei.

Otto von Bismarck
Prince Otto Eduard Leopold von Bismarck-Schönhausen Duke of Lauenburg (April 1, 1815 – July 30, 1898) was a very well known aristocrat and statesman of the 19th century in Europe. As Prime Minister of Prussia from 1862 to 1890, he was mainly responsible for unifying the many independent German countries and founding the German Empire in 1871. He became the first chancellor of the new Empire.
He was "Graf von Bismarck-Schönhausen" (Count Bismarck-Schönhausen) in 1865, then since 1871 "Fürst" von Bismarck (Prince Bismarck) and since 1890 the "Herzog von Lauenburg" (Duke of Lauenburg). First he did not want the duke title, but accepted it later.
Bismarck was very conservative and he was strongly connected to the monarchy. He was not a big supporter of democracy. His most important goal was to make Prussia stronger and he achieved that through the unification of Germany. Bismarck tried to stop the socialist movement and to reduce the power of the Catholic Church. One way to stop socialism was to make the working class happy. He did that by introducing many social reforms like public health and accident insurance, as well as pensions for old people.

Alexander the Great
Alexander the Great (July 20 or 26, 356 BC - June 10 323 BC) was a Macedonian king. He was born in the city of Pella and his father was the king Philip II. He was taught most of his skills in Athens during his childhood. He is known for his military skills. He wanted to rule a large empire called Persia. He is often listed as one of the greatest military commanders in history, along with Hannibal Barca, Julius Caesar, Genghis Khan, Subutai, Napoleon I of France, and others.
By the time of his death he had conquered most of the Middle Eastern world known to Europeans, which included ancient Pakistan, Persia, Egypt, and Asia Minor. He died in Babylon in 323 BC of an unknown cause. He was taught by a great teacher and world famous philosopher named Aristotle, and through his teachings he became the world's first great military commander. At the age of 21 he became the king of Macedonia, after his father had been assassinated by a former bodyguard. Nobody knows the cause of Alexander's death. Some people have said his death was caused by poison in wine, murder, or fever.

Grover Cleveland
Stephen Grover Cleveland (born March 18, 1837 died June 24, 1908) was the 22nd (1885–1889) and also the 24th (1893–1897) President of the United States. He was the only president to serve two terms that weren't one and then the other.

Emmet D. Boyle
Emmet Derby Boyle (July 26, 1879 - January 3, 1926) was a Governor of Nevada. He was a Democrat.
Boyle was born in Virginia City, Nevada in 1879. He was a mining engineer, and was the Governor between 1915 and 1923. He died in 1926 at the age of 46.

Andrew Johnson
Andrew Johnson (December 29, 1808 – July 31, 1875) was the 16th Vice-President and 17th President of the United States. He became President in 1865 after Abraham Lincoln was killed and he was also the first President to be impeached, but was later acquitted and finished the rest of his term. He is also the only US president never to have gone to school; he was taught by his wife Eliza McCardle Johnson.
He bought Alaska from Russia for $2.7 million (the price was 2 cent per acre).

Mao Zedong
Mao Zedong (December 26, 1893 – September 9, 1976) was a Chinese Communist leader. He was the leader of the People’s Republic of China (PRC) from its establishment in 1949 until his death in 1976. Some people think Mao was a bad man, and some people think Mao was good. The reasons people have called him bad are because they blame him for millions of Chinese deaths, and say that he was not skilled at running the government. People who do not like Mao Zedong also say that he was impatient and would not wait for things he wanted. But people who agreed with Mao's Chinese Communist group say that he was a hero, who helped women and peasants gain rights. They also say that he saved China from foreign rule.
Beginning.
Mao was born on December 26, 1893 in the Hunan province of China. He grew up in a farming family, and became a Communist while working at a library. Throughout the 1920's, his power increased, or became larger, in the Communist Party of China, and by 1933, he was its leader. This kind of "party" is a group of people who think the same way about politics or their country. During the 1920s, the group began to fight with rival Chinese leader Chiang Kai-shek and his group, the Kuomintang. This fight was called the Chinese Civil War. Some people say Chiang Kai-shek wanted China to be a democracy where people could choose their leader, but others say that Kai-shek only wanted to keep power. The Communists fought to make the country a socialist one-party state, a country where only one political party is allowed.
The Chiang Kai-shek's group, the Nationalists, had more fighters in 1935. They defeated, or beat, Mao's Communists and made them move out of the country. The Nationalists left to a fort that they owned. This move was called the Long March. Mao escaped from the Nationalists with other Communists to a part of China called Yenan. By this time, in 1935, he may have been the person who caused more than 500,000 deaths.
When Japan invaded China in 1937, Mao and Chiang stopped fighting. After the United States entered World War 2, they attacked each other again. Nobody really knows who started this new fight; some people say it was the Nationalists, other people say it was the Communists.
The United States defeated Japan in 1945 and this made the Japanese Army leave China. The Chinese Civil War had been going on during World War 2, but after the war it became very violent. Chiang Kai-shek and the Nationalists had friends in the cities and among the middle class. Mao and the Communists had many friends in the farms and the countryside. In those days in China there were more farmers than city people, so Mao had more friends than Chiang. By 1949, Mao had chased the Nationalists to an island called Taiwan, and told the people that China would be Communist, with him as leader.
What he did.
Mao had many plans for how China could move forward in technology very fast and catch up with countries like the United Kingdom and United States. Mao was responsible for the First Five Year Plan and also, The Second Five Year Plan. The Second Five Year Plan had some ideas that did not work the way that Mao had wanted them to. Farms could not produce, or make, much food because of bad farming plans, and cities did not make many things like clothes and machines. Because of the lack or food, many people died of starvation.
Mao wanted to change everything about China. He wanted to change the way Chinese people think about China, and even change the way they remembered history. Because of this, he forced people to change things very fast, even if they did not want to. These changes were called The "Cultural Revolution". Mao did not like it if someone talked about his ideas a bad way, but many people in Chinese cities did not like Mao's ideas because of the food problems. There was also no freedom to do many different things when the Communists were running the country. To keep people from saying bad things about the Communists and making groups of friends to try and get rid of him, Mao told all of China's best and brightest people quit their jobs, and go into the farms. China become poorer and weaker because of this.
About the same time Mao became the leader in China, Nikita Khrushchev became the leader in the Soviet Union. Krushchev and Mao were both Communists dictators. Before Khrushchev became the leader in Russia, China and Russia were friends with each other. Joseph Stalin was the leader in the Soviet Union before Krushchev, and Mao liked Stalin and respected his way to lead. Krushchev thought Stalin was a criminal dictator, and led the country very differently. Both Mao and Krushchev did not like each other, so the Soviet Union was no longer friends with China. China now had only a few friends like Albania, North Korea, Democratic Kampuchea, and Pakistan. This change of friends was called the Sino-Soviet Split. "Sino" is another way to say "Chinese" in this case.
Mao also made several changes to the Chinese language, such as switching from the Wade Giles system of Romanization to Pinyin, which is different. For this reason, Nanking is now called Nanjing on modern maps. Taiwan still uses Wade Giles, so its capital is called Taipei instead of the pinyin Taibei. He also simplified the Chinese characters, making them easier to read and write so that more people would be able to read.
Legacy.
Some Chinese mainlanders still believe Mao Zedong was a great leader, but they also knew that he did many unwise and bad things. According to Deng Xiaoping, Mao was "seven parts right and three parts wrong", and his "contributions are primary and his mistakes secondary." Some people think Mao made China lose its best ally, or friend, the Soviet Union, in the Sino-Soviet Split. The Great Leap Forward and the Cultural Revolution were two of the things that Mao did that many people disliked. Most historians, people who study history, think that about 70,000,000 people died because of Mao's bad ideas and neglect. That is the biggest number of people to ever die without a war. Some people disliked Mao because he did not support family planning, and this caused too many babies to be born, making too many people in too small places. Leaders of China after Mao had to make a new rule called one child policy.

Chester A. Arthur
Chester Alan Arthur (October 5, 1829 – November 18, 1886) was an American politician and the 21st President of the United States. Before becoming president, he was most noted as the Collector of Customs for the port of New York.

Charlemagne
Charlemagne (Latin: Carolus Magnus, English: Charles the Great, German: Karl der Große, Dutch: Karel de Grote) (ca. 742 or 747 - 28 January, 814) was the king of the Franks who started the Holy Roman Empire. He was crowned as the Emperor in 800.
Life.
The Franks—one of the Germanic peoples who had moved their homes over the River Rhine into the Roman Empire as it was falling apart—were, by the year 700, the rulers of Gaul, and a lot of Germania east of the Rhine. They also protected the Papacy and the Roman Catholic faith. When their king Pepin the Short died, his sons, Charlemagne and Carloman were chosen to share the kingdom. They divided it into two parts: one half for Charlemagne, and the other for Carloman. Carloman died on December 4, 771, leaving Charles (Charlemagne) as the leader of the whole Frankish kingdom.
He was king of the Franks from 768, and king of the Lombards from 774. He was crowned Imperator Augustus (Emperor) in Rome on Christmas Day by Pope Leo III in 800, starting the Holy Roman Empire, that they hoped would be a kind of second Western Roman Empire (while the Byzantines in Constantinople were still keeping up the Eastern Roman empire.) With many wars, Charlemagne spread his empire across much of Western Europe.
Charles fought in wars all the time when he was king. He is known for using his sword, “Joyeuse”, in each of the thirty years of war and the 18 battles he fought in. He also finally managed to conquer Saxony, something the Roman Emperor Augustus could not do 800 years earlier. He was able to convert the Saxons to Catholic Christianity. He also had many schools built so his people could learn.
Charles the Great died in 814, leaving his kingdom to his only son, Louis the Pious. The descendants of Charlemagne are called "Carolingians". His family line died out in Germany in 911 and in France 987.
Battles and Campaigns.
Saxon wars

William Howard Taft
William Howard Taft (September 15, 1857 – March 8, 1930) was the 27th President of the United States from March 4, 1909 to March 3, 1913. He is well-known for being the heaviest President in U.S. history, weighing over 350 pounds.
Taft served as Solicitor General of the United States, a federal judge, Governor-General of the Philippines, and Secretary of War before being nominated for President in the 1908 by the man who preceded him, Theodore Roosevelt. As a Republican President, Taft was most notable for trust-busting, in which he broke up large businesses that had too much control over the economy. Taft also expanded civil service, fixed up the United States Postal Service and promoted world peace.
In 1912, Theodore Roosevelt came back into politics and ran for President against William Howard Taft. Many Republicans split their votes between Taft and Roosevelt, and the Democratic opponent Woodrow Wilson won the election.
In 1921, Taft became the 10th Chief Justice of the United States Supreme Court. He retired from the job on February 3, 1930 due to bad health. Taft died on March 8, 1930 due to heart failure. Three days later, he became the first president to be buried at Arlington National Cemetery.

Francisco Franco
Francisco Paulino Hermenegildo Teódulo Franco y Bahamonde Salgado Pardo de Andrade or just Francisco Franco (December 4, 1892 – November 20, 1975). He was the dictator of Spain from 1936 to 1975, and regent of the Spanish Kingdom from 1947 to 1975.
He was a leader of a coup d'etat against the Spanish Second Republic in 1936. After this uprising the Spanish Civil War started. Franco was supported by fascists, big businesses, the church, conservative people and Spanish nationalists. This was because the Spanish Republic had a socialist government that wanted to make businsses and the church less powerful. The Republic also set up local parliaments in the regions of Spain. Spanish nationalists thought this was wrong and would make Spain weak. Franco remained neutral during World War II as Hitler did not accept his conditions for Spain to take part in it with the fascist and nazi regimes. He let a group of volunteer soldiers join the German Army to fight the Russians between 1941 and 1943. They were called the "División Azul" (Blue Division)

Warren G. Harding
Warren G. Harding (November 2, 1865–August 2, 1923) was the 29th President of the United States. He was the president from 1921 to 1923. He died while he was the president. Before becoming president, he was a senator and the assistant governor of Ohio. Before he was in government, he was an important newspaper manager. He was in the Republican Party and believed that government should do as little as possible. Very few people think that his work as president was very good, and in fact he had a lot of problems with it. His vice president Calvin Coolidge became president after he died.

Millard Fillmore
Millard Fillmore (January 7, 1800 - March 8, 1874) was the 13th President of the United States. He was President from 1850 to 1853. Fillmore was the last person from the Whig Party to be president.
Fillmore became president in 1850 when the 12th president (Zachary Taylor) died. The Whig party did not pick him to run for president in 1852. He ran for president in 1856 for the Know Nothing Party, but lost.
Before he was president.
Millard Fillmore grew up in a poor family. He worked hard to do well in school, and went to college. He got a job as a lawyer in 1823. In 1828 he was voted to be part of the New York congress, and made friends in the Whig Party. This helped him get chosen to run for vice president in 1848.
Being president.
When he was vice president, Millard Fillmore was in charge of the United States Senate while it was fighting over a decision about slavery involving Texas and New Mexico. As president, Fillmore signed the Compromise of 1850. This made some of the people in his Whig Party upset at him, and they stopped him from running for president in 1852.
He also started the first library at the White House. There is a joke that Fillmore put the first bathtub in the White House, but this is not true.
After being president.
After Fillmore, Franklin Pierce became the 14th president. Fillmore got a job in charge of the University of Buffalo. Fillmore joined the Know Nothing Party and tried to run for president again, but the Know Nothing Party was not very successful.
There is a statue of Millard Fillmore at City Hall in Buffalo, New York.

John Tyler
John Tyler was the 10th President of the United States of America, from 1841 to 1845. He was the first vice president to become president after the president before him died. He lived from March 29, 1790 to January 18, 1862.
Before being president.
Tyler grew up in Virginia and became a lawyer. His father was also a lawyer who later became governor of Virginia. Tyler became a state representative in the United States Congress, and then also became governor of Virginia like his father.
Tyler started in government as a member of the Democratic Party, but later he changed to the Whig Party, which was very new. He was chosen to run as vice president next to William Henry Harrison. Whig Party people used to say "Tippecanoe and Tyler Too" to get people to vote for them. (William Henry Harrison was famous for being a general in a battle in a place called Tippecanoe, and that was his nickname.)
Harrison and Tyler won the election, but Harrison died one month later. Tyler then became president.
Being president.
Some people thought that Tyler was not the real president, because he had not been elected. But the United States Constitution says that the vice president takes over if the president dies, and Tyler said that meant he was the new president. At first, the rest of the government agreed and declared him the new president. But the Whig Party did not want Tyler to be president, and a lot of people called him "the accidental president" or "His Accidency".
While Tyler was president, his wife Letitia died. Two years later he married a new wife, Julia. This made him the first person to get married while being the President. He had 15 children, more than any other president.
Tyler made the Whig Party angry when he picked people from the other party (the Democratic Party) to work in his government. He wanted to bring the two Parties to work together, but instead this made him unpopular. The Whig Party decided not to pick him to run for president in 1844.
Tyler refused to send government soldiers to Rhode Island during the Dorr Rebellion. Instead, he told the Rhode Island government that they should listen to what the people wanted. When Tyler was a boy, he stood up against a very bad teacher, so he believed that people would not fight against their government unless it was for a very good reason. Some people thought that this meant Tyler was not doing his job.
While he was president, Florida became a new state. Texas was its own country, after winning a war against Mexico. Tyler wanted Texas to be a U.S. state and tried to make this happen while president, but it did not happen until a few months afterwards.
After being president.
The Whig Party did not want Tyler to be president again, and did not pick him to run for president in 1844. He had some friends in the Democratic Party who sometimes asked him for ideas, but that Party did not like him enough to be president, either. Tyler was sometimes called "the President without a party" since both groups did not want him.
When the Confederate States of America was created, Tyler thought that states should be allowed to make their own laws, even about slavery. He did not want a civil war. Instead, he tried to get the United States to agree to let the southern states keep slavery. But the United States Congress said no, and Tyler decided that Virginia had to join the Confederacy. He later was elected to the Confederate congress, but died before taking the job.

Saladin
A sultan Salah al-Din Yusuf ibn Ayyub 1138–1193) was a famous kurdish Sultan during the Crusades. (From Arabic derive from old Assyrian means power, rule, government, later as a kings title) People in Europe and the United States also call him "Saladin". Many Muslims consider him a hero for defeating the Crusaders over twenty years worth of battles.
He founded the Ayyubid dynasty of Egypt, Syria, Yemen (except for the Northern Mountains), Iraq, Mecca Hejaz and Diyar Bakr. Salah ad-Din is a title which translates to "The Righteousness of the Faith" from Arabic.
Many books were written about Saladin, the things he did and the battles he won. "Daastaan Imaan Farooshoon Ki" is one book in Urdu written by Althamash that says very good things about Saladin.

Benjamin Harrison
Benjamin Harrison (August 20, 1833–March 13, 1901) was the 23rd President of the United States (1889-1893).
He was the Grandson of William Henry Harrison. His home was Indianapolis, Indiana. He was a member of the Republican party. He was elected to the White House in 1888, beating Grover Cleveland, the 22nd President of the United States. After Benjamin Harrison served one full four-year term as President, Cleveland ran again and, this time, beat Harrison.
Benjamin Harrison's first wife was Carrie Harrison. After Carrie Harrison died, his second wife was Mary Dimmick Harrison.
Besides being President, Benjamin Harrison was a successful lawyer. He argued many cases before the United States Supreme Court.

William McKinley
William McKinley (January 29, 1843 – September 14, 1901) was the 25th President of the United States, from 1897 until his assassination in 1901. He was shot by an anarchist named Leon Czolgosz on September 6 1901 and died on September 14. Czolgosz claimed the President committed war crimes in the American Philippines war and was an enemy of the people. At the time, McKinley was the third American President to be assassinated. During his term, the United States annexed Hawaii, Cuba, the Philippines, and Wake Island. Before he became President, he had been a congressman of Ohio.

The Secret of NIMH
"The Secret of NIMH" is an animated movie from director Don Bluth's studio, released in 1982 by United Artists.
"Tagline'": Right before your eyes and beyond your wildest dreams."
Story.
In Bluth's first movie, a widowed mouse named Mrs. Brisby does what she can to move her home, a stone block, before humans invade her place with a tractor. To do that, she must find help from a comic, love-seeking crow and a group of very smart rats from NIMH, the National Institute of Mental Health. In order to get the task done, she must see the leader of the rats, an old magician named Nicodemus, for a glowing red amulet that could rescue her home and her children (Martin, Teresa, Cynthia and a sick Timothy). She also learns, from him, a secret about his group that could forever change her life.
The movie was based on Robert C. O'Brien's children's book "Mrs. Frisby and the Rats of NIMH". (The main character's name was changed to "Brisby", so that its audiences would not take its sound for the Frisbee toy.)
In spite of its critical success, "NIMH" gained mediocre attention at the box office, because of a much bigger rival, Steven Spielberg's E. T. (Ironically, Spielberg saw the Bluth movie and asked its director to work on "An American Tail", which would come out in 1986.)
Many fans and critics have called "NIMH" Don Bluth's most important work. Yet "An American Tail" and 1997's "Anastasia" would become, business-wise, his most successful works in later years.
A 1998 direct-to-video sequel, "Timmy to the Rescue", has been avoided seriously by fans of the first one, due to its clichés and familiar story. Another one, "The Beginning", has been rumoured to come out in 2001; no such movie, however, exists yet.

The Care Bears Movie
"The Care Bears Movie" is an animated movie that came out on March 29, 1985. It was produced by Nelvana Limited of Canada, and was distributed by The Samuel Goldwyn Company. It was the first in a trilogy(or set of three) of big-screen movies that had the Care Bears in lead roles, and the first to be based directly on a toy line. The movie's success led to a spin-off television series that premiered on ABC a year after its release.
There were well-known celebrities among the movie's starring line-up, such as Carole King, who wrote and sung its opening theme. John Sebastian and NRBQ also contributed to its score. The movie also had the voices of Mickey Rooney, Canadian actress Georgia Engel, and voice actress Cree Summer.
It was made as a full-length commercial for the title toys, and had mixed views from critics. But its $23 million gross at the box office made it the biggest animated work outside the Disney market when it came out. It is one of the most profitable releases in the animation industry (its cost was $3 million). The movie saved Nelvana from closing down when "Rock & Rule", the company's first production, did not do well.
Facts.
"The Care Bears Movie" holds financial records for non-Disney animation (at the time it first came out), for Canadian moviemaking (only rivalled by "Porky's" and, more recently, "The Wild"), and for its distributor Samuel Goldwyn.
Its director, Arna Selznick, was one of three women to ever lead the production for a full-length cartoon. To this day, she is proud of these efforts, though she was aware of the strategy to promote it.
Plot.
In this movie, an orphanage caretaker named Mr. Cherrywood tells the story of how the Care Bears come to help two children who do not care for anyone (Kim and Jason). The Care Bears live in Care-a-lot, a cloud-filled place up in the sky. As the two of them become friends with the Bears, a carnival magician's helper, Nicholas, turns from good to bad, because of an evil spirit he got from an old book.
When the boy's evil grows more and more, the Care Bears and their Cousins (from the Forest of Feelings), along with Kim and Jason, come back to Earth to end his evil doings. In turn, the carnival and the whole world will be saved.

Rutherford B. Hayes
Rutherford B. Hayes (October 4, 1822 - January 17, 1893) was the 19th President of the United States. He served only one term, from 1877 to 1881. Hayes was a Republican and was elected governor of Ohio three times prior to becoming president. Hayes narrowly won the contested election of 1876, only defeating Democratic opponent Samuel Tilden after a Congressional committee awarded Hayes some disputed electoral votes.
During his presidency, Hayes effectively ended the Reconstruction period that followed the American Civil War. He ordered the withdrawal of military forces that had occupied the Southern states. Hayes refused to seek a second term as president.

Franklin Pierce
Franklin Pierce (November 23, 1804 - October 8, 1896) was the 14th President of the United States. A Democrat, he took office in 1853 and served one four-year term. He believed that each state should choose whether the state should allow slavery; his presidency was marked with violence sparked by the Kansas Nebraska Act. In addition, a political scandal damaged his credibility when the Ostend Manifesto was publicized.
Pierce was a dark horse candidate in the 1852 presidential election. Before running for president, he came from New Hampshire and had served in the House of Representatives.
Pierce is widely regarded as one of the worst U.S. presidents ever because of his inability to lower tensions before the American Civil War.

Carlo Azeglio Ciampi
Carlo Azeglio Ciampi was born in 1920 in Livorno, Italy.
He was 10th President of the Italian Republic, his work started in 1999 and ended in 2006. He was followed by Giorgio Napolitano
He is appreciated very much by the Italian people because of his equality and rightness.
Since 1979 he had been President of the Bank of Italy, but his task ended in 1993.
He was also Prime Minister of the Italian government, but his task lasted just a few months, because it was just a technical government,which purpose was to lead the country in a moment of difficulty.

James K. Polk
James Knox Polk (November 2, 1795–June 15, 1849) was the eleventh President of the United States, his term was from March 4, 1845 to March 3, 1849. During his term in office he split Oregon with England and bought northern Mexico.
Early Life.
Polk was born in Mecklenburg County, North Carolina. He went to the University of North Carolina.

Al Gore
Albert Arnold "Al" Gore, Jr. (born March 31, 1948 in Washington, D.C.) is a former American politician. His father, Albert Gore, Sr. was a Senator for Tennessee. He grew up in both places.
Gore was a Representative from 1977 to 1985 and a Senator from 1985 to 1993. In 1988 he ran for President for first time, but lost to Michael Dukakis in the Democratic primary. In 1993, he became Vice President to Bill Clinton. He ran for President in 2000, but lost to George W. Bush (many people still argue this). Even though he lost the race, Gore won in the popular vote by over 500,000 votes.
Gore is now a businessman, and runs and works for several companies, including Generation Investment Management, Google, Apple Computers, and TV channel Current. He released a movie in 2006 about global warming called "An Inconvenient Truth".
He currently lives in Nashville and is married to Tipper. The Gores have 4 children and 2 grandchildren.

Bob Chiarelli
Robert (Bob) Chiarelli (born September 24, 1941)is the current mayor of Ottawa, Canada. He grew up in Ottawa, and was married to the late Carol Chiarelli.
He was first made mayor of the new Ottawa on November 13, 2000.

Arnold Schwarzenegger
Arnold Schwarzenegger (born July 30, 1947 in Austria) is an actor and currently the governor of the American state of California. He lives in the Los Angeles, California area, but works in Sacramento, the capital of California.
Schwarzenegger went to the United States in 1968 and later became an actor. He has acted in many movies, including the "The Terminator" series. In 2003, when Gray Davis was recalled (removed from political office), Schwarzenegger won his seat for governor of California.
Schwarzenegger is married to Maria Shriver.
Before he was an actor, he was a bodybuilder and won the Mister Universe title seven times.

Henry Knox
Henry Knox (1750-1806) was a military leader for the Americans during the American Revolutionary War. Originally from Boston, Massachusetts, he was appointed Chief Artillery Officer of the Continental Army. He is best known for transporting cannons and other artillery from Fort Ticonderoga to Boston through icy conditions using oxen. Later, George Washington named him the first Secretary of War.
Fort Knox in Kentucky & Maine are named after him.

Alejandro Toledo
Alejandro Toledo is the current president of Peru. He won the 2001 election for President.
He is from the town of Chimbote in Ancash Region, Peru. He is married to Eliane Karp of Belgium.

Evo Morales
Juan Evo Morales Aima (born October 26, 1959) is the President of Bolivia. He is an Aymara Native American, and is politically a leftist. He is the founder and leader of the Movement toward Socialism (or MAS) political party. "Movimiento al Socialismo" is its Spanish name. On January 22, 2006, he became President of Bolivia. His party has declared that he is the first indigenous person to be president of Bolivia. Not everyone believes this to be true because of his mestizo heritage and similar backgrounds of several past Bolivian presidents. Nonetheless, he is likely the first "culturally" indigenous president of Bolivia.

Konstantin Chernenko
Konstantin Ustinovich Chernenko (Russian language: Константи́н Усти́нович Черне́нко September 24, 1911 – March 10, 1985) was the leader of the Soviet Union for a very short time. He became the leader in 1984, and ruled for 13 months until his death in 1985.

Montreal Canadiens
The Montreal Canadiens are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL). Their nickname is the "Habs" (short for the French "habitants", meaning inhabitants - people who live in a certain place). They have won the Stanley Cup championship 24 times, more than any other team.
Origin.
The Canadiens (who use the French spelling of "Canadian") were formed in 1909, as part of the National Hockey Association.
Early games.
They won their first Stanley Cup in 1916, with star players such as Edouard "Newsy" Lalonde and goaltender Georges Vezina. The Canadiens joined the NHL in 1917; Canadien Joe Malone won the first NHL scoring title (Art Ross Trophy). They won the Cup again in 1924, with players such as Billy Boucher. Howie Morenz was a big star in the early years of the NHL. He was a great skater. Morenz won the Hart Trophy, as the league's top player, three times. Goalie George Hainsworth played at the same time, and along with others such as Aurel Joliat, they won the Stanley Cup in 1930 and 1931.
It took 13 years before they won the Cup again. A young Maurice "The Rocket" Richard, star goalie Bill Durnan,Hector "Toe" Blake, and Elmer Lach led the Canadiens to the cup again in 1944, as well as 1946. Richard scored 50 goals in a 50-game season in 1944-45. No one did that again for 36 years. He led the NHL in goals five times.
Later games.
The Canadiens became a very powerful team in the 1950's. Led by legendary center Jean Beliveau, Doug Harvey (who won seven Norris Trophies as best defence, six on Montreal), Bernie "Boom Boom" Geoffrion, Dickie Moore, Jacques Plante (who won seven Vezina Trophies for goalies), and Richard (along with his younger brother, Henri, the "Pocket Rocket"), the team won the Cup in 1953, and five times in a row, 1956 through 1960. They won again in 1965, 1966, 1968, and 1969.
New members.
New players led the team in the 1970's: Guy Lafleur, Ken Dryden, Bob Gainey, Larry Robinson, and Yvon Cournoyerled them to the cup in 1971, 1973, and four times in a row, 1976 through 1979. By 1979, they had won the Stanley Cup 16 times in 27 years.

Adolph Rupp
Adolph Frederick Rupp (September 2, 1901-December 10, 1977) was one of the most successful college basketball coaches in history. He coached the University of Kentucky's basketball team from 1930 to 1972, 42 years. He helped the team win 4 national NCAA championships. Rupp Arena in Lexington, Kentucky is named after him.

Miami Dolphins
The Miami Dolphins is an American football club in the National Football League team based in Miami, Florida, USA. The Dolphins began playing in 1966 and in 1972 they had the only perfect season in NFL history and won a Super Bowl, with Bob Griese leading the team as quarterback. Another quarterback, Dan Marino, is a more recent famous player for this club.

Charles de Gaulle
General Charles-André-Joseph-Marie de Gaulle (November 22, 1890 - November 9, 1970) was a French military and political leader. He was president of France from 1959 to 1969.

Pol Pot
Saloth Sar (better known as Pol Pot) (May 19, 1925 – April 15, 1998) was the Maoist-extremist leader of Cambodia/Kampuchea between 1975 and 1979. His government was called the Khmer Rouge. It was a military government. He turned Cambodia into a military dictatorship called Democratic Kampuchea. Between 1.7 and 3 million Cambodians were killed by his regime (a regime is a government based on a certain world view). He was not stopped until the Vietnamese Communists liberated Kampuchea in early 1979.

Oliver & Company
"Oliver & Company" is an animated movie, released in the United States by Walt Disney Pictures and Buena Vista Pictures on November 18, 1988. It is loosely based on Charles Dickens's book "Oliver Twist", which has been made many times for the screen and television.
The Story.
Oliver is an orange orphan cat lost in New York City, when a mongrel (dog of mixed breed), named Dodger, finds him. When Oliver gets some sausages for him (from a hot dog seller named Louie), Dodger leaves the cat behind and runs to the barge of his poor owner, Fagin the pickpocketer. Inside Fagin's barge are four other dogs, which he also owns: Tito the chihuahua, Einstein the Great Dane, Rita the afghan hound, and the serious bulldog Francis. When Oliver breaks in, those dogs (including Dodger) go into a fit of fighting and confusion over their visitor. After Fagin breaks it up, he goes outside on a quay, only to find out that he must pay his agent, Sykes, some money within three days. In order to get the money, Fagin, his dogs, and Oliver set out into the city streets the next day. While the poor man is unlucky trying to sell his useless stuff, the animals encounter a limosine that is driven by Winston, a butler. They put on an act to get his attention. In the end, Tito gets "barbecued" after interfering with the limosine's dashboard, and Jennifer finds the cat, who is tangled up in the wires nearby. Taking Oliver home at Fifth Avenue, she makes friends with him. Thus, the cat is lucky to be adopted twice in two days. The next morning, Fagin's dogs return in order to get Oliver back to their barge, much to the upset of Winston and his pet poodle, Georgette. But as they do so, Oliver feels he cannot fit in with his other friends. Yet he is Fagin's best hope, because of the gold tag on his collar. So he writes to the "Very Rich Cat Owner" at Oliver's address in hopes of getting Sykes' money faster. As Jenny reads that letter after she comes home from school, she and Georgette go to the docks to get Oliver. Jenny gets him back, thanks to Fagin, but then Sykes kidnaps her for the sake of the ransom that the pickpocketer has to pay in twelve hours. It is up to Fagin and his dogs to save both Jenny and Oliver from the wrath of Sykes and his Dobermans, Roscoe and DeSoto.

Rudolf Hess
Walter Richard Rudolf Hess (Heß in German) (April 26, 1894 – August 17, 1987) was a High Ranking Nazi
leader, and one of Adolf Hitler's closest men.
Early life.
Rudolf Hess was born in Alexandria, Egypt, but moved back to Germany in 1908.
He joined the army in World War I and was trained as a pilot.
He flew to Scotland during World War II and was arrested. After the war he was tried at the Nuremberg Trials, and sentenced to life imprisonment.
He died in the Allied Military Prison, Spandau, Berlin in 1987. Since 1966 he had been the only prisoner, his death was caused by a strangulation cord but officials recorded it as a suicide.

Hans Enoksen
Hans Enoksen (born 1956) is the Prime Minister of Greenland. He was elected Prime Minister December 14, 2002.

Benjamin Franklin
Benjamin Franklin (January 17, 1706 - April 17, 1790) was one of the "Founding Fathers" of the United States, and one of the country's earliest politicians. He had a very important part in shaping the American Revolution, even though he was never elected to any official position. As a leader of the Enlightenment, he influenced European scientists. He even was the first thing many Europeans associated with America at the time. His success with the French military was an important factor in America's win over Great Britain.
Most people see Franklin as one of history's greatest inventors. Some of his greatest creations include the lightning rod, bifocals (a type of eyeglasses), the idea of unity in the Thirteen Colonies, and the idea of America itself.
The city of Philadelphia, Pennsylvania (where he lived) marked his three hundredth birthday in 2006.
Franklin is frequently seen on the United States' hundred-dollar bill as a mark of brilliance and a tribute to our past.

Paul Bremer
Lewis Paul Bremer III (Paul Bremer and "Jerry" among his friends) is an American author and politician. Paul Bremer was born on September 30, 1941. He was named "Director of Reconstruction and Humanitarian Assistance" on May 6 for Iraq in 2003, after the war..
Biography.
Jerry Bremer was born in Hartford, Connecticut. He grew up in New Canaan, Connecticut. He went to school at Phillips Academy and graduated in 1959. Then he went to Yale University. He received a Bachelor of Arts degree in 1963. In 1996, he received a masters degree from Harvard University. His degree was in business. He also received a degree in Paris.
In 1967, he joined the United States foreign service. At first he worked in Kabul, Afghanistan. He also worked in Blantyre, Malawi from 1968 to 1971. He worked for the United States State Department for 23 years. During that time, he worked for six different Secretaries of State, including Alexander Haig. A Secretary of State is the top government official in the U.S. State Department. A secretary of state is appointed by the United States President. He also worked as a deputy chief at an American embassy in the country of Norway. A deputy chief is a person in charge at the embassy.
In 1983, President Ronald Reagan appointed Paul Bremer to the position of Ambassador to the Netherlands. He also became "Ambassador at Large for Counter Terrorism."
He retired in 1989. Then he spent the next 15 years working in private (non-government) companies. One of the companies he worked for was Kissinger Associates (a company that was run by someone who used to be a Secretary of State, Henry Kissinger). He also served as a board member for several corporations. A board member is someone who makes big or strategic decisions on how a company should operate. Mr. Bremer has served on the board for corporations such as Air Products and Chemicals Incorporated, Akzo Nobel NV (a Dutch company), and Marsh Crisis Consulting Company.
Jerry Bremer speaks many languages besides English. He also speaks Arabic, French, Dutch, Norwegian, Persian, German, and Spanish.
He is married to a woman named Frances Winfield. They were married in 1966. They have two adult children and two grandchildren.
After he worked in Iraq, Bremer wrote a book. The title of the book is "My Year in Iraq: The Struggle to Build a Future of Hope". The book was published in January, 2006.

Teodoro Obiang Nguema Mbasogo
Teodoro Obiang Nguema Mbasogo (born June 5 1942) is the President of Equatorial Guinea.

Toronto Maple Leafs
The Toronto Maple Leafs are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL).
Origin.
They were formed in 1917 as one of the five original NHL teams. They were called the Toronto Arenas, but changed their name to St. Patricks, then to Maple Leafs, in the 1920s.
History.
The Maple Leafs have won the Stanley Cup championship 13 times, more than any team except the Montreal Canadiens. However, they have not won since 1967.
Early years.
They won in their first year, 1918, and then again in 1922 and 1932. In their early years, they had many NHL scoring champions: "Babe" Dye in 1923 and 1925, "Ace" Bailey in 1929, Harvey "Busher" Jackson in 1932, Charlie Conacher in 1934 and 1935, and Gordie Drillon in 1938. However, no Toronto player has been scoring champion since then.
Winnings.
They were a strong team in the 1940s. They won the Stanley Cup in 1942 against the Detroit Red Wings, four games to three, even though they were losing three games to none at one point. This was the first of six championships in ten years; they also won in 1945, then three years in a row: 1947, 1948, and 1949, and again in 1951. Some of their best players in that time included goaltender Turk Broda, forward Syl Apps, and defence "Babe" Pratt, who won the Hart Trophy as the most valuable player in 1944. Ted "Teeder" Kennedy won the Hart Trophy in 1955; but no other Maple Leaf has won that award.
The team won four Stanley Cups in the 1960s: three in a row - 1962, 1963, and 1964 - and again in 1967. Frank Mahovlich, a left winger, was the star player. They were also led by defenceman Tim Horton (who began the Tim Horton's doughnut shops), center Dave Keon, goaltender Johnny Bower, and winger George Armstrong. Keon won the Conn Smythe Trophy as the top player in the playoffs in 1967.
Later years.
In the late 1970s, the Maple Leafs were a good team, with players such as centre Darryl Sittler (who scored a record 10 points in one game) and Swedish defence Borje Salming (one of the first Europeans to play in the NHL). However, there were 18 NHL teams by then, so it was hard to come first. Wendyl Clark was a strong player in the 1980s; he became the team's all-time top scorer. Mats Sundin was another Swedish star in the 1990s and 2000s. They also had some good goaltenders around this time: Curtis Joseph, then Ed Belfour.

Detroit Red Wings
The Detroit Red Wings are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League.
Early history.
They were formed in 1926. The Western Canada Hockey League (WCHL) folded that year, and many of the players from the WCHL's Victoria Cougars went to play for Detroit. As a result, the team was first called the Detroit Cougars, then later it changed to Detroit Falcons, before becoming known as the Red Wings.
Later history.
In the late 1940s, the line of Sid Abel, Gordie Howe, and Ted Lindsey became very important to the team. Abel won the Hart Trophy in 1949, and Lindsey won the Art Ross Trophy as scoring champion in 1950. Howe then won six Hart and six Art Ross Trophies between 1951 and 1963. Terry Sawchuck was a star goaltender, who ended up with more career shutouts than any other goalie (103). Red Kelly won the first ever Norris Trophy as best defence. As a result of having such great players, the Red Wings won four Stanley Cups in six years: 1950, 1952, 1954, and 1955. Two of these were very close: they were won in overtime of the 7th and deciding game in 1950 (against the New York Rangers) and 1954 (against the Montreal Canadiens). These are the only two times the NHL championship has gone to overtime of game seven.
The Red Wings continued to be a strong team throughout the 1960. They lost the final five times between 1956 and 1966. Norm Ullman was their star centre in the 1960s.
Comeback.
They were not a strong team again until the late 1980s. Steve Yzerman became a star at this time. Sergei Fedorov became the first Russian to win the Hart Trophy in 1994. The Red Wings won the President's Cup as top team in the NHL regular season in 1995, 1996 (with a record number of wins), and 2002. They won the Stanley Cup in 1997, 1998, and 2002. Niklas Lidstrom won the Norris Trophy as best defenceman three times beginning in 2001. The team was one of the richest in the NHL, which helped them get many good players.
Winnings.
The Red Wings have won eleven Stanley Cups, the third most of any team, and the most of the United States teams. They first won in 1936 and 1937, and again in 1943. Ebbie Goodfellow won the Hart Trophy as the NHL's most valuable player in 1940. Sid Howe was also a star on the team at this time.

Hugh Capet of France
Hugh Capet (French: Hugues Capet) (circa 940 – October 24, 996) was King of France from 987 until his death in 996. He was born in Paris, France and was the son of Hugh the Great and Hedwige of Saxony. He married Adelaide of Aquitane. She was the daughter of William III of Aquitane. Capet was the first person of the direct Capetian Dynasty to rule France.Hugh would make the office of the king hereditary and would pass his crown down to his son.The dynasty he establish would rule France unbroken for 300 years.
"Capet" is a nickname for "wearing a cape".
Hugh Capet is buried in the Saint Denis Basilica.

Chicago Blackhawks
The Chicago Blackhawks are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL). They were formed in 1926, named after Chief Black Hawk, a native American leader. The team has won the Stanley Cup Championship three times.
The Regina Capitals were a team in the Western Canada Hockey League until 1925, when they moved and became the Portland Rosebuds. One year later, the league folded. Most of the Portland players then played for the new Chicago team in the NHL.
In the 1930's, Charlie Gardiner was a star goaltender for the team. Players on the Blackhawks won four scoring titles (Art Ross Trophy) in the 1940's: Doug Bentley in 1943, his brother Max in 1946 and 1947, and Roy Conacher in 1949. Max Bentley also won the Hart Trophy as the league's most valuable player in 1946. Goalie Al Rollins won the Hart Trophy in 1954. By 1960, however, the team had only made the Stanley Cup final four times, winning the Cup in 1934 and 1938, and losing in 1931 and 1944.
The team was much stronger in the 1960's. Bobby Hull led the NHL in goals seven times, more than any other player. He also won three Art Ross and two Hart Trophies. Stan Mikita won four Art Ross and two Hart Trophies. Between them, they led the NHL in scoring seven times in nine years. Star goaltender Glenn Hall was an all-star many times; and Pierre Pilote won the Norris Trophy as best defenceman three times. The Blackhawks won the Stanley Cup in 1961, and also made the finals in 1962 and 1965. Goalie Tony Esposito led them to the finals in 1971 and 1973.
Since that time, they have had many star players such as Doug Wilson, Steve Larmer, Jeremy Roenick, and Tony Amonte; but they have not won the Cup since 1961, the longest wait of any NHL team. They won the President's Cup as the top team in the regular season in 1991, and made the finals again in 1992, partly due to Ed Belfour (who won two Vezina Trophies as best goaltender) and Chris Chelios (who won two Norris Trophies on Chicago). As of 2006, however, they have only made the playoffs once in the last eight years.

Heinz Fischer
Heinz Fischer (born 9 October 1938) is the current president of Austria. His wife is Margit Fischer.

Boston Bruins
The Boston Bruins are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL). They were the first American team in the NHL, in 1924. They have won five Stanley Cup championships.
Early games.
In their early years, the Bruins won three Stanley Cups: 1929, 1939, and 1941. Ralph "Cooney" Weiland won the Art Ross Trophy as scoring champion in 1930. Aubrey "Dit" Clapper was also a star player around this time. Then Eddie Shore came along a huge star in the league on defence, he won the Hart Trophy as most valuable player (MVP) four times: in 1933, 1935, 1936, and 1938 Only Gordie Howe and Wayne Gretzky have won it more often. "Tiny" Thompson was the team's star goaltender.
Later games.
The Bruins continued to be a strong team through the late 1970's, 1980's, and early 1990's. One reason was Ray Bourque, who won the Norris Trophy five times. He is the team's top career scorer, and the highest scoring defenseman in NHL history. The Bruins won the President's Cup as regular-season champions in 1983 and 1990, and made the Stanley Cup finals in 1988 and 1990; but they have not won the championship since 1972. Cam Neely was an important player until the mid-1990's, and Joe Thornton was a top scorer until he was traded to the San Jose Sharks in 2005.
Top players.
Some of the team's top players in the 1940's were Milt Schmidt and Bill Cowley. Schmidt won the Art Ross Trophy in 1941, and Cowley the next year (teammate Herb Cain won it in 1944). Cowley won two Hart Trophies, in 1941 and 1943, and Schmidt was MVP in 1951. However, the team did not win a championship for 29 years after 1941.
Best player.
Then came Bobby Orr. He began as a defenceman with Boston in 1966. After his rookie (first) season, he won the Norris Trophy as best defenceman in the NHL eight times in a row. He joined with centre Phil Esposito to lead the Bruins to the Stanley Cup in 1970 and 1972. Orr won the Conn Smythe Trophy as MVP in the playoffs both years. He also won the Hart Trophy in 1970, 1971, and 1972; Esposito won it in 1969 and 1974. Esposito won five Art Ross Trophies: 1969, 1971, 1972, 1973, and 1974. Orr won it in 1970 and 1975, the only defence ever to win the scoring title. John Bucyk was also a star player at this time, and was the team's top career scorer for many years.

Alberto Fujimori
Alberto Fujimori (born July 28, 1938) was the President of Peru from 1990-2001.
He is still remembered in Peru for defeating Shinning Path, the peace with Ecuador and recovering the economy after the presidency of Alan García.
In 2001, Fujimori's head of intelligence, Vladimiro Montesinos, was accused of doing illegal things. People thought that Fujimori was also involved. After that, Fujimori resigned to the Presidency of Peru.
Valentín Paniagua was elected president by the Congress soon after Fujimori resigned. Fujimori went to Japan, because he is a citizen there. Japan protected him from Peruvian law since they do not find any valid accusation.
In 2005, Fujimori was detained in Chile. The Peruvian government is now trying to bring him back to Peru in order to have him face trial

New York Rangers
The New York Rangers are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL). They play in Madison Square Garden in New York City. The team began in 1926, and has won four Stanley Cup championships.
Early years.
The Rangers were successful in their early years, winning the Stanley Cup in 1928, 1933, and 1940. Bill Cook won the Art Ross Trophy as scoring leader in 1927 and 1933, and Bryan Hextall won it in 1942. "Babe" Pratt was a star defenceman around this time.
Later years.
The Rangers did very poorly in the mid-1940s, but improved by 1950, when they lost the Stanley Cup final in overtime of the deciding game seven to the Detroit Red Wings. Buddy O'Connor won the Hart Trophy as most valuable player in 1948, goaltender Chuck Rayner won it in 1950, and Andy Bathgate won it in 1959.
The team did not make the finals again until 1972, when they lost to the Boston Bruins. They were led by players such as Jean Ratelle, Brad Park, Ed Giacomin, and Rod Gilbert. The Rangers made the finals again in 1979, losing to the Montreal Canadians.
Rivalry.
There was another team in New York, the Americans. The Americans felt that the Rangers were favoured by Madison Square Garden, and that their team folded in 1942 because of the Rangers. The Americans' coach and general manager, Red Dutton, claimed the Rangers would never win another Stanley Cup as long as he lived. This became known as Dutton's curse.
Comeback.
Red Dutton died in 1987, and his curse came true. Finally, the Rangers improved, winning the President's Cup as regular-season champions in 1992 and 1994. Mark Messier won the Hart Trophy in 1992, and Brian Leetch won two Norris Trophies as best defence. They led the Rangers to the Stanley Cup in 1994, after 54 years of not winning.
Problems.
Recently, the Rangers have been a poor team, missing the playoffs many years in a row. However, in 2005-06, the team has improved again, much due to the play of star Jaromir Jagr and rookie (first year) goalie Henrik Lundquist.

Vancouver Canucks
The Vancouver Canucks are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL).
Early games.
The Canucks were first an amateur team in the Pacific Coast Hockey League (PCHL), winning the championship in 1946 and 1948. In 1952, the PCHL joined with the Western Canada Senior Hockey League to form the minor-league Western Hockey League. The Canucks won the championship in this league in 1958, 1960, 1969, and 1970.
Beginning.
The Canucks joined the NHL in 1970. They were not a good team at first, though they won their division in 1975. Andre Boudrias was a star for the team at this time. The team made the Stanley Cup finals in 1982, which surprised many people, since they had finished below average in the regular season. Goaltender Richard Brodeur, along with forwards Stan Smyl, Thomas Gradin, and Darcy Rota, led the team. Coach Roger Neilson and some players raised white towels on top of their hockey sticks to "surrender" to the referees, who they thought were unfair (a white flag means surrender or "I give up"). After that, the fans all waved white flags during Canucks playoff games. The team lost four games to zero in the finals to the New York Islanders.
Comeback.
In the late 1980s, players such as Toni Tanti and Petri Skriko led the team. They made the finals again in 1994, due to players such as goaltender Kirk MacLean, the "Russian Rocket" Pavel Bure (who scored the most goals in the NHL that year), Trevor Linden, and Cliff Ronning. However, they lost four games to three to the New York Rangers.
Problems.
The Canucks did poorly in the late 1990s, but improved in the 2000s. Markus Naslund came second in scoring in 2002 and 2003, and was named the Pearson Trophy winner as players' choice for the best player in 2003. Todd Bertuzzi, Matthias Ohlund, and Ed Jovanovski were also important players who helped lead the team to the division title in 2004. However, they lost in overtime of deciding game seven to the Calgary Flames in the first round of the playoffs (just as they had done in 1989), and the Flames went to the finals (just like 1989).
The Canucks just missed the playoffs in 2006. Two of the young stars, identical twins Daniel and Henrik Sedin, along with players such as Anson Carter, were important to the team that year.

Mi Reflejo
"Mi Reflejo" is the first Spanish-language album by American pop singer Christina Aguilera. It was released on 2000. There are 11 songs in this album. Six of them are new songs. Five of them are from her first album "Christina Aguilera" but in Spanish.
This album won a Grammy Award as Best Latin Pop Album in 2001.

Michelle Bachelet
Michelle Bachelet (Verónica Michelle Bachelet Jeria) became the first woman president of Chile on March 11, 2006.

Jennifer Granholm
Jennifer Granholm (b. February 5, 1959) is a Canadian born American politician. She is the governor of the state of Michigan. Granholm was born in Canada and raised in California. She ran for governor of Michigan in 2002, even though she had lived in the state for less than 15 years.

Sandra Day O'Connor
Sandra Day O'Connor (born March 26, 1930) is on the Supreme Court of the United States. She is the first woman to be part of that court.

John Paul Stevens
John Paul Stevens (born April 20, 1920 in Chicago, Illinois) is on the Supreme Court of the United States. He was nominated by President Gerald Ford in 1975. Now he is senior Associate Justice and member of the court "Liberal Wing". He voted with minority in Bush v. Gore case (2000). He also voted with majority in Furman v. Georgia case (1976), but later bacame a death penalty opponent.
he is currently 87 years old he is very mean and he stinks. his mama name is pigfeet and his daddy name is cletus anything else u wanna kno help by adding to it.

Antonin Scalia
Antonin Scalia (born March 11, 1936) is a jurist on the Supreme Court of the United States. His position is that of Associate Justice. He is a Roman Catholic born to Italian American parents.

Anthony Kennedy
Anthony Kennedy is on the Supreme Court of the United States. He was made a judge on that court in 1988.
Kennedy was born in Sacramento, California, on July 23, 1936. He went to Harvard University, Stanford University, and the London School of Economics. He was a private lawyer, a professor, and in 1975, he was appointed by Gerald Ford to the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals. In 1988, Ronald Reagan nominated him for the Supreme Court. He became a member of the court on February 18, 1988.

David Souter
David Souter is a member of the Supreme Court of the United States. He was born September 17, 1939. Souter has been an Associate Justice since 1990. He replaced William J. Brennan.

Clarence Thomas
Clarence Thomas is a Justice of the Supreme Court of the United States. He was born June 23, 1948. Thomas has been a Justice since 1991. He is the only African-American currently on the court. He is also the second African American to ever serve on the court. The only other African Amerian was Thurgood Marshall. Clarence Thomas was born in Pin Point, Georgia. A small community outside Savannah. His father left his family when he was only a year old, leaving his mother Leola Anderson, to take care of the family.

Stephen Breyer
Stephen Breyer is a Justice of the Supreme Court of the United States. He was born August 15, 1938. Breyer has been an Associate Justice since 1994.

Ruth Bader Ginsburg
Ruth Bader Ginsberg is a Justice of the Supreme Court of the United States. She was born March 15, 1933. She has been an Associate Justice since 1993.

John G. Roberts
John Glover Roberts, Jr. (born January 27, 1955) is the seventeenth and current Chief Justice of the United States Supreme Court. Appointed by President George W. Bush, Roberts is generally considered a member of the more conservative wing of the court.
Before joining the Supreme Court on September 29, 2005, Roberts was a judge on the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit for two years.

Engelbert Dollfuss
Engelbert Dollfuss ("German": Dollfuß) (October 4, 1892 – July 25, 1934) was the Chancellor of Austria from 1932 until 1933. He led the country as a dictator from early 1933 until 1934.
He studied law in Vienna, and Economics in Berlin. During World War I, he served in the Alps and briefly became a Prisoner of War in 1918.
He became Chancellor on May 20, 1932 as head of a right-wing coalition government. He wanted to solve the problems caused by the Depression. He had problems finding majorities in parliament. The measures he liked to take to deal with inflation were not well liked. In March 1933, he suspended the Austrian parliament. He then governed by decree.
With Adolf Hitler as Chancellor in Germany, Dollfuss feared that the influence of the NSDAP would grow. This would then lead to a growth in popularity for its Austrian counterpart. Because of this, he banned the NSDAP in June 1933. He also banned the SDAPÖ in February 1934.
In September 1933 he formed an umbrella grouping to support the regime, the "Vaterländische Front" (Fatherland Front) and merged the Christian Social Party with the para-military Heimwehr (Home Guard), a Nationalist paramilitary group. The regime which was put intp power by him and remained in power until 1938 is often called "Austrofascism". The form of state he employed was called the "Ständestaat".
On July 25, 1934 eight Austrian Nazis entered the Chancellery building and shot and killed Dollfuss in an attempted coup, as a prelude to Anschluss. The Nazis surrendered and were executed. Kurt Schuschnigg became the new dictator of Austria.

Mehmed II
Mehmed II (March 30, 1432, "Edirne" – May 3, 1481, "Hünkârcayırı", near "Gebze") was Sultan of the Ottoman Empire for a short time from 1444 to 1446, and later from 1451 to 1481. At the age of 21, he conquered Constantinople. So he brought to an end to the medieval Byzantine Empire.

Halldór Ásgrímsson
Halldór Ásgrímsson (born September 8, 1947) is the Prime Minister of Iceland. The leader of the Progressive Party since 1994, he took over as Prime Minister on September 15, 2004, from the Independence Party leader, Davíð Oddsson.
He has been very active in politics in Iceland.

Frederick I of Prussia
Frederick I of Prussia (German: "Friedrich I."), July 11, 1657 – February 25, 1713) of the Hohenzollern dynasty was the first King in Prussia (1701 – 1713).

Nikita Khrushchev
Nikita Sergeyevich Khrushchyov (Russian: Ники́та Серге́евич Хрущёв) IPA:, commonly spelled in English as Khrushchev) April 17, 1894 – September 11, 1971) was the leader of the Soviet Union after the death of Joseph Stalin. He ruled from 1953-1964.
Nikita was born in the town of Kalinovka in Russia. He later moved to Ukraine. He worked in mines, and became part of the Bolshevik movement.
He moved his way up in the Communist Party, eventually becoming trusted by President Joseph Stalin. When Stalin died, Khrushchev became the leader of the Soviet Union.
"De-Stalinization".
When Nikita became the leader of the Soviet Union, he began something he called "De-Stalinization". He took down all posters and statues of Joseph Stalin. Also, he moved Stalin's grave to a place where people could not see it in the Kremlin wall, he buried Stalin deep. This was all a part of an effort to make the people of the Soviet Union forget about Stalin.
He helped unravel truth behind Katyn tragedy where over 22000 of Polish inteligentisa were killed by Stalin and Beria's orders.
Relations with the "West".
He also had better contacts with the western countries like the USA, Britain, and France. This means the USSR and the west were more friendly. He visited America in 1959.
But the USSR and the US still did not trust each other. In 1962 America and the USSR had problems over missiles being in Cuba (near the US), and could have had a war. Khrushchev took the missiles away from Cuba and this problem was ended.
Relations with China.
Also, during this time, the Soviet Union became a lot less friendly with China. Because the Chinese leader Mao Zedong liked Stalin, and did not like it when Khrushchev became more friendly with the west, and when Nikita Khrushchev began a "destalinization" campaign. That's when Mao started the Sino-Soviet Split

Office Space
Office Space is a 1999 comedy movie. The movie was directed by Mike Judge.

Vigdís Finnbogadóttir
Vigdís Finnbogadóttir (born April 15, 1930) was the 4th president of Iceland. She was president from 1980 to 1996. She was the world's first elected woman president.
She studied literature and drama at the University of Grenoble and the Sorbonne in Paris, and also at the University of Iceland. She graduated in English and French literature, and has a degree in education.
At her election in 1980 she was the first woman anywhere to be elected the head of state in a democratic election. She was re-elected unopposed in 1984 and 1992, and beat her opponent in the election of 1988.

Ólafur Ragnar Grímsson
Ólafur Ragnar Grímsson (born May 14, 1943, in Ísafjörður, Iceland) is the fifth and current President of Iceland, from 1996 to present, re-elected without opposition in 2000, and was re-elected for a third term in 2004.
From 1962 to 1970, he studied economics and political science at the University of Manchester. He was a professor at the University of Iceland for political science, served as a Member of the Althing, and was the Minister of Finance (1988–1991).
He married Guðrún Katrín Þorbergsdóttir in 1974, who gave birth to twin daughters the following year. Guðrún Katrín was very popular in Iceland, and her charm is without a doubt one of the main reasons her husband was elected; she charmed the nation from the start of his campaign. Her death from cancer in 1998 was a shock to the nation and her family.
Ólafur's second marriage was to Dorrit Moussaieff to whom he had been engaged since May 2000. This took place on his 60th birthday May 14, 2003.

Qazi Muhammad
Qazi Muhammad (1893-1947) was the Nationalist and Religious Kurdish leader and the Head of Republic of Mahabad (Republic of Kurdistan), the second modern Kurdish state in the Middle East (after Republic of Ararat). He acted as the president of the Russian backed Republic of Mahabad, in Kurdistan of Iran (Eastern Kurdistan) in 1946. He was also the founder of the Kurdish Democratic Party of Iran. A year later, the Kurdish national movement (Komeley Jiyanewey Kurd) that he helped organize was crushed by Iran's central government. The Iranian military court sentenced him to death, and he was hanged in Chuwarchira Square in the center of city of Mahabad at March 30 1947. Mustafa Barzani, the father of nationalist Kurdish movement in Iraqi Kurdistan (Southern Kurdistan), was the defence minister in his cabinet. One of his sons Ali Qazi is today an active member in the kurdish movement.

Emperor of Ethiopia
The Emperor of Ethiopa was the name of the ruler of Ethiopia until 1975 when the emperors and the royal family, the Solomonids, were taken out of power.
The name that was used for "Emperor" by the Ethiopians means "King of Kings".

Tarja Halonen
Tarja Halonen (born December 24, 1943) is the President of Finland. She is from Kakkala. She was elected in 2000 and 2006.

Rocky
"Rocky" is a 1976 movie. It was written by, and starred, Sylvester Stallone. The movie is about a man living in Philadelphia, who is trying to become a great boxer. It won three Academy Awards, for Best Picture, Best Director, and Film editing (it was nominated for seven other Awards), and was ranked #78 in AFI's 100 Years... 100 Movies list. It was followed by 5 sequels, the most recent came out in 2006.

The Deer Hunter
"The Deer Hunter" is a 1978 movie. It told the story of 3 friends affected by the Vietnam War. It won the Academy Award for Best Picture.

Hosni Mubarak
Muhammad Hosni Said Mubarak (Arabic: محمد حسنى سيد مبارك) (born May 4, 1928), commonly known as Hosni Mubarak (Arabic: حسنى مبارك), has been the fourth President of Egypt for twenty four years, since 14 October 1981.
Mubarak became the Vice-President of the Republic of Egypt after moving up the ranks of the Egyptian Air Force. Then he became the President after President Anwar Sadat was assassinated on 6 October 1981.
As President of Egypt, Mubarak is thought to be one of the most powerful leaders in the region. Under the 1971 Constitution of Egypt, President Mubarak has exercised strong control over the country.
Some people think Mr. Mubarak is a dictator. In 2005, he called a free election. He won that election.

Yasser Arafat
Yasser Arafat or Yassir Arafat (Arabic: ياسر عرفات‎) (August 4 or August 24, 1929 in Jerusalem, Palestine) or Cairo, died November 11 3:30am, 2004), born Mohammed Abdel-Raouf Arafat al-Qudwa al-Husseini (محمد عبد الرؤوف القدوة الحسيني) and also known by the "kunya" Abu `Ammar (أبو عمّار) became known as the first leader of the Palestinian people. He was Chairman of the Palestine Liberation Organization (PLO) from 1969 to 2004. In 1993 he also became president of the Palestinian National Authority (PNA).
In 1994, Yasser Arafat was one of the three recipients of the Nobel Peace Prize. The others were Yitzhak Rabin and Shimon Peres. They got the prize for their peace efforts in the Middle East.
The views of him are divided. Some people see him as a hero, who fought for the cause of the Palestinian people. Others see him as a terrorist, who promoted the use of violence to reach his goals. Still other think he was a charismatic leader, but he made too many concessions to the Israeli government. Yasser died in Paris, the next day he was buried at his compound in Due to hasty funeral in Ramallah on November 12, he was reburied on November 13th, around 3 AM.
He was buried in a special casket, with the hope of being buried in Jerusalem one day when Palestine becomes free and independent with Jerusalem as its capital.

Yitzhak Rabin
(יצחק רבין in Hebrew, other spellings: Yitschak Rabin,Yitzchak Rabin) (March 1, 1922 – November 4, 1995) was an Israeli politician and general. He was the fifth Prime Minister of Israel from 1974 until 1977 and again from 1992 until his assassination in 1995 by Yigal Amir, a right-wing activist who had strongly opposed Rabin's signing of the Oslo Accords and to peace with Palestine. He was the first local-born Prime Minister of Israel, the only Prime Minister to be killed and the second to die in office (following Levi Eshkol).
In 1994, Yitzhak Rabin was one of the three recipients of the Nobel Peace Prize. The others were Yasser Arafat and Shimon Peres. All three got the prizes for trying to make peace in the Middle East.

Formula One
Formula One, or F1, is a type of race-car driving. Teams compete in a series of Grand Prix races, held in different countries around the world. Some of the most popular races are held in Monaco, Japan, Italy and Britain. The cars are very fast, making speeds of up to 370 kilometers per hour. The championship has been won many times by
different teams- Mclaren, Ferrari and Williams. Teams can consist of as many as 600 people, who all come together every race weekend, and using each of their individual expertise try to obtain the maximum result - a victory. The winning driver and team each gain ten points towards the drivers and constructor's championship. Teams consist of drivers, test drivers, a team principal, mechanics, engineers, designers and aerodynamicists to name a few of the team personnel. Winning a race takes a good qualifying position, flawless strategy, perfect pitstops and a fast car.
Drivers are paid huge salaries to risk their lives every time they step into the cockpit. Like all types of motoracing, the dangers associated with formula one are great. So much so, that there are many safety measures. Drivers wear 4 layers of flameproof overalls, made of a fire resistant material called Nomex. A drivers helmet must be able to resist an 800 degree celsius flame for at least 45 seconds, as well 100s of Gforces. the helmets can be driven over by trucks with no damage being done to them. Carbon fibre is the ideal material for the bodywork of formula one cars - which are very expensive to build and repair. The design of cars differs from team to team. Each team has two entries into the championship which means two cars to build, plus a spare car. The current tyre suppliers are Bridgestone - making sure every car has the right tyre for the differing weather conditions. Wet weather driving is considered a skill in formula one, as the cars are slowed down considerably.
The body that runs Formula One, the FIA, is based in France. Although Formula One is a 'billion dollar business', a drop in viewership and attendance figures at races has prompted the FIA to make a number of rule changes in recent years. these changes are meant to make the races more interesting, so more people watch.

Abdullah Öcalan
Abdullah Öcalan is the leader of Kurdistan Workers Party (PKK), a Communist group banned by the government of Turkey. Turkey branded Abdullah a terrorist, although many Kurds look to him for leadership and call him "Apo" or "uncle." "Öcalan" means, in Turkish, "he who takes revenge"
He was born on April, 4th 1949 into a poor peasant family in the village of Omerli, Urfa. He studied at vocational school and then pursued a course at the School of Political Science, Ankara University. He became involved in militant Maoist politics and was first arrested in 1973. In 1975 he returned to Kurdistan and in 1978 he was one of the founder members of the PKK. At the First Congress in November 1978 he was elected leader.
He left Turkey in 1979, before the military coup of September 1980, which led to the imprisonment of thousands of members and sympathisers of the party. In 1982 the PKK decided to resume an armed struggle inside Turkey and in August 1984 the military wing, the Liberation Units of Kurdistan (HRK), began operations. In 1985 the political wing was renamed the National Liberation Front of Kurdistan (ERNK) and in 1986 the HRK became the Peoples Liberation Army of Kurdistan (ARGK). Öcalan's pronouncements had become increasingly moderate through the 1990s, publicly he stated his desire to move the PKK away from violence and towards a political approach.
He was forced out of his group's base in Syria, following pressure from Turkey, in November 1998. He fled to Russia and then Europe, he was arrested after arriving from Moscow at Rome's Fiumicino Airport. He was soon released while he appealed for political asylum, Italian law forbids the extradition of someone to a country where they would face a death sentence. An extradition request from Germany also collapsed amid political maneuvering. He left Italy on 16 January 1999 and returned to Russia but soon left for Greece, apparently intending to fly from there to The Hague. He was refused entry to a number of European states and instead, on February 3 (?) the Greek authorities flew him to Nairobi, Kenya.
On February 15, 1999 Turkey succeeded in kidnapping or arresting him in Nairobi and quickly transported him to Turkey. The details of his capture remain unclear. On February 16, across Europe, Kurdish supporters responded with protests, acts of violence and terrorism. Öcalan was charged with treason in Ankara, Turkey on February 23.
Öcalan is held as the only inmate on the prison island of Imrali. He was tried before a military court on the island from May 31, 1999. The trial had six days of proceedings and following various adjournments he was sentenced to death on June 29. His appeal was rejected in November but the sentence was suspended while there was a review by the European Court of Human Rights. In September 2002 a Turkish court finally reduced his sentence to life imprisonment. The country had abandoned the death penalty in August 2002 as part of the process towards joining the European Union.

Lilo & Stitch
"Lilo & Stitch" is an animated movie, released by Disney in 2002. The movie was written by and directed by Chris Sanders and Dean DeBlois.
The song used by Disney to advertize the movie was Suspicious Minds, performed by Gareth Gates who became famous on the UK TV program, Pop Idol.

Margrethe II of Denmark
Margrethe II ("Margrethe Alexandrine Þórhildur Ingrid") (born 16 April 1940) is the Queen regnant of Denmark. Only very rarely is her name anglicized as Margaret II.
Early life.
Princess Margrethe was born at Amalienborg Palace, Copenhagen, to Crown Prince Frederik and Crown Princess Ingrid. She was baptised on 14 May 1940 at the Naval Church in Copenhagen. As King Christian X was also the King of Iceland at the time of her birth, the Princess was given an Icelandic name, "Þórhildur" (spelled with the Icelandic thorn character, simplified as "th").
Margrethe was not born to be monarch, even though she was the eldest child of the Crown Prince, later King. At the time of her birth, only males could ascend the throne of Denmark.
The act of succession was changed in 1953.
Her father king Frederik IX died in 1972, and Queen Margrethe II became the first female Danish Sovereign.

Levy Mwanawasa
Levy Patrick Mwanawasa (September 3, 1948 – August 19, 2008) was a Zambian politician. He was the President of Zambia from January 2002 to his death.

Manmohan Singh
Manmohan Singh is the Prime Minister of India.

Indira Gandhi
Indira Gandhi (19 November 1917 – 31 October 1984) was the first woman to become Prime Minister of India. She is the daughter of Jawaharlal Nehru, who was also Prime Minister of India. Her son, Rajiv Gandhi, also later became Prime Minister of India. Born Indira Nehru, she married Feroze Gandhi, who had changed his name from "Feroze Khan" and was not related to the famous civil rights leader, Mahatma Gandhi, who helped India gain freedom.

Hamas
Hamas (Arabic: حماس, acronym of Harakat al-Muqawama al-Islamiyya, Arabic: حركة المقاومة الاسلامية, literally "Islamic Resistance Movement") is a Palestinian Islamist Sunni organisation. It was started in 1987 during the First Intifada by Ahmed Yassin and Abdel Aziz al-Rantissi as the Gaza branch of the Muslim Brotherhood organziation in Egypt. In the 2006 Palestinian election, Hamas got 74 of 132 seats in parliament and controls the Gaza Strip. The group wants to build a Palestinian state based on Islamic ideas in the area that is now Israel, the West Bank, and Gaza Strip. Hamas does not recognise the State of Israel.
Name.
"Hamas" is an acronym of the Arabic phrase حركة المقاومة الاسلامية, or Harakat al-Muqawama al-Islamiyya or "Islamic Resistance Movement".
Izz ad-Din al-Qassam Brigades.
Hamas is known for its military wing, the Izz ad-Din al-Qassam Brigades, which plans and carries out attacks on Israel and its citizens. Because of numerous suicide bombings and attacking of civilians in Israel, the United States, and other countries call it a terrorist organisation. The country of Jordan has made the group illegal. However, the international press, including the Israeli English-language daily newspaper, call Hamas members by the more neutral term "militants."
Popularity.
In early 2006, Hamas won a clear victory in the vote for the Palestinian parliament. Voters saw Hamas as an alternative to exchange the long-ruling Fatah party, the main part of the PLO. Fatah had not improved the Palestinian people's conditions and reached statehood, and was thought to be corrupt.
Charitable Work.
Hamas has shown its organizational ability by building health, education, and social services to help the population in the West Bank and the Gaza Strip, where there is much poverty. Such efforts have increased its support. In the first half of 2007, Hamas gained political control of the Gaza Strip, while Fatah keeps its headquarters in the West Bank.
Hamas is also associated in some way with Popular Front for the Liberation of Palestine headed by Ahmed Jibril.

Charles-Maurice de Talleyrand-Périgord
Charles Maurice de Talleyrand-Périgord (February 2, 1754 - May 17, 1838) was a French diplomat. He worked successfully from the regime of Louis XVI, through the French Revolution and then under Napoleon I, Louis XVIII and Louis-Philippe. Since the turn of the 19th century he was known simply as "Talleyrand". He is widely seen as one of the most versatile and influential diplomats in European history, although he was known to accept bribes from other European powers, especially while serving under Napoleon.

Horace Greeley
Horace Greeley (February 3, 1811 – November 29, 1872) was an American newspaper editor, reformer and politician. His "New York Tribune" was the most influential newspaper of the period 1840-1870. Greeley used it to promote the Whig and Republican parties.
He is best known for his socially colored journalism. He wanted to convince people of his ideas. He thought that the role of a journalist must be to convince people with sound arguments. He did not like the sensationalist approach of Joseph Pulitzer and others.

Slobodan Milošević
Slobodan Milošević (Serbian: Слободан Милошевић, pronounced; August 20, 1941 – March 11, 2006) was a Serbian, Yugoslav leader. He was President of Serbia from 1989 to 1997 and then President of the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia from 1997 to 2000. He was the leader of Serbia's ruling Socialist Party. He was a leader in the Yugoslav Wars. He also led his nation to defend itself against NATO agression that took Kosovo from Serbia. NATO leaders charged him for war crimes and crimes against humanity during the bombing of Yugoslavia. He lost elections in 2000. After his fall from power, he was taken to The Netherlands to stand trial at the International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia in The Hague, but died after five years in prison before the case could reach a conclusion. He did not recognize the tribunal, and said he was being tried for standing up to NATO expansion. Many accusations regarding Kosovo proved to be false. It was said by the UN tribunal that Milosevic, who had chronic heart problems and a high blood pressure, died of natural causes.

Klaus Wowereit
Klaus Wowereit (*1 October 1953 in Berlin) is a German politician. He has been the SPD Governing Mayor of Berlin, Germany since 2001. He and his party won 31.4% of the votes in the 2001 state elections], and he started a coalition government with Linkspartei.PDS. He was President of the Bundesrat in 2001/02. He was re-elected as Governing Mayor in 2006, and has carried on the coalition.
He supports Kurt Beck as "Kanzlerkandidat", the SPDs nominee for the Chancellorship of Germany. Many people wanted Wowereit to be the candidate, not so many after he decided to stay in coalition with Die Linke after the 2006 elecctions.
Background.
Until 1973, Klaus Wowereit went to the Ulrich-von-Hutten-Oberschule in Berlin, then he went up to the Free University Berlin to study law. He took his first State Exams in 1981 and the second set in 1984).
Political career.
After university Woweriet spent three years as a civil servant in the Senate Office (that is, Ministry) of the Interior. At the age of 30, he was became the youngest councillor in the city of Berlin when he was elected a councillor of Tempelhof Borough. After eleven years he stood for the Berlin House of Deputies Abgeordnetenhaus which is City's Landtag or state legislature in 1995. In December 1999, he was elected chairman of the SPD parliamentary group in the Abgeordnetenhaus. Since June 2001 he has served as Governing Mayor, "Regierender Bürgermeister", of Berlin.
Sexual orientation.
Wowereit is one of the most famous German politicians who has openly declared himself homosexual. He came out at a convention of the Berlin SPD just before the 2001 mayoral elections, when he said "Ich bin schwul, und das ist auch gut so." "I am gay, and it's ok that way"). This is now a famouse quotation in German. He probably came out so that the tabloid newspapers could not publish what they thought were embarrassing stories about him.
Wowereit is not the only gay mayor of a large European city. Bertrand Delanoë, the mayor of Paris, is openly gay, and Ole von Beust, the mayor of Hamburg, is also gay.
In September 2007, Wowereit published an autobiography called "...und das ist auch gut so.", after his famous coming out phrase.

Carl XVI Gustaf of Sweden
Internationally King Carl XVI Gustav is best known for presenting the Nobel Prizes every year.

Kwame Nkrumah
Dr. Kwame Nkrumah (born Francis Nwia-Kofi Ngonloma, September 21, 1909 – April 27, 1972) was an African political leader. He was well known for being the first Prime Minister (later President) of Ghana, and his vision for a united African continent. On March 6, 1957, after ten years of campaigning for Ghanaian independence, Nkrumah was elected and Ghana gained independence from British rule.
Early life and activism.
Nkrumah was born Francis Nwia-Kofi Ngonloma in Nkroful, a town in Gold Coast (the British colony that was to become Gold Coast) to Kofi Ngonloma, a goldsmith, and Elizabeth Nyaniba, a salesperson, who he saw as a great inspiration.
Education.
Nkrumah was first named Francis Nwia-Kofi, but later changed his name to Kwame Nkrumah in 1945 in the UK. He was born on Saturday.
He attended Elementary School at Half Assini where his father worked as a goldsmith. A German Roman Catholic priest called George Fischer significantly influenced his elementary school education.
Timeline.
The Osagyefo, Dr. Kwame Nkrumah authored over 20 books and publications. (See) and he is a lead authority on the Political theory and Practical Pan-Africanism.

José Luis Rodríguez Zapatero
José Luis Rodríguez Zapatero (born August 4, 1960 in Valladolid) is the President of the Government of Spain. His party, the Spanish Socialist Workers' Party (PSOE), won the general election on March 14, 2004. He succeded to Jose Maria Aznar. Notable actions of his government have included withdrawing Spanish troops from Iraq and legalizing same-sex marriages.

Ben Bradshaw
Benjamin Peter James Bradshaw (born 30 August 1960) is an English politician and the Member of Parliament for the Exeter constituency in the United Kingdom. He was elected in the 1997 general election.
He is a Minister of State in the Department of Health and Minister for the South West and was one of the first openly gay MPs.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Vyacheslav Molotov
Vyacheslav Mikhailovich Molotov (Russian: Вячесла́в Миха́йлович Мо́лотов) (March 9 [O.S. February 25] 1890 – November 8, 1986) was a Soviet politician and diplomat. He was a leading figure in the Soviet government from the 1920s, when he came to power. He was a protégé of Joseph Stalin, until the 1950s. Nikita Khrushchev dismissed him from office. He was the main Soviet signatory of the Molotov-Ribbentrop pact of 1939. This pact was signed between Germany and the USSR, and it was a promise not to attack each other. The pact lasted about two years, until Germany started the invasion of the Soviet Union on June 22 1941.

Joachim von Ribbentrop
Ulrich Friedrich Wilhelm Joachim von Ribbentrop (born Ulrich Friedrich Wilhelm Joachim Ribbentrop) (April 30, 1893 – October 16, 1946) was Foreign Minister of Germany from 1938 until 1945. He was executed through hanging for war crimes after the Nuremberg trials.

Charles II of England
Charles II, who is sometimes called the Merry Monarch (May 29, 1630–February 6, 1685), was king of England, Wales, Ireland, and Scotland, from 1649 to 1685. His father was Charles I of England, who was executed after losing a war with Parliament.
Early life.
Prince Charles was the King's eldest son. As a little boy, he was made Prince of Wales as a sign that he would one day be king. By the time he grew into a young man, his father was already at war with Parliament. Prince Charles did not take much part in the fighting. His mother, Henrietta Maria, was French, and she took her children to France when the war broke out, to keep them safe. Prince Charles was only eighteen when he heard that his father was dead. This made him King, and he started calling himself King Charles II straight away, but Parliament was still in control of Britain and would not let him take his throne.
The King's escape.
In 1651, Charles II returned to Britain and fought Parliament at the Battle of Worcester. He was defeated, but he was not caught by the enemy because he hid in an oak tree. Later, he was forced to disguise himself as a servant. A young lady called Jane Lane helped him to escape, and he sailed to Holland where his supporters were. He kept his own royal court there until 1660.
The Restoration.
While Charles was in Holland, Britain was being ruled by Oliver Cromwell, an ordinary man who had been chosen as leader of the country by Parliament. Cromwell was very strict and did not allow the people to enjoy themselves, so they soon grew tired of him. When Cromwell died in 1658, his son Richard was chosen to be the next leader. Richard Cromwell did not like being in power, and he agreed with most of the people that King Charles II should be asked to come back and rule Britain.
In 1660, Charles II was brought back to Britain and took his throne. Many of his enemies were punished for having executed his father and fought against him, but Richard Cromwell was allowed to go and live quietly away from London. Charles was popular and was called "The Merry Monarch" because he changed many of the laws that Cromwell had made and allowed people to enjoy themselves freely. He liked to go to the theatre, played cards and enjoyed sports such as horse racing. Some people thought that a king should be more serious and not spend so much time and money on pleasure.
There were also some people who did not like King Charles II because of his religious beliefs. He had been brought up by his mother, who was a Roman Catholic, and he still took part in Catholic services in private, even though most people in the country were Protestant. He married a princess from Portugal, Catherine of Braganza. They did not have any children, but Charles refused to divorce Catherine because he loved her and he did not agree with divorce. Before he was married, he had several girlfriends and lovers, and even after he was married he went on having lovers, who were called "mistresses". The most famous of these was an actress called Nell Gwyn. Several of Charles's lovers had babies, but none of these children were allowed to follow Charles as king, because they were "illegitimate", meaning that they had been born to parents who were not married to each other.
The most popular of Charles II's children was James Scott. Charles gave him the title Duke of Monmouth. James's mother had been Charles's girlfriend when he was living in Holland, and some people said that they had been secretly married. If this had been true, then James would have been allowed to be king when Charles died. There were many who wanted this to happen, because they did not like the thought of Charles's younger brother being the next king. This brother, who was also called James, was a Roman Catholic and was not popular.
Charles II died quite suddenly, and his son James, Duke of Monmouth, started a rebellion in the hope of becoming the next king. He was defeated by the royal army, which supported Charles's brother James. The Duke of Monmouth was executed by having his head chopped off, and Charles's brother became the next ruler, King James II of England.

Leonid Brezhnev
Leonid Brezhnev was a leader of the Soviet Union. Born in 1906, Brezhnev was dictator of the Soviet Union from 1964 until his death in 1982. During the Second World War in Russia, Brezhnev acted as a spy, instead he spied on his own countrymen for political reasons.

Lech Kaczyński
Lech Aleksander Kaczyński (born June 18, 1949) has been the President of the Republic of Poland since 2005. Kaczyński served as President of Warsaw from 2002
until the day before he became president. He is the identical twin brother of the Prime Minister of Poland, Jarosław Kaczyński.

Janet Reno
Janet Reno (June 21, 1938-) was the United States Attorney General from 1993 to 2001, under President Bill Clinton. She was the first woman to ever have this job.

Charles V, Holy Roman Emperor
Charles V (24 February 1500–21 September 1558) was Holy Roman Emperor, King of Spain, Naples, and Sicily, and king of the Burgundian territories. He was called Carlos I in Spain, though he is also commonly called Carlos V. His nickname was "El Dorado" or "the golden one" because of his good and impressive rule.
Philip the Handsome and Joanna the Mad of Castile were his parents. His grandparents on his mother's side were Ferdinand II of Aragon and Isabella I of Castile. Their marriage made Spain into one kingdom. His grandparents on his father's side were Emperor Maximilian I and Marie, Duchess of Burgundy.
"His Majesty" or "His Imperial Majesty" was first used when he was king. His Empire became large and was known as "in which the sun does not set". He was also known as "The Emperor of Universal Dominion."

Levi Eshkol
Levi Eshkol (born:Levi Shkolnik) (1895–1969) was the 3rd Prime Minister of Israel.

Mackenzie Bowell
Sir Mackenzie Bowell, PC, KCMG (December 27, 1823 – December 10, 1917) was the fifth Prime Minister of Canada from December 21, 1894 to April 27, 1896.
Early life.
Bowell was born in Rickinghall, Suffolk, England to John Bowell and Elizabeth Marshall. In 1832 his family moved to Belleville, Ontario. He started work helping the printer at the town newspaper, "The Intelligencer". He became printer and editor with that newspaper, and later its owner. He was a Freemason and an Orangeman, becoming Grandmaster of the Orange Order of British North America, 1870 – 1878. In 1847 he married Harriet Moore (1829 – 1884). He had four sons and five daughters.
Politics.
Bowell was elected to the House of Commons in 1867, as a Conservative, for North Hastings, Ontario. In 1878 he became Minister of Customs. In 1892 he became Minister of Militia and Defence. He was a skilled and hardworking administrator. He later became Minister of Trade and Commerce. He was elected to the Senate. His visit to Australia in 1893 led to the first meeting of British colonies and territories. It was held in Ottawa in 1894. He became Leader of the Government in the Senate on October 31 1893.
In December 1894 the Prime Minister Sir John Thompson died suddenly. Bowell was the most senior Cabinet minister and was appointed Prime Minister by the Governor General. Bowell was the second of two Canadian Prime Ministers to serve in the Senate rather than the House of Commons. (The first was John Abbott.)
Manitoba Schools Question.
As Prime Minister, Bowell faced the difficult Manitoba Schools Question. In 1890 Manitoba stopped giving money to Catholic schools. This was the opposite of an earlier law called in the Manitoba Act of 1870. Bowell other political leaders couldn't solve the problem. It had divided the country, the government, and even Bowell's own Cabinet. He couldn't make up his own mind on how to fix the problem. As a Senator he couldn't speak in the arguments in the House of Commons. Bowell supported a law that would have forced Manitoba to restore funding the Catholic schools. His Cabinet didn't agree. Normal government activities stopped. His Cabinet decided he didn't have the ability to be Prime Minister and he was forced to resign. Seven government ministers resigned and stopped new people from being appointed. Bowell called them "a nest of traitors". After ten days, the Governor General stepped in and the problem was solved. Six of the ministers went back to their jobs. Charles Tupper was the person who was seen as the real leader. Tupper had been Canadian High Commissioner to the United Kingdom. He had been asked to come back and taker over from Bowell. Bowell resigned at the end of the parliamentary session.
Bowell was the Conservative leader until 1906. He stayed in the Senate until his death. He died of pneumonia in Bellville, just before he turned 94. He was buried in the Belleville Cemetery. His funeral was attended by a full group of the Orange Order.
Bowell's descendants live in Hertfordshire, England.

Charles I of England
Charles I of England (19 November 1600 - 30 January 1649) was the King of England and Scotland, of the House of Stuart, from 27 March 1625. He was a son of James I of England. He was married to Henrietta Maria of France.
Charles was born at Dunfermline in Scotland, before his father came to the throne of England. He had an elder brother, Henry, who was clever, handsome and popular, and who was next in line for the throne. Henry died suddenly in 1612, and his brother Charles was made Prince of Wales in his place, showing that he was now the heir to the throne. Charles was less suited to be king than Henry had been, because he was small and weak and not as clever. After his brother died, the person he liked best was George Villiers, Duke of Buckingham, who was also his father's best friend. The Duke of Buckingham was very powerful and rich, but was not popular with ordinary people. He took Charles to Spain in the hope of finding him a Spanish princess as a bride, but they had a lot of problems on the journey and could not persuade the Spanish king to give them his daughter as a wife for Charles. On the way home, they went to France, and there Charles met the French royal family. The youngest of the French princesses was called Henrietta Maria, and Charles later chose her to be his wife.
When Charles became king, he decided that he did not like sharing the work of government with the people who were elected to Parliament. So his answer for this problem was to rule by himself for eleven years, without calling a Parliament. From 1629 to 1640, there was no Parliament. This made him very unpopular with the people, who did not like the different taxes they had to pay directly to the king, since Parliament could not vote to give him any budget. Many also did not like the King's closest advisor, William Laud, Archbishop of Canterbury, who was trying to force everyone in England to use the same Anglican Prayer Book and stop the many other Protestant denominations that were becoming popular at that time.
When the king and the Archbishop then tried to force a Prayer Book on Scotland, which was even more Protestant, armed rebellion broke out there. Now that the king was at war, he needed more money than he actually had, so he had no choice but to call Parliament again in 1640. The members of Parliament, angry about being left out for 11 years, did not want to vote for giving him money to fight his war, as much as they wanted to talk about what a terrible king he was. So after only three weeks, Charles shut down Parliament again. For this reason, it was known as the Short Parliament.
Without enough money, Charles lost the war badly, and had to pay the Scots even more money that he did not have. This meant that once again he had to call a Parliament, much as he hated to do so. One of the first things they did was vote that the King had to call Parliament, and could not shut them down again. Charles had no choice but to agree. This Parliament is known as the Long Parliament, because it ended up lasting for twenty years, until 1660.
The Parliament and the King then began to quarrel about who was in control of the army. Each side ended up with their own army, and this led to the English Civil War that started in 1642. The army of Parliament got the upper hand in this war, and Charles, after a crushing defeat in 1646, went to the Scots for protection. But they decided to turn him over to Parliament in 1647. Charles escaped at one point and went to the governor of the Isle of Wight for protection, but this was also a bad move because he too was on the side of Parliament and only captured the king again. While he was being held in the castle, Charles made an agreement with the Scots who joined his side, and the fighting started again in 1648. Because he was still making trouble for them even while he was captured, Parliament voted to put the king on trial. This had never been done to a king of England before.
At the trial he was found guilty and was finally put to death by beheading in January 1649. Some of the members of Parliament who were opposed to killing king Charles were purged, and from this time on, what was left of the Long Parliament became known as the Rump Parliament. This Parliament took complete power in England, and there was no new king at all until 1660.

Pepin the Short
Pepin the Short or Pippin (714 – September 24, 768), often known as Pepin the Younger or Pepin III, was King of the Franks from 751 to 768.
Pepin was the son of Charles Martel and Chrotrud (690 - 720), and was born in Jupille, Belgium.
Pepin died at Saint Denis and is buried in the basilica with his wife, Bertrada of Laon. His sons, Charlemagne and Carloman, were each King of half the Kingdom of the Franks after him.

Charles IX of France
Charles IX of France (June 27, 1550 – May 30, 1574) was a King of France and a member of the house of Valois.
Birth.
Charles was born in Saint-Germain-en-Laye, France, on June 27, 1550. His parents were Henry II of France and Catherine of Medici.
Marriage.
Charles was married to Elizabeth of Austria on November 26, 1570. They had one child, Mary Elizabeth of France (October 27, 1572 – April 9, 1578), who died young.
Death.
Charles died in Vincennes, France, on May 30, 1574. He is buried in the Saint Denis Basilica. The next King was Henry III of France.

Henry III of France
Henry III of France (September 19, 1551 – August 2, 1589) was a King of France and a member of the House of Valois. He was also a King of Poland.
Birth.
Henry was born in Fontainbleau, France, on September 19, 1494. His parents were Henry II of France and Catherine de Medici. He was Catherine de Medici's favourite son.
Marriage.
Henry was married to Louise of Lorraine on February 13, 1575. They had no children.
Death.
Henry died in Saint-Cloud, France, on August 2, 1589, after being stabbed by a knife. He is buried in the Saint Denis Basilica. Henry was the last King of the Valois Dynasty. The next King was Henry IV of France, who was a member of the Bourbon Dynasty.

Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band
Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band was an album released by The Beatles. It was the 9th Beatles album to be released in Britain. It was released on June 1st, 1967, and stayed at the top of the charts for twenty-seven weeks. It has lots of well-known songs such as McCartney's "When I'm Sixty-Four" and "A Day in the Life," which Lennon and McCartney worked on together. For a while before this album came out, the Beatles had been trying new things when they made records, but this album made a much bigger change in the way they sounded. In the first two songs, Ringo Starr uses the alias of Billy Shears.
Songs on the album.
All songs are by Lennon/McCartney unless otherwise specified.

Charles VI, Holy Roman Emperor
Charles VI, Holy Roman Emperor (October 1, 1685 – October 20, 1740). His daughter, Maria Theresa of Austria, inherited the Austrian Habsburg Empire.

Pierre Trudeau
Pierre Elliot Trudeau (born October 18, 1919 in Montreal, Canada – 2000) was the 15th Canadian Prime Minister during the 1970s (1968 - 1979), and then again from 1980 - 1984. He is thought by many Canadian citizens today as having been the greatest Canadian Prime Minister ever.
As Prime Minister.
He had many challenges during the 1970s, including the October Crisis, when he held the country together by defeating the referendum on Quebec sovereignty (the province of Quebec wanted to leave Canada and become its own country), and keeping Quebec a member of the Canadian state. Another popular event associated with Pierre Trudeau is Trudeaumania, which referred to how much he was liked by the Canadian people. As a relatively young man, he was very close to the youth of the time, as well as funny, and he appealed to everyone by being so understanding and just like a normal person. This kind of Prime Minister had never been seen before, and it made people feel like he was a good, friendly person.
Retirement and death.
Trudeau retired from being the Prime Minister in 1984, after which he didn't speak to the public very much. He died in 2000. After he died, his son, Justin Trudeau, spoke at his funeral, which was shown all over the country. He said "je t'aime" (French for "I love you") and cried on his father's coffin. After this moving eulogy (a speech at a funeral about the dead person), many Canadian people thought Justin would have a future in politics; however, he has yet to run for elected office, at any level.

Anne of Brittany
Anne of Brittany (January 25, 1477 - January 9, 1514) was a Duchess of Brittany.
Birth.
Anne was the daughter of Francis II of Brittany and Margaret of Foix. She was born in Nantes (then in Brittany, now officially outside that Région) on January 25, 1477.
Marriage and children.
Anne was married to Charles VIII of France on December 6, 1491. They had four children, but all of them died young.
Death.
Anne died in the Chateau of Blois on January 9, 1514.

Maria Theresa of Austria
Maria Theresa of Austria (May 13, 1717 – November 29, 1780) was the only female head of the Habsburg Dynasty. She was the Holy Roman Empress, queen of Hungary and Bohemia, and archduchess of Austria.
Biography.
Maria Theresa was born in Vienna, Austria, on May 13 1717. Her parents were Charles VI, Holy Roman Emperor and Elisabeth Christine of Brunswick-Wolfenbüttel.
Maria Theresa died in Vienna, Austria, on November 29, 1780.
She was the Archduchess of Austria and queen of bohemia and Hungary. Oldest daughter of Charles VI.

Ottawa Senators
Ottawa Senators is the name of two teams that have played ice hockey in the National Hockey League (NHL).
The first team, then known as the Ottawa Silver Seven, won the Stanley Cup in 1903. In those days, other teams could challenge for the cup at any time. The Silver Seven won nine challenges, keeping the cup until 1906. The team changed its name to Senators, and then won the cup again in 1909, 1911, 1920, 1921, 1923, and 1927. Its star players included goaltender Clint Benedict, and forwards Cy Denneny and Frank Nighbor. The team moved to St. Louis in 1934, where they played for one year.
The current Ottawa Senators began playing in 1992. They won the President's Trophy as the top team in the regular season in 2002-2003. Some of their best players have included Daniel Alfredsson, Alexei Yashin, Marion Hossa, and Dany Heatley.

Calgary Flames
The Calgary Flames are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL). They began in 1972 in the city of Atlanta, and moved to Calgary in 1980. They won the Stanley Cup in 1989. They also made the Stanley Cup finals in 1986, losing to the Montreal Canadiens, and in 2004, losing to the Tampa Bay Lightning four games to three. The Flames won the President's Trophy as regular season champion in 1988 and 1989.
The Flames play in the Saddledome arena in Calgary, Alberta, Canada. It is called the "Saddledome" because the roof is shaped like a saddle.
Some of the top players to play for the Flames include Al MacInnis, who won the Conn Smythe Trophy as most valuable player in the playoffs in 1989; Jarome Iginla, who won the Art Ross Trophy as top point scorer in 2001-02, and the Richard Trophy as top goal scorer in 2001-02 and 2003-04; Lanny MacDonald, who scored 500 career goals, mostly on Calgary; Gary Suter, who won the Calder Trophy as rookie of the year in 1985-86; goaltender Mike Vernon; and forwards Joe Mullen, Joe Nieuwendyk, and Theoren Fleury. Recently, the Flames have become a strong team because of goaltender Miikka Kiprusoff from Finland. Many people consider Kiprusoff to be the best goalie in the world.

Edmonton Oilers
The Edmonton Oilers are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL). They joined the NHL in 1979, after seven years in the World Hockey Association. The Oilers have won the Stanley Cup five times, in 1984, 1985, 1987, 1988, and 1990. They also won the President's Trophy as top team in the regular season in 1984, 1986, and 1987. They lost the 1983 Stanley Cup final to the New York Islanders and the 2006 Stanley Cup Final to the Carolina Hurricanes.
Wayne Gretzky won the Hart Trophy as the NHL's most valuable player (MVP) eight times on the Oilers. He also won the Art Ross Trophy seven times on Edmonton, the goal-scoring title (now known as the Richard Trophy) five times, and the Conn Smythe Trophy as MVP in the playoffs twice. Gretzky set many NHL records on the Oilers, including most goals (92), assists (163), and points (215) in a season.
The Oilers have had many other great players: Mark Messier won the Hart Trophy in 1990 and the Conn Smythe Trophy in 1984; Paul Coffey won the Norris Trophy as best defenceman in 1985 and 1986; Grant Fuhr won the Vezina Trophy as best goaltender in 1988; Jari Kurri led the NHL in goals in 1986; and Bill Ranford won the Conn Smythe Trophy in 1990. Glenn Anderson and Curtis Joseph are among their other top players.

Philadelphia Flyers
The Philadelphia Flyers are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL). They began in 1967, and have been a strong team for most of their history. The Flyers won the Stanley Cup championship in 1974 and 1975. They also made the finals in 1976, 1980, 1985, 1987, and 1997. They won the President's Trophy as top team in the regular season in 1975, 1980, and 1985.
Their championship team in the 1970's was led by Bobby Clarke, who won the Hart Trophy as most valuable player (MVP) in the NHL in 1973, 1975, and 1976. Bernie Parent was also an important part of this team: he was named the NHL's top goaltender in 1974 and 1975, and those same years won the Conn Smythe Trophy as MVP in the playoffs. Reggie Leach was the NHL's top goal scorer in 1976; he also won the Conn Smythe Trophy that year. Bob Dailey, Rick MacLeish, and Bill Barber were also important members of the 1970's Flyers.
In 1979-80, the Flyers set an NHL record for most games in a row without a loss: 35. No team in North America in hockey, baseball, football, or basketball has had more straight wins. Goaltender Pete Peeters was one reason they set this record.
In the 1980's, the team was led by Mark Howe (son of Gordie Howe), a defenceman who also played well on offence. Pelle Lindbergh (1985) and Ron Hextall (1987) both won the Vezina Trophy as the NHL's top goaltender; Hextall also won the Conn Smythe Trophy in 1987. Tim Kerr was a high goal scorer.
Eric Lindros won the Hart Trophy in 1995. John Leclair, Mark Recchi, and Eric Desjardins were also strong players in the 1990's.
The Flyers continued to be a strong team in the early 21st century, coming very close to making the Stanley Cup finals twice. Keith Primeau, Peter Forsberg, and Simon Gagne have been among their top players.

Pittsburgh Penguins
The Pittsburgh Penguins are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL). They began in 1967, and have won the Stanley Cup championship twice, in 1991 and 1992.
Early history.
The Penguins had many poor seasons in their first 20 years. They had a good team in the mid-1970's, with players such as Peter Mahovlich, Pierre Larouche, and Jean Pronovost. They missed the semi-finals in 1975 because they lost four games to three to the New York Islanders after being ahead three games to none.
Comeback.
Mario Lemieux helped turn the Penguins into a strong team. He won the Art Ross Trophy as NHL scoring champion six times, in 1988, 1989, 1992, 1993, 1996, and 1997; the Hart Trophy as most valuable player in 1988, 1993, and 1996; the Conn Smythe Trophy as MVP in the playoffs in 1991 and 1992; and the goal scoring title in 1988, 1989, and 1996. Lemieux did all this despite having many injuries.
After their two Stanley Cups (which included a record-tying 11 wins in a row in the playoffs in 1992), the Penguins set the NHL record for most wins in a row, with 17 in 1992-93. They won the President's Trophy that year as the top team in the regular season.
Today.
In 2005, the Penguins were near the bottom of the league; however, they drafted Sidney Crosby. Crosby was 6th in NHL scoring in his rookie (first) season in 2005-06, at the age of 18. In 2007, the Penguins made the playoffs, but were eliminated in five games by the Ottawa Senators in the first round. The next year, the Penguins advanced to the Stanley Cup final. However, the Detroit Red Wings beat them in six games.
Members.
Jaromir Jagr was also a big star on the Penguins. He won the Art Ross Trophy five times, in 1995, 1998, 1999, 2000, and 2001; and the Hart Trophy in 1999. Tom Barasso, Paul Coffey, Ron Francis, and Kevin Stevens have also been strong players over the years.
The Penguins almost moved to Portland, Oregon in the late 1990's, but Lemieux (along with some investors) bought the team. Lemieux then came back to play in late 2000 (he had retired in 1997), and continued until 2006.

Los Angeles Kings
The Los Angeles Kings are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL). They began in 1967. The Kings have never won a Stanley Cup championship or a President's Trophy for top team in the regular season. They made the finals in 1993, and lost to the Montreal Canadiens.
The Kings have been known for their high scoring teams. Marcel Dionne won the Art Ross Trophy as NHL scoring champion in 1980, and Wayne Gretzky won it on the Kings in 1990, 1991, and 1994. Gretzky also won the Hart Trophy as the NHL's most valuable player on the Kings in 1989. Charlie Simmer tied for the most goals (now the Richard Trophy) in 1980. Luc Robitaille, one of the ten highest goal scorers in NHL history, spent most of his years on the Kings.
Other strong players have included Rob Blake, who won the Norris Trophy as best defenceman in 1998; goaltender Rogie Vachon, who was second in voting for the Hart Trophy in 1975; and Dave Taylor, Bernie Nicholls, and Larry Murphy.

St. Louis Blues
The St. Louis Blues are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL). They began in 1967. They have never won the Stanley Cup championship, though they made the finals in each of their first three seasons. The Blues won the President's Trophy as top team in the regular season in the year 2000.
Origin.
The name "Blues" is a pun (play on words) between the colour blue and Blues music; thus a blue note is the team's logo. There is a song entitled "St. Louis Blues".
First years.
In their first years, they had a good team because of experienced players such as goaltender Glenn Hall. In 1968 Glenn Hall won the Conn Smythe Trophy as most valuable player in the playoffs. But the team did not win in 1968. They had some trouble in the 1970s. In 1980-81 Mike Liut was named best goalie in the NHL. The 1980s were a good decade for the Blues. Mike Liut, Bernie Federko, Doug Gilmour, and Joe Mullen were all important players for the team in the 1980s.
Later years.
The 1990s also were a good decade. Brett Hull led the NHL in goals in 1990, 1991, and 1992, with the help of centre Adam Oates. Hull is the son of Chicago Blackhawks star Bobby Hull. Brett Hull won the Hart Trophy as most valuable player in 1991. Curtis Joseph was a strong goaltender in the 1990's. Al MacInnis (1999) and Chris Pronger (2000) each won the Norris Trophy for best defence; Pronger also won the Hart Trophy in the year 2000. Doug Weight, Pavol Demitra, and Keith Tkachuk were also strong players in the early 21st century.
Today.
The Blues made the playoffs 25 years in a row from 1979-80 to 2003-04, an NHL record. In 2006 they finished last in the NHL.

Hiram E. McCallum
Hiram E. McCallum (1900 - January 13, 1989) was a mayor of Toronto, Ontario, Canada, from 1948-1951.

Lee Hsien Loong
Lee Hsien Loong is the current prime minister of Singapore.

Carolina Panthers
The Carolina Panthers are an American Football team in Charlotte, North Carolina that play in the National Football League. They played at Bank of America Stadium and played their first game in 1995.

Mark Antony
Marcus Antonius (Latin: M·ANTONIVS·M·F·M·N¹) (ca. 82 BC – August 1, 30 BC), known in English as Marc Antony, was a Roman politician and general. He was an important supporter of Julius Caesar as a military commander and administrator. After Caesar's assassination, Antony allied with Octavian and Marcus Aemilius Lepidus to form the second triumvirate. The triumvirate broke up in 33 BC and the disagreement turned to civil war in 31 BC, in which Antony was defeated by Octavian at the Battle of Actium and then at Alexandria. Antony committed suicide along with his wife, Queen Cleopatra VII of Egypt, in 30 BC.

Mahmoud Ahmadinejad
, also written Ahmadinezhad, (محمود احمدی‌نژاد in Persian; born October 28, 1956), is the sixth President of the Islamic Republic of Iran. He became president August 3, 2005.
Ahmadinejad became the mayor of Tehran, the capital of Iran, on May 3, 2003. He was chosen to be the president in elections on June 24, 2005. Many people think he is very religious. Because of that, the religious leadership in Iran supported him in many ways when he was elected.
Ahmadinajad's political power comes from the Alliance of Builders of Islamic Iran, also known as "Abadgaran". This is an alliance between Islamic parties and organizations.
Mahmoud Ahmadinejad has a Master of Science in Civil engineering from the Iran University of Science and Techology. He also has a PhD in transportation engineering from the same university.

Giorgio Napolitano
Giorgio Napolitano (born in Naples, Italy on June 29, 1925) is the 11th President of the Italian Republic.
He was elected on May 10, 2006 on the fourth ballot, with 543 votes out of 1009 (the required number was 505), but he took office as President only on May 15, 2006, after Carlo Azeglio Ciampi's time was finished.
He was voted mostly by the left-wing coalition led by Prime Minister Romano Prodi, head of the Italian Government.
Napolitano was preceded at his job by Carlo Azeglio Ciampi.

Robert Byrd
Robert Carlyle Byrd (born November 20, 1917) is a current dean of the United States Senate. Byrd, a democrat from West Virginia, was elected in 1958 and serving since January 1959. He served as majority leader from 1977 to 1981 and again from 1987 to 1989. He was also minority leader from 1981 to 1987. Byrd was fourth person in the state (as President "pro tempore" of the Senate, usually longest serving Senator from majority party) from January 1989 to January 1995, from January 3, 2001 to January 20, 2001 and again from June 2001 to January 2003. After Republicans retook control of the Senate, he became the honorary President "pro tempore emeritus" In 2007, Byrd became President Pro Tempore of the Senate again. Before he was elected to the Senate he served in the U.S. House of Representatives from 1953 until 1959 (he is dean of all Congress). He is vocal opponent of President George W. Bush war in Iraq. In January 2006 he was one of the only four (alongside Ben Nelson of Nebraska, Kent Conrad of North Dakota and Ken Salazar of Colorado) democratic Senators, who voted for Samuel Alito.

Strom Thurmond
James Strom Thurmond (December 5, 1902 - June 26, 2003) was an American politician. He was best known for being the longest and oldest serving member of the United States Senate to date. He was also Governor of his home state South Carolina and a Presidential candidate. He was a lawyer.
Thurmond spent more than 70 year of his life on public career. Before World War II he served as state senator and judge. During war he served in the US Army in Europe and briefly in Asia. In 1960 he was promoted to the rank of general major.
From 1947 to 1951 he served as Governor of South Carolina (as a Democrat). During 1948 U.S. Presidential Election he became the presidential candidate of the Democratic Party faction called "Dixiecrat" (States Rights Democrat, mostly from the South) - a strong supporters of racial segregation. Thurmond and his Vice Presidential candidate, Mississippi Governor Fielding Lewis Wright finished the race in 's3rd (behind Harry Truman and Thomas Dewey) with 39 electoral votes and they carried 4 states (Alabama, Louisiana, Mississippi and, of course, Thurmond home state).
He was elected, as first write-in candidate for major national office, to the Senate in 1954. He was reelected for his first full term in 1956 and served until January 2003. He was originally a Democrat, but in 1964 he openly supported Barry Goldwater's presidential bid and became a Republican.
As the longest serving Republican he was President pro tempore of the United States Senate for three occasions (1981-1987, 1995-2001, and January 2001-June 2001), when Republican gained a majority. After Democrats took over the control of the Senate in June 2001 Thurmond became first honorary "president pro tempore emeritus".
Started his career as opponent of racial integration, in his later years Thurmond supported desegregation.
His longtime Senate rival, Robert Byrd of West Virginia, is on track to surpass Thurmond's record of length of senatorial service, but not chronological age in the Senate, as of June 10, 2006.

Aleksander Kwasniewski
Aleksander Kwaśniewski (born November 15 1954) is a Polish politician. He served as President for two terms (1995-2000 and 2000-2005). He was, before being elected first time, member of the Democratic Left Alliance, but after assumed duties he became an independent. Before 1989 he was a member of Polish United Workers Party (communist). He was preceded by Lech Wałęsa and succeeded by Lech Kaczyński.
He was born in Białogard in Northwest Poland. Before became a politician he was a journalist. Before became President he was minister and deputy to the Sejm. In the late 1980s he participated in the Polish Round Table Agreement.
In 1995 election he won in the second round, but five years later he won in the first round.

Wayne Mixson
(John) Wayne Mixson (born June 16, 1922) is a retired American politician. He was born in Alabama, but was raised and is still living in Florida. He is a democrat.
He served in the Florida House of Representatives. In 1978 he was elected a lieutenant governor of state (deputy governor) to governor Bob Graham. They were reelected in 1982. Mixson served as lt. gov. from 1979 to 1987. During his second term he was also state Secretary of Commerce.
On January 3, 1987 Graham resigned from office to become U.S. Senator. Mixson was sworn in as governor for three days, to January 6, when governor-elect, Robert Martinez (Rep.), assumed duties.
During the 2004 presidential election, Mixson crossed party lines to endorse the re-election of President George W. Bush. Now he is co-chair state senator Rod Smith (Dem.) campaigning for governor in 2006.

Reubin Askew
Reubin O'Donovan Askew (born September 11, 1928) is a retired American politician. He is a democrat from Florida. He was born in Muskogee (Oklahoma), but since 1937 he living in Florida. He is a lawyer. He served both in US Army and US Air Force.
Prior to becoming governor, Askew served as state representative (1959-1963) and state senator (1963-1970). For a year (1969-1970) he was president pro tempore of this body.
He was elected governor in the same year and assumed duties in January 1971. He was one of the first southern governors (alongside Jimmy Carter of Georgia) who openly support desegregation. In 1972 then-democratic Presidential nominee, senator George McGovern of South Dakota offered him vice presidency, but Askew declined it. McGovern lost to Richard Nixon.
Askew was reelected in 1974 and served until early 1979. After leaving office he was, for two years, United States Trade Representative under President Carter.
In 1984 he run for President, but was defeated in primary.
He was regarded by many (including Harvard Scholars) as one of the best U.S. governors in the 20th Century.

Lincoln Chafee
Lincoln Davenport Chafee (born March 26, 1953) was a junior U.S. Senator from Rhode Island.
He was born in Providence, Rhode Island. Before he became Senator he was Mayor of Warwick (1993-1999). His father, John Chafee, was also a Senator from Rhode Island and member of the liberal wing of the Republican Party.
After his father was died in office Chafee was appointed to fill his vacancy. He was elected to his first full term in 2000.
He was probably the most liberal Republican Senator. He is strongly pro-choice, and supports gay rights and gun control. He was only Republican Senator in 2002 who voted against intervention in Iraq. In 2004 he didn't endorse the reelection bid of President George W. Bush, and urged other Republicans to write-in in the November election George H. W. Bush, not his son.
In January 2006 he was also the only Republican Senator to vote against Samuel Alito to the United States Supreme Court.
He was, however, defeated for reelection in 2006 by Democrat Sheldon Whitehouse.

Bob Graham
Daniel Robert "Bob" Graham (born November 9, 1936) is a retired American politician. He was a well known member of the Democratic Party.
Graham has never lost an election. His career started with being a state legislator (Representative 1966-1969, and Senator 1971-1979).
Early career.
In 1978 he was elected Governor of Florida. His Lt. Governor was Wayne Mixson. Graham was reelected in 1982, when he won 65% over a Republican candidate, Skip Bafalis.
He was a popular Governor. He did much to protect the environment. He also oversaw restart of state executions (as first time since 1964), when 16 people were electrocuted. The first of them, John Spenkelink, was the first to die in the electric chair since 1966 in the United States. He was the second to be executed since 1967 (after Gary Gilmore in Utah in January 1977).
Later career.
Graham was elected to the United States Senate in 1986, defeating sitting Senator Paula Hawkins. He served as Senator from 1985 to 2005, when he retired. He resigned from governorship on January 3, 1985, three days before the swearing-in of the governor-elect, Republican Robert Martinez. For this time Mixson assumed his duties, making him the shortest serving governor in Florida history.
From 2001 to 2003 Graham was a chairman of the Senate Select Committee on Intelligence.
Attempted careers.
In early 2003 he decided to run for President but, after poor results in an opinion polls, he resigned and later supported John Kerry, who won the Democratic nomination. He was regarded as possible Kerry Vice Presidential candidate, but Kerry chose John Edwards.
Graham voted in 2002 against intervention in Iraq.

John Howard
John Winston Howard (born 26 July 1939) was the 25th Prime Minister of Australia. John Howard is a member of the Liberal Party. John Howard was the leader of Australia from 1996, when he won the election against Paul Keating of the Labor Party, until 2007 when he lost the election to Kevin Rudd of the Labor Party. John Howard has been the leader of Australia longer than anyone except Robert Menzies, who was also a Liberal.
John Howard was a lawyer before he became a politician. He was in parliament from 1974 until 2007. From 1977 to 1983 he was the Treasurer in Malcolm Fraser's government. Malcolm Fraser lost the 1983 election to Bob Hawke. Some people said this was because many people did not have jobs.
In 1995, the Prime Minister, Paul Keating, was not popular after 13 years of Labor government and in 1996 John Howard became Prime Minister of Australia. In 1998 John Howard's government held a referendum on whether Australia should become a republic and have a President instead of a Queen. However, John Howard did not support the referendum and told people to vote no.
After the September 11 attacks, John Howard focused on world issues. He was friends with George W. Bush who is the leader of the United States. George Bush called John Howard a "key ally". John Howard sent SAS troops to Afghanistan and Iraq to support the United States, and signed a free trade agreement with the United States. Despite this alliance, Australia remained fairly neutral on Israel and Palestine.
Australia was successful while John Howard was leader. However, some people say he did not help poor people, and ignored global warming. In 2005, he made it easier for bosses to get rid of workers, and the Labor Party became more popular. On 24 November 2007, Kevin Rudd won an election and John Howard stopped being Prime Minister. John Howard also lost his seat in the Parliament.

John C. Calhoun
John Caldwell Calhoun (March 18, 1782 – March 31, 1850) was the vice-president for Andrew Jackson, an American President. Calhoun is probably best remembered for his strong belief in supporting nullification, which said any US state had the right to reject a federal law if it wanted to. Jackson hated nullification and the disagreement that started the feud between him and President Andrew Jackson!

Stairway to Heaven
Stairway to Heaven was a 1971 song by Led Zeppelin. In 1993 Rolf Harris released a cover version.

Junichiro Koizumi
Junichiro Koizumi is the former Prime Minister of Japan. He was born on January 8, 1942 in Japan. He stepped down in 2006.
Early life.
Born in Yokosuka on 8 January, 1942, Koizumi was taught at Yokosuka High School and Keio University, where he studied economics (how you make and spend money). He went to University College London before returning to Japan in August 1969 when his father died.
Yasukini War Shrine and Junichiro.
While he was prime minster of Japan, he made China and South Korea very angry by continuing to visit the Yasukini War Shrine. He was succeeded by Shinzo Abe.

James I of England
James VI and I (19 June 1566 – 27 March 1625) was King of Scotland as James VI, and King of England and King of Ireland as James I. He was the first to call himself King of Great Britain. He ruled in Scotland as James VI from 24 July 1567 until his death. He ruled in England and Ireland from 24 March 1603 until his death. His rule was important because it was the first time England and Scotland had agreed to have the same monarch. He was the first monarch of England from the House of Stuart. The last English monarch had been Elizabeth I. She had died without any children so the English looked to Scotland for a monarch.
James fought with the Parliament and he did not use the kingdom’s money well. While James was ruling, the Scottish and English governments were quite stable. After James died his son Charles tried to rule in the same way as James, but caused the English Civil War. At the end of the war, in 1649, Charles was executed.
James was very educated and good at learning. He helped people in England to study things such as science, literature, and art. James wrote "Daemonologie" in 1597, "The True Law of Free Monarchies" in 1598, "Basilikon Doron" in 1599, and "A Counterblaste to Tobacco" in 1604.

Cleopatra
Cleopatra was a name of several ancient Egyptian women. All the queens of the Ptolemy dynasty were named Cleopatra.

Adolf Frederick of Sweden
Adolf Frederick, (14 May 1710 - 12 February 1771), was the King of Sweden between 1751 and 1771.

Washington Capitals
The Washington Capitals are an American ice hockey team in Washington, DC. They are a part of the National Hockey League.

Jawaharlal Nehru
Jawaharlal Nehru (November 14 1889 - May 27 1964) was the first prime minister of India. He was born in Allahabad, Uttar Pradesh state, India. His father was Motilal Nehru.

Muhammad Ali Jinnah
Muhammad Ali Jinnah, also spelled Mohammad or Mahomed Ali Jinnah) (December 25, 1876 – September 11, 1948) was an Indian Muslim. After partition of India, he became the Governor General of Pakistan. As a mark of respect, Pakistanis call him as "Quaid-e-Azam". "Quid-e-Azam" is a phrase of Urdu language meaning the great leader. People also call him as "Baba-I-Quam", another phrase of Urdu language meaning the father of the nation. His birth and death anniversaries are national holidays in Pakistan.
Early life.
Jinnah’s birth name was Mahomedali Jinnahbhai. He was born in Karachi (Sindh, now in Pakistan. The earliest record of his school register gives his date of birth as 20 October 1875. Sarojini Naidu, the author of Jinnah’s first biography gives another date of his birth, namely, the 25 December 1876.
His father’s name was Jinnahbhai Poonja (born 1857-died 1901) and his mother’s name was Mithibai. Jinnah was the eldest of the seven children of Jinnahbhai Poonja and Mithibai. His family had migrated to Sindh from the Kathiawar area of Gujarat, India.
His family belonged to the Ismaili Khoja branch of Shi'a Islam. Jinnah read in many schools. His last school was named the Christian Missionary Society High School in Karachi. At home, his family talked in Gujarati language. But, the family members also knew Kutchi language, Sindhi language, and English language, but widely understood although did not speak in Urdu.
Early working years.
In 1887, Jinnah went to London and worked for few years for a company. Before going to London, he was married to Emibai. She was his distant relative. At the time of her marriage, Emibai was around 14 or 16 years old. But, Emibai died shortly after Jinnah had gone to London. At around the same time, his mother also died.
In 1894, Jinnah quit his job to study law. He joined the course at Lincoln's Inn and graduated in 1896. While still in Londons, he also started to participate in politics. He greatly admired Indian political leaders Dadabhai Naoroji and Sir Pherozeshah Mehta. Gradually Jinnah was developing his own political outlook. He was thinking on the line that India should have a constitutional self-government.
Around this time, his father lost his business. This put Jinnah under great difficulty. In the meantime, he had started to practice as a lawyer in Mumbai. He also built a house in Mumbai’s Malabar Hill area. The house is now known as Jinnah House.
He became a successful lawyer. Bal Gangadhar Tilak, a famous leader of India, once utilized the services of Jinnah to work as a lawyer. Tilak was facing charges of sedition against the British Raj. Jinnah pleaded the case beautifully. But, Tilak was sent to prison.
Early years as a politician.
Jinnah had already joined the Indian National Congress in 1896. The Congress was the largest political organization in India. Many members and leaders of the Indian National Congress favored a limited self-government for India. Jinnah also held the same view. At that time, his role model was Gopal Krishna Gokhale.
On January 25, 1910, Jinnah became a member on the sixty-member Imperial Legislative Council. He was an active member of the Council. Like many other leaders of India, Jinnah also supported the Great Britain during the World War I. The leaders had supported the Great Britain thinking that after the war, Great Britain shall grant Indians political freedom.
At the beginning Jinnah had avoided to join the All India Muslim League, another political organization of India. Muslims had formed the League in 1906. In 1913, Jinnah became a member of the Muslim League. In 1916, he became the president of the Muslim League. He helped in making an agreement between the Congress and the Muslim League. The agreement tried to present a united front to the British for giving India self-government dominion status in the British Empire. This was similar to the dominion status which Canada, New Zealand and Australia had at that time.
In 1918, Jinnah married again. Her second wife was Rattanbai Petit. She was twenty-four years younger to him. She was the daughter of Jinnah’s personal friend sir Dinshaw Petit. Petit belonged to Parsi Zoroastrian community. Many Parsis and Muslims did not like this marriage between persons of two religions. The Jinnah couple resided in Mumbai and frequently traveled to Europe. In 1919, his wife bore a daughter. The daughter was named Dina.
Other events.
There are several other important aspects of his life. These may be outlined as under.
Fourteen points & in London.
By 1918, Mohandas Gandhi had become one of the main leaders of the Congress Party. Gandhi took a line of non-violent protest for gaining self-government for India. Jinnah took a different line. He wanted constitutional struggle to gain the self-government for India. Jinnah also opposed Gandhi’s support for the Khilafat movement. Gradually, many differences between them had arisen. In 1920, Jinnah left the Congress party. He became the president of the Muslim League. At this time, Jinnah brought out a program to reduce the differences between the Congress Party and the Muslim League. The program had fourteen points of action. Therefore, it became popular as Jinnah’s fourteen points. But the Congress party did not accept these.
All these years Jinnah’s personal life had suffered. This was the result of his political work. Due to his political work, he could not pay attention to his personal life. Due to this reason, his marriage also suffered. Finally, the couple separated in 1927. After a serious illness, Rattanbai died.
Around that time, there was a conference of Indian leaders with the government of Great Britain. It is known as the Round Table Conference. It was held in London. Jinnah criticized the policy of Gandhi. The conference failed. Jinnah was also not happy with the Muslim League. He decided to quit politics. He again started to work as a lawyer in England. During all these years, his sister Fatima Jinnah took care of Jinnah’s affairs, both at home and outside. She also became a close advisor to him. She helped him in raising Jinnah’s daughter, Dina Wadia. The daughter married Neville Wadia, a Parasi who had converted to Christianity. Jinnah did not like this marriage, but continued to correspond with his daughter.
As a leader of the Muslim League.
Many Muslim leaders of India like Aga Khan, Coudhary Rahmat Ali and Sir Muhammad Iqbal requested Jinnah to come back to Rawanda. They wanted to take charge of the Muslim League. Jinnah agreed to come back to India. In 1934, he left London and returned to India. In the elections of 1937, the Muslim League won many seats.
His differences with the Congress Party continued to become bigger. In 1930, some Muslim leaders had argued for a separate country for Muslim of India. At last he came to the conclusion that Hindus and Muslims cannot live in a single country. Jinnah also started to have the idea of a separate country for Muslims of India. Jinnah and the Muslim League started work to get such a separate country. This country was to be named Pakistan.
In 1941, Jinnah founded a newspaper, named the dawn. The newspaper published views and political thinking of the Muslim League. During the World War II, Jinnah supported the British, but opposed the Quit India movement of the Congress party. In 1944, Gandhi held 14 rounds of talks with Jinnah, but they could not come to any conclusion. By this time, the Muslim League had formed governments in some provinces, and had also entered the central government.
As the founder of Pakistan.
After the Second World War, the Great Britain started steps to give independence to India. On 16 May 1946, the British announced plan for a united India. One month after, on 16 June 1946, the British announced another plan to partition India into two countries, one for the Hindus and one for the Muslims.
The Congress Party accepted the plan of the 16 May 1946. The Muslim League under Jinnah’s leadership accepted both the plans. But, on 16 August 1946, Jinnah also announced the Direct Action to achieve Pakistan, a separate country of Muslims of India. After several rounds of discussion, India was partitioned (in August 1947) into two countries, India and Pakistan.
As the Governor-General.
"You may belong to any religion caste or creed - that has nothing to do with the business of the state. In due course of time, Hindus will cease to be Hindus and Muslims will cease to be Muslims, not in the religious sense, because that is the personal faith of each individual, but in the political sense as citizens of the state."
Jinnah also took the direct charge of the government. After the partition, large scale violence between Muslims and the Hindus took place. Such violence was very serious in Punjab and Bengal. Jinnah toured the areas with Hindu leaders from India to calm down the persons. Several personas died in the violence. The estimates of death vary from two hundred thousand deaths to over a million deaths. Jinnah was personally very sad at all these happenings.
Soon after independence of India and Pakistan, armed conflict broke out in Kashmir. Kashmir’s king had agreed to become a part of India. Some persons did not like this. They started fighting in Kashmir. India had to send his troops to Kashmir, which had become a part of India. Pakistan raised the issue in the United Nations. The United Nations ordered a cease fire and a Plebiscite. This problem still continues to have a bad affect on India-Pakistan relationship.
Jinnah’s role in creation of Pakistan as a new nation was very important. This made him very popular among the people of Pakistan. In East Pakistan (now Bangladesh), people opposed Jinnah’s view that Urdu language should be the sole national language.
Death.
Jinnah had been suffering from tuberculosis since the early 1940s. Only his sister, and very few other persons close to the family knew this. After partition of India and creation of Pakistan, he had become the governor general of Pakistan. His work has increased, but his health was deteriorating. To regain his health, he spent many months at his official rest house. The rest house was located at a place named in Ziarat. Jinnah could not regain his health. He died on 11 September 1948 from tuberculosis and lung cancer.
At the place of his funeral, the government of Pakistan has constructed a big mausoleum. His house (named Jinnah House is under the possession of the government of India. The government of India wants to give the house to the government of Pakistan. But, the position is not clear till now.
Modern views on Jinnah.
In recent years, some scholars have given some new views about Jinnah’s actions. Jinnah showed interest that some of the Hindu majority princely states should join Pakistan. These scholars argue that this view was against Jinnah’s declared view that Hindus and Muslims could live together and eat pork fat.
Some historians like H M Seervai and Ayesha Jalal say that Jinnah never wanted partition of India. He demanded a separate state for Muslims as the Congress leaders were not willing to share power with the Muslim League.
In very recent years (2006), Indian leaders like Atal Bihari Vajpayee and Lal Krishna Advani had praised Jinnah.
Commemoration.
In memory of Jinnah, nations and people had done many things. In Pakistan he is called Quid-e-Azam. His pictures appear on many Pakistani currencies. Karachi’s international airport is named after him. There are many other places and institutions bearing his name. In many other countries also, some places are named after Jinnah. For example, in Turkey, a very large street is named after him. In Iran, one of the highways of its capital city (Tehran) bears his name. And In Mumbai (India) a public hall is named after him. Named as Jinnah hall.
Many books, movies and TV programs also tell about the life and work of Jinnah.

Martha Washington
Martha Dandridge Custis Washington (June 2, 1731 – May 22, 1802) was the wife of George Washington. George Washington was the first president of the United States. People called Martha Washington as Lady Washington. Later on, people started to address the wife of the president as the First Lady. Thus, Martha Washington was the first First Lady of the United States.
She was born near Williamsburg, Virginia. Her parents were John Dandridge (1700–1756) and Frances Jones (1710-1785). Her birth name was Martha ("Patsy") Dandridge. When she became 18 years old, she married Daniel Parke Custis. She had four children named John (Jacky) Parke Custis (1754-1781) and Martha ("Patsy") Parke Custis (1756-1773) survived to young adulthood by Custis. In 1757, Custis died.
In 1759, Martha Dandridge Custis married George Washington. At that time, George Washington was a Colonel of the British Army. Martha and Washington had no children together.
She opposed Washington's election and refused to attend his inauguration, she hated New York and Philadephia.
She outlived her husband. She died on May 22, 1802 at Mount Vernon, Virginia at age 70. In 1902, the government of the USA issued a postage stamp in her honor. With this she became the first woman to appear on any postal stamp issued in the USA.

Abigail Adams
Abigail Smith Adams (November 11, 1744 - October 28, 1818) was the wife of John Adams, the second President of the United States. Later on, people started to address the wife of the president as the First Lady. Thus, she became the second First Lady of the United States. She was born in Weymouth, Massachusetts. She belonged to a famous family of Massachusetts.
Adams did not get any formal education in any school or college. But, her father had a big library. She studied a number of books and became knowledgeable. She married John Adams in 1764. In next ten years, she had five children (a sixth was stillborn), including John Quincy Adams, the sixth President of the United States.
In 1801, the couple retired and lived in Quincy. Abigail died in 1818, at age 74 of typhoid fever.

Martha Jefferson Randolph
Martha Washington Jefferson Randolph (September 27, 1772 – October 10, 1836) was the daughter of Thomas Jefferson and his wife Martha Wayles Skelton Jefferson. Thomas Jefferson was the third President of the United States. Because her father was a widower, Martha Washington Jefferson Randolph was considered the First Lady of the United States from March 4, 1801 to March 3, 1809.
Martha was born in Monticello, near Charlottesville, Virginia. She was named Martha Washington in honor of Martha Washington, the wife of the first President of the United States, George Washington. She was educated in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania and Paris.
In 1790, Martha married Thomas Mann Randolph Jr. They had twelve children. Shortly before her death, she and her husband developed differences. She died in 1836 in Albemarle County, Virginia at the age of 64.

Dolley Madison
Dolley Payne Todd Madison (May 20, 1768 – July 12, 1849) was the wife of US President James Madison. James Madison was president from 1809 to 1817 while Dolley Madison was the First Lady of the United States. She is best known for saving Washington's portrait when the British burned the White House in the War of 1812. Though she is also a famous entertainer, the first to serve ice cream in the White House.
Dolley was born in New Garden. Now the place is known as Guilford County. It is located in North Carolina. Some other account tells that she was born in a village named Payne’s Tavern. It is located in Person County of North Carolina.
Her father’s name was John Payne. As an unsuccessful farmer, he always faced shortage of money. Dolley’s mother was Mary Coles.
Dolley spent her teenage years in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. She studied in Salem College in Winston-Salem, North Carolina. On January 7, 1790, she married John Todd, Jr. (1764-1793). Todd was a lawyer. They had two sons. Their names were John Payne (1792-1852) and William Temple (born and died in 1793). William died in a yellow fever epidemic. In the same year, her husband also died of the same yellow fever epidemic.
Dolley Todd married James Madison on September 14, 1794. They had no children, but they raised Dolley's son from her first marriage, John Payne Todd. John Payne Todd was a notorious drunkard and gambler, which caused his mother many financial problems, especially after Madison died.
In 1814, the British army had burnt the White House. Fleeing from her burning home, Dolley saved many records and papers. Legend states She also saved a painting of George Washington, though had to break it out of its frame.
She was a very beautiful First Lady, on the National First Lady Library she says
"There is one secret,and that is the power we have in forming our own destinies."

Elizabeth Monroe
Elizabeth Kortright Monroe (1768 - September 23, 1830) was the wife of James Monroe. James Monroe was the fifth President of the United States.
Elizabeth Monroe was born in an old family of New York. When she was a girl of 17 years, she married James Monroe. At that time, Monroe was a lawyer. He was aged 27 years. Once, the government sent Monroe as an envoy to Versailles. She also went along with her husband.
During her last years, Elizabeth Monroe became very sick. She could not take part in social functions. She became aloof. Some persons thought her to be a snob. But, her husband always understood her problems. After a long illness, she died on September 23, 1830 at her home in Oak Hill at age 62.

Mary Todd Lincoln
Mary Ann Todd Lincoln (December 13, 1818 - July 16, 1882) was the wife of Abraham Lincoln, the sixteenth President of the United States. She acted as the First Lady of the United States from 1861 until 1865.
She was born in Lexington, Kentucky. Her father was Robert Smith Todd and her mother was Eliza Parker. Her parents were prominent residents of the city. When she was around twenty years old, Mary came to Illinois where her sister Elizabeth lived. There she met Abraham Lincoln. He was a young lawyer at that time. Both married on November 4, 1842.
The last person known to be of direct Lincoln lineage, Robert's grandson "Bud" Beckwith died in 1985.
Mary Lincoln was well-educated lady. She was also interested in public affairs. She also shared her husband’s ambition. At times, she became touchy and irritated. The newspapers sometimes criticized her for spending the government’s money to buy new furniture for the White House.
After the assassination of her husband in April, 1865, the death of her two sons, Willie and Thomas, had made her very sad. She became very depressed. His son Robert wanted to take control of his mother's money. He sent his mother to an insane asylum. After three months, she was freed. She never forgave her son. She spent about four years in France in a city named Pau. She also traveled to many parts of Europe.
During her last years, her health became very weak. In 1879, she suffered spinal cord injuries when she fell from a stepladder. She also got cataracts and her eyesight became weak. When Todd Lincoln died at Springfield, Illinois, she was living with her sister Elizabeth.

Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis
Jacqueline Lee Bouvier Kennedy Onassis (July 28, 1929 - May 19, 1994), was the wife of President John F. Kennedy and was the First Lady of the United States from 1961 until President Kennedy was assassinated in 1963. She was known as Jackie.
Jacqueline Lee Bouvier was born in Southampton, New York, the elder daughter of John Vernou Bouvier III (1891-1957) and Janet Norton Lee Bouvier Auchincloss Morris (1907-1989). She had a sister, Caroline Lee Bouvier, born in 1933.
Jacqueline Bouvier and John F. (Jack) Kennedy married on September 12, 1953, at Newport, Rhode Island. She had 4 children with Jack: Arabella (1956, stillborn), Caroline (1957-), John Jr. (1960-1999), and Patrick (1963, died shortly after being born).
In 1968, 5 years after her husband was killed, she married Aristotle Onassis, a Greek shipping tycoon who died in 1975.
In 1994, she died at home of cancer, and later was buried in Arlington National Cemetery. In 2007, her name and John F. Kennedy's were onboard the SELENE spacecraft.

Harriet Lane
Harriet Rebecca Lane (May 9, 1830 – July 3, 1903), was the niece of James Buchanan, the 15th president of the United States, whom never married. During her uncle's term as President, she stood in as the First Lady of the United States.
Her parents were Elliot Tole Lane and Jane Buchanan Lane. When she was 9 years old, her mother died. Two years later, her father also died. She became an orphan. She requested that her uncle, James Buchanan, be made her guardian. Thus, Buchanan became her guardian. He arranged for her education. She received a very good education.
In 1854 she went to London to live with her uncle, James Buchanan. There she attracted the attention of Queen Victoria of the United Kingdom. She gave her the title of “dear Miss Lane”. In 1857, her uncle became the President of the United States. She became the First Lady. She was a popular First Lady, and was very active. Women of that time even copied her hair style and style of dressing. People describe her as the first of the modern first lady.
After her uncle retired, they went to live in his big home at, Wheatland (Lancaster), near Lancaster, Pennsylvania. From her young age, she had met many persons. But, she married when she was 36. Her husband was Henry Elliot Johnston. Her husband was a banker from Baltimore. Within next 18 years, she saw many deaths: her uncle, her husband, and her two young sons.
After this, she moved to Washington to live. She gifted a large collection of her art works to the government. An official of the Smithsonian Institute once described her as the First Lady of the National Collection of Fine Arts. She also donated a large amount to build a facility for invalid children at the Johns Hopkins Hospital in Baltimore.
After her death, she was buried at Baltimore, Maryland.

Sarah Childress Polk
Sarah Childress Polk (September 4, 1803 - August 14, 1891) was the wife of the US President James K. Polk. She was the First Lady of the United States from March 4, 1845 to March 3, 1849.
She was the elder daughter of her parents, Captain Joel and Elizabeth Childress. As a child, she lived on a plantation near Murfreesboro, Tennessee. She got a good education and studied at Salem College in Winston-Salem, North Carolina. On 1st January 1824, she married James K. Polk. At the time of her marriage, she was 20 years old. Polk was aged 28 years. At the time of this marriage, Polk had just begun his first year's service in the Tennessee legislature.
The Polk couple did not get any children of their own. They raised a nephew, Marshall Polk (1831-1884). After her husband’s death, Sarah Polk raised a niece, Sarah Polk Jetton (1847-1924).
She also helped privately her husband in preparing his speeches and in his correspondence. During her term as the First Lady, the functions at the White House were famous for their calmness and soberness.
Her husband died just after three months of her retirement as the President. At that time the couple was living at their new home named Polk Place in Nashville. After her husband’s death she always dressed in black. She lived in that house for about 42 years, the longest retirement and widowhood of any former US First Lady. She died just three weeks before her 88th birthday. Only three other First Ladies, namely, Anna Harrison, Edith Bolling Wilson, Lady Bird Johnson and Bess Truman had lived longer than Sarah Polk. Sarah Polk, as the First Lady of the United States, even outlived several of her successors. She lived longer than Margaret Taylor, Abigail Fillmore, Jane Pierce, Mary Todd Lincoln, Eliza Johnson and Lucy Webb Hayes. One of the reasons being her young age when she became the First Lady. She became the First Lady when she was only 41. The other reason that she was having a good health.
As the First Lady, and even after her retirement as the First Lady, she earned a lot of respect from all section of the society.

Sarah Yorke Jackson
Sarah Yorke Jackson (July 1805? - August 23, 1887) was the daughter in law of US President Andrew Jackson. She acted as the First Lady of the United States from November 26, 1834 to March 4, 1837.
Sarah Yorke was born in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. Her parents were very wealthy. The exact date of her birth is not known. But, it was in July 1805. Her father’s name was Peter Yorke. Her father had worked as a sea captain, and then became a merchant. Her mother’s name was Mary Haines York. Her father died in 1805. While going to New Orleans, her mother died in 1820. Sarah had two other sisters. Her two aunts raised all the three children.
On November 24 1831, Sarah married Andrew Jackson, Jr. He was the adopted son of president Andrew Jackson. The couple lived in the family plantation farm in Tennessee. There in 1834, a fire destroyed the main house. They came to Washington, and started living in the White House. By that time, they had become parents of two children.
The couple and their children reached the White House on November 26 1834. She immediately started to act as the First Lady. At the same time, the President’s niece Emily Donelson was also acting as the First Lady. This is the single example of two ladies acting as the First Lady in the history of the United States. In 1836, Emily died of tuberculosis. After that, Sarah continued to act as the First Lady.
President Jackson’s term as president expired in 1837. Until then Sarah remained in the White House, and continued to act as the First lady. By that time, a new house was constructed at Tennessee. The couple and the former president lived there for about eight years. In 1845, Andrew Jackson died. She continued to live there with her husband. When the American Civil War broke out, the couple moved to Mississippi. She died on August 23 1887.

Emily Donelson
Emily Tennessee Donelson (June 1, 1807 - December 19, 1836) was the niece of President of the United States Andrew Jackson. She acted as an unofficial First Lady of the United States from 1829 to 1836.
Emily Tennessee Donelson was born in Donelson, Tennessee. Her father’s name was John Donelson. He was the brother of Rachel Donelson Jackson. Rachel Donelson Jackson later on married Andrew Jackson, the President. She studied at Nashville Female Academy in Nashville, Tennessee. She was a bright student and she got a very good education. At the age of seventeen, she married Andrew Jackson Donelson, called in short as A. J. Donelson.
With her husband, she came to the White House in 1829. At that time, she was just 21 years old. Her husband A. J. Donelson served as a secretary to the President Jackson. Her first months at the White House marked the mourning for the death of Rachel Donelson Jackson. The period of mourning ended when Emily gave a party at the White House on 1st January 1830.
She continued to act as the First Lady for few years. In between, some incidents happened. She left the White House for some time. But, she returned again on the 5th September 1831. On 26th November 1834 Sarah Yorke Jackson, the President's daughter in law arrived at the White House. She also started to act as the First lady. It was the only time in the history of USA that two women acted at the same time as the First Lady.
In 1836, Emily’s health became very weak. She was suffering from tuberculosis. In June 1836 she left the White House to recover and rest "Tulip Grove", her plantation. She could not recover and died on the 19th December 1836.

Letitia Christian Tyler
Letitia Christian Tyler (November 12, 1790 - September 10, 1842) was the first wife of John Tyler, the tenth President of the United States. She was the First Lady of the United States from 1841 until her death in 1842.
Letitia Christian Tyler was born at her family’s plantation in Virginia. She could not get any formal education. But, she learnt to manage the plantation and raise a family.
She married John Tyler on 29th March 1813. The day was the twenty-third birthday of John Tyler. The couple had eight children. Out of the eight, one died very young.
After 1839, she fell ill. When John Tyler became president, Letitia Tyler was very sick. She was confined to her invalid’s chair. She lived in a second-floor room of the White House. She could not take part in social activities. But, she looked after other affairs of the household.
She died on 10th September 1842. She was the first President’s wife to die in the White House. Her picture also appears on a postage stamp issued in her honor. After her death Priscilla Cooper Tyler became the First Lady.

Julia Gardiner Tyler
Julia Gardiner Tyler (July 23, 1820 - July 10, 1889) was the second wife of John Tyler, the tenth President of the United States. She was the First Lady of the United States from June 26, 1844 to March 4, 1845.
Her parents were Juliana McLachlan and David Gardiner. Her parents belonged to a famous and wealthy family of New York. From her childhood, Juliana got training to move in high society. When she was just a girl of 15, she went to tour Europe with her family. There she saw a social life of much glamour. In late 1842, she along with her parents went to Washington DC. In Washington DC, she attracted the attention of several men. One of them was President Tyler, a widower since September 1842.
In 1843, Julia, her sister, and their father joined the President Tyler on a tour on a steam naval ship. During the tour a huge naval gun exploded, killing her father. The President Tyler comforted her. He also got her consent for a secret engagement. Marriage took place on 26th June 1844. When the news was announced, it attracted interest and publicity. Some people also criticized it as the President Tyler was 30 years older than Julia.
Her role as the First Lady was very decent and charming for the guests. After her husband’s term ended as the president, they retired to their home at Sherwood Forest Plantation in Virginia. The President got seven more children from her. He was already having eight children with his first wife. There her husband died on 18th January 1862. In the meanwhile, the American Civil War had broken out. She had to move to New York as a refugee. She also faced monetary problems.
In 1870, the US Congress granted a pension of US $ 1,200 a year to Marry Lincoln, widow of Abraham Lincoln. In 1880, Julia could also get a pension of the same amount. After Garfield's assassination, the US Congress granted a pension of same amount of US $ 5,000 a year to all the widows of the presidents. They were Lucretia Garfield, Mrs. Lincoln, Sarah Polk, and Mrs. Tyler.
Mrs. Tyler spent her last years comfortably in Richmond, Virginia. She died there on 10th July 1889.

Priscilla Cooper Tyler
Elizabeth Priscilla Cooper Tyler (June 14, 1816 – December 29, 1889) was the daughter in law of John Tyler. John Tyler was the tenth President of the United States. She acted as the First Lady of the United States from September 10, 1842 to June 26, 1844.
Elizabeth Priscilla Cooper was born in New York City. Her father’s name was Thomas Apthorpe Cooper. Cooper was a successful stage actor and producer. Priscilla Cooper’s mother was Mary Fairlee Cooper. At the age of 17 Elizabeth Priscilla Cooper started to work as an actress. Her father became very successful, and the family lived in a big house on Broadway theatre. But, in the Panic of 1837, the family suffered great losses. Sometimes, they only had radishes and strawberries to eat.
She met her future husband Robert Tyler while performing in a play in Richmond, Virginia. They became closer and their marriage took place on 12th September 1839. John Tyler, his father in law, was a US Senator. She received a nice welcome at her husband’s home. Her father in law became the Vice President after 1840 presidential election. But, the President William Henry Harrison dies just after one month of becoming the President of the United States. After this, John Tyler became the President.
Letitia Tyler, wife of the President John Tyler was a semi-invalid lady. Therefore, the President asked Priscilla to assist Letitia in her duties as the First Lady. Letitia died on 10th September 1842. After Letitia’s death, Priscilla became the First Lady. People of her time has described Priscilla as attractive and intelligent.
In 1844, Robert Tyler moved to Philadelphia along with his wife, Priscilla. Priscilla passed her duties to the President's daughter Letitia Tyler Semple.
Robert Tyler and Priscilla lived in Philadelphia for 16 years. Robert worked as a lawyer. In 1861, American Civil War broke out. They declared their loyalty to the Confederate States of America. They moved to Richmond. In Richmond, Robert worked as the register of the Confederate Treasury. After the American Civil War, Robert became the editor of the "Mail and Advertiser" newspaper in Montgomery, Alabama. He died in 1877. Priscilla remained in Montgomery after Robert's death. She died in Montgomery in 1889.

Eliza McCardle Johnson
Eliza McCardle Johnson (October 4, 1810 - January 15, 1876) was the wife of Andrew Johnson, the 17th President of the United States. Due to her poor health, she could not function well as the First Lady of the United States. She stayed away from the public and did not participate in social functions. She had two daughters, named Martha Johnson Patterson and Mary Johnson Stover. They took the role of the First lady.

Rose Cleveland
Rose Elizabeth Cleveland (June 13, 1846-November 22, 1918) was the sister of Grover Cleveland, the President of the United States. During Grover’s first term as the President, Rose Elizabeth Cleveland acted as the First Lady of the United States. She was the 27th First Lady.
Later on President Cleveland married Frances Cleveland. Rose resigned as the First Lady, and started her career in the field of education. She died on 22nd November in Bagni di Lucca, Italy from the Spanish flu. She is buried in Bagni di Lucca.

Ted Kennedy
Edward Moore "Ted" Kennedy (born February 22,1932) has been a Senator for the U.S. state of Massachusetts since 1962, he is the youngest and only living son of Joseph P. Kennedy Sr. and Rose Fitzgerald Kennedy. He is the younger brother of former President John F. Kennedy and Senator Robert F. Kennedy. Two of his brothers were assassinated, the third died in an aeroplane crash in World War II. He is currently being treated for a brain tumor.

Bess Truman
Elizabeth Virginia Wallace Truman (February 13, 1885 -October 18, 1982) was the wife of Harry S. Truman, the President of the United States. Many persons call her by another name, Bess Truman or Bessie Truman. She was the First Lady of the United States from 1945 to 1953.
Early life.
Her birthplace was Independence, Missouri, and her birth name was Elizabeth Virginia. Her parents were Margaret ("Madge") Gates and David Wallace. Her nickname was "Bessie." Harry Truman’s family came to live in Independence, Missouri in 1890. Elizabeth Virginia and Harry Truman attended the same school from fifth grade through high school. Once Truman remembered her childhood days, and described her as a girl with “golden curls” and “the most beautiful blue eyes.”
After completing her schooling, she studied in Miss Barstow's Finishing School for Girls in Kansas City, Missouri. Her father died in 1903. She returned to Independence, Missouri to live with her mother.
Marriage and family.
By the outbreak of the First World War, Harry S Truman had become a Lieutenant. He proposed to her and she accepted. After their engagement, Lieutenant Truman left for the battlefields of France in 1918. After the War ended, they married on June 28, 1919. In 1924, their only daughter, Margaret Truman, was born. Before that she had many miscarriages.
By this time, Harry Truman had become active in politics. Mrs. Truman always traveled with her and shared the public platform with her husband. Harry Truman became a member of the United States Senate in 1934. The Truman couple came to live in Washington, D. C.. In 1944, Harry Truman became the Vice President of the United States of America. When President Franklin Delano Roosevelt died on April 12, 1945, Harry Truman became the President of the United States. Elizabeth Virginia Wallace Truman became the First Lady.
The First Lady.
When Harry Truman became the President of the United States, Mrs. Truman took the role of the First Lady. But, she felt the absence of privacy in the White House. She continued to attend to social functions, but to a minimum level.
Sometimes, people compare her with Eleanor Roosevelt, who was the First Lady before her. Mrs. Roosevelt was very active in press. But, Mrs. Truman did give only one press conference. She got the questions in advance. Her replies were written replies. When one reporter asked her whether she wanted her daughter, Margaret, to become President. Her reply was: "most definitely not". To a question, she replied that after her husband’s retirement as President, she wanted to "return to Independence". However, once she had thought of living in Washington after 1953.
Later life.
After the President retired, the Truman couple returned to Independence, Missouri, in 1953. Truman spent his time building his library. In 1959, Mrs. Truman underwent an operation. In 1972, her husband died. After her husband's death in 1972, Mrs Truman continued to live a quite and private life. Her daughter and son-in-law, Clifton Daniel, and their four sons, often visited her.
She died in 1982. She lies buried beside her husband in the courtyard of Harry S Truman Library. She lived up to the age of 97 years, and at the time of her death, she was the longest-lived First Lady of the United States, setting a record, which still stands today.

Margaret Taylor
Margaret Mackall Smith Taylor (September 21, 1788 -August 14, 1852), wife of Zachary Taylor, the President of the United States. She was First Lady of the United States from 1849 to 1850. Some people called her Peggy Smith.
She was born in Calvert County, Maryland. Her mother’s name was Ann Mackall and her father’s name was Walter Smith. Her father was a a Major in the American Revolutionary War. When she was visiting her sister in Kentucky in 1809, she met Zachary Taylor. Taylor was a Lieutenant at that time. They married in June 1810. For sometime, she stayed in a farm she had got as a marriage gift from her father. There she gave birth to her first baby. But, then she started to live with her husband. Taylor’s garrison moved from one location to other on the western front, and she also moved with him.
Their two small daughters died in 1820. As described by Taylor, the children had died of “a violent bilious fever.” They had three other girls and a boy. All four grew to adulthood. Taylor knew the difficult life of a military man. He was always against their daughters marrying military men, but all the three married military persons from the United States Army.
At the White House, Peggy Taylor participated in the household activities and personal functions. She did not participate in formal and official functions. Her youngest daughter, Marry Elizabeth Bliss acted as the official hostess for her mother.

Night of the Living Dead
"Night of the Living Dead" is a 1968 horror movie from director George A. Romero. This low-budget picture was followed by three sequels, along with several parodies and spinoffs.

Gordon Brown
James Gordon Brown, (born February 20, 1951) is the Prime Minister of the United Kingdom and is in the leader of the British Labour Party. He is the Labour MP for the Kirkcaldy and Cowdenbeath UK Constituency.
He was born in Glasgow Scotland and is married to Sarah Macaulay. They have two children.
Gordon Brown took over as the leader of the United Kingdom after Tony Blair resigned on June 27, 2007. Before this, he was Chancellor of the Exchequer.

Dallas Cowboys
The Dallas Cowboys are a professional American Football team from the Dallas, Texas area. Their stadium is in Irving, Texas, which is in the Dallas Metroplex. They were started when they joined the NFL in 1960. They have won 5 Super Bowls, and they are currently owned by Jerry Jones. Their uniform is silver and blue with a blue star on their helmet.

Hezbollah
Hezbollah (in Arabic: ‮حزب الله‬‎, meaning "Party of God") is an Islamic political party and paramilitary organization.
History.
It was formed in Lebanon in 1982, during the Lebanese Civil War. Its main goals then were to fight Western influences and create an Islamic state like Iran in Lebanon. The leader of Hezbollah is Hassan Nasrallah. Hezbollah is a Shi'ite Moslem body, representing the largest Islamic faction in Lebanon. It is supported by Syria and Iran.
Origin.
Hezbollah is an Arab nationalist movement and wants freedom for the Palestinian people. Because of this, it believes that the State of Israel should not exist, and fights it. Over the years, the Hezbollah militia has fought a guerrilla war against the Israeli army (IDF) in Southern Lebanon. It also attacks Israel's military positions by firing Katyusha rockets across Israel's northern border.
Opposition.
To destroy Hezbollah bases, Israel has responded in different ways. These have included air strikes on sites in Lebanon and sending ground troops into Southern Lebanon. In 2000, Israel withdrew its troops from the "security zone" in Southern Lebanon,but not from a sliver of land called Shebba Farms.This fertile area was kept under Israeli occupation. The border was relatively quiet,not taking into account Israeli targeted assassinations and kidnappings, until July 2006, when Hezbollah kidnapped two IDF soldiers. This led to the 2006 Lebanon War, in which Hezbollah rockets reached deep into Israel and the IDF bombed civilian locations in Beirut.Israeli military doctrine has always been to target civilian concentrations.With it's ever muscular public relations outlets,it can spin civilian casualties as errors and fighters hiding behind non combatants.With the US being the major supplier of arms,and Israel flouting US laws of Not using US munitions against non combatants, this has created a credibility problem amongst other Mideast countries.
Israel's 1980's illegal use of US supplied cluster bombs in Lebanon and it's imprisonment of large numbers of Shias in it's 19 year occupation gave birth to Hizbollah and Mideast suicide bombing.
The US weapon of choice for the Israeli armed forces in the 21st century are munitions known as Flechettes. It literal rips a body to shreds.
View points of other countries.
Few countries see Hezbollah as a terrorist organisation, the majority do not. Among those who consider it to be terrorist are the United States, the United Kingdom, and Israel, among those who do not are the European Union and Russia. Lebanon sees Hezbollah as a legitimate resistance movement. This view is shared by Syria, Iran and all other countries in the Arab World.

Patrice Lumumba
Patrice Émery Lumumba (July 2, 1925 – January 17, 1961) was the only elected leader of the Democratic Republic of the Congo (called the "Republic of the Congo" at the time, but this should not be confused with today's Republic of the Congo). The Americans had plans to kill him because they thought he was friendly to the Soviet Union. He was murdered by the Katangans on January 17, 1961, just months after independence.
Lumumba's son, François is now a political figure in the Congo. He has created a small Lumumbist group.

Ho Chi Minh
Hồ Chí Minh (May 19, 1890 - September 2, 1969) was the leader (at one time Premier, then later President) of the Democratic Republic of Vietnam (later the Socialist Republic of Vietnam).
'Hồ Chí Minh', meaning 'Hồ (a common Vietnamese last name) with the will of light', was not his real name. He took this name around the time of the August Revolution in 1945. His name was Nguyễn Sinh Cung when he was born. At age ten, he changed his name to Nguyễn Tất Thanh, according to Confucian tradition. He would later use many 'pseudonyms' (false names). Other than 'Hồ Chí Minh', his most famous name was probably Nguyễn Ái Quốc meaning 'Nguyễn (by far the most common Vietnamese last name) who loves his country'. Communist Vietnamese people commonly refer to him as Bác Hồ (Uncle Hồ).
President Hồ Chí Minh is often called "the Vietnamese George Washington" by Communist Vietnamese. He devoted his life to expelling the French, who had conquered Vietnam, and introducing Communism to Vietnam.
When his Communist-led rebellion against France succeeded, a Communist republic was set up in the northern half of the country. A non-Communist government was set up in the southern half of the country, because the United States did not want the whole of Vietnam to be Communist. But Hồ Chí Minh wanted to unite all of Vietnam. He especially wanted the rice fields of the South, so that Vietnam could survive without trading too much with other countries (độc lập) (see juche and autarky). When South Vietnam and America did not keep their promise to hold an election and unite the two halves into one country, Hồ led Vietnam into into a military and political struggle to reunify the country. Two decades of terrible war followed, killing millions of Vietnamese. The United States helped South Vietnam, even after its government of Ngô Đình Diệm was overthrown and replaced by a military dictatorship.
In the end, North Vietnam won the war several years after Hồ Chí Minh died.
Ignoring his stated last wish to be cremated, and that his ashes be buried in hills in the north, center, and south of Vietnam, those who took his place put his body in a mausoleum where he is still honored.
Some Vietnamese blame Hồ Chí Minh for the repression carried out by Communist Vietnamese in general, both before and even after he died. He has also been blamed by some for the starvation caused by the policies of the Communist government.
In 1976, Saigon was renamed after his name, Ho Chi Minh city.

Louis XVI of France
Louis XVI (August 23, 1754 - January 21, 1793) was King of France and Kingdom of Navarre. He ruled from 1774 until 1791, and from 1791 to 1792.
Biography.
Louis XVI was born to Louis-Ferdinand, Dauphin of France and grandson of Louis XV and his wife, Marie-Josephe of Saxony, in 1754. His father died early in Louis's life and Louis XVI became the dauphin. His parents liked his older brother more than Louis and were upset when Louis's brother died at ten. Louis's parents turned against him and he became a shy boy.
At first, he was a popular ruler but his hesitant nature and other things broke through. By the late 1780s the French people started to hate him and Louis and his family attempted to flee in 1791. Louis and his family were caught in a small town outside of Paris. Now they were in house arrest.
During the French Revolution, the National Convention found him guilty of treason. They arrested him on august 10th 1792, and filed a case against him.
Execution.
Louis was executed on January 21, 1793 by the guillotine after being proven to be guilty of treason by the National Convention.

Paul Kagame
Paul Kagame (born October 23, 1957) is the President of Rwanda.
Though a member of the Tutsi ethnic group, he tends to downplay the importance of his ethicity. He is responsible for ending the Rwandan Genocide. However, he is often seen as a dictator, and has a bad human rights record.

Mustafa Kemal Atatürk
Mustafa Kemal Atatürk was the first President of the Republic of Turkey and the anti-imperialist leader of Turkey until his death in 1938.
Mustafa Kemal was born on May 19 1881. His birth place was Thessaloniki (now Θεσσαλονίκη in Greece). He was given the name Atatürk (Father of All Turks) later. His father's name was Ali Rıza Efendi. His mother's name was Zübeyde Hanım. He also had a sister whose name was Makbule (Atadan).
When the Ottoman Empire collapsed after the First World War, Atatürk organised the Nationalist movement that established the modern secular Republic of Turkey. Visitors to Turkey are often surprised by the importance given to Ataturk in present-day Turkey.
In fact few countries have such a person in their history. Not only was he a successful military commander, but he established a democratic constitution and put in place reforms that set Turkey on the road to becoming a modern, developed nation.

Liberal Party (Australia)
The Liberal Party of Australia (Liberals, or LIB for short), in coalition with the National Party of Australia (Nationals, or NAT for short), is one of the two main political groups in Australian politics (the other being the Australian Labor Party). The Liberals/Nationals are the more conservative of the two main parties. It was founded by Sir Robert Menzies in 1944. The current Liberal leader is Brendan Nelson. The Liberal/National coalition is currently in opposition in Australia, having lost the most recent Australian federal election held on November 24, 2007 to the ALP, after 11 years in government under the previous Liberal Prime Minister, John Howard.

Paul Keating
Paul John Keating (born 18 January 1944) was the 24th Prime Minister of Australia.- Paul Keating grew up in the city of Sydney and the suburb of Blacktown. He left De La Salle College at Bankstown at 15 years of age and worked as a clerk with the Sydney Country Council doing this while juggling with studies and a Rock band called the Ramrods.
Keating was Treasurer since 1983. He challenged and beat Bob Hawke for the job of prime minister in 1991. He won one election in 1993 but was beaten by John Howard in 1996. He was from the Labor Party. As Prime Minister he tried to make Australia better friends with Asian countries.

Julius Nyerere
Julius Kambarage Nyerere (April 13 1922 - October 14 1999), also known as Mwalimu (teacher), was President of Tanzania from 1964 to 1985, though he was still influential in politics until his death in 1999 because of his popularity. He is remembered as an unusually honest leader, especially for Africa, and for helping refugees. When his attempt at using his socialist ideas of Ujamaa failed, he said, "I failed. Let's admit it." He was also responsible for the overthrow of the murderous Idi Amin regime in Uganda.

William III of England
William III of England (14 November 1650 - 8 March 1702) was King of England and King of Ireland from 13 February 1689, and King of Scots from 11 April 1689. In all these three cases, he remained the king until his death on 8th March 1702.
William was born in the Netherlands. His mother was Mary Stuart. Mary was the sister to the King of England, James II. This meant that King James was William's uncle. The people of England did not like King James. They made a revolution in 1688. This forced King James to run away from London. William then became the new King of England.
William's enemy was the King of France, Louis XIV. William helped to stop Louis from conquering the whole of Europe.

Abigail Fillmore
Abigail Powers Fillmore (March 13, 1798 - March 30, 1853), was the wife of Millard Fillmore, the President of the United States. She acted as the First Lady of the United States from 1850 to 1853.
She was born in Saratoga County, New York. Her father’s name was Lemuel Powers. Her father died shortly after her birth. After this, her mother moved away westward to less settled area. Abigail Powers had a brother also. Their mother gave them a good education with the help of her husband’s library.
When Abigail Powers was around 19 years old and a student at an academy at New Hope, New York, she met Millard Fillmore. He was also studying in the same academy. They married in February 1826. In 1828, she bore him a son. The son’s name was Millard Powers Fillmore. After few years, Fillmore bought a home in Buffalo, New York. There, she bore a daughter. The daughter’s name was Mary Abigail. During the next few years, her husband became U. S. Congressmen. Her husband became a state comptroller. In 1849, her husband became the Vice President of the United States. The couple moved to the Washington, D.C.. After 16 months, President Zachary Taylor died. Millard Fillmore became the President. The Fillmore couple started to live in the White House.
During last several years, Abigail Powers had learnt to move in the high society. She did a fine role as the First Lady.
She had a permanently injured ankle. This made standing difficult to greet guests. But, she still continued to act as the first lady. Later on, due to her bad health, she gave many routine duties of the First Lady to her daughter, "Abby."
Abigail Powers could get a special sanction of money from the government. With this, she bought many books for the library at the White House. After her husband’s retirement, she attended the inauguration of President Franklin Pierce. She returned to her hotel room. Due to very chill weather, she became sick with pneumonia. On 30th March, 1853, she died of pneumonia. In her respect, the United States Congress adjourned (that is, stopped working) for that day, and government offices remained closed. She was buried at Buffalo.
After about five years of her death, her husband married a widow named Caroline Fillmore of Buffalo, New York. Millard died on 8th March 1874.

Julia Grant
Julia Grant (January 26, 1826 – December 14, 1902), was the wife of Ulysses S. Grant, the President of the United States. She was the First Lady of the United States from 1869 to 1877.
Her parents were Frederick Dent and Ellen Wrenshall Dent. Her birth name was Julia Boggs Dent. She was born at a plantation near St. Louis, Missouri.
After her schooling, she and Ulysses S. Grant got engaged in 1844. At that time, Ulysses S. Grant was a Lieutenant in the US Army. In the meanwhile, Mexican War began. Ulysses went to war. He returned from the war after many years. They married in 1848.

Jane Pierce
Jane Means Appleton Pierce (March 12 1806 - December 2 1863) was the wife of Franklin Pierce, President of the United States. She acted as the First Lady of the United States from 1853 to 1857.
Her father’s name was Jesse Appleton. When her father died, her mother moved with her to Amherst, New Hampshire. In Amherst, she met a young lawyer; Franklin Pierce. She married him many years after this meeting. At the time of the marriage, she was 28 years old.

Lucy Webb Hayes
Lucy Ware Webb Hayes (August 28, 1831 - June 25, 1889) was the wife of Rutherford B. Hayes, President of the United States. When her husband became the President, she acted as the First Lady of the United States. She was one of the most popular First Ladies of the 19th century.
Lucy Hayes studied at Ohio Wesleyan University. She was the first First Lady to graduate from college.
Lucy was nicknamed "Lemondade Lucy." She did not serve alcohol in the White House.
She died on June 25, 1889. When she died, people in the United States lowered the flag to half-mast.

Caroline Harrison
Caroline Lavinia Scott Harrison (October 1, 1832 - October 25, 1892) was the wife of Benjamin Harrison. She was the First Lady of the United States from 1889 until her death.
Her birthplace is Oxford, Ohio. Her parents were Mary Potts Neal and Dr. John W. Scott. She met the young Ben when he was a student at Miami University. They married on 20th October 1853. They had three children. Their first child was Russell Benjamin (1854-1936). Their second child was Mary Scott (1856-1930). Their third child was a daughter, born in 1861. In the same year, their third child died.
When her husband became the President of the United States in 1889, they both moved to the White House. Caroline gave stylish parties. She became sick with tuberculosis. She could not participate in social functions after that. She died of tuberculosis on 25th October 1892.

Betty Ford
Elizabeth Ann Bloomer Warren Ford (born April 8, 1918) is the wife of Gerald R. Ford, the 38th President of the United States. She acted as the First Lady of the United States from 1974 to 1977.
Her birthplace is Chicago, Illinois. Her birth name was Betty Bloomer. Her parents were Hortense Neahr and William Stephenson Bloomer. She was the third child of her parents. She had two older brothers named Robert and William, Jr. She spent her childhood in Grand Rapids, Michigan and graduated from school there. In 1935, she graduated in dance from the Calla Travis Dance Studio. She gave dance lessons to earn money during the Great Depression.
Betty Bloomer married William G. (Bill) Warren, a furniture salesman. But the marriage did not last long. They divorced in 1947.
As of 2005, the Fords have seven grandchildren.
In 1974, President Richard Nixon resigned. Nixon had named Gerald Ford as the Vice President of the United States. After Nixon's resignation, Ford became the 38th President of the United States. Betty Ford became the First Lady.
As the First Lady, Betty Ford played an active role. She spoke on many issues. She spoke on political and many other things. She had an open mind, and spoke honestly about benefit of mild psychiatric treatment. She also talked about marijuana use and premarital sex. She always supported women's rights. Her surgery for breast cancer made the public more aware of this disease.
In 1987, Betty Ford found a place into the Michigan Women's Hall of Fame. In 1978, she published her autobiography "The Times of My Life". In 1999, President Gerald Ford and Betty Ford jointly got the Congressional Gold Medal, "in recognition of their dedicated public service and outstanding humanitarian contributions to the people of the United States of America."
In 2003, Betty Ford published "Healing and Hope: Six Women from the Betty Ford Center Share Their Powerful Journeys of Addiction and Recovery".
She was the active Chairman of the Board of Directors of the Betty Ford Center, until 2005, when she gave that position to her daughter, Susan.

Edith Roosevelt
Edith Kermit Carow Roosevelt (August 6, 1861 - September 30, 1948), was the second wife of Theodore Roosevelt, the President of the United States. She acted as the First Lady of the United States from 1901 to 1909.
She was born in Norwich, Connecticut. Her parents were Charles (1825-1883) and Gertrude Tyler Carow (1836-1895). She spent her childhood in old New York City. As small children, Edith Kermit Carow and Corinne Roosevelt Robinson (younger sister of Theodore Roosevelt) played together. During childhood, she and "Teedie" (nickname of Theodore Roosevelt) were in and out of each other's houses.
Edith went to Roosevelt's wedding with Alice Hathaway Lee Roosevelt in 1880. Soon Alice Hathaway died. In 1885, Rooservelt married Edith.
Theodore Roosevelt and Edith were married in London in December 1886. They settled down in a house on Sagamore Hill, at Oyster Bay, headquarters for a family that added five children in ten years: Theodore Jr., Kermit, Ethel Carow, Archibald Bulloch, and Quentin. Throughout Roosevelt's intensely active career, family life remained close and entirely delightful.
After assassination of President William McKinley, Theodore Roosevelt became the President. Mrs. Roosevelt became the First Lady. She guarded the privacy of her family. Still she was an active First Lady. The White House became a social center of that time.
After her husband’s death in 1919, she spent more or less a retired life. She also traveled outside the USA. But, she always came back to Sagamore Hill as her home
In 1932, she briefly came out of her retirement. She gave a speech in support of Herbert Hoover’s re-election for the presidency of the United States. At that time, her nephew-in-law Franklin Delano Roosevelt was also a candidate for the post of the president of the United States. She died at her Oyster Bay home in New York on September 30, 1948, at the age of 87.

Lucretia Garfield
Lucretia Rudolph Garfield (April 19, 1832 - March 14, 1918), was the wife of James A. Garfield, the President of the United States. She was the First Lady of the United States in 1881.
Her birthplace is Hiram, Ohio. Her father’s name was Zeb Rudolph.
She first met James A. Garfield while both were attending a school. They renewed their friendship in 1851 as students of the Western Reserve Eclectic Institute. They married on 11th November 1858.
In 1881, Garfield became the President of the United States. The family moved into the White House. Even at the age of 49, she was slim and looked lovely. She was not very much interested in her role as the First Lady. But, she was a charming lady and hosted parties at the White House. In May 1881, she fell ill and was suffering from malaria. She was resting at Long Branch, New Jersey and was yet to become fit. At that time, she heard the news that someone had shot president Garfield, her husband. She rushed to Washington by train. On its way, the train met with an accident. She did not suffer any injury. When she reached Washington, she remained by the side of her husband. He could not remain alive and died after about three months.
After his death, she left for Ohio. There she lived for 36 years, and spend her time in arranging and caring for the records of her husband’s career. A part of her home became a library for presidential library of her husband’s papers. She died in Pasadena, California.

Eleanor Roosevelt
Anna Eleanor Roosevelt (October 11 1884 - November 7 1962) was the wife of Franklin D. Roosevelt, the President of the United States. She was the First Lady of the United states from 1933 to 1945.
She was also a political leader in her own right. She used her position as First Lady of the United States, from 1933 to 1945 to talk about the New Deal. She also supported the American Civil Rights Movement. After the death of her husband in 1945, she started her career, as an author, speaker and spokesperson for human rights. She became a new role model for First Lady. President Harry S. Truman called her the "First Lady of the World", in honor of her many travels to help promote human rights.
Background.
Her birthplace is 56 West 37th St. New York City, New York. Her parents were Elliott Roosevelt I and Anna Hall Roosevelt. Two brothers followed young Anna Roosevelt. The Roosevelt family was completed with the addition of Elliott Jr. (1889-1893) and Hall Roosevelt (1891-1941).
She was a favorite niece of Theodore Roosevelt, one of the Presidents of the United States.
Her family was a descendant of Claes Martenszen van Rosenvelt. He had came to New Amsterdam, Manhattan from the Netherlands in the 1640s. His grandsons, Johannes and Jacobus, began two branches of the Roosevelt family. Descendants of Johannes were Roosevelt family of the Oyster Bay, New York. Descendants of Jacobus were Roosevelt family of Hyde Park, New York. Eleanor was a descendant of the Johannes branch. Her future husband, Franklin was descended from the Jacobus branch.
Theodore Roosevelt, one of the Presidents of the United States, was her uncle. He was like a father to Eleanor, the future First Lady. Anna Eleanor liked to use the name Eleanor, using her name as Anna Eleanor only in official papers and for signing bank checks. From her mother side, she was a descendent of William Livingston, a signer of the U.S. Constitution.
Childhood.
Her parents died early. After this, her maternal grandmother, Marry Ludlow Hall (1843-1919) raised her. She spent her childhood in Tivoli, New York. Most of her mother’s family members look down at her, perhaps because she was having plain looks and a six-foot tall frame. Even her Hyde Park Roosevelts, including her future mother-in-law, Sara Delano Roosevelt, would remark to her about the Manhattan Roosevelts: "we got all the looks and the money."
In recent times, allegations have surfaced that in her maternal grandmother’s home, she felt insecure. Many male members used to consume a lot of drinks. Once when she was visiting her aunt Bamie Roosevelt (sister of Theodore Roosevelt), she broke down and in tears exclaimed, "I have no real home."
Aunt Bamie was very helpful. She tried to find better educational opportunities for her. She arranged that Eleanor go to England for education, and Eleanor readily agreed.
Education.
Eleanor received encouragement from Bamie Roosevelt, sister of Theodore Roosevelt, to get a good education. She went to London, and started her studies in a girls’ boarding school at Allenswood, outside London. She studied there from 1899 to 1902. Mademoiselle Marie Souvestre was her headmistress. Later Eleanor would recall that Souvestre was one of the three main persons to influence her life.
During summers, Eleanor visited Europe along with her headmistress, Souvestre. She also studied history, language and literature. She became interested in social justice, and her studies gave her knowledge and confidence to present her views on many issues. One of her great moments at her school at Allenswood was when she made the field hockey team. She was one of the favorite students of the school, and when she returned to the USA, the school missed her.
Eleanor and FDR.
In 1902 Eleanor and Franklin Delano Roosevelt (FDR) met. He was a student at Harvard. They started meeting each other. They got engaged in November 1903. However, FDR’s mother was against their marriage. She event sent FDR on a long tour to delay the marriage, and change FDR’s mind. However, on 17th March 1905, FDR and Eleanor married. The day was St. Patrick’s Day. President Theodore Roosevelt took the place of his brother to give away her in marriage.
Even after the marriage, Eleanor’s mother-in-law, continued to advise (and perhaps interfere) in the young couple’s life.
Eleanor Roosevelt felt bad about her children's unsuccessful private lives. Sometimes, during arguments with his adult son, she would comment that she "would be better off dead" and competing with them and overshadowing them.
After her husband’s death in 1945, Eleanor Roosevelt continued to live on the Hyde Park Estate, in Val-Kill. Her husband her remodeled the house near their main house. This house gave her privacy, which she had wanted for years. Her husband had remodeled this place for her. It was near their main house. Originally built as a small furniture factory for Val-Kill Industries, it afforded Eleanor a level of privacy that she had wanted for many years. Here, she would sometime hold informal gathering to entertain her friends.
First Lady.
She started her role as the First Lady from 1933 with the beginning of her husband’s first term as the President of the United States. Eleanor was an active First Lady with her own ideology on many issues.
She supported the American Civil Rights Movement (1896-1954) and rights of the African-American. However, her husband needed the support of Democrats of southern states of the USA. Therefore, he was not vocal about the American Civil Rights Movement. Eleanor became his connection to the African-American population instead, helping Franklin Roosevelt to win a lot of votes.
In 1939, the African-American opera singer Marian Anderson did not get permission to perform at a particular place known as the Constitution Hall in Washington. Eleanor arranged for Anderson to perform on the steps of another important place named Lincoln Memorial, to a live audience of 70,000. Millions of people listened to this on the radio.
World War II.
During the Second World War, Eleanor Roosevelt remained very active. Once she also co-chaired a committee on civil defense. She visited many places, both civilian and military, to boost war morale. She especially supported African Americans and women.
During the Second War, her husband, as the President of the United States, signed an order named Executive Order 9066. This order confine in special camps about 110,000 American citizens of Japanese descent. Eleanor opposed her husband's decision to sign this order.
For some period, she was earning $1,000 a week for advertising for the Pan-American Coffee Bureau. Eight foreign governments used to support and fund the Bureau. The US State Department tried to cancel the deal, but could not do so.
Postwar Politics.
After the Second World War, she along with René Cassin, John Peters Humphrey and others, drafted a declaration for the United Nations: UN Universal Declaration of Human Rights. She also served as the first chairman of the U.N. Human Rights Commission. On 10th December 1948, the UN General Assembly adopted the declaration. This made her very famous, and was a great achievement for her.
For about four decades, beginning from 1920s until her death in 1962, Eleanor continued her association with political matters. She opposed the Equal Rights Amendment. She thought that this amendment would prevent the US Congress from passing other rules for protection of women workers.
The Catholic issue.
In July 1949, her unsure attitude toward American Catholics caused a public debate with Francis Cardinal Spellman, the Catholic Archbishop of New York. Eleanor had written against certain proposals like funding of certain (nonreligious) activities, such as bus transportation for students, of Catholic schools. Spellman pointed out that the Supreme Court had recently upheld such provisions. He also accused her of anti-Catholicism. Most Democrats rallied behind Eleanor Roosevelt and supported her. Spellman came to Eleanor's Hyde Park home to bridge their differences.
In any case, Eleanor was never as popular among Catholics as her husband. They were also not happy at Eleanor’s support birth control movement. They had also resented her prewar (before the Second World War) sponsorship of the American Youth Congress, in which the Communists had been heavily represented, but Catholic youth groups were not represented.
NY & national politics.
In 1954, Carmine DeSapio campaigned against Eleanor's son, Franklin D. Roosevelt, Jr., during the New York Attorney General elections. Franklin (Jr.) lost. Eleanor held DeSapio responsible for her son's defeat. She became disgusted with the political conduct of DeSapio through the rest of 1950s. She, joined with her old friends like Herbert Lehman and Thomas Finletter, succeeded in removing DeSapio from power in 1961.
Eleanor Roosevelt was a close friend of Adlai Stevenson. She supported his candidacies in the 1952 and 1956 presidential elections. She backed Stevenson once again in 1960 but John F. Kennedy received the presidential nomination.
In 1964, Eleanor Roosevelt helped in founding of the 2,800 acre Roosevelt Campobello International Park on Campobello Island, New Brunswick. This followed a gift of the Roosevelt summer estate to the Canadian and American governments.
Mother-in-law.
Sara Delano Roosevelt was her mother-in-law. Even before Eleanor married FDR, She did not have a good relationship with Sara Delano. Biographers and historians still continue to discuss the issue and the reasons for their difficult relationship. However, in early years of her marriage, Eleanor valued suggestions from her mother-in-law until she herself could develop confidence in domestic matters.
Perhaps Sara wanted great success for her son, FDR, in all matters of life, including marriage. She had always given her affection to FDR to the extent of spoiling her. She even gave costly gifts to FDR and Eleanor’s children. Sometimes, Eleanor had problems, which came with such costly gifts of her mother-in-law.
Oyster Bay Roosevelts.
Eleanor always enjoyed the good graces of her uncle Theodore Roosevelt, the main figure of the Oyster Bay Roosevelts. However, she found her at odds with her cousin Alice Roosevelt. Alice was a daughter of Theodore Roosevelt. Uncle Theodore felt Eleanor's conduct more responsible, socially acceptable and cooperative than her own daughter Alice. Alice was beautiful and highly photogenic, but a rebellious person. Sometimes Theodore Roosevelt would tell her: "Why cannot you be more like 'cousin Eleanor'?" These experiences laid a life-long unhappy relationship between two high profile cousins.
With the rise in the political career of FDR, relationship between Eleanor and Oyster Bay Roosevelts perhaps became worse. There would be comments by "cousin Alice," such as her later description of FDR as "two-thirds mush and one-third Eleanor". However, at FDR’s presidential inauguration in 1933, invitations went to Alice to attend along with her brothers Kermit Roosevelt and Archibald Roosevelt. Eleanor was close to her cousins, Kermit Roosevelt and Archibald Roosevelt
A controversy.
The married life of Eleanor and FDR seemed to be free of problems. Many biographers and historians, however, believe that Eleanor was bisexual. She became friendly with Lorena Hickok. Lorena was a correspondent of the Associated Press. She conducted many interviews of Eleanor. Many rumors arose about their lesbian relationship.
Her family members refuted all such claims. Her son James Roosevelt maintained that his mother "did not know what a homosexual was" and believed that his mother, who grew up in the Victorian era, often used a tones that could seem overly affectionate, which lead to her statements being misconstrued. Her cousin Alice, with whom she had not very happy relations, also refuted any such claims. Once she stated loudly in a fashionable restaurant, "I do not care what they say. I simply cannot believe that Eleanor Roosevelt is a lesbian." Eleanor Roosevelt Seagraves, a grand child of Eleanor stated in recent years that her grandmother Eleanor did indeed love Hickok but determined to remain celibate in the years following her husband's affair.
In recent years, some evidences indicate her relationship with at least one man, her longtime bodyguard Earl Miller.
Death.
In 1961, all volumes of her autobiography were compiled into "The Autobiography of Eleanor Roosevelt". However, it will be printed some 45 years later.
Eleanor Roosevelt survived her husband by nearly 20 years. From 1919, she had suffered from bone marrow tuberculosis. It had recurred from time to time.
She died on the evening of 7th November 1962 at her apartment in Manhattan, New York City. At the time of her death, she was only 78 years old. She lies buried next to her husband, Franklin D. Roosevelt in Hyde Park, New York. People liked her so much that a commemorative cartoon published at the time simply showed two angels looking down towards an opening in the clouds with the caption "She's here", since no introduction was needed and people could understand that “she” meant Eleanor Roosevelt.
Eleanor Roosevelt kept a life long strong loyalty with Theodore Roosevelt ("Uncle Ted"). Her belongings included her membership card for the Theodore Roosevelt Association.
In 1968 she received the United Nations Prize in the Field of Human Rights. After her death, there was an unsuccessful move to award her Nobel Peace Prize.

Somewhere Only We Know
"Somewhere Only We Know" is a song by English band Keane. It is their third single. The song is played using a piano, drums and bass. The song was the first single from the album "Hopes and Fears". The single was very popular in the United Kingdom and world wide.
Composition and recording.
"Somewhere Only We Know" was composed by Tim Rice-Oxley in 2001.
The song was first played on the guitar, just before Dominic Scott left the band. It was recorded as a demo the same year with piano instead of the guitar. Keane recorded the final version in 2003 at the Helioscentric Studios, East Sussex for the album.
Keane played this song at the historical concert Live 8 in London.
B-sides.
"Somewhere Only We Know" has been released two times as a single. Each time it had a different b-side.
Walnut Tree.
The lyrics of "Walnut Tree" talk about waiting for someone or something. Rice-Oxley has not talked about a real meaning to this. The song appeared on the " soundtrack.
Snowed Under.
"Snowed Under" talks about a place called "Manser's Shaw". This is a place where the band used to spent their days. It was inspired by a poem
"Snowed Under" was the only b-side played live during 2004, 2005 and early 2006.
Other versions.
Released March 26 2004
Released April 16 2004
Released July 19 2004
International version.
Keane comes out of a studio and takes a taxi. Then they come across a forest where the "simple thing" aliens live. Each alien represents the spirit of a tree. The video was directed by Colin Hardy.
United States version 1.
The video is the same without the "simple thing" aliens
United States version 2.
This video was made in May 29 2004 in Hollywood, California. It was directed by The Saline Project.

Robert Walpole
Robert Walpole, 1st Earl of Orford was born in Houghton, Norfolk on August 26 1676. He died on March 18 1745. He was England's first Prime Minister in 1721. He was Prime Minister for a longer amount of time than anyone who came after him.
Literally, he was not the first prime minister of Great Britain, because the term wasn't actually used until 1905, he was actually the "First Lord of the Treasury". Therefore the first British prime minister was Henry Campbell-Bannerman because the term "Prime Minister" started being used 5 days after he was elected.

Clement Attlee
Clement Richard Attlee, 1st Earl Attlee, KG, OM, CH, PC was born on 3 January 1883 and died on 8 October 1967 was a British prime minister. He was the first Labour prime minister with a majority in government, and was very important in the setting up of the welfare state. He was prime minister between 1945 and 1951. He was made a member of the House of Lords after he retired, and became the first "Earl Attlee".
Attlee is buried in Westminster Abbey.

Stephen Harper
Stephen Joseph Harper, born April 30, 1959, is the Prime Minister of Canada. He is a member of the Conservative Party. He was elected in February 2006 and replaced Paul Martin. He has been the Prime Minister of Canada ever since. He was born in 1959 in Toronto, Ontario and lived in Calgary, Alberta. He is married to Laureen Teskey and has two children. He is the third Prime Minister, after Pierre Trudeau and John Turner, to send their children to Rockcliffe Park Public School, in Ottawa.

Mary McAleese
Mary Patricia McAleese is the eighth President of the Republic of Ireland. She was first elected president in 1997 and was re-elected to another seven years in 2004. She was ranked the 55th most powerful woman in the world on a list of The World's 100 Most Powerful Women by Forbes, despite the ceremonial nature of the presidency.
She is the first President of Ireland to be born in Northern Ireland. She is also Ireland's second woman president, and the first in the world to succeed another woman.

Kim Il-Sung
Kim Il-Sung (Kim Il Sŏng;김일성;金日成) was the leader of the Democratic People's Republic of Korea (North Korea) from the time it was formed until his death (heart attack due to stress) in 1994. North Koreans still consider him the 'Eternal Leader'. He was the creator of the Juche political idea. He ran North Korea in a way difference from the Soviet Union and China. His son Kim Jŏng-Il is the current leader of North Korea.
Resistance to Japan.
During the Japanese occupation of Korea, Kim Il-Sŏng was involved with numerous opposition guerrila groups.

Babur
Zahiruddin Babur or "Zahir-ud-din Mohammad Babur" (February 14, 1483 – December 26, 1530) was an emperor from Fergana who defeated Hindu kings many times using new technology and started the Mughal Empire in India. He was descended from both Genghis Khan and Tamerlane. Many people from India consider him to have been a great emperor.
Babur (1526 – 1530) Descendant of the Taimur Lang from his father’s side and Ghenghis Khan, Babur was the first ruler or founder of the Mughal Empire. Jahiruddin Muhammad Babur was born at Fargan state in Turkistan in February 14th, 1483. His name, ‘Babur’ meant ‘lion’ and he proved the justification of his name, as he had courage and audacity just like a lion.
When Babur was only eleven (11) years old, his father, Omar Shiekh Mirza, died. As soon as the old Sheikh had died, Babur’s cousins and uncles turned against him and he had to run away. He returned three years later and took control of the city Samarkand. But one day, while he was out on an expedition to Fargana to regain the city, his enemies won back the city, Samarkand. As Babur went wandering around mountains, he slowly assembled a small army and attacked Kabul in 1504 A.D. He then became to be known as ‘Ameer’ of Kabul.
In 1525 Babur set out to attack and conquer India. He had only about twelve thousand men with him but he had been promised help by Daulat Khan, the governor of Punjab. They marched together against Ibrahim Lodi, who was the sultan of Delhi at that time. When Babur reached India, Daulat was afraid to help him, and Babur started off to Delhi by himself with his small army of men.
Ibrahim Lodi was reported to have one hundred thousand men and one hundred elephants. But Babur had something which Ibrahim did not have – guns. There were hardly any guns at that time in India and Babur had managed to get hold of some in Kabul. He had cannons and some rifles as well.
The two armies met at a place called Panipat, a small village near Delhi. Both armies remained in position opposite each other for a week before the battle began. Babur was an excellent general and he planned the battle very carefully as conquering Delhi was indeed very important to him. After the battle about fifteen thousand men of the enemy were killed including their commander Ibrahim Lodi.
Before the enemy could recover from their defeat, Delhi was captured again.
Babur had to fight more battles, the Battles of Khanua and Gogra. In 1527 A.D. he had to face a fierce enemy of his, the Rajput hero, Rana Sangram (or Sanga). A ferocious battle was fought between the two in the field of Khanua and Babur won the battle magnificiently. In 1529 A.D., Babur got into a battle with the Afghans. Babur won, but the Afghans were not totally weakened. They joined hands with Mahmud Lodi, the brother of Ibrahim Lodi, to fight Babur again. But Babur approached forward and was a successful winner of this Battle in Gogra.
After all these victorious battles, Mughal Rule started under Babur. But, unfortunately, Babur, could not have enjoyed it for long. When his son Humayun fell ill, Babur prayed to God to spare his son at the cost of his life.Soon after that, Humayun recovered miraculously and Babur fell ill. He died in 1530. He was buried in Kabul.
As a person, Babur was very emotional and affectionate towards his family, his people, his empire and his labor. He believed that peace can only be obtained by accepting other races and religions and not creating any sort of difference. He told Humayun that “Islam can better be preached by the sword of love and affection, rather than the sword of tyranny and persecution.” Giving love to his people would be the only way of uniting everyone, was one Babur’s beliefs.

Exile on Main St.
Exile On Main St. is one of The Rolling Stones' most successful albums. It was released in 1972 and includes the hit songs "Happy" and "Tumbling Dice".

Dan Quayle
James Danforth "Dan" Quayle (born February 4, 1947) was the 44th Vice President of the United States, under George H. W. Bush.

Snakes on a Plane
"Snakes on a Plane" (released in Japan as "Snake Flight" (スネーク・フライト)) is a 2006 movie starring Samuel L. Jackson, about snakes overrunning a plane. The snakes take over the plane, and Samuel L. Jackson's character Neville Flynn kills them all. The movie became very popular before it was released because of the title.

Idi Amin
Idi Amin Dada (mid 1920s – 16 August 2003) was a repressive dictator of the African country of Uganda. The President of Tanzania at the time, Julius Nyerere, invaded Uganda to save the country from Idi Amin.
Amin is famous for sending all Asians, mainly from India and Pakistan, out of Uganda. He threw them out because he believed they were taking the jobs of Ugandans. Many of the Asians that left Uganda came back after Amin was thrown out.
Amin also supported the cause of Palestine freedom. This caused the famous hijacking of an Air France flight that landed in Uganda.
He died in 2003 in Saudi Arabia, where he lived after being thrown out of Uganda.
A 2006 movie, "The Last King of Scotland" is about Amin's government. Forest Whitaker won an Academy Award for best actor.

Kuomintang
Kuomintang (KMT) is a political party in Taiwan. It was in China until 1949 when Communist captured China. Kuomintang means "Nationalist Party".

Chiang Kai-shek
Chiang Kai-shek was a political leader born in Xikou on October 31, 1887. He led China from 1930 to 1949. He led Taiwan from 1950 until his death in 1975.

Romano Prodi
Romano Prodi (born August 9, 1939 in Scandiano, Italy) is an Italian politician and leader of a left-wing coalition named "L'unione" (The Union).
Prodi was "President of the Council of Ministers", that is, Prime Minister of Italy between 1996 and 1998.
He then served as President of the European Commission from 1999 to 2004.
He was re-elected Prime Minister of Italy for a second time in 2006, when he defeated Silvio Berlusconi, leader of the right-wing coalition named "Casa delle Libertà" (House of Freedom).

Hafez al-Assad
Hafez al-Assad (Arabic: حافظ الأسد Ḥāfiẓ al-Asad) (6 October, 1930 – 10 June, 2000) was president of Syria for three decades. He was succeeded by his son and current president Bashar al-Assad in 2000.

Mohamed ElBaradei
Mohamed ElBaradei (Arabic: محمد البرادعي) (born June 17, 1942, Egypt) is the Director General of the International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA). The IAEA is an inter-governmental organization related to the United Nations. It is based in Vienna and tries to bring about the peaceful use of nuclear energy. ElBaradei and the IAEA were both awarded the Nobel Peace Prize in 2005. They got the prize for their efforts in Iraq, finding that there were no weapons of mass destruction in Iraq.
ElBaradei has a doctorate in International law.

Art of Life
Art of Life was the fourth album by the Japanese band X Japan. It was released in 1993 and contained only a song of 29 minutes of the same name.

Gamal Abdel Nasser
Gamal Abdel Nasser was the leader of the Egyptian revolution in 1952 The revolution turned Egypt into a republic instead of a kingdom, and it was the reason why the British army got out of Egypt. Nasser was born in 1918 in Upper Egypt, then he became the president of Egypt in 1954. He worked to build the high dam, and made the Suez Canal to be returned to Egypt. Nasser also fought The Six Day War with Israel but Israel won. He died in 1970.
Gamal Abdel Nasser was most beloved by the Egyptian people. He was their saviour from the British occupation & the corrupted royality. He started his era with a series of corrections & rectifications in most of Egypt's systems. Then he started the "Nationalization" or "التأميم" of Egyptian resources. That means that he made the government take possition of most of income sources in the country previously held by individuals & re-distributing them on the commons. This was very "communist" deed.
1) The freedom of education (students get educated in government's schools free of charge with no feez)
2) the construction of the "High Dam" at Aswan, the south of Egypt to produce electricity from the water flow & preserve fresh water for the people to purify & drink & for the irregation of the crops.

Tampa Bay Lightning
The Tampa Bay Lightning is an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL). They were formed in 1991, and began playing in 1992-93 NHL season.
The Lightning has won the Stanley Cup championship 1 time and won the Southeast Division title 2 times (2002-03 and 2003-04).
Before the Lightning's Stanley Cup championship, the team was regarded as one of the worst team in the league. It made the play-offs once before winning the Southeast Division in 2002-03.
It won the Stanley Cup championship in 2003-04, the year before the NHL Lock-Out. Under the leadership of captain Dave Andreychuk, and the strong goaltending performance of goaltender Nikolai Khabibulin, the Lightning earned its first Stanley Cup over the Calgary Flames in 7 games.
During the Lightning's Stanley Cup winning year, Martin St. Louis won the Hart Trophy, the league's most valuable player. After game 7 against the Calgary Flames, Brad Richards was awarded the Conn Smythe Trophy, the play-offs most valuable player. Also, coach John Tortorella was awarded the Jack Adams Trophy for coach of the year.

Luiz Inácio Lula da Silva
Luiz Inácio Lula da Silva was the 39th President of Brazil. He was born October 27, 1945. He became the President on January 1, 2003. He succeeded Fernando Henrique Cardoso. His wife, the First Lady of Brazil, is Marisa Letícia Lula da Silva.

Helmut Kohl
Helmut Josef Michael Kohl (born April 3, 1930 in Ludwigshafen am Rhein) is a German CDU politician.
From 1969 to 1976 he was the Minister President of the state of Rhineland-Palatinate and from 1982 to 1998 Chancellor of the Federal Republic of Germany. Kohl helped to arrange the process of German reunification and participated considerably in the European unity process.
His involvement with the CDU donation affair, and in particular offences against party law is open to question

Paul Biya
Paul Biya is the President of Cameroon. He has been the country's president since 1982.
Biya was born on February 13, 1933 in the village of Mvomeka'a in Cameroon. At that time, the country was called French Cameroon. He studied at The Sorbonne and the Institut d'Etudes Politiques de Paris in Paris, France. He graduated in 1961 with a bachelor's degree in public law and a diploma in international relations.
After graduating, Biya returned to Cameroon and worked in the government. In 1975, the President Ahmadou Ahidjo gave the job of Prime Minister to Biya. When President Ahidjo resigned on November 6, 1982, Biya became president of the country. Shortly afterwards, Ahidjo and Biya began feuding, and Ahidjo was forced to leave Cameroon.
Biya was elected as the President of Cameroon in 1984, 1988, 1992, 1997 and 2004, but other parties only have been allowed to enter the elections since 1992. The results many of these election results have been called fraudulent (achieved through unfair or illegal ways).
Many organizations, including Amnesty International, have criticized Biya's government for restricting the freedom of the people of Cameroon. These issues include control of the media (newspapers and radio and television stations) and violations of human rights. Biya's supporters point to the country's stability and high literacy rate.

Scottish Socialist Party
The Scottish Socialist Party is a political party which was formed in 1998. It argues for socialism and scottish independence. It has four MSPs in the Scottish Parliament.

Edmund Barton
Sir Edmund Barton (18 January 1849 – 7 January 1920) was the first Prime Minister of Australia. He had a big part in making Australia a country. His government passed laws stopping non-white people from coming to Australia and allowing women to vote in elections. After he was Prime Minister he became a judge of the High Court.

Alfred Deakin
Alfred William Deakin (3 August 1856 - 7 October 1919) was the second Prime Minister of Australia.
He was born in Fitzroy, Melbourne, Australia, the second child of William Deakin. In the 1890s he helped Australia become a country. He was Australia's first Attorney-General (head lawyer) when Edmund Barton was Prime Minister and then became Prime Minister after Barton left. He introduced the Bill to start Australia's High Court, began planning for a railway to cross Australia, took over control of New Guinea from Britain, and introduced old age pensions.
Deakin married Elizabeth Brown on April 3, 1882. They had three children.
When he was old he had Alzheimer's disease which made him forget a lot of things.
Alfred Deakin died on the 7th of October 1919 in South Yarra, Victoria.He was buried at St.Kilda Cemetery.

Chris Watson
John Christian Watson (c. 9 April 1867 - 18 November 1941), known as Chris Waston, was the third Prime Minister of Australia. He was the first Prime Minister from the Labor Party. He was Prime Minister for only 4 months.

Beatrix of the Netherlands
Queen Beatrix is the Queen of the Netherlands. She was born on January 31, 1938. She was crowned on 30 April 1980. Her full name is Beatrix Wilhelmina Armgard, Princess van Oranje-Nassau, Princess van Lippe-Biesterfeld.
She was married with Claus von Amsberg, who died in 2002. Her mother was Queen Juliana, and her father was Prince Bernhard. Her sons are Prince Willem-Alexander, Prince Johan-Friso and Prince Constantijn.

Andrew Fisher
Andrew Fisher (August 29, 1862 – October 22, 1928) was the fifth Prime Minister of Australia. He was Prime Minister three times. His government helped create the Royal Australian Navy and make Australia's own paper money. When he retired he moved to London.
Fisher was born in Crosshouse, Scotland where he was educated at the Crosshouse Primary School. At the age of 10 he left school to work in the coal mines. In 1885 he moved to Australia where he worked in the coal mines at Burrum and Gympie. He was elected to the Queensland Parliament in 1892. In 1901 he married Margaret Irvine.
When Fisher was Prime Minister a number of important projects were undertaken. The Commonwealth Bank was set up, the Northern Territory of South Australia was transferred to the Commonwealth, the federal capital of Canberra was founded, and the construction of the trans-Australian railway line linking Perth to the other capital cities was begun. As well as introducing maternity allowances, Fisher acknowledged the need for greater political equality for women.
Andrew Fisher is one of Australia's most successful prime ministers because of the changes he made. He was the first prime minister to have a majority in both the House of Representatives and the Senate. He was able to have more than 110 Acts passed into law..

Joseph Cook
Sir Joseph Cook (7 December 1860 - 30 July 1947) was the sixth Prime Minister of Australia from June 1913 until September 1914. He was Prime Minister when World War I started. He moved to London when he retired.

Solomon
Solomon was a King of Israel, the son of King David of Israel. He is written about in the Bible. (2 Samuel). He was the author of several Old Testament books. He wrote Ecclesiastes, Song of Songs and much of Proverbs.

Billy Hughes
William Morris "Billy" Hughes (25 September 1862 – 28 October 1952) was the seventh Prime Minister of Australia. He became Prime Minister during World War I. He tried to introduce conscription but the public did not want it. His party, Labor, kicked him out and he formed a new party with the opposition called the Nationalist Party. He was Prime Minister for over 7 years which was the most of anyone at the time. He was forced to resign by the Country Party in 1923 but he stayed in Parliament until he died.

Stanley Bruce
Stanley Melbourne Bruce (15 April 1883 – 25 August 1967) was the eighth Prime Minister of Australia from February 1923 until October 1929. He became Prime Minister when the Country Party asked Billy Hughes to resign. His government won elections in 1925 and 1928 but lost the 1929 election and Bruce became the first sitting Prime Minister to lose his seat. He was made a Viscount after he left politics.

James Scullin
James Henry Scullin (18 September 1876 – 28 January 1953) was the ninth Prime Minister of Australia from October 1929 until January 1932. He became Prime Minister two days before the Great Depression began. His government could not stop the effects of the Depression. His government suffered a big defeat at the December 1931 election. Scullin stayed as leader of the Labor Party but lost the 1934 election.

Joseph Lyons
Joseph Aloysius Lyons (15 September 1879 – 7 April 1939) was the tenth Prime Minister of Australia. He was Premier of Tasmania in the 1920s. He was from the Labor party. In 1931 he took his supporters and joined the other side. He started a new party called the United Australia Party. In January 1931 his new party won the elections. Lyons was the first Prime Minister to die while in office.

Earle Page
Sir Earle Christmas Grafton Page (8 August 1880 - 20 December 1961) was the eleventh Prime Minister of Australia. He became Prime Minister when Joseph Lyons died in office. He remained until a new leader, Robert Menzies, was elected by the United Australia Party.

Fredrik Reinfeldt
John Fredrik Reinfeldt (born August 4, 1965) is the Prime Minister of Sweden. He became Prime Minister in 2006. He is also the leader of the Moderate Party. The Moderate Party is the largest of the four political parties in the Swedish government, but the second largest in the parliament following the Social Democrats and their leader Mona Sahlin.

Metallica (album)
Metallica (also known as The Black Album) is Metallica's most successful album, selling over 14 million copies worldwide. It contained songs such as "Enter Sandman", "Nothing Else Matters", "Sad but True" and "The Unforgiven".

Robert Menzies
Sir Robert Gordon Menzies (20 December 1894 - 14 May 1978) was the twelfth Prime Minister of Australia. He was Prime Minister for a total of 18 and half years which is the longest in Australia's history. After the death of Joseph Lyons he was elected leader of the United Australia Party and became Prime Minister in 1939. He resigned in 1941 after a lot of criticism. In 1944 he helped form the new Liberal Party. In 1949 he was re-elected Prime Minister. He stayed in the job until he retired in 1966.

The Dark Side of the Moon
"The Dark Side Of The Moon" is a famous album by the band Pink Floyd.
History.
It debuted in 1973 and is their ninth album. It is one of the most famous albums of all time, frequently placing in the top five whenever a rock music authority makes a list of the greatest albums of all time.
Cover.
Its cover, which features a ray of white light going through a prism, is also one of the most famous album covers of all time. Analysts say that statistically, Dark Side Of The Moon is always playing somewhere on planet Earth. It is one of the most famous concept albums (Albums where all the songs are about a central theme. Some concept albums tell a specific story), and used to be the best-selling album of all time. There is an album-pressing plant in Germany that does nothing but create copies of Dark Side Of The Moon.
About.
Dark Side of the Moon is about life.
The opening track, "Speak to Me", features ticking clocks, a racing heartbeat, people talking, and it ends in a loud scream.
"Breathe", a modern day radio staple (Meaning that it is frequently played), is a slow moving song about how endless life feels sometimes.
"On the Run", the next song, was a major technical achievement for its time. Footsteps, airplanes, and an explosion are all heard. The song gives the listener the feeling of being chased.
"Time", one of the album's most famous songs, is about how rushed humans can feel sometimes. An idea expressed is that people give themselves so much to do, yet so little time to do it.
"The Great Gig In The Sky" is a song featuring vocals by Clare Torry. It was originally called "The Mortality Sequence", and featured sounds from religious radio.
"Money", the album's best-selling single, is a catchy jazz song about currency.
"Us & Them" is an anti-war song, reinforcing the idea from "Time" that life is too short to be wasted on something like war.
"Any Colour You Like" is an instrumental song.
"Brain Damage" is one of the most haunting songs on the album, seemingly spoken by a mentally ill person.
"Eclipse", the final song on Dark Side Of The Moon is about life in general, and recaps all the themes from the album.
The album spent over 14 years on the Billboard charts and it is currently the ninth best selling album in the United States.

Arthur Fadden
Sir Arthur William Fadden (13 April 1895 - 21 April 1973) was the 13th Prime Minister of Australia. He was leader of the Country Party when Robert Menzies resigned in 1941. He became Prime Minister but lost to John Curtin in an election held only one month after he became Prime Minister. When Menzies became Prime Minister again in 1949, Fadden was the Treasurer for eight years.

John Curtin
John Joseph Curtin (8 January 1885 - 5 July 1945) was the 14th Prime Minister of Australia. He was Prime Minister for most of World War II. He made Australia an ally of the United States. A lot of people think he was Australia's best Prime Minister. He died just before the end of the War in July 1945.

Michael Jeffery
Major-General Philip Michael Jeffery (born 12 December 1937) was the 24th Governor-General of Australia from 11 August 2003 until 5 September 2008. He was appointed by John Howard. Before this he was Governor of Western Australia. He quit the army in 1993 when he became Governor.

Frank Forde
Francis Michael Forde (18 July 1890 - 28 January 1983) was the 15th Prime Minister of Australia. He was Prime Minister for only a week after John Curtin died. He lost a leadership contest to Ben Chifley. He lived longer than any other Prime Minister. He died at 92.

Ben Chifley
Joseph Benedict Chifley (22 September 1885 – 13 June 1951) was the 16th Prime Minister of Australia. He won the leadership after the death of John Curtin in 1945. His government tried to take ownership of all Australia's banks. This was not popular and the High Court said that it could not be done. Opposition leader, Robert Menzies said that Chifley and the Labor Party was soft on Communism. This is one of the main reasons why Chifley lost the 1949 election. He died soon after losing the 1951 election to Menzies.

Harold Holt
Harold Edward Holt (5 August 1908 - 17 December 1967) was the 17th Prime Minister of Australia. He became Prime Minister after the retirement of Robert Menzies. He supported the United States in the Vietnam War. He disappeared while swimming at a beach in Victoria in December 1967. His body was never found. Many urban Australian myths surround his disppearance.

John McEwen
Sir John McEwen (29 March 1900 – 20 November 1980) was the 18th Prime Minister of Australia. He was leader of the Country Party when Harold Holt disappeared and so was appointed Prime Minister until the Liberal Party elected a new leader.

John Gorton
Sir John Grey Gorton (9 September 1911 – 19 May 2002) was the 19th Prime Minister of Australia. He was elected Liberal Party leader after Harold Holt disappeared. Gorton kept Australia in the Vietnam War. His party passed a vote of no confidence in him in 1971 and he resigned. He did not like the Liberal Party after this.

William McMahon
Sir William McMahon (23 February 1908 – 31 March 1988) was the 20th Prime Minister of Australia. He challenged John Gorton for the leadership in 1971 and won. He lost the next election in December 1972 to Gough Whitlam.

Gough Whitlam
Edward Gough Whitlam (born 11 July 1916) was the 26th Prime Minister of Australia. He is the only Prime Minister to have been dismissed by the Governor-General. He was Prime Minister for three years. His government made a lot of changes compared to the previous Liberal governments.
His government did not have a majority in the Senate (the upper house of the Australian Parliament). This made it hard for Whitlam's government to make laws. In 1975 the opposition, led by Malcolm Fraser, blocked government supply in the Senate. This meant that the government had no money. This was a big crisis in Australia. In order to end the crisis the Governor-General, Sir John Kerr, dismissed Whitlam and made Fraser the Prime Minister. Whitlam lost the election that was held a month later.
Whitlam is one of the most controversial people in Australia. Many people think of him as a hero while others consider his government to have been poor.

Malcolm Fraser
John Malcolm Fraser (born 21 May 1930) was the 27th Prime Minister of Australia. He became Prime Minister in November, 1975 when Governor-General, Sir John Kerr, dismissed Gough Whitlam. At this point he was only temporary Prime Minister. He won the election held in December, 1975. He won two more elections in 1977 and 1980 before losing to Bob Hawke in 1983.
His government stopped some of the changes made by the Whitlam government. They also reduced government spending to stop money becoming less valuable. He also supported efforts to abolish racism in South Africa, the boycott of the Moscow Olympics and more immigration from Asian countries.

Australian Labor Party
The Australian Labor Party is one of the two major political parties in Australia. The party was made in 1891; it is the oldest political party in Australia. It is currently in power in Australia, meaning that it runs the Government. Its current leader and New Australia's Prime Minister is Kevin Rudd.
Image:Labor 1901c.jpg|thumb|Group photograph of Federal Labour Party MPs elected to the Australian House of Representatives and Australian Senate at the first 1901 election, including Chris Watson, Andrew Fisher, Billy Hughes, Frank Tudor, King O'Malley and Lee Batchelor.

Bob Hawke
Robert James Lee "Bob" Hawke (born 9 December 1929) was the 23rd Prime Minister of Australia. He was a union leader before he entered parliament in 1980. He became leader only a little while before the 1983 election but he defeated Malcolm Fraser. His government made many changes, like the Whitlam government, but did it more slowly and with more planning. His government moved Labor to the right economically. His leadership was challenged twice by Paul Keating. He lost the second time and retired.

Shinzo Abe
Shinzo Abe was the Prime Minister of Japan. He was born on September 21, 1954 in Japan. He was preceded by Junichiro Koizumi. He was the 90th Prime Minister of Japan, and stepped down September 12, 2007. The official reason to end his term was missing support for Japan's mission in Iraq, however, he had been involved in a number of crises for the last couple of months.

Condoleezza Rice
Condoleezza Rice (born November 14 1954 in Birmingham, Alabama) is the 66th and current United States Secretary of State. She is the second Secretary of State under President George W. Bush. She took over from Colin Powell on January 26, 2005, after he stepped down. Rice is the first African American woman, second African American (after Powell), and second woman (after Madeleine Albright) to serve as Secretary of State.
Before she became Secretary of State, Condoleezza Rice was Bush's National Security Advisor during his first term (2001–2005). Before she did this, she was a Professor of political science at Stanford University from 1993 to 1999, where she also was the Provost.

Isabella of Castile
Isabella of Castile was a queen of Castile and Leon. Her husband was Ferdinand II of Aragon and her grandson Carlos I of Spain (Charles V, Holy Roman Emperor).

Nancy Pelosi
Nancy Pelosi (born March 26, 1940) is an American politician. She is a member of the United States House of Representatives and is currently the Speaker of the House. She represents the 8th district of California, which is part of the city of San Francisco. She was first elected to Congress in 1987. Pelosi is a member of the Democratic Party. She is the first woman to lead a major party in the United States Congress. She is also the first woman and the first Italian-American to be the Speaker of the House. Because she is Speaker of the House, she is second in line to the President of the United States, behind the current Vice President of the United States, Dick Cheney.
Her father, Thomas D'Alesandro, Junior, was Mayor of Baltimore, Maryland and served five terms in Congress. Her brother, Thomas D'Alesandro III, also was Mayor of Baltimore.
Pelosi graduated from Trinity College in Washington, D.C. in 1962. She and her husband, Paul Pelosi, who is from San Francisco, have five children: Nancy Corinne, Christine, Jacqueline, Paul and Alexandra, and five grandchildren.

Eva Perón
María Eva Duarte de Perón (May 7, 1919 – July 26, 1952) was the second wife of Argentine President Juan Perón. She was first lady from 1946 until she died in 1952 and she served with her husband as a co-ruler of Argentina during those years. Before she died the Congress made her Spiritual Leader of the Nation. She worked as an actress before she married Peron.
By the time of her death, she was one of the most powerful women, or maybe even the most powerful woman, in the world. She is known for her work in many charitable and feminist causes, and became an icon to many people in Argentina. Evita was President of the Peronist Women's Party, a big and powerful political party made up of women who supported the Perons' party. She ran the Ministry of Labor and the Ministry of Health. The Eva Peron Foundation gave a lot of money and other things to the poor. The poor liked Evita Peron a lot. Her life inspired both a musical and a movie called "Evita". The movie starred Madonna.
When she died (of cervical cancer), her corpse was embalmed. After her husband was overthrown, her body was lost for almost 20 years, until it was found in Italy. It was brought back to Argentina and buried with her husband after he died in 1974. It was brought back by the President, a woman named Isabel Perón, who was married to Juan Perón years after Eva's death.

Willy Brandt
Willy Brandt was a German chancellor from 1969 until 1974. He was born Herbert Ernst Karl Frahm on December 18th, 1913 in Lübeck Germany. He was the leader of the Social Democratic Party of Germany (1964 – 1987 and winner of the Nobel Peace Prize (1971). He died on October 8th, 1992 in Unkel at the Rhine.
Biography.
He was born as son of Martha Frahm and John Möller in 1913 in Lübeck. He never met his father and grew up with his mother and his grandfather.
He flew to Norway when the Nazis took over government in Germany. He lead a contact office for the resistance against the Nazi regime. After he lost his German citizenship, he became Norwegian. The Germans arrested him when they occupied Norway. He fled to Sweden. In 1945, Brandt returned to Germany as writer for Scandinavian newspapers.
Political Life.
His political career started in 1948. He became a representative for the SPD in the Bundestag for a district of Berlin. He was member of the state parliament of Berlin from 1950 until 1971.
He became president of the Parliament of Berlin (1955) and Mayor of Berlin (1957). Willy Brandt started to campaign for the position as Chancellor (Bundeskanzler) for the Social Democrats (SPD) in 1961. In 1966, he became Vice-Chancellor of the "Grand Coalition" of SPD and the Christian Democratic Union of Germany (CDU) under Chancellor Kurt Georg Kiesinger. He started the social-liberal coalition between the SPD and the Free Democratic Party of Germany (FDP). Willy Brandt became Chancellor in 1969.
He travelled to East Germany, Warsaw and Moscow to improve relationships. His acceptance the Oder-Neisse Line and many of controversies in the Parliament and society followed.
In 1971, he got the Nobel Peace Prize for his politics.
In 1972, Rainer Barzel of the CDU believed he could end the Brandt administration, but he failed to win the vote of no-confidence. Brandt was re-elected to a second term later that year. In 1974, Günther Guillaume who worked in Brandt's office was discovered to be a spy. Brandt resigned and Helmut Schmidt became chancellor.
Brandt stayed leader of the SPD, and later of the Socialist International too. He was member of the European Parliament from 1978 to 1983. He gave up the position as chief of the SPD in 1987.

Konrad Adenauer
Konrad Hermann Josef Adenauer (born January 5, 1876 in Cologne; died April 19, 1967 in Rhöndorf (part of Bad Honnef)). From 1949 to 1963 he was the first Bundeskanzler (chancellor) of the Federal Republic of Germany and from 1951 to 1955 was foreign secretary the same time.
Adenauer was the third of five children of a court secretary in Cologne. His family was Catholic. Konrad Adenauer started his political career in 1906 in the city assembly of Cologne. From 1917 to 1933 and again in 1945 he was mayor of Cologne.
Adenauer was member of the Catholic Zentrum Party. When the Nazi Party took power he lost his job. At first he worked with the Nazis, but after the conspiracy to kill Hitler failed in 1944 he hid for his own safety.
After the war he became mayor of Cologne again, but lost the job after a few months.
In the Parlamentarischer Rat of West Germany, he was one of the top politicians and the President. He founded the CDU at the same time.
He was important in making Bonn the West German capital instead of Frankfurt am Main.
In 1949 he was elected as the first Chancellor of the Federal Republic of Germany.
He made sure West Germany joined the side of the western capitalist countries in the Cold War. He also helped West Germany join NATO. He was reelected three times.
In 1964 he stopped being chancellor. He was a representative in the Bundestag until his death at 91 years old.

Helmut Schmidt
Helmut Heinrich Waldemar Schmidt (December 23, 1918 in Hamburg) is a German politician and was Chancellor of the Federal Republic of Germany from 1974 to 1982.
Helmut Schmidt was born in Hamburg in 1918. He finished school in 1937 with the Abitur.
Afterwards he had to join the working service and after that to join in the army.
At the end of World War II he was First Lieutant.
He became prisoner of war in 1945.
After he was set free, he started to study macro economy. He finished his studies in 1949. Then he started to work for the administration of Hamburg.
Schmidt joined into the SPD in 1949.
In 1953 he became a member of the Bundestag first time.
From 1961 to 1965 he was Senator in the state government of Hamburg.
From 1969 to 1972 he was Minster of Defence of West Germany, from 1972 to 1974 he was Minister of Finance.
After Willy Brandt gave up his job as "Bundeskanzler", Helmut Schmidt was elected as new chancellor.

Robert Kocharian
Robert Kocharian is the president of Armenia. He is the second president Armenia has had since it left the Soviet Union. On August 31 1954 Robert Kocharian was born in Nagorno-Karabakh, in the city of Stepanakert. As president of Armenia, Kocharian has been talking to the president of Azerbaijan, Ilham Aliyev, about what to do with the land of Nagorno-Karabakh, which the two countries had a war over.

Ludwig Erhard
Ludwig Wilhelm Erhard (* February 4, 1897 in Fürth; † May 5, 1977 in Bonn) was a German politician.
Early life.
Erhard was born as the son of a salesman. After his middle school exam, he started training to become a salesman himself. He was wounded as soldier in World War I. After World War I, he started to study micro economy at a college in Nuremberg.
Later life.
After that, he studied economy on the University of Frankfurt am Main. In 1925 he finished his doctoral thesis. Afterwards, he worked in his father's company. After the Great Depression, the company went bancrupt.
From 1928 to 1942, he worked as science assistant, but he couldn't get a promotion because he didn't want to become a member of a Nazi organisation. From 1942 to 1945, he was the head of the institute for industrial research.
Until 1949, he worked for the CDU, but joined still in 1963.
From 1945 to 1946, he worked for the provisional government of Bavaria, afterwards he was an economic organisation official for the British-American administration in West Germany.
In 1949, he became Secretary for Economy under Konrad Adenauer.
From 1957-1963, he was Vice Chancellor.
After Adenauer resigned in 1963, Erhard became the new chancellor.
In 1966, Kurt Georg Kiesinger succeded him.

Kurt Georg Kiesinger
Kurt Georg Kiesinger (* April 6th, 1904 in Ebingen, now Baden-Württemberg; † March 9th, 1988 in Tübingen-Bebenhausen) was a German politician.
Kiesinger was born in Southern Germany. He studied history and philosophy in Tübingen and later law in Berlin.
He joined the Nazi party in 1933, and worked in the government. After the war he was held in a prison camp in Ludwigshafen. He was released when notes on his personnel file showed that he had not helped the anti-Jewish actions in his department, and had tried to stop them.
In 1946, he started a political career in the CDU.
From 1958 to 1966, he was Minister President of Baden-Württemberg, from 1967 to 1971 Chair of the CDU.
From 1966 to 1969, he was chancellor of West Germany.

Palpatine
Palpatine (also known as the Emperor and Darth Sidious) is a character from the "Star Wars" universe.
His most famous and once only seen force ability is force lightning seen in the last episode "Return of the Jedi" which is forked to spread the damage even further and is blueish purple. He is played by Ian McDiarmid. He is seen in Episode V for the first time. Palpatine is believed to be the true villain of the Star Wars films because he was the one who caused Anakin Skywalker to join the Dark Side of the Force.
Palpatine rose to power in Episode III, when he sent Anakin to the Jedi Temple and ordered the Clone Troopers to execute Order 66. Palpatine battled Yoda in a duel which would decide the fate of the Galaxy. He defeated Yoda, and was able to form a new order upon the fallen Republic; he created the first Galactic Empire.
Palpatine ruled the Galaxy for 23 years, when in the end he was killed by his own apprentice, Darth Vader.

Ferdinand II of Aragon
Ferdinand II "the Catholic" (Catalan: "Ferran d'Aragó "el Catòlic") (March 10, 1452 – June 23, 1516) was king of Aragon (1479-1516), Castile, Sicily (1468-1516), Naples (1504-1516), Valencia, Sardinia and Navarre and Count of Barcelona.
Biography.
Ferdinand was the son of John II of Aragon by his second wife, the Aragonese noblewoman Juana Enriquez. He married Infanta Isabella, the half-sister and heiress of Henry IV of Castile, on October 19, 1469 in Ocaña. He became Ferdinand V of Castile when Isabella succeeded her brother as Queen of Castile in 1474. The two young monarchs had initially to fight a civil war against Juana, princess of Castile (also known as Juana la Beltraneja), the purported daughter of Henry IV. They were ultimately successful. Ferdinand succeeded his father as King of Aragon in 1479 and the Crown of Castile and the various territories of the Crown of Aragon were united in a personal union. For the first time since the 8th century this created a single political unit which might be called Spain, although the various territories were not properly administered as a single unit until the 18th century.
The first decades of Ferdinand and Isabella's joint rule were taken up with the conquest of the Kingdom of Granada, the last Muslim enclave in the Iberian peninsula. This was completed by 1492. In that same year, the Jews were expelled from both Castile and Aragon, and Christopher Columbus was sent by the couple on his expedition which would ultimately discover the New World. By the Treaty of Tordesillas of 1494, the extra-European world was split between the crowns of Portugal and Castile by a north-south line through the Atlantic Ocean.
The latter part of Ferdinand's life was largely taken up with the so-called Italian Wars, disputes over control of Italy with successive Kings of France. In 1494, Charles VIII of France invaded Italy and expelled Ferdinand's cousin, Alfonso II, from the throne of Naples. Ferdinand's alliance with various Italian princes and with Emperor Maximilian I, expelled the French by 1496 and installed Alfonso's son, Ferdinand, on the Neapolitan throne. In 1501, following the death of Ferdinand II of Naples and his succession by his uncle Frederick, Ferdinand of Aragon signed an agreement with Charles VIII's successor, Louis XII. Louis had just successfully asserted his claims to the Duchy of Milan, and they agreed to partition Naples between them, with Campania and the Abruzzi, including Naples itself, going to the French and Ferdinand taking Apulia and Calabria. The agreement soon fell apart, and over the next several years, Ferdinand's great general Gonzalo Fernández de Córdoba conquered Naples from the French, by 1504. Another less famous "conquest" took place in 1503, when Andreas Paleologus, de jure Emperor of the Eastern Roman Empire, left Ferdinand and Isabella as heirs to the empire, thus Ferdinand became de jure Roman Emperor.
After Isabella's death, her kingdom went to her daughter Joanna. Ferdinand served as the latter's regent during her absence in the Netherlands, ruled by her husband Archduke Philip. Ferdinand attempted to retain the regency permanently, but was rebuffed by the Castilian nobility and replaced with Joanna's husband, who became Philip I of Castile. After Philip's death in 1506, with Joanna mentally unstable, and her and Philip's son Charles of Ghent only six years old, Ferdinand resumed the regency, ruling through Francisco Cardinal Jimenez de Cisneros, the Chancellor of the Kingdom.
In 1508, war resumed in Italy, this time against Venice. All the other powers on the peninsula, including Louis XII, Ferdinand, Maximilian, and Pope Julius II joined together against as the League of Cambrai. Although the French were victorious against Venice at the Battle of Agnadello, the League soon fell apart, as both the Pope and Ferdinand became suspicious of French intentions. Instead, the Holy League was formed, in which all the powers now joined together against France.
In November 1511 Ferdinand and his son-in-law Henry VIII of England signed the Treaty of Westminster, pledging mutual aid between the two against France. Earlier that year, Ferdinand had conquered the southern half of the Kingdom of Navarre, which was ruled by a French nobleman, and annexed it to Spain. At this point to reinforce his claim to the kingdom, Ferdinand remarried with the much younger Germaine of Foix (1490–1538), a grand-daughter of Queen Leonor of Navarre. The Holy League was generally successful in Italy, as well, driving the French from Milan, which was restored to its Sforza dukes by the peace treaty in 1513. The French were successful in reconquering Milan two years later, however.
Ferdinand died in 1516 in Madrigalejo, Cáceres, Extremadura. He had made Spain the most powerful country in Europe. The succession of his grandson Charles, who inherited not only the Spanish lands of his maternal grandparents, but the Habsburg and Burgundian lands of his paternal family, would make his heirs the most powerful rulers on the continent. Charles succeeded him in the Aragonese lands, and was also granted the Castilian crown jointly with his insane mother, bringing about at long last the unification of the Spanish thrones under one head.
Children.
Ferdinand and Isabella had 5 children, Isabella of Asturias, Juan of Aragon, Joanna of Castile, Maria of Aragon, and Catherine of Aragon. Joanna and Catherine married with several European dynasties, setting the bases for the huge heritage of their grandson Charles V. His granddaughter was Queen Mary I of England.

Toy Story
"Toy Story" was the first Disney/Pixar animated movie. Pixar made the movie while Disney packaged it and sold the reels of movie to movie theatres. It was released in November 30 1995. It was the first animated movie to be completely done with computers instead of hand-drawn animation. A sequel called "Toy Story 2" was released in 1999.
Plot.
It is a children's movie about toys that are owned by a young boy called Andy. Andy's favorite toy is Woody, the cowboy. Woody is also the main character in the movie. Woody is a rival of Buzz Lightyear, Andy's new space ranger toy. Tom Hanks provides the voice of Woody and Tim Allen does the voice of Buzz.

National Party of Australia
The National Party of Australia is the third biggest political party in Australia. It was first called the Country Party when it started in 1922 and then became the National Country Party in 1975. In 1982 it became the National Party.
The party's federal parliamentary leader since 3 December 2007 is Warren Truss.
The National Party represents the interests of people who live in rural areas, that is, not in big cities. It normally joins together with the Liberal Party to form a coalition government. It has less people in Parliament than the Liberal Party. The current leader is Mark Vaile. When the National Party is in a coalition government its leader is usually the Deputy Prime Minister.

Giuseppe Garibaldi
Giuseppe Garibaldi was an Italian soldier. He fought for the Italian Unification Movement. He led a group called the Red Shirts through the Kingdom of Two Sicilies to bring together the kingdoms of Italy in 1860.

Edward the Confessor
Edward the Confessor ("c". 1004 – 4 January 1066) was King of England from June 8 1042 to 4 January 1066. After he died, there were four people that claimed to be king. Edward had promised to each of them that they would be king.

Chicago Bears
The Chicago Bears are a professional American football team in the National Football League based in Chicago, Illinois. The Bears were founded 1919, and were first called the Decatur Staleys. The team was one nine NFL Championships, with the latest being in 1985. The Bears play their home games at Soldier Field. The starting quarterback for the Bears is Rex Grossman. Notable players on the Bears include Brian Urlacher, Devin Hester. The Bears were the champions of the National Football Conference in 2006 and 1985

Edward Heath
Edward Heath was a Prime Minister of the United Kingdom.
He was educated at Balliol College, Oxford.

David Lloyd George
David Lloyd George (17 January 1863 – 26 March 1945) was the British Prime Minister during the last half of World War I. He was Prime Minister for six years, between 1916 and 1922.
Lloyd George was born in Chorlton-on-Medlock, Manchester, England to Welsh parents. His father, who died before Lloyd George was two-years old, was a teacher and a farmer. When he was young, he lived with his mother and his brother. When he was 21, Lloyd George became a lawyer and opened an office in the back of his brother's house.
Lloyd George's law practice was a success. Shortly after opening it, Lloyd George became interested in politics. He began working with the Liberal Party. He was elected as a Member of Parliament (MP) on April 13, 1890. Lloyd George would serve as an MP until 1945. In the House of Commons, Lloyd George worked to promote Welsh issues, fought against the Second Boer War and campaigned for education reform.
In 1905, Lloyd George was selected to become a cabinet minister. He served as President of the Board of Trade (1905-1908) and Chancellor of the Exchequer (1908-1915). After World War I started, he held the positions of Minister of Munitions (1915) and War Secretary (1916).
By the end of 1916, the war was going badly for Great Britain. Lloyd George gathered together a coalition (a type of political team) of Liberal and Conservative MPs to form a new government. On December 5, 1916, Prime Minister H. H. Asquith resigned, and Lloyd George took his place. Lloyd George's government introduced conscription (forcing men to join the armed forces) and rationing (placing limits on the amount of food someone can buy) by the end of the war.
After the war, Lloyd George represented Britain at the Versailles Peace Conference and helped create the Irish Free State. By 1922, Lloyd George's coalition was breaking apart. In October 1922, the Conservative Party led by Andrew Bonar Law won the election. Lloyd George remained an MP, however, until 1945.
In 1945, he was given the titles Earl Lloyd George of Dwyfor and Viscount Gwynedd. He was to take a seat in the House of Lords, but he died before he could do so.

Dag Hammarskjöld
Dag Hammarskjold (Swedish: Dag Hjalmar Agne Carl Hammarskjöld) (29 July 1905 – 18 September 1961) was a Swedish diplomat and the second Secretary-General of the United Nations. He served as Secretary-General from April, 1953 until his death in a plane crash in what is now Zambia, on 18 September 1961.

Alexander Lukashenko
Alexander Lukashenko is the leader of the country of Belarus. He has been the leader since 1994. He was the first leader of the country to be chosen by Belarus citizens. Before becoming the leader, he belonged to the law making section of the government. He was also in the military of the Soviet Union and ran a factory that made things to help farming.

Henry III of England
Henry III (1 October 1207 – 16 November 1272) became King of England in 1216 when he was less than ten years old. He continued to be king for 56 years until he died in 1272. He was married to Eleanor of Provence.

Edward I of England
Edward I (17 June 1239–7 July 1307), was a King of England who was known for conquering Wales and keeping Scotland as part of England during his lifetime. He became king on 21 November 1272, until his death in 1307. His mother was Queen Eleanor of Provence and his father was King Henry III of England. He also expelled the Jewish people from England.

Néstor Kirchner
Néstor Kirchner (February 25, 1950) was President of Argentina between 2003 and 2007. He was born in Santa Cruz Province, Patagonia, where he was governor. It was elected President in 2003 preceded by Eduardo Duhalde. His wife is the current president of Argentina, she is Cristina Fernández de Kirchner.

William Wallace
William Wallace was a knight from Scotland who fought the King of England (Edward I) in the Middle Ages. He was born around 1270, and executed by the English on 23 August 1305. Scotland had been occupied by England, and Wallace led resistance to the occupation. A book called "The Acts and Deeds of Sir William Wallace, Knight of Elderslie" was written by a minstrel named Blind Harry in the 15th century. The book is written more like a story than a true version of his life, and has led to much of the legends around William Wallace. The film Braveheart is based on the novel.
Birth.
Exactly where and when Wallace was born is not very clear. Some people say he was born about 1272, but a book printed in the 16th century called "History of William Wallace and Scottish Affairs" says he was born in 1276. Tradition says he was born in Elderslie, near Paisley in Renfrewshire. There are links with Ayrshire as well, and it is not clear whether Wallace first fought the English in Ayrshire or Lanark.
Family.
Tradition sees Wallace as a "common", normal person. Robert the Bruce, who also fought the English, was seen as being more noble. But this is not true because Wallace's family were minor nobles.

Robert I of Scotland
Robert I of Scotland (July 11, 1274 – June 7, 1329) is more better known as Robert the Bruce. He was King of Scotland (1306 – 1329). He is famous for beating the English army at the Battle of Bannockburn near Stirling in 1314.

Anaheim Ducks
The Anaheim Ducks are an ice hockey team from Anaheim, California, California. They are in the National Hockey League (NHL). The Ducks changed the name on June 22, 2006. They used to be the Mighty Ducks of Anaheim. The name comes from the Disney movie "The Mighty Ducks".
The team was created in 1991 and started playing in the 1993 season. The Ducks were originally owned by The Walt Disney Company. In 2005, Disney sold the Ducks to Susan and Henry Samueli
They are in the Western Conference's Pacific Division. They play their home games at Honda Center, in Anaheim, California. Their team colors are black, gold, and orange. Randy Carlyle is the team's head coach. Scott Niedermayer is the captain of the team.
To date, they have won one Stanley Cup. It was in the 2006-2007 season. The Anaheim Ducks won the conference championship in the 2002-03 season and 2006-2007 season. They have won a Pacific division title in 2006-2007.

Ngo Dinh Diem
Ngo Dinh Diem or "Ngô Ðình Diệm" in Vietnamese was the first President of South Vietnam. He was born on 3 January 1901 in Hue, Vietnam
He was overthrown and killed on 2 November 1963 by the South Việtnamese army, which then set up a military dictatorship.

Empress Matilda
Empress Matilda (c. February 1101 - 10 September 1167), sometimes referred to as Empress Maud, was the second child of Henry I of England and Matilda of Scotland. She was Queen of England for a short time in 1141. She fought against King Stephen who was the nephew of Henry I. Their argument ended when Matilda's son, Henry, was named by King Stephen as his successor at the treaty of Wallingford in 1153. This happened because Stephen's own chosen successor, his son Eutace, died in 1153.

Alfred the Great
Alfred the Great (c. 849 - 26 October 899) was king of Wessex from 871 to 899. He was the first monarch from the British Isles to style himself as 'King of the Anglo-Saxons' and so he is sometimes considered the first English king. Alfred started the Royal Navy in the 9th century.
Alfred earned the name 'the Great' by defending the kingdom from Viking invasions. Alfred was a scholar and encouraged education in the kingdom as well as improving the legal system.
He married Alswitha of Mercia, b. 852 - d. 905, known as Queen Ealswitha. She is buried at the Church of St. Lawrence in the Square, Winchester, England.
Alfred died in 899 but it is not known how he died. He was succeeded by his son, Edward the Elder.

Edward IV of England
Edward IV of England was a king of England. He was born on April 28, 1442. He was King of England from March 4, 1461 until his death on April 9, 1483.
Edward was the eldest of the four sons of Richard Plantagenet, Duke of York. The Duke of York was a very powerful man, and had a claim to the throne of England. He became more popular than the existing king, Henry VI of England, who was thought to be weak. When the duke tried to take the throne from Henry VI, the Wars of the Roses broke out. By the time Edward was eighteen, he and his brother Edmund, Earl of Rutland, who was seventeen, were old enough to take part in the fighting, and Edward turned out to be a very good soldier. He was helped by Richard Neville, 16th Earl of Warwick, a clever nobleman who fought for the Duke of York. At the Battle of Wakefield in 1460, Edward's father, and his brother Edmund, were both killed. As his father's heir, he now claimed the throne. In March 1461, he entered London with his army and was crowned king, although he was only nineteen. King Henry VI was put into prison.
For a while, Edward ruled the country well, with help from the Earl of Warwick. Then Edward met a woman called Elizabeth Woodville, whom he wanted to marry. The Earl of Warwick did not know about their romance, and he wanted King Edward to marry a foreign princess in order to make an alliance with another country, which would have made his position stronger. Elizabeth and Edward got married secretly in about 1464, and they had ten children in the nineteen years of their marriage.
When the Earl of Warwick learned of Edward's marriage, he was angry. He grew even more angry as time went on, because Elizabeth's family became powerful and the king no longer respected Warwick as he had done in the beginning. In 1459 he rebelled against the king, with help from another of Edward's younger brothers, George, Duke of Clarence; George was married to the Earl of Warwick's elder daughter, Isabel. The rebels went to France and made an alliance with Queen Margaret, who was the wife of King Henry VI. The Earl of Warwick managed to defeat King Edward in battle in 1471, and freed King Henry VI from prison. Henry was now king again, and Edward had to escape to Burgundy, while his wife and children went into hiding.
The Duke of Burgundy was married to Edward's sister Margaret, so he was willing to help raise more troops. When Edward returned to England, he defeated the Earl of Warwick in battle and killed him. Shortly afterwards, Queen Margaret and her son arrived in England. They were also defeated in battle by King Edward, and his throne was safe. To make sure of this, Edward arranged for King Henry VI to be killed.
While Edward was away in Burgundy, his wife Elizabeth had given birth to a son, Edward, who was given the title of Prince of Wales. He would be the next king. Edward ruled with help from his two brothers. George, who had once rebelled against him, was now loyal, and the youngest brother, Richard, Duke of Gloucester, had always been loyal. There were still quarrels between them and the powerful Woodville family. George and Richard also quarrelled with each other, and in the end King Edward had to put George in prison, where he died.
Edward IV died very suddenly at the age of forty. His son became King Edward V of England, but his reign did not last long. Edward's brother, Richard, thought that it would not be a good idea for a boy to be king, and he took the throne himself. No one really knows what happened to Edward's two sons, the Princes in the Tower.

Mary II of England
Mary II of England was born on April 30, 1662, and died on December 28, 1694. She was Queen of England and Ireland from February 13, 1689. She was also Queen of Scotland (as Mary II of Scotland) from April 11, 1689 until her death.

James II of England
James II of England/VII of Scotland (14 October 1633 – 16 September 1701) became King of Scots, King of England, and King of Ireland on 6 February 1685, and Duke of Normandy on 31 December 1660. He was the last Roman Catholic king of Scotland, England, or Ireland. Some of his citizens did not like his religious ideas, leading a group of them to disobey and fight against him. This was called the Glorious Revolution because no one was killed. He was not replaced by his Roman Catholic son, James Francis Edward, but by his Protestant daughter and son-in-law, Mary II and William III (William II of Scotland), who became rulers in 1689.
The belief that James, not William III or Mary II, was the one true ruler became known as Jacobitism (from Jacobus or Iacobus, Latin for James). James made one serious attempt to recover his throne when he landed in Ireland in 1689. After his defeat at the Battle of the Boyne in the summer of 1690, he returned to France, living the rest of his life under the protection of King Louis XIV. His son James Francis Edward Stuart (The Old Pretender) and his grandson Charles Edward Stuart (The Young Pretender and Bonnie Prince Charlie) attempted to restore the Jacobite line after James's death, but failed.

Henry IV of England
Henry IV (April 3 1367 – March 20 1413) was a king of England. He was born at Bolingbroke Castle in Lincolnshire. That is why he was often called "Henry Bolingbroke".
His father, John of Gaunt, was the third son of King King Edward III, and had a lot of power in the reign of King Richard II.
Henry and Thomas de Mowbray, 1st Duke of Norfolk argued in 1398. King Richard ordered Henry to live outside England for ten years (with the approval of Henry's father, John of Gaunt) but Thomas de Mowbray was kicked out of England for life.
The next year John of Gaunt died, and Richard would not allow Henry to inherit Gaunt's land right away. Instead, Henry had to ask for the lands from Richard.
Henry met with the exiled Thomas Arundel, former Archbishop of Canterbury. Henry and Arundel returned to England while Richard was on a military campaign in Ireland.
With Arundel as his advisor, Henry Bolingbroke began a military campaign, took land from those who opposed him and ordering his soldiers to destroy much of Cheshire.
Henry gained enough power and support to have himself declared King Henry IV. He imprisoned King Richard (who mysteriously died in prison) and by-passing Richard’s seven-year-old heir presumptive Edmund de Mortimer.
Henry was crowned on 13 October, 1399. It was the first time since the Norman Conquest in 1066 that the monarch made a public speech in English. Henry consulted with Parliament frequently, but was sometimes at odds with them, especially over religious matters. On Arundel's advice, Henry was the first English king to allow the burning of heretics, mainly to suppress the Lollard movement.

Anne of Great Britain
Anne of Great Britain (February 6 1665 - August 1 1714) became Queen of England, Scotland, and Ireland on March 8 1702. On May 1 1707, when England and Scotland combined into a single kingdom, Anne became the first sovereign of the Kingdom of Great Britain.

Harold Godwinson
Harold Godwinson or King Harold II of England (c. 1022 – October 14, 1066) was an English king. He ruled England after king Edward the Confessor died. He ruled from January 5 1066 until he was killed at the Battle of Hastings. Harold Godwinson was killed by an arrow shot by one of William's archer's. Before Harold Godwinson became king, he swore to William, Duke of Normandy, that he would help him become king. Harold Godwinson had three brothers Tostig, Swegen and Gryth. He also had a sister called Edith.She was married to the king so he was his brother in law

Richard II of England
Richard II (January 6 1367 – February 14 1400) was the son of Edward the Black Prince, Prince of Wales, and Joan "The Fair Maid of Kent". He was born in Bordeaux and became his father's successor when his elder brother died in infancy. His father died before him, so he became king in 1377. Towards the end of his reign, Richard became a tyrant, and was removed from the throne in 1399. He died the next year.

Henry V of England
Henry V of England (September 16, 1387 - 31 August 31, 1422) was the King of England from 1413 to 1422. He was born at Monmouth, Wales. It is not known whether he was born on 9 August 1386 or 16 September 1387.
Henry V was the son of Henry Bolingbroke, later Henry IV, and Mary de Bohun, who died before Bolingbroke became king.
During his reign, Henry increased his power as King of England and also took the title of King of France, over which English kings had been fighting for decades. He defeated the French at the famous Battle of Agincourt in 1415.

Abu Bakr
Abū Bakr (c. 573–August 23 634/13 AH) was the first Muslim ruler after the Prophet Muhammad (632–634). While Sunnis regard him as his rightful successor ("caliph"), chosen by the people. The Shi'a Islam insist that he violated Muhammad's direct orders and made a Coup d'état. International lists have him as the first Muslim Caliph.

SG Essen
The SG Essen (German: Startgemeinschaft Essen) is a swimming club in Essen (North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany). It is a union of the swimming sections of 13 sports clubs. The SG Essen is one of the most successful swimming clubs in West Germany. The women's team is in the first Bundesliga (national league), the men's team in the second.
The SG Essen's breaststroke swimmers are well known: Mark Warnecke, Anne Poleska, and Rebecca Horstmann. The chief trainer is Horst Melzer.

Licensed to Ill
"Licensed to Ill" is the first album of the Beastie Boys, released on November 1986.

Athelstan
Athelstan (c. 895–October 27, 939), called the Glorious, was the King of England from 924 to 939. He was the son of King Edward the Elder. Athelstan's reign is sometimes overlooked but it was of great importance to political developments in the 10th century.
Athelstan was the son of Edward the Elder, and grandson of Alfred the Great. His father succeeded, after some difficulty, to the Kingdom of the Anglo-Saxons formed by Alfred. His father had also been the King of Mercia. When Edward died Athelstan quickly became King of Mercia but he was not immediately accepted as King of England. His borther, Ælfweard, had more support in England but died soon after Edward. This made it easier for Athelstan to become king.
For Athelstan it was very important to have many allies. A year after his crowning he married one of his sisters to the viking King of York, Sithric. However, Sihtric died only a year later, and Athelstan took the opportunity to take Northumbria. This move made him king of more territory than any Anglo-Saxon king before him, roughly the same as modern England. Historical records indicate that the other rulers in Great Britain accepted him as king at Bamburgh around this time.
Athelstan died at Gloucester in 939 and was succeeded by his half-brother, Edmund I.

Firefly (TV series)
"Firefly" is an American science fiction television series. It first aired in the United States and Canada on September 20, 2002. It is set in the future, but also has many things about it which would be expected in a story of the American Old West. This combination of past and future gives a unique science fiction setting for the story. It was created by writer and director Joss Whedon, creator of "Buffy the Vampire Slayer" and "Angel". He created it with his production company, Mutant Enemy. Whedon was the executive producer, along with Tim Minear.
"Firefly" was first broadcast on the FOX network. It was cancelled after only eleven of the fourteen episodes were shown. Even though the show did not last long, it sold very well when it was released onto DVD and had great fan support. Because of this, Whedon and Universal Pictures made a movie based on the series, titled "Serenity". The movie was named after the fictional spaceship in the show. It won an Emmy in 2003 for "Outstanding Special Visual Effects for a Series".
The series is set in 2517 AD. It follows the adventures of the crew of "Serenity", a "Firefly"-class spaceship. The cast play the nine characters who live on "Serenity". Whedon described the show as "nine people looking into the blackness of space and seeing nine different things". The show looks at the changing lives of people who fought on the losing side of a civil war. It also shows the pioneer culture that is on the edges of their star system. It is a future where the only two superpowers, the United States and China, joined to create a single government. This government was called the "Alliance". This also caused the two cultures to blend into each other. Whedon said that nothing has changed in the future. There are more people with better technology, but they still have the same problems politically, morally and ethically.
Creation.
Whedon came up with the idea for the show after reading "The Killer Angels", a novel about the Battle of Gettysburg during the American Civil War. He wanted to follow people who had fought on the losing side of a war. He wanted to look at their lives after the war on the edges of civilization. It was meant to be the kind of drama with a lot of people trying to figure out their lives in a pioneer environment. Whedon wanted to have a show that was about when life was physical and things did not come easy to people. Whedon was also very interested in science fiction and wanted to make something for television that was character-driven and dirty.
For the name of the show, Joss Whedon wanted something that had strength and movement. He felt that the word "firefly" had both. The fact that it was also something small with a powerful name made him like it more. From there, he created the ship in the image of a firefly.
Format.
While making the first episode, Whedon was arguing with FOX that the show should be shown in widescreen format. Because of this, he filmed scenes with actors on the edge of both sides so that they would have to show it that way. However, the pilot was turned down by the FOX executives. They thought that it did not have enough action. They also did not like the captain. FOX told Whedon on a Friday afternoon that he had to make a new script by Monday morning or they would not do it. Whedon and Tim Minear spent the weekend writing a new episode, "The Train Job". In this new episode, the captain was more "happy" and they added "larger than life" characters. These characters were the henchman "Crow", and the "hands of blue" men, that also introduced a "X-Files"-type ending.
Set design.
Production designer Carey Meyer built the ship "Serenity" in two parts. It was built as a complete set. It had ceilings and working lights built in as part of the set that the cameras could use. It also had movable parts. This helped with moving the camera around inside the set. There were other good things about this set design. One was that it let the people watching feel that they were really in a ship. For Whedon, the design of the ship was very important. It defined the known space for the viewer. He wanted to show that it was simple and that it was "beat-up but lived-in and ultimately, it was home". Each room had a feel to it, usually shown by the paint color.
Their small budget was a reason to use the ship for much of telling the story. When the characters did go off of the ship, the worlds all had Earth atmosphere and colors. They could not afford to build alien worlds.
Music.
The theme song, "The Ballad of Serenity", was written by Joss Whedon and performed by Sonny Rhodes. Whedon wrote the song before the series was approved by Fox. An early recording done by Whedon can be found on the DVD release.
The soundtrack to the series was released on CD on November 8, 2005 by Varèse Sarabande. The musical score matches the blending of cultures in the show. Cowboy guitar blended with an Asian feel was the musical background for the series. Greg Edmonson wrote the music for the series. He said that he wrote for the emotion of the moment.
Casting.
In casting his nine-member crew, Whedon looked first at the actor and how they got along with others. All nine cast members were chosen before filming began. However, while filming the original pilot "Serenity", Whedon saw that the actress cast as Inara Serra (Rebecca Gayheart) was not right for the role.Morena Baccarin auditioned for the role and two days later was on the set in her first television show.
Whedon asked Nathan Fillion to play the lead role of Malcolm Reynolds. After telling him the idea for the show and showing him the pilot, Fillion wanted the role. Fillion was called back several times to read for the part before he was cast.
Alan Tudyk auditioned and was told to come back in to test with the possible Zoes (the character's wife). It was down to him and one other person. The Zoes did not work out and Tudyk was sent home. He got a call telling him he had the part anyway.
Veteran science fiction-fantasy actress Gina Torres ("The Matrix Reloaded", ') did not at first want to do another science fiction show, but "was won over by the quality of the source material." As she recalled, "So you had these challenged characters inhabiting a challenging world and that makes for great storytelling. AND NO ALIENS!"
Adam Baldwin grew up watching westerns. The character of Jayne Cobb was a role that was perfect for him.
Canadian actress Jewel Staite has been an actress since age nine. She videotaped her audition from Vancouver. she was asked to come to Los Angeles to meet Whedon, where she was cast for the role of Kaylee Frye, the ship's engineer.
Sean Maher remembers reading for the part and liking the character of Simon Tam. He said it was Whedon's personality and vision that "sealed the deal" for him. For the role of Simon's sister, Whedon called in Summer Glau for an audition and test the same day. Glau had first worked for Whedon on an episode of "Angel". Two weeks later Whedon called her to tell her she had the part. This was Glau's first speaking role.
The veteran television actor Ron Glass ("Barney Miller", "All in the Family"), has said that until "Firefly", he had not thought about a science-fiction western role but he fell in love with the pilot script and the character of Shepherd Book.
Back story.
The series takes place in the year 2517, on several planets and moons. The TV series does not say if these are in one star system. The movie "Serenity" makes clear that all the planets and moons are in one large system. The characters refer to "Earth-that-was" and in the movie, it is said that long before the events in the series a large population had left from Earth to a new star system: "Earth that was could no longer sustain our numbers, we were so many." The people settled in this new star system, with "dozens of planets and hundreds of moons." Many of these were terraformed, a process in which a planet or moon is altered to resemble the Earth. The terraforming process was only the first step in making a planet livable. Only the most central planets got more treatment. This caused many of the border planets and moons to have environmentsthat fit the Western setting.
Synopsis.
The show takes its name from the "Firefly"-class spaceship "Serenity" that the main characters call home. It looks like the lightning bug, Firefly in shape. Its tail section even lights up during acceleration.
The Alliance is shown to control the star system through an organization of "core" planets. DVD commentary suggests that two main "core" planets make up the Alliance. One is mostly Occidental in culture, the other is Asian. This explains the series' mixed linguistic and visual themes. The central planets are under Alliance control, but the outer planets and moons resemble the 19th century American West, with little government control. Settlers people on the outer worlds have relative freedom from the central government. The outer areas also have Reavers, a cannibalistic race.
The captain of the crew of "Serenity" is Malcolm "Mal" Reynolds (Nathan Fillion). The episode "Serenity" shows that the captain and his first mate Zoe Washburne (Gina Torres) are veteran "Browncoats" of the civil war. A later episode, titled "Out of Gas", shows that Mal bought the spaceship "Serenity" to continue living beyond Alliance control. Much of the crew's work is made up of cargo runs or smuggling. One of the main story arcs is that of River Tam (Summer Glau) and her brother Simon (Sean Maher). River was a child prodigy. Her brain was experimented on. She seems to have schizophrenia and often hears voices. It is later found out that she is a "reader", someone with psychic abilities. Simon gave up a very good career as a surgeon to save her from the Alliance. They join the crew in the original "Serenity". Because of this rescue, they are both wanted criminals.
Signature show elements.
"Firefly" takes place in a multi-cultural future. Because of this, Mandarin Chinese is a common second language. It is used in advertisements, and characters in the show often use Chinese words and curses.
The show also has slang not used in today's culture. There are changes to modern words, or new words ("shiny" is a synonym of "cool"). The Japanese katakana and an Old West dialect are also used.
One of the problems that Whedon had with FOX was the tone of the show, especially with the main character Malcolm Reynolds. FOX wanted Whedon to make his character more "jolly". They felt he was too dark in the original pilot.
Main characters.
"Firefly" had an ensemble cast that played the nine crew members of the ship, "Serenity". These characters fight criminals, Alliance security forces, the insane Reavers, and the mysterious men with "hands of blue" - who seem to work for a secret agency which is part of the huge corporation, The Blue Sun Corporation. The crew needs to get enough income to keep their ship working. While doing this, they must stay hidden from people looking for them.
All nine major characters are in every episode, with one exception: Book is absent from "Ariel".

Henry II, Holy Roman Emperor
Saint Henry II (972 – 13 July 1024), called the Holy or the Saint, was the fifth and last Holy Roman Emperor of the Saxon or Ottonian dynasty.

Conrad II, Holy Roman Emperor
Conrad II (c. 990 – June 4, 1039) was the son of Count Henry of Speyer and Adelheid of Alsace. He was elected king in 1024 and crowned emperor of the Holy Roman Empire on March 26, 1027, the first emperor of the Salian Dynasty.
During his reign, he proved that the German monarchy had become strong enogh that it no longer depended on contracts between king and dukes alone.

Otto I the Great
Otto I the Great (November 23 912 – May 7 973), son of Henry I the Fowler, king of the Germans, and Matilda of Ringelheim, was Duke of the Saxons, King of the Germans and Holy Roman Emperor.

Edward III of England
Edward III (13 November 1312 – 21 June 1377) was one of the most successful English monarchs of the Middle Ages. He ruled for 50 years.
He made England the strongest military power in Europe.
Edward was crowned when he was fourteen years old, after his father was forced to resign. After his victory against the Scots, he declared himself heir to the French throne in 1337 and so started the Hundred Years' War. The war went very well for England; the victories of Crécy and Poitiers led up to the Treaty of Brétigny by which he gained a lot of territory. When he became older, he was much less active mostly a result of his bad health.
Edward also established the Order of the Garter, and developed of legislature and government. But during his reign there was the Black Death.
In his own time and for centuries after Edward III was praised a lot. But by Whig historians he was seen as an irresponsible adventurer. This view has turned, and modern historians see what a good king he was.

Harold Wilson
James Harold Wilson, Baron Wilson of Rievaulx, KG, OBE, FRS, PC (March 11 1916 – May 24 1995) was one of the most prominent British politicians of the 20th century. He won more elections than any other 20th century Prime Minister of the United Kingdom (in 1964, 1966, February and October 1974) — but only once with a clear majority (1966).

Labour Party (UK)
The Labour Party has been, since its founding in the early 20th century, the principal political party of the left in the United Kingdom. It is currently the party of government in the United Kingdom and the Welsh Assembly. It was in power in the Scottish Parliament (in coalition with the Scottish Liberal Democrats) until 2007, and is the second largest grouping on the London Assembly, although the Mayor of London until May 2008 was a Labour party member. It is also the 2nd largest party in Local Government and the 2nd largest UK party in the European Parliament.
History.
The party was officially formed in 1906, just after the general election, as a successor of the Labour Representative Committee formed in 1900. In 1918, the party made a new constitution with the commitment to socialism, or the socialization of the industry. This could be found in Clause 4.
The Labour Party won the general election in 1945 for the first time. From 1951 Labour was in opposition for thirteen years, during which there were serious fights between the left and right wings of the party. The leader of the left wing was Aneurin Bevan. His supporters were called the Bevanites. They wanted a less confrontational policy in foreign affairs and more socialist actions. The leaders of the right wing were Clement Attlee and Hugh Gaitskell. They believed that Western capitalism had changed a lot and that socialism and public ownership was not so important. Gaitskell tried to remove Clause 4 from the party constitution at the 1959 conference, but he could not.
In 1994 Tony Blair could force the Labour Party to drop Clause 4. This was an important step to change the party into ‘New Labour’.

Henry VI of England
Henry VI (December 6, 1421 - May 21, 1471) was King of England from 1422 to 1461 and then from 1470 to 1471. He was also the King of France from 1422 to 1453.
The Child King.
Henry was the only child of King Henry V of England and was his heir. He was born on December 6, 1421 at Windsor. He became king at the age of nine months on August 31, 1422, when his father died. His mother, Catherine of Valois was then only twenty years old. Because she was the daughter of King Charles VI of France she was not allowed to have a large part in raising her son.
Humphrey, Duke of Gloucester, Henry IV's youngest son, was given the position of "Protector and Defender of the Realm and the Church" (Regent of England) until the King was old enough to rule. His job was to keep the peace and deal with Parliament. Henry IV's oldest living son, John, Duke of Bedford, was the made the Regent of France. He was in charge of running the war that was happening. Bedford also replaced Gloucester as Regent of England whenever he was in England.
Coronation.
Henry was eventually made King of England at Westminster Abbey on November 6, 1429 a month before his eighth birthday. He was made King of France at Notre Dame in Paris on December 16, 1431. He did not actually take control of government until he was of age in 1437 - the year his mother died.
Henry's marriage to Margaret of Anjou.
Because of his success in the Hundred Years' War, Henry V had left England with a lot of land in France. Since Henry VI was still a child, and England was ruled by a Regent, much of the land his father gained was lost. Diplomatic mistakes as well as military failures caused the loss of most of the English land in France.
Henry VI was a deeply spiritual man. He did not have the wisdom needed to rule effectively. He let his court be controlled by a few noble favorites. The people who wanted to end the war in France became more powerful, while the people supporting the war were ignored.
Henry VI was told that the best way of get peace with France was to marry Charles VII’s niece, Margaret of Anjou. Henry agreed to send people to talk with King Charles. Charles agreed to the marriage as long as he would not have to give the customary dowry and if he would get the lands of Maine and Anjou from the English. Henry V agreed, but did not let parliament know about giving away Maine and Anjou. The English people would not be happy to know the lands were given away.
The marriage happened in 1445. Margaret was much the opposite of Henry. She was ready to take decisions and lead while he was happy to be led by her. Margaret was a better ruler than Henry ever was, even though she was only sixteen at that time.
Death and legacy.
Henry VI was imprisoned in the Tower of London, where he was murdered on May 21, 1471. Popular legend said that Richard, Duke of Gloucester was guilty of his murder, as well as the murder of Henry VI's son Edward of Westminster.
King Henry VI was originally buried in Chertsey Abbey. In 1485, his body was moved to St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle.
He was succeeded by Edward IV, son of Richard, Duke of York.

Edward II of England
Edward II (April 25 1284–1327) of Caernarfon, was King of England from 1307 until he was removed from the throne in January, 1327. His tendency to ignore his nobility, in favour of low-born favorites, led to political trouble and eventually to his removal from the throne. He is most remembered for a story about his alleged murder, which was linked to his reliance on the corrupt family of Hugh le Despenser, which has been seen by some as evidence of his homosexuality.

Richard III of England
Richard III (1452-1485) was an English king. He reigned from 1483 until 1485.
Richard was the youngest son of Richard, Duke of York. He had three elder brothers, Edward, Edmund and George. Richard, Duke of York, and his second son, Edmund, were both killed in battle during the Wars of the Roses. The eldest son, Edward, was a very good soldier, and won the throne of England in battle against the reigning king, King Henry VI. Edward then became King Edward IV of England and his two brothers, George and Richard, became very powerful men.
Richard married Anne Neville, whose father had once been a friend of the family. Richard and Anne had known each other since they were children, but Anne had been taken to France, where she had married the Prince of Wales, the son of Henry VI. When the Prince of Wales was killed in battle, Anne became a widow, and soon she was married to Richard, even though he had been her husband's enemy. Richard and Anne lived at Middleham Castle in the north of England. They had one son, who was named Edward after Richard's brother, King Edward. Richard quarrelled frequently with his brother George, who was married to Anne's sister, Isabel. George was a trouble-maker, and he made his brother, King Edward, so angry that he was put in prison, where he died.
King Edward married a woman called Elizabeth Woodville, who had a big family. Soon her family were very rich, and were taking all the powerful positions in the country. Edward and Elizabeth had several children, including two sons, who were named Edward and Richard.
When King Edward died, his elder son Edward should have been the next king, but he was still a boy. Richard had been asked by his brother the king to look after the two boys. He was worried that the new young king would not be able to rule the country properly. He was also worried that the Woodville family would soon be telling the king what to do and ruling the country for themselves.
Richard took the throne from his nephew, Edward V, and sent Edward and his brother to the Tower of London. They were both probably murdered. At the time, many people believed that King Richard had ordered them to be killed, but no one is really sure what happened to them.
There has been a lot of discussion, over many years, about whether Richard III was a good king or a bad king. During his reign, which lasted only two years, he was very popular in parts of the country, especially the north of England (where he was born). However, there were enough people who hated him to make sure that his enemies were able to raise a big army against him and defeat him in battle.
Richard was killed at the Battle of Bosworth in 1485. He was the last English king to die in battle. Henry Tudor succeeded him.

Henry I the Fowler
Henry I the Fowler (German: "Heinrich der Finkler" or "Heinrich der Vogler"; Latin: "Henricius Auceps") (876 – 2 July 936) was the duke of Saxony from 912 and king of the Germans from 919 until his death. He was the first of the Ottonian Dynasty of German kings and emperors and therefore he is generally considered to be the founder and first king of the medieval German state, that was known until then as East Francia. As he was an eager hunter, he was called "the Fowler" because it was said he fixed birding nets when messengers arrived to inform him that he was to be king.

The Offspring (album)
"The Offspring" is the debut album by the band of the same title. It was originally on vinyl in 1989 under the label Nemesis Records and it was re-released on CD in 1995 on Epitaph Records.

Saparmurat Niyazov
Saparmurat Niyazov (February 19, 1940 - December 21, 2006) was the first President of Turkmenistan. He served from 1993 to 2006. Saparmurat Niyazov also called himself Türkmenbaşy, which means leader of the Turkmen people. He tried to make a cult of personality, which means that he put many pictures and statues of himself around his country to make himself seem important. While he was president, Niyazov made doing many things against the law, such as growing a beard or ballet dancing. He died from a heart attack on December 21, 2006, and Gurbanguly Berdimuhammedow became the new president of Turkmenistan.

Denver Broncos
The Denver Broncos are a American football team in the National Football League. They are in the American Football Conference. Their quarterback is Jay Cutler. The Broncos play in Denver, Colorado.
The Denver Broncos won the Super Bowl in 1997 and 1998. Their most famous player is John Elway.

Indianapolis Colts
The Indianapolis Colts are a American football team in Indianapolis, Indiana. They play in the National Football League. They were originally the Baltimore Colts. The team moved to Indianapolis in 1984. Their quarterback is Peyton Manning.

Edward the Martyr
King Edward the Martyr or Eadweard II (c. 962 – March 18, 978/979) followed his father Edgar as King of England in 975, but was murdered after a reign of only a few years.
He was declared a holy martyr that means canonised as "Saint Edward the Martyr" in 1001. That seemed fair as Edward was thought to be a good Christian and it was thought that the murderers were "irreligious" men.
Motive and details of his murder.
Edward's stepmother, Queen Elfrida was against his accession to the throne as she wished her son, Ethelred, to become king instead. But Edward was supported by more people - including St Dunstan - and was confirmed by the Witan.
King Edward was said to be "a young man of great devotion and excellent conduct. He was completely Orthodox, good and of holy life. Moreover, he loved above all things God and the Church. He was generous to the poor, a haven to the good, a champion of the Faith of Christ, a vessel full of every virtuous grace."
On King Edward's accession to the throne there was a great famine in the land and violent attacks were stirred up against monasteries by a prominent noblemen who wanted the lands which his father King Edgar had endowed to them. Many of these monasteries were destroyed, and the monks forced to flee. But the King stood firm together with archbishop Dunstan to defend the Church and the monasteries. For this, some of the nobles decided to remove him and replace him with his younger brother Ethelred.
"Edward was treasonably slain by his own family... it is reported that his stepmother, that is the mother of King Ethelred, stabbed him with a dagger while she was in the act of offering him a cup to drink."
History of his relics.
The story of the relics of St Edward began at the moment of his death (martyrdom). Immediately following the murder, the body of the murdered king slipped from the saddle of his horse and was dragged with one foot in the stirrup until it fell into a stream at the base of the hill upon which Corfe Castle stands (From that time people thought that the stream had healing properties - particularly for the blind). The queen then ordered that the body be quickly hidden in a hut nearby. Within the hut however, there lived a woman blind from birth whom the queen supported out of charity. During the night, a wonderful light appeared and filled the whole hut and struck with awe, the woman cried out: "Lord, have mercy!" and suddenly received her sight. At this she discovered the dead body of the king. The church of St. Edward at Corfe Castle now stands on the site of this miracle. At dawn the queen learned of the miracle and was troubled and again ordered the disposal of the body, this time by burying it in a marshy place near Wareham. But a year after the murder a column of fire was seen over the place where the body was hidden, lighting up the whole area. This was seen by some of the inhabitants of Wareham, who raised the body. Immediately a clear spring of healing water sprang up in that place. Accompanied by what was now a huge crowd of mourners, the body was taken to the church of the Most Holy Mother of God in Wareham and buried at the east end of the church. This took place on February 13, 980.
Because of a series of following miracles, the relics were brought to the abbey at Shaftesbury. When the relics were taken up from the grave, they were found to be whole and not destroyed. The transport of the relics was done in a great procession on February 13, 981 and arrived at Shaftesbury seven days later. There the relics were received by the nuns of Shaftesbury Abbey and were buried with full royal honours on the north side of the altar. On the way from Wareham to Shaftesbury, a further miracle had also taken place; two crippled men were brought close to the bier and those carrying it lowered the body to their level, and the cripples regained full health at once. (This procession and these events were re-enacted 1000 years later in 1981). In 1001 the tomb in which the saint lay was said regularly to rise from the ground. King Ethelred was filled with joy at this and instructed the bishops to raise his brother's tomb from the ground and place it into a more fitting place. As the tomb was opened a wonderful fragrance issued from it - such that all present "thought that they were standing in Paradise". The bishops then took away the sacred relics from the tomb, and placed them in a casket in the holy place of the Saints together with other holy relics. This elevation of the relics of St. Edward took place on June 20, 1001.
St. Edward was officially glorified by the All-English Council of 1008, presided over by St. Alphege, archbishop of Canterbury (who was later also martyred by the Danes in 1012). King Ethelred ordered that the saint's three feast days (March 18, February 13 and June 20) should be celebrated throughout England. Shaftesbury Abbey was rededicated to the Mother of God and St. Edward. Shaftesbury was apparently renamed "Edwardstowe", only reverting to its original name after the Reformation. Many miracles were recorded at the tomb of St. Edward, including the healing of lepers and the blind.
During the sixteenth century, under King Henry VIII, monasteries were dissolved and many holy places were demolished, but St. Edward's remains were hidden so as to avoid desecration. In 1931, the relics were recovered by Mr. Wilson-Claridge during an archaeological excavation; their identity was confirmed by Dr. T.E.A. Stowell, an osteologist. In 1970, examinations performed on the relics suggested that the young man had been knifed in the back whilst riding his horse and had then been dragged along the ground by the terrified animal with his foot caught in a stirrup. In about 1982, Mr. Wilson-Claridge donated the relics to the Russian Orthodox Church Outside Russia, which placed them in a church in Brookwood Cemetery, in Woking, Surrey. The St. Edward Brotherhood of monks was organized there as well. The church is now named St Edward the Martyr Orthodox Church. Orthodox Christians recognize Edward and other Westerners whose sainthood was declared before the formal split between Orthodox and Catholics in the 11th century.

John Major
Sir John Major (born March 29, 1943) KG, CH is a British politician who was Prime Minister of the United Kingdom from 1990 to 1997. He was also a member of the Cabinets of Margaret Thatcher as Chief Secretary to the Treasury, Foreign Secretary and Chancellor of the Exchequer. He retired from the House of Commons at the 2001 general election of the United Kingdom.

Spencer Perceval
Spencer Perceval (November 1, 1762 – May 11, 1812) was a British statesman and Prime Minister. He is the only British Prime Minister to have been assassinated (shot dead).
Perceval was the seventh son of John Perceval, 2nd Earl of Egmont by his second wife. His father, a close friend of Frederick, Prince of Wales and King George III, had served in the Cabinet as First Lord of the Admiralty, but died when Perceval was ten.
Perceval was Prime Minister when William Wilberforce passed his Bill (law) ending the slave trade.
The Orders in Council against trade which Perceval had written in 1807 became unpopular. In the winter of 1811 the Luddite riots started. They were also a cause of the War of 1812 with the United States of America. Perceval was forced to have an inquiry by the House of Commons. On May 11, 1812, Perceval was on his way to attend the inquiry. In the lobby of the House of Commons he was was shot through the heart John Bellingham. Perceval's body lay in 10 Downing Street for five days before burial. Bellingham gave himself up straight away. Tried for murder, he was found guilty and hanged a week later.
Perceval is buried at St Luke's Church in Charlton, south-east London.

Nelson Rockefeller
Nelson Aldrich Rockefeller (July 8, 1908 – January 26, 1979) was an American politician and businessman. He was from one of the richest and most powerful families in the United States, The Rockefellers. He was Governor of New York from 1959 to 1973. He tried many times to become President of the United States. The closest he came to being President was being chosen as Vice-President in 1974 under Gerald Ford.

Ban Ki-moon
Ban Ki-moon (born June 13 1944 in Eumseong, North Chungcheong, Korea) is a South Korean former politician. He became the Secretary-General of the United Nations on January 1, 2007, after Kofi Annan.
Ban was the Foreign Minister of the Republic of Korea (South Korea) from January 2004 to November 1 2006. On October 13 2006, he was elected to be the eighth Secretary-General by the United Nations General Assembly; he was sworn in on December 14, 2006.
Education.
Ban received his bachelor's degree in International Relations from Seoul National University in 1970 and earned a Master of Public Administration from the John F. Kennedy School of Government at Harvard University in 1985.
Personal.
Ban is married, and he has a son and two daughters. His native language is Korean, but he also speaks English and French.
Ban met U.S. President John F. Kennedy in Washington, D.C. after winning an English language competition in the early 1960s while he was in high school. The competition was organised by the American Red Cross. He has said that it was after this meeting that he wanted to become a diplomat.
Career.
Ban joined the Ministry of Foreign Affairs in May 1970 and worked his way up during the years of the Yusin Constitution.
His first overseas posting was to New Delhi. After that, he worked in the United Nations Division at the foreign ministry's headquarters. At the time of Park Chung Hee's assassination, Ban was First Secretary at South Korea's Permanent Observer Mission to the UN in New York City (South Korea only became a full UN member state on September 17 1991). He subsequently assumed the post of Director of the United Nations Division. He has been posted twice to the Republic of Korea (ROK) Embassy in Washington, D.C. Between these two assignments he served as Director-General for American Affairs in 1990 – 1992. He was promoted to the position of Deputy Minister for Policy Planning and International Organizations in 1995. He was then appointed National Security Advisor to the President in 1996, and assumed the office of Vice Minister in 2000. His most recent post was as Foreign Policy Advisor to the President Roh Moo-hyun.
While he served as Ambassador to Austria, Ban was elected as Chairman of the Preparatory Commission for the Comprehensive Nuclear-Test-Ban Treaty Organization (CTBTO PrepCom) in 1999. During the ROK's Presidency of the 56th Session of the United Nations General Assembly (GA) in 2001, he worked as Chef de Cabinet of the President of the GA.
Ban has been very involved in issues relating to inter-Korean relationships. In 1992, he served as Vice Chairman of the South-North Joint Nuclear Control Commission, following the adoption by South and North Korea of the Joint Declaration of the Denuclearization of the Korean Peninsula. In September 2005, as Foreign Minister, he played a leading role in the diplomatic efforts to adopt the Joint Statement on resolving the North Korean nuclear issue at the Fourth Round of the Six-Party Talks held in Beijing.
UN Secretary-General candidacy.
In February 2006, Ban announced his candidacy to replace Kofi Annan as UN Secretary-General at the end of 2006. He was the first South Korean to run for Secretary-General. He got the most votes in each of the four straw polls conducted by the UN Security Council on July 24, 14 September, September 28 and October 2.
On September 25 2006, while these polls were taking place, Ban addressed the Asia Society in New York on his candidacy and views on major issues confronting the UN. The next day, he gave an interview to the Asia Society's "AsiaSource", where he again spoke a lot about the upcoming challenges to be faced by the UN. Earlier in the year, he had spoken to the Council on Foreign Relations in New York.
In an informal poll that took place on October 2 2006, Ban received fourteen favourable votes and one "no opinion" from the fifteen members of the Security Council; the Japanese delegation the only nation that was not in full agreement. More importantly, Ban was the only one to escape a veto, while each of the five other candidates received at least one "no" vote from the five permanent members of the council — People's Republic of China, France, Russia, the United Kingdom, and the United States. After the vote, Shashi Tharoor, who finished second, withdrew his candidacy and China's Permanent Representative to the UN told reporters that "it is quite clear from today's straw poll that Minister Ban Ki-moon is the candidate that the Security Council will recommend to the General Assembly."
On October 9, the Security Council formally chose Ban as its nominee. On October 13, the 192-member General Assembly adopted a resolution, by acclamation, appointing Ban as Secretary-General.
Awards.
Ban has been awarded the Order of Service Merit twice, once in 1975, and again in 1986, by the Government of the Republic of Korea. For his accomplishments as an envoy, he received the Grand Decoration of Honour from the Republic of Austria in 2001. A year later, the government of Brazil awarded himi the Grand Cross of Rio Branco.
In September 2005, the Korea Society in New York honoured him with the James A. Van Fleet Award for his contributions to friendship between the United States and the Republic of Korea.

Samuel Alito
Samuel Anthony Alito, Jr. (born April 1, 1950) is a judge on the Supreme Court of the United States. His position is that of Associate Justice. He is a Roman Catholic born to Italian American parents and served in the U.S. Army reserves years before joining the Supreme Court.

Once Upon a Time in America
"Once Upon a Time in America" is a 1984 movie directed by Sergio Leone and starring Robert De Niro and James Woods as Jewish gangsters. The movie was Sergio Leone's last before his death.
The movie is set at three different times;
When Leone finished making the movie it was 229 minutes (3 hours and 49 minutes) and started with an old character (Robert De Niro) remembering his past; it then showed him as a child and as a young adult. We call this flashbacks; it can happen in movie but certainly not in real life. But when it was first shown to American audiences it was made much shorter and set in chronological order; meaning the movie first showed the characters as children, then as young adults and then as older adults; or 'from start to finish'. We call this "chronological"; this is what would happen in real life. Many people agree that the longer version is much better than the shortened chronological version.

Edward the Elder
Edward the Elder (c. 874-877 - 17 July 924) was King of England from 899 until his death in 924. He was the son of Alfred the Great but had to fight his cousin, Aethelwold, to become King. He fought many battles during his time as King. Most of them were to expand his territory and to stop other groups of people becoming more powerful. He was killed in battle in 924. After his death the Kingdom of England was divided between Ælfweard and Athelstan.

Edmund I of England
Edmund I (921 - May 26 946), called the Elder, the Deed-Doer or the Magnificent, was King of England from 939 until his death. He was a son of Edward the Elder and a half-brother of Athelstan.
While he ruled, Edmund fought off an invasion by the King of Dublin, signed a treaty with Malcolm I of Scotland and established a policy of safe borders.
Edmund was killed fighting a thief who would not leave a royal party. He was succeeded by his brother Edred.

Sweyn I of Denmark
Sweyn I, or Sweyn Forkbeard, (c 960 - February 2, 1014), was King of Denmark from about 985 - February 2, 1014 and King of England from December 25 1013 - February 2, 1014.
Sweyn's father was Harald Bluetooth, King of Denmark. Sweyn invaded England many times between 990 and 1013, when his army took control of London on Christmas day. Sweyn briefly became King of England until he died 40 days later on February 2, 1014 after being hurt in a fall from his horse.

Edgar of England
King Edgar or Eadgar I ("c." 942–July 8, 975) was the younger son of King Edmund I of England. He won the nickname, "the Peaceable", but in fact was a stronger king than his elder brother, Edwy, from whom he took the kingdoms of Northumbria and Mercia in 958. Edgar was acclaimed king north of the Thames by a conclave of Mercian nobles in 958, but officially succeeded when Edwy died in October 959. Immediately Edgar recalled Dunstan (eventually canonised as St. Dunstan) from exile and made him successively Bishop of Worcester, then of London and finally Archbishop of Canterbury.

Roh Moo-hyun
Roh Moo-Hyun is a former President of South Korea. He was born on September 1, 1946 in Gimhae, Gyeongsangnam-do, South Korea. He took office on February 25, 2003. After retirement from Cheongwadae, he is living in Bongha Maeul, Gimhae, Gyeongsangnam-do now.

Kim Young-sam
Kim Young-sam (born December 20, 1927 in Geoje, South Gyeongsang) was the President of the South Korea from February 25, 1993 to February 25, 1998.

Roh Tae-woo
Roh Tae-woo (born December 4, 1932 in Daegu, South Korea), is the sixth President of South Korea (1988–1993). He was a former Korean general and politician. A member of the Hanahoi, Roh was the hand-picked successor of the ex-general and president Chun Doo-hwan. This caused large pro-democracy rallies in Seoul and other cities in 1987. Roh agreed to hold democratic presidential elections, making himself a candidate for the next election. The opposition split the votes between Kim Young-sam and Kim Dae-jung (both of whom later became presidents). This made Roh the first elected president after the time that the military ruled the country.
Roh's rule was notable for hosting the Seoul Olympics in 1988 and for his foreign policy of nordpolitik.
In 1993, Roh's successor Kim Young-sam led an anti-corruption campaign that saw Roh and Chun Doo-hwan on trial for bribery. The two former presidents were later charged with mutiny and treason for their part in the 1979 coup and the 1980 Gwangju Riot.
Both were found to be guilty in August 1996 of treason, mutiny and corruption. Chun was sentenced to death, later changed to life imprisonment. Roh's 22 1/2-year jail sentence was reduced to 17 years. Both were released from prison in early 1998, pardoned by then-President Kim Dae-jung.

Chun Doo-hwan
Chun Doo-hwan (born 18 January, 1931) was a Korean military officer and the President of South Korea from 1980 to 1988. He was sentenced to death in 1996. Chun was later pardoned by President Kim Young-sam with the advice of then President-elect Kim Dae-jung, who had sentenced to death by Chun some 20 years earlier.
The road to power.
Chun was a graduate of the Korean Military Academy in 1955. He was a member of Hanahoi, a powerful group of military officials that supported his actions. He was in charge of the investigation into the assassination of President Park Chung-hee. On 12 December 1979, in what became known as the Incident of December 12th, Chun ordered the arrest of Army Chief of Staff General Chung Sung Hwa (정승화, 鄭昇和) without authorization from then-President Choi Kyu-ha. He ordered the arrest as part of the investigation of his part in the assassination. Chung Sung Hwa resisted the arrest. This led to a bloody gun fight at the Army Headquarters and the Ministry of Defense. By the next morning, Chun and his fellow military academy graduates Roh Tae-woo and Jeong Ho-yong were in charge of the Korean military.
On 17 May 1980, Chun placed the entire country under martial law and disbanded the National Assembly. Many politicians were arrested, including liberal politician Kim Dae-jung. Kim was later sentenced to death in spite of protests from the United States. Later, Chun changed Kim's sentence in return for U.S. support. Protests across the nation became smaller. However, very violent prostests happened in Gwangju. Protestors Lootinglooted government building. They armed themselves with stolen guns and military jeeps. Protestors killed a couple of policemen and started of violent protest against the government. A couple of hundreds of protestors and some thirty soldiers were killed in the Gwangju. Choi resigned in August, and Chun was elected his successor by the National Conference for Unification, the South Korean electoral college, in September. In February 1981, Chun was elected president under a revised constitution as the candidate of the Democratic Justice Party (later renamed Democratic Republican Party).
Years in office.
Chun ruled in an authoritarian manner. The 1981 constitution was less authoritarian than its 1972 predecessor, the Yushin Constitution, but still granted very broad powers to the president. However, it limited the president to one seven-year term. Chun did not try to change it so he could run for reelection in 1988.
By 1986, the general public was happy with the economic growth. However, there was much anger and hatred against Chun's regime by left-wing students who later became known as 386s. The left wing students led the nationwide June 1987 protests. In the same month, U.S. President Ronald Reagan sent a letter to Chun in support of the creation of "democratic institutions." On June 29th, Roh Tae-woo announced a program of reform. This included direct presidential elections, restoration of banned politicians including Kim Dae-jung, and other liberalizing measures. This won Roh instant popularity, and he was elected as the next president of South Korea. It later became known that Chun was responsible for this plan.
During Chun's visit to Rangoon, Burma (now Myanmar) in 1983, a bomb exploded at a mausoleum he was about to visit. The bomb killed 21 people, including South Korean Cabinet members. Chun himself did not die because he got there two minutes late. While no firm evidence of North Korean involvement has been found, they are widely though to be responsible.
An embattled ex-President.
In 1996, former presidents Chun and Roh were jailed on charges of corruption. On December 16, they were also found guilty of treason and mutiny as part of their takeover of power. Chun was sentenced to death. That sentence was changed to a life sentence. He and Roh were pardoned a year later.

Choi Kyu-ha
Choi Kyu-hah (July 16, 1919 – October 22, 2006) (also spelled Choi Kyu-ha) was the President of South Korea between 1979 and 1980. He was born in the town of Wonju, located in the Gangwon province. He was foreign minister of South Korea from 1967 to 1971 and prime minister from 1975 to 1979.
After the assassination of Park Chung Hee in 1979, Choi, the prime minister of South Korea at the time, took power. Because of the unrest of Park's authoritarian rule, Choi promised a new constitution and democratic elections (many thought that the elections led by Park were flawed). He won a December election later that year to become the country's fourth president.
In December 1979, Major General Chun Doo-hwan and close allies in the military staged a military coup against Choi's government. They quickly removed the army chief of staff and by early 1980 virtually controlled the government.
In April 1980, because of increasing pressure from Chun and other politicians, Choi appointed Chun as head of the Korean Central Intelligence Agency, giving him enormous power. In May, Chun declared martial law and removed all trappings of civilian government, becoming the de facto ruler of the country. By then, student protests were increasing in Seoul and Gwangju. The protests in Gwangju continued, resulting in the Gwangju Massacre, where over 200 civilians were killed within five days by Chun's military.
Choi resigned soon afterward. Chun became president on September 1, 1980. After his resignation, Choi lived quietly out of the public eye. He died on October 22, 2006.

Pak Chŏng Hŭi
Pak Chŏng Hŭi (sometimes spelled: Park Chung-hee) (November 14, 1917 – October 26, 1979) was the president of Republic of Korea from 1961 to 1979. He has been credited with the modernization of the Republic of Korea through export-led growth and developmental dictatorship. He was named one of the top 100 Asians of the Century by Time Magazine (1999). He has been severely criticized for his government's brutality, especially after 1971.
Birth.
Pak was born in Seonsan, a small town in Gumi-si(구미시), Gyeongsangbuk-do(경상북도) near Daegu(대구). He was the seventh child from a family of modest means. His father was Park Seong-bin (age 46 at the time) and his mother was Baek Nam-hui (age 45).
Pak came from an undistinguished local branch of Goryeong Bak descent group.
Pak won admission to Daegu Teacher's College through a competitive examination. He entered on April 8, 1932 and graduated on March 25, 1937, after five years of study. His formative years coincided with the Japanese invasion of China, starting with the Manchurian incident in 1931 and culminating in all-out war in 1937.
He went on to teach for several years in Mungyeong, where the school has been preserved as a museum.
Military career.
Pak won admission to a two-year training program in Manchukuo, the Japanese puppet state in Manchuria. Under the Japanese policy of sōshi-kaimei, he adopted the Japanese-style name Takaki Masao (高木正雄). He graduated from the Japanese Manchurian military academy at the top of his class in 1944. He then was selected for another two years of training at the Imperial Military Academy in Tokyo.
Pak had served as a lieutenant in the Kantogun, part of the Imperial Japanese Army, in Manchuria, fighting Mao Zedong's Chinese Communist forces. Although the Kantogun also carried out actions against Korean guerrillas, it's improbable that Pak participated in such action since there were no Korean guerrillas in the region at the time of his brief deployment.
Post World War II.
In the aftermath of Japan's defeat in World War II, under his communist elder brother's influence, Pak joined a communist group, the South Korean Workers' Party, in the American occupation zone, which later became South Korea. Pak was involved in a rebellion in Yeosu and Suncheon, Jeollanam-do, led by units of the new American-supported army. Pak was arrested and sentenced to death, but released soon after revealing the names of communist participants to the South Korean authorities. He was then released and left the army in dishonor. However; the outbreak of the Korean War enabled him to be reinstated, and he served the new country fighting against the communists.
Ascension to presidency.
Syngman Rhee, the first president of the Republic of (South) Korea, was forced out of office on April 26, 1960 as an aftermath of the April 19 Movement, a student-led uprising. A new government took office on August 13. This was a short-lived period of parliamentary rule in South Korea with a figurehead president, Yun Po-son, in response to the authoritarian excesses and corruption of the Rhee administration. Real power rested with Prime Minister Chang Myon.
Yun and Chang did not command the respect of the majority of the Democratic Party. They could not agree on the composition of the cabinet and Chang attempted to hold the tenuous coalition together by reshuffling cabinet positions three times within five months.
Political background.
Meanwhile, the new government was caught between an economy that was suffering from a decade of mismanagement and corruption by the Rhee presidency and the students who had led to Rhee's ouster. The students were regularly filling the streets, making numerous and wide-ranging demands for political and economic reforms. Law and order could not be maintained because the police, long an instrument of the Rhee government, were demoralized and had been completely discredited by the public. Continued factional wrangling caused the public to turn away from the party.
Coup d'état.
Seizing the moment, then-Major General Pak Chŏng Hŭi led a bloodless military coup (called the 5.16 Revolution) on May 16, 1961, a coup largely welcomed by a general populace exhausted by political chaos. Although Chang resisted the coup efforts, President Yun sided with the junta and persuaded the United States Eighth Army and the commanders of various South Korean army units not to interfere with the new rulers.
The Korean Central Intelligence Agency (KCIA) was created on June 19, 1961 to prevent a countercoup and to suppress all potential enemies domestic and international. It was to have not only investigative power, but also the power to arrest and detain anyone suspected of wrongdoing or harboring anti-junta sentiments. The KCIA extended its power to economic and foreign affairs under its first director, Colonel (retired) Kim Jong-pil, a relative of Pak and one of the original planners of the coup.
Yun remained in office to provide legitimacy to the regime, but resigned on March 22, 1962. Pak Chŏng Hŭi was the real power as chairman of the Supreme Council for National Reconstruction. Following pressure from the Kennedy administration in the United States, a civilian government was restored, with Pak narrowly winning the 1963 election as the candidate of the newly-created Democratic Republican Party over Yun, candidate of the Civil Rule Party. He was re-elected in 1967, again defeating Yun by a narrow margin.
Economic reform.
Pak is generally credited as playing a pivotal role in the development of South Korea's economy by shifting its focus to export-oriented industrialization. When he came to power in 1961, South Korean per capita income was only USD 72, and North Korea was regarded as the greater economic and military power on the peninsula because North Korea was industrialized under the Japanese régime due to its geographical proximity to Manchuria and merit in terms of natural resources, and managed to rebuild after heavy bombing by the Americans during the Korean War. During Pak's tenure, per capita income increased twentyfold, and South Korea's rural, undeveloped economy was transformed into an industrial powerhouse. Even Kim Tae Jung, one of Pak's most prominent opponents during his rule, has retrospectively praised him for his role in creating the modern-day South Korea.
The strength of Pak's leadership was evidenced by the remarkable development of industries and rise in the standard of living of average South Korean citizens during his presidency. Many still question Pak's judgment, however, as his 1965 normalization of diplomatic relations with Japan had been extremely unpopular and resulted in widespread unrest as memories from Japan's 35-year brutal colonization of Korea proved vivid. However, by normalizing relations with Japan, Pak allowed Japanese capital to flow into the country. These aids and loans -- although criticized by many Koreans to be too meager for the 35 years of occupation by Imperial Japan -- along with American aid, helped to restore the depleted capital of South Korea. Nonetheless, it must be noted that with North Korea's economy at the time being bigger and more vibrant than that of South Korea, Pak did not have many options or much time to negotiate for more fitting reparations and apologies. This issue still plagues Japan and South Korea's relationship today.
Pak was reelected in 1967 against Yun.
Yusin Constitution.
The Constitution of 1963 barred a South Korean president from seeking a third consecutive term. However, with the assistance of the KCIA, Pak's allies in the legislature succeeded in amending the Constitution to allow the current president--himself--to run for three consecutive terms. In 1971, Pak was victorious again, this time over Kim Dae-jung in the general election.
Just after being sworn in for his third term, Pak declared a state of emergency "based on the dangerous realities of the international situation." In October 1972, he dissolved Parliament and suspended the Constitution. In December, a new constitution, the Yusin Constitution, was approved easily by the general public. The new document dramatically increased Pak's power. It transferred the election of the president to an electoral college, the National Conference for Unification. The presidential term was increased to six years, with no limits on reelection. In effect, the constitution converted Pak's presidency into a legal dictatorship. Pak was re-elected in 1972 and 1978 with no opposition.
Assassination attempts.
On January 21, 1968, a team of about 10--15 North Korean spies was secretly sent to South Korea to kill Pak. They crossed the border mountains and hijacked a bus in Seoul. No civilians were in the bus. The spies drove it towards the Blue House (the presidential residence of South Korea), where Pak was at the time. When the Korean military was informed of the presence of the North Koreans, they hurriedly went to protect the president. Armed with machine guns and grenades, the spies drove almost to the Blue House until they met South Korean soldiers. After a short grenade and gun battle, all but one spy were killed. Thirty-seven South Koreans were also killed.
On August 15, 1974, a botched assassination attempt by North Korean agent Mun Se-gwang claimed his wife, Yuk Yeong-su, instead. After this attack he finished the speech he had been giving. His wife died later that day.
Assassination.
On October 26, 1979, Pak was gunned down by Kim Jae-kyu, the director of the KCIA. Kim claimed that Pak was an obstacle to democracy and that his act was one of patriotism. After Kim shot the president to death and the leader of his guards, his agents quickly killed four more of the presidential bodyguards before the group was apprehended. The entire episode is usually either considered a spontaneous act of passion by an individual and that the actions of the other agents only occurred because the men felt loyalty to Kim and naturally followed his lead, or as part of a pre-arranged attempted coup by the intelligence service, with the latter being more widely believed.
Legacy.
It is alleged by supporters that despite his dictatorial rule and the high growth that occurred during his years in power, Pak did not engage in corruption and led a simple life. Detractors allege he was simply a brutal dictator and only brought about high growth through military control over labour.
Being a complex man as a policy maker, many Koreans continue to hold Pak in high regard in great part due to the industrial and economic growth experienced by South Korea under his presidency. But there are also many who condemn Pak for the brutality of his dictatorship and for his service to the Japanese army during World War II. Today, Pak's critics deplore the widespread human rights abuses in South Korea during his rule. However, his supporters argue that the human rights abuse accusation is mostly fabricated or exaggerated. One example of his many abuses was the kidnapping of opposition activist Kim Tae Jung. Around noon of August 8, 1973, Kim was attended a meeting with the leader of the Democratic Unification Party held in the Room 2212 of the Hotel Grand Palace in Tokyo. At around 13:19, Kim was abducted by a group of unidentified agents as he walked out of the room after the meeting. He was then taken into the empty Room 2210 where he was drugged and became unconscious. Later Kim was moved to Osaka and later to Seoul, South Korea. Kim was later quoted as saying that a weight had been attached to his feet aboard the boat heading toward Korea, indicating that the kidnappers had intended to drown Kim by throwing him into the sea. They were, however, forced to abandon this plan as the Japan Maritime Self-Defense Force began a pursuit of the kidnappers' boat. Subsequently Kim was released in Busan. He was found alive at his house in Seoul five days after the kidnapping. According to some reports U.S. Ambassador Philip Habib intervened with the South Korean government to save Kim's life.
Pak's daughter Park Geun-hye was elected the chairwoman of the conservative Grand National Party in 2004. She has resigned her post in order to prepare a presidential bid for the upcoming election.

Yun Poson
Yun Bo-seon (August 26, 1897 – July 18, 1990) was the President of South Korea from 1960 to 1962.
He was born in Asan, South Chungcheong province, Yun graduated from the University of Edinburgh in 1930. He entered politics after Japanese occupation ended in 1945, with Syngman Rhee being his mentor. In 1948, Yun was made mayor of Seoul by Rhee. A year later, he was made the Minister of Commerce and Industry. Soon, he started to disagree with Rhee's authoritarian policies. He then served as president of the Red Cross Society, before being elected to the National Assembly in 1954. A year later, he founded the opposition Democratic Party along with several others.
After Rhee's government was ousted by a student-led pro-democracy uprising, Yun was elected president on August 13, 1960. He was merely a figurehead, as South Korea had switched to a parliamentary system in response to the authoritarian excesses of Rhee's regime. After Park Chung Hee's coup in 1961, he stayed on briefly to provide legitimacy to the regime, but resigned on March 22, 1962. He opposed Park's authoritarian rule and ran for president twice in 1963 and 1967, losing each time. After receiving suspended sentences several times for anti-government activities, Yun retired from politics in 1980 and focused primarily on cultural activities until his death from diabetes and high blood pressure. He died in 1990.

Rhee Syng-man
Syngman Rhee or Lee Seungman or Yee Sung-man (March 26, 1875 – July 19, 1965) was the first president of South Korea. His presidency, from August 1948 to April 1960, remains controversial, affected by Cold War tensions on the Korean peninsula and elsewhere. Rhee was a strong anti-Communist, and led South Korea through the Korean War. His presidency ended in resignation following popular protests against a disputed election. He died in exile in Hawaii.
Early life.
Rhee was born in Whanghai Province to Rhee Kyong-sun, a member of the aristocratic Yangban family. Rhee was descended from Prince Hyo-nyong, the second son of King Taejong of Joseon. He soon became active in Korea's struggle against Japanese control. He was arrested in 1897 for demonstrating against the monarchy. After he was released in 1904 he went to the United States. He obtained several degrees, including a Ph.D. from Princeton University. He became so like an American that he began writing his name in the Western manner, with the personal name before the family name.
In 1910, he went back to Korea, which had by this time been taken over by Japan. His political actions got him into trouble with the Japanese army, and so he left for China in 1912. In 1919, all of the major pro-independence groups formed the Provisional Government in Shanghai. Rhee was elected the president, a post he held until 1925 when he was removed by the Provisional Assembly for the misuse of his authority.
Presidency.
At the end of World War 2, Rhee returned to Seoul. This was before the other independence leaders, since he was the only one well known to the Allies. In 1945, he was chosen as head of a provisional (short term) government. With the unspoken agreement of the occupation authorities, Rhee conducted a number of actions to "remove Communism". This was actually a hidden plan to remove all possible opposition to him.
Rhee was elected the first president of South Korea on 10 May, 1948 by a parliamentary vote. He defeated Kim Koo, the last president of the Provisional Government by 180 votes to 16. All the left-wing parties refused to take part in the election. On 15 August 1948, he formally took over from the US military and and became the legal power over the Korean people.
As president, Rhee took on dictatorial powers even before the Korean War started in 1950. He allowed the internal security force (headed by his right-hand man, Kim Chang-ryong) to put people in prison and torture them if they were thought to be Communists or North Korean agents. His government also directed several massacres, the most famous being on the island of Jeju. This was after an uprising by left-wing groups. While massacres did occur under governments that came after Rhee, there were not as many and less widespread.
Korean war.
Rhee made himself unpopular by telling the people in Seoul to stay in the city when the Korean War started. He had already left. His decision to cut the bridges on the Han River stopped thousands of people from escaping from the Communists. The UN and South Korean forces fought back and drove the North Koreans north towards the Yalu River. After a Chinese counterattack they UN and South Korean were pushed back to the current DMZ. Rhee became unpopular with the US and the UN for refusing to agree to a number of peace plans that would have left Korea divided. He wanted to become the leader of a united Korea with UN assistance. He tried to stop any peace plan that would not remove the northern government completely. He also argued for stronger military action to be used against China. He was annoyed because the US would not bomb China.
On January 18, 1952, Rhee declared South Korean rule over the waters around the Korean peninsula. This was an idea the same as today's exclusive economic zones. The new border, which Rhee called the "Peace Line", included Tsushima Island and the uninhabited islands named Dokdo. This led to protests from the Japanese government. They claimed that the islands were Japanese territory. Minor clashes followed, but the islands have been under South Korean administration since then.
Throughout his rule, Rhee took extra steps to keep his control over the government. In May 1952 Rhee pushed through constitutional changes which made the presidency a directly-elected position. So he could get this passed by parliament he declared martial law. He jailed the members of parliament he thought would vote against it. Rhee was subsequently elected by big majority. He regained control of parliament in the 1954 elections. He pushed through an amendment to exempt himself from the eight-year limit on presidents.
Rhee's chances for reelection during the presidential campaign of 1956 seemed small. People didn't think he should be allowed to be President three times. The main opposition candidate Shin Ik-hee drew large crowds during his campaign. Shin's sudden death while on the campaign trail, however, allowed Rhee to win the presidency with ease. The runner-up of that election, Cho Bong-am of the Progressive Party, was later charged with spying and executed in 1959.
Resignation.
By 1960, Rhee had already served three terms in office. His next victory was certain after the main opposition candidate, Cho Byeong-ok, died shortly before the March 15 elections. Rhee won with 90% of the vote. The real contest was in the race for vice president. This was held separately under the law of the time. Yi Gi-bung, who Rhee thought should take over after him, was declared the winner of an election that the opposition claimed was rigged. This created anger among groups of the Korean people. A student-led April 19 Movement forced Rhee to resign on April 26.
On April 28, a DC-4 belonging to the CIA operated Civil Air Transport took Rhee out of South Korea. This was to rescue him from the angry crowds. Kim Yong Kap, Rhee's Deputy Minister of Finance, revealed that President Rhee had taken $20 million in government money for himself. Rhee, his Austrian-born wife, Francisca Donner, and adopted son lived in exile in Honolulu, Hawaii. His son became a famous college professor and called his son Young Rhee. Young Ree later became a very famous architect and civil engineer. John Rhee, Young Rhee's son, married Ban Hae Young. On July 19, 1965, Rhee died of a stroke. His body was returned to Seoul and buried in the National Cemetery on July 27, 1965.
Legacy.
Rhee's legacy has been in considerable dispute. In general, conservative circles regard Rhee as the patriarch of the nation, while liberals tend to be critical of him.
Rhee's former residence in Seoul, Ihwajang, is currently used for the presidential memorial museum, and Woo-Nam Presidential Preservation Foundation has been set up to honour his legacy.

Liese Prokop
Liese Prokop (March 27, 1941 - December 31, 2006) was an Austrian athlete and politician. Prokop was born in Vienna, Austria. Before being married to Gunnar Prokop, her name was Liese Sykora. The two had two sons and a daughter. Prokop won the silver medal in the Pentathlon in the 1968 Summer Olympics in Mexico City. Prokop was the first female Austrian Minister for Interior affairs. She was in charge of the security of Austria, including its police force. She was a member of the ÖVP, Austrian people's party.
She died unexpectedly December 31, 2006 of a torn aorta while being taken to a hospital in St. Pölten.

Austrian People's Party
The Austrian People's Party (German: "Österreichische Volkspartei" or "ÖVP") is one of the biggest parties in Austria. Its name roughly translates to Austrian People's party. It has about 630.000 members. Its views are often center-right. This means it often has conservative views on the matters at hand. Many of its voters are Catholics. It is against moderate socialism, which is embodied by the other big party, the SPÖ.
A well-known politician, Dr. Wolfgang Schüssel is a member of this party. Former Minister of the Interior, Liese Prokop was also a member.

Social Democratic Party of Austria
The Social Democratic Party of Austria (German: "Sozialdemokratische Partei Österreichs" (often shortened to "SPÖ")) is one of the oldest political parties in Austria. Its politics are center-left. This means it has a strong stance in labour unions. The party rejects neoliberalism. They like moderate socialism and social democracy. A well known politician of this party was Bruno Kreisky.
Since the end of the Second World War, the party has been the strongest, or second-strongest party in Austria, by vote. The other party that they share this status with are the ÖVP.

Social Democratic Party of Germany
The Social Democratic Party of Germany (German Sozialdemokratische Partei Deutschlands or SPD'") is the oldest political party of Germany that still exists. There were other political parties that were older, but they no longer exist.
History.
It was founded as the General German Workers Association ("Allgemeiner Deutscher Arbeiterverein") (ADAV) on May 23rd in 1863 in Leipzig. Founder was Ferdinand Lassalle.
In 1875 the ADAV joined with the Social Democratic Workers' Party ("Sozialdemokratische Arbeiterpartei") (SDAP), which was founded in 1869 in Eisenach by August Bebel and Wilhelm Liebknecht.
The new name was the Socialist Workers' Party of Germany ("Sozialistische Arbeiterpartei Deutschlands") (SAP).
In the autumn of 1890 it took its present name.
In the years between 1875 and 1890 it was made illegal by Otto von Bismarck.
The Social democrats wanted to support the rights of workers.
In 1914 the SPD was split into two. Most members of the party supported the Kaiser and his plans for war. The other members formed the Independent Social Democratic Party of Germany ("Unabhängige Sozialdemokratische Partei Deutschland") (USPD). They were against the war.
After the monarchy fell, the SPD lead some governments of the Weimar Republic.
Later the SPD was the only party in the Reichstag who voted against the Enabling Act,("Ermächtigungsgesetz") which allowed Hitler to become dictator.
Afterwards, the Nazis banned the SPD. They arrested the leading social democrats. Many were sent to Nazi concentration camps. Others moved away to towns where they were not known. Friedrich Kellner, an organizer for the SPD in Mainz from 1920 to 1932, moved to Laubach. He wrote entries in a secret diary about the crimes of the Nazis.
After World War II, the SPD was reformed.
In the GDR (East Germany) the Soviet Union forced the SPD to join with the communist party to make the Socialist Unity Party of Germany ("Sozialistische Einheitspartei"). In Western Germany the SPD worked as a not-communist left-winged party.
First chief of the SPD after WWII was Kurt Schumacher.
The SPD lead some state governments in West Germany, but was always the leading opposition party in the Bundestag (federal parliament).
Under its parliamentary party leader Herbert Wehner the SPD joined the federal government lead by chancellor Kurt Georg Kiesinger (CDU) with the CDU and the CSU in 1966. Party chief Willy Brandt became foreign secretary and vice chancellor.
In 1969 Willy Brandt became federal chancellor. The SPD lead a coalition government with the FDP as its partner. In 1974 Helmut Schmidt became chancellor.
In 1982 the SPD lost the power of government.
Between 1998 and 2005 the SPD lead the government under chancellor Gerhard Schröder. Its partner this time was the Green Party.
In November 2005 the SPD became the junior partner in a coalition with the CDU and CSU under Angela Merkel.
Programme.
The SPD is traditionally the party of the workers in Germany.
In 1959 the SPD adopted the "Godesberger Programm", named after the town of Bad Godesburg in North Rhine-Westphalia. The SDP formally abandoned Marxism, and accepted the market economy (which means people and companies can make money and keep it themselves), but wanted to have a social balance (which means people would get help from the government if they had no job, were sick or too old to work, instead of relying on savings or charity). Companies might get subsidies to help keep people in work).
Many people thought that the government of Chancellor Schröder (1998 - 2005) changed the idea of social balance, making people rely more on savings or charity. The SPD lost a lot of members. Now there is a discussion in the SPD about new social balance policies.

Spiro Agnew
Spiro Theodore Agnew (November 9, 1918–September 17, 1996) was the 39th Vice President of the United States. He served under President Richard M. Nixon. He was also the 55th governor of the state of Maryland and the first Greek American governor in United States history.
He is most famous for his resignation in the summer of 1973 after he was under investigation for the crime of extortion, tax fraud, bribery, and conspiracy. In October he was charged with having taken bribes a little more than $100,000 while in office.
Agnew is the only U.S. Vice President in history to leave office because of criminal charges. Ten years later, in January 1983, he paid the state of Maryland almost $270,000 as a result of a civil suit that came from the bribery allegations.
Early life.
Spiro Agnew was born in the state of Maryland to Theodore Spiros Agnew, a Greek immigrant who shortened his name from Anagnostopoulos when he moved to the USA, and Margaret Akers, a native of Virginia.
Electoral history.
Baltimore County Executive, 1962
Governor of Maryland, 1966
1968 Republican National Convention (Vice Presidential tally)
United States presidential election, 1968
1972 Republican National Convention (Vice Presidential tally)
United States presidential election, 1972

The Left Party.PDS
The Left Party.PDS (in German: Die Linkspartei or Linkspartei.PDS) was a left-winged political party in Germany. After joining with another political party, it became "Die Linke", or "The Left" in 2007.
History.
After the end of the GDR in 1990, the former Socialist Unity Party of Germany "Sozialistische Einheitspartei Deutschlands" (SED) changed to the SED-PDS and later to the Partei des Demokratischen Sozialismus (PDS).
In the former GDR it was very successful in state elections and it had a small group in the federal parliament. But it always failed in Western Germany.
In the 2000s there were a lot of changes of job policy and ways of helping people in need. People that restrictions hurt the poorer and unemployed people in Germany. These reforms were made by the Social democrats SPD and the Greens, who were traditionally the left-wing parties in Germany.
Some people, who left the SPD and some people from Trade Unions founded the Electors Association for Work and Social Justice "Wahlgemeinschaft Arbeit und Soziale Gerechtigkeit" (WASG) in Western Germany. Many students.
They - and although the PDS - realized that there was no chance to win mandates in elections as concurrents. So they dicided to found a new party, Die Linkspartei.
In the last federal elections the joined the parliament, in the state of Berlin they joined the state government.
Programme.
Die Linkspartei is a left-wing party. It is the only party in the federal parliament, which believes in the need for government rules protecting jobs and people instead of letting do everything thay want.
They want to have more people employed in by government bodies instead of having private companies doing jobs for the government. They also want higher taxes the rich and those who make money from the capital marked instead of work.
They are against study fees and want to have only a Comprehensive school "gesamtschule" instead of two or three different types of further school in most German states.
Their foreign policy follows the old position of the Green Party "Bündnis 90/Die Grüne" and is strictly against any German soldiers fighting. They are still talking about allowing German soldiers to be in the peace keeping missions of the United Nations.
In the field of civil rights they copied the position of the Greens, too.

Free Democratic Party (Germany)
The Free Democratic Party or Freie Demokratische Partei, short FDP (from 1968 to 2001 F.D.P.) is a political party in Germany. Currently its position is that of free market believer. The party does not want to take away all of the social features of the German welfare state, however.
History.
Several liberal parties have existed in Germany since the 19th century.
The FDP was founded in Western Germany in September of 1945 in the state of Hamburg. It became member of the state parliament of Hamburg in the first election.
Similar liberal parties were founded in other German states, most of them successful in getting mandates.
In 1947, on March 17th, the "Demokratische Partei Deutschlands" (DPD) was founded as a whole-German liberal party by Theodor Heuss and Wilhelm Külz, but it broke down after a short while.
On December, 11th in 1948 the FDP was founded as a liberal party for Western Germany.
Chief of the party was Theodor Heuss.
In its first years the main part of the party followed a national-liberal way. Liberal in the economical field, but very conserative in most other fields.
But in every state it had its own way.
The next important man was Thomas Dehler.
The FDP was the smaller partner of the CDU under Konrad Adenauer. It was member of the Western German government from 1949 to 1966.
In 1969 the FDP returned to government. But now the FDP was partner of the Sozialdemokratische Partei Deutschlands under Willy Brandt, later Helmut Schmidt.
It changed its values. A lot of left-liberal position were leading ideas of the FDP in that time.
Civil rights and to give everyone the chance of a good education guaranteed state stipendia, no study fees any more, more higher education schools).
It changed again in 1982, when it crashed down the government on Schmidt and elected Helmut Kohl of the CDU to the new chancellor.
It became more and more a single issue party with its only interest in a low tax tarif - espially for high incomes.
It fought for study fees now and against social security. It secretary general said one day "We are the party of the best-incomes".
In 1998 it lost its power and became part of the opposition.
In some state parliaments thew FDP is still in power as junior partner of the CDU.
The party's inofficial motto is "So viel Staat wie nötig, so wenig Staat wie möglich!", meaning "as much state as necessary, as little state as possible!"

Alliance '90/The Greens
Alliance '90/The Greens (German: Bündnis 90/Die Grünen) is a political party in Germany. It was formed in 1992 by the Western German party "Die Grünen" and the Eastern German "Bündnis '90". Its main interests are ecology, civil rights, equality between men and women and the chances of immigrants in the German society. Their motto was "ecologically, basic democratic, social, without violence".
Early years.
In the 1970s, there were a lot of protests against nuclear power in Germany. The protesters had no support in the political parties in Germany. So they got the idea to found their own party.
In the election to the European Parliament of 1979, their party, the Sonstige Politische Vereinigung Die Grünen, got 3,2 %. They tried again and this time it was accepted and was founded in Karlsruhe on January 13th, 1980.
Since their aims were for civil rights and ecology, a lot of former Anti Vietnam War protesters joined the party.
The Greens were pacifists and strictly against nuclear weapons. They wanted to reach a de-militarized Europe.
Leaders.
First chiefs of the party were Herbert Gruhl and Petra Kelly. After a short while some right-winged people left the party, so they became a left-winged party.
Incluence.
In the old GDR, a Green party was founded in 1989 and joined to the Western Greens in 1990. In 1993 the Bündnis 90 - a civil rights movement from the former GDR - and Die Grünen joined them.
In 1998 they joined the federal government under Gerhard Schröder together with the Social democrats.
Problems.
The Green lost a lot of their values in that time. They voted for joining the Kosovo War and to attack Serbia in 1999 and lost their social issues. In 2005 they lost their power in the federal government.
Currently they are in opposition in the federal and all state parliaments.
Programme.
The Greens are interested in ecology, so one of their main issues is saving the earth - especially the climate - without using nuclear power.
The second main issue of the Greens is gender mainstraming.
The third issue are the integration and the chances of immigrants in Germany.
In the foreign policy the Green changed their position in their first period in federal government. Before that time they wanted German soldiers only to allow peace keeping missions of the United Nations, many Greens wanted a de-militarized Germany. After their legislative period - with main influence of foreign secretary Fischer - they accepted to join international military missions e.g. in Afganisthan. But their main issue is to avoid conflicts by developement policy and international cooperation. Main issues of foreign policy are international envoirementional and climate saving projects like the Kyoto protocoll, the developement of the European Union and a reform of the international law like the installing of the International Crime Court in The Hague.

Christian Social Union of Bavaria
The Christian Social Union of Bavaria or Christlich Soziale Union (short CSU) is a conservative political party in the German state of Bavaria.
In the federal parliament of Germany (Bundestag) the CSU and the CDU always join together.
Its chief is Erwin Huber.
History.
In 1945, two local CSU groups were founded. One in Würzburg and the other in Munich.
In January 1946 the CSU was founded for the whole of Bavaria.
All state elections of Bavaria were won by the CSU. Sometimes the CSU had to make some coalitions with the Bayernpartei (Bavarian Party), the FDP or the SPD.
In the federal government the CSU always joins with the CDU.
One very famous leader of the CSU was Franz Josef Strauß. Sometimes he was well known for the good that he did. Other times because of scandals.
Programme.
The CSU is a very conservative party according to the people of Bavaria, who mainly live in the countryside and smaller towns and villages.
Traditionally it tried to make a compromise between conservative tradition and social welfare.
Currently it leans to more free market beliefs instead of social care.

Christian Democratic Union of Germany
The Christian Democratic Union of Germany or "Christlich Demokratische Union Deutschlands (CDU)" is one of the two main right of centre political parties in Germany. It describes itself as a Christian democratic, liberal and conservative party of the centre.
In November 2005 the Federal leader of the CDU Dr Angela Merkel became the Chancellor of the Federal Republic of Germany.

Neville Chamberlain
Arthur Neville Chamberlain, (18 March 1869 – 9 November 1940) was a politician, Lord Mayor of Birmingham, Chancellor of the Exchequer and British Prime Minister from 1937 to 1940.
Early life.
Neville was born in Edgbaston, in Birmingham. His father was Joseph Chamberlain, an important politician. His half-brother (they had different mothers), Austen, also became an important politician. Neville went to Rugby school. He became interested in botany (plants),
birds and fishing. Neville also loved music and literature (reading). He studied metallurgy at Mason college, which Joseph Chamberlain later made part of the University of Birmingham. Later, he became an apprentice in an accounting company.
Neville became a successful manager in a manufacturing company. In 1911, when he was 42, the people of Birmingham elected (chose) him to be part of the city council. On the council, he had the job of planning improving the city, the same kind of work his father had done. He planned new houses for poor people. In 1915 he became Lord Mayor of Birmingham, also as his father had done. In this job he did work to improve the city, including starting the Birmingham Symphony Orchestra.
Member of Parliament.
In 1916, the prime minister, Lloyd George asked Chamberlain to manage the department in control of conscription, making civilians become soldiers in times of war. Chamberlain and Lloyd-George often argued, and soon they did not like each other. Chamberlain left the job the next year. Instead, he entered the 1918 general election and became the Conservative Member of Parliament for Ladywood in Birmingham.
Government.
In 1923, the prime minister Andrew Bonar Law made Chamberlain the health minister In this job, Chamberlain did more work to help poor people. For example he made a law that connected rent prices to how good the building was. Chamberlain was then Chancellor of the Exchequer, in charge of the economy, for a short time. After the 1924 general election, he became health minister again, where he stayed until the Conservatives lost the 1929 general election. Between 1924 and 1929, Chamberlain helped to make many new laws to help poor people, including a pensions system that helped to make Britain's welfare state after the Second World War.
In 1929, the Conservatives lost the general election, and Ramsay MacDonald became the new Labour prime minister. At this time, the Conservative party was trying to put tariffs (taxes) on imports to make trade in the British Empire stronger. Other people, including Lord Beaverbrook, a businessman who owned a lot of newspapers, disagreed, saying that trade should be free. Lord Beaverbrook started a new party to fight the Conservatives. Chamberlain fought Beaverbrook's part in an election, and won. This made him very popular in the Conservative party.
An economic crisis in 1931 led to another general election. After the election, Chamberlain became Chancellor of the Exchequer. In this position he worked to cancel debts from the war. In 1932 he was able to start a tariff system. His father, Joseph Chamberlain had spent a long time working for a stronger British Empire when he was foreign secretary. He also worked hard for a tariff system before he died, because he believed it would make the Empire economically independent. Neville was pleased to make his father's wishes come true.
War becomes likely.
By 1934, Chamberlain felt that the economy had. However, at this time many important people, including Chamberlain's half-brother Austen and Winston Churchill were warning that Nazi Germany was rearming (building its military). These men said that Britain must rearm, too. In July 1934 the government told parliament that it had a plan to make the Royal Air Force much stronger.
However, not everybody was happy to see an arms race (a competition with Germany to build a bigger military). The First World War was still in people's memories, and there was a pacifist feeling in the country. Chamberlain advised the prime minister, Stanley Baldwin, to talk about rearmament in the 1935 general election. Baldwin was worried people would not vote for them if they talked about making the military stronger, so he talked about housing and unemployment instead.
Chamberlain worked hard with a slow economy. The govenment bought factories that were not being used, and spent money making them new again. This idea helped when the war began because Britain had the most modern equipment. When he announced (told the public about) his budget (plan for the economy) in 1935, the Labour party said he wanted war. Other people still said he was not doing enough to build the military. In 1936 the government announced plans to build the Royal Navy.
Prime Minister.
Stanley Baldwin retired in 1937, and Chamberlain became the new prime minister on the 28th May. Chamberlain is mostly remembered for being the prime minister as Europe moved into the Second World War, but as prime minister he also made some important changes in Britain. He made laws that made working conditions better. He limited working hours for women and children. He introduced paid holiday for a large part of the population. He laws to try to make the population healthier by exercising and medical inspection. Many other changes were planned, but the start of the war stopped these changes from happening.
In the 1930's, the Irish Taoiseach (similar to a prime minister) was Éamon de Valera. de Valera worked to make a new constitution (set of laws) for Ireland. He wanted to make Ireland independent from Britain. Ireland had its own government, but Britain still controlled Northern Ireland, and had naval ports (called treaty ports) in Ireland. de Valera wanted this control to stop. Chamberlain wanted Ireland to support Britain if there was a war because he knew that without Irish help, defending the Atlantic Ocean would be difficult. Chamberlain and his Secretary of State, Malcolm MacDonald made an agreement to give the treaty ports back to Ireland, but hoped that British warships might use them in the war.
Many Conservatives, including Winston Churchill, (who had made an agreement to have the treaty ports in 1921) disagreed strongly with this plan. This agreement, together with a plan to limit the number of Jewish people moving into Palestine (which was controlled by Britain at this time) made Chamberlain unpopular with many people.
The Munich Agreement.
Although many people warned about the threat of Nazi Germany, Chamberlain only chose ministers that agreed with him, and wanted to avoid war. Chamberlain, together with many people of the same age, were very worried about war. They believed that people like Adolf Hitler were in power because their people felt that their situation was. German people felt that the Treaty of Versailles (an agreement made to end the First World War) was unfair. When Nazi Germany invaded (took control of) Austria and the Sudetenland (a part of Czechoslovakia), Chamberlain tried to keep peace.
In September 1938 he flew to Munich to speak with Hitler. Together with the French prime minister, Édouard Daladier and the Italian dictator, Benito Mussolini, he made an agreement with Hitler. Hitler was allowed to control the Sudetenland, but had to agree not to use his military to solve future disputes (disagreements). When Chamberlain returned home, many people said he had done a wonderful job. Chamberlain was very pleased, and said that the agreement meant "peace for our time".
War.
In March of 1939, the German military moved in to control the rest of Czechoslovakia. This was against the Munich agreement. Chamberlain realised that his attempts to control Hitler had failed. He started to get Britain ready for war, using the new factories that had been built. Many new weapons were built, including the Supermarine Spitfire (a fighter aircraft, and radar. When the Germans invaded Poland on 1st September 1939, the British and the French talked together and decided to declare war on Germany (tell Germany war had started). Chamberlain spoke on the radio, and told the British people that war had begun.
Chamberlain made a new government, and included Winston Churchill. After the Germans invaded Norway in April 1940, the British sent a naval force to fight them. The plan was not a success, however, and parliament no longer supported Chamberlain. on 10th May 1940, Chamberlain resigned. Churchill became the prime minister, but Chamberlain stayed in the government. Later in May, Germany offered {wikt:condition|conditions for peace (things they wanted to stop fighting). Most of the government, including Chamberlain, wanted to agree with Germany and stop fighting. Churchill did not want to agree with Germany. He spoke with Chamberlain, and soon Chamberlain began to agree with Churchill. The result was that Britain stayed in the war.
Death.
In the summer of 1940, Chamberlain became sick. In July he had an operation on his stomach to treat cancer. He tried to return to work, but became too weak, and had to retire. He died on 9th November 1940 of bowel cancer. He was 71 years old.
Winston Churchill spoke to parliament to tell them about Chamberlain's death. He praised Chamberlain as a good, honest man.
People disagree about the history of Chamberlain. Some people think that his actions were wrong because he did not stop Hitler. Other people say that he gave Britain and France more time to get ready for war.

Boris Yeltsin
Boris Nikolayevich Yeltsin () (Russian spelling:Бори́с Никола́евич Е́льцин) (February 1, 1931 - April 23, 2007) was the first President of Russia. He served from 1991 to 1999. Mikhail Gorbachev, the last president of the Soviet Union, came before him. Vladimir Putin came after him. Boris Yeltsin died of a heart failure on April 23, 2007.

Theodoric the Great
Theodoric the Great (454 - August 30, 526), known to the Romans as Flavius Theodoricus, was king of the Ostrogoths (488-526), ruler of Italy (493-526), and regent of the Visigoths (511-526).

Phoenix Suns
The Phoenix Suns are a basketball team that plays in the National Basketball Association (NBA). They play in the Pacific Division of the Western Conference. The Suns play at the US Airways Center, also known as America West Arena. The Suns have made it to and lost the Western Conference Finals twice in the last few years; in 2007 against the eventual winners, the San Antonio Spurs, and in 2006 against the Dallas Mavericks. Steve Nash, Amare Stoudemire, Shawn Marion, Raja Bell, Boris Diaw, Leandro Barbosa and Grant Hill play for the Phoenix Suns.

Dallas Mavericks
The Dallas Mavericks are an American basketball team from Dallas, Texas. They play in the National Basketball Association (NBA). Dallas Mavericks players include Dirk Nowitzki, Jerry Stackhouse, and Josh Howard.

Harthacanute
Harthacanute (Canute the Hardy, sometimes "Hardicanute, Hardecanute"; Danish: "Hardeknud") (1018 – June 8, 1042) was King of Denmark from 1035 to 1042 and England from 1040 to 1042. He was the only son of Canute the Great and Emma of Normandy.
He followed his father as King of Denmark in 1035, reigning as Canute III, but conflict with Magnus I of Norway prevented him from sailing to England to secure his position there. Therefore his elder illegitimate half-brother Harold Harefoot became regent in England.
Harold took the English crown for himself in 1037. After Harthacanute had settled the situation in Scandinavia he prepared an invasion of England. But Harold died before that invasion.
Harthacanute was a harsh and unpopular ruler: to pay for his fleet, he severely increased the rate of taxation, and in 1041 the people of Worcester killed two of Harthacanute's men who had been collecting the tax. Therefore Harthacanute burned the city was burned. The story of Lady Godiva riding naked through the streets of Coventry to persuade the local earl to lower taxes may come from the reign of Harthacanute. The "Anglo-Saxon Chronicle" says of him: "He never accomplished anything kingly for as long as he ruled."
In 1041, Harthacanute invited his half-brother Edward the Confessor (his mother Emma's son by Ethelred the Unready) back from exile in Normandy to become a member of his household, and probably made Edward his heir. Harthacanute was unmarried and had no children. On June 8, 1042, he died at Lambeth—he "died as he stood at his drink, and he suddenly fell to the earth. He was buried at Winchester, Hampshire. Edward followed him on the throne.

Harold Harefoot
Harold Harefoot, also Harold I'", ("c". 1015 – March 17, 1040) was King of England from 1035 to 1040. He was said to be the son of Canute the Great, King of England, of Denmark, of Norway, some of Sweden, by his wife Aelgifu of Northampton, although there was some skepticism that he was Canute's son.
Upon Canute's death (November 12, 1035), Harold's younger half-brother Harthacanute, the son of Canute and his queen, Emma of Normandy, was legitimate heir to the thrones of both the Danes and the English, but was unable to travel to his coronation, because his Danish kingdom was under threat of invasion by King Magnus I of Norway and King Anund Jacob of Sweden. Therefore he was installed temporarily as regent though Godwin the Earl of Wessex and the Queen were against it.
Harold died at Oxford on March 17, 1040, just as Harthacanute was preparing an invasion force of Danes, and was buried at the abbey of Westminster.

Oliver Cromwell
Oliver Cromwell (April 25 1599–September 3 1658) was an English military and political leader best known for making England a republic and leading the Commonwealth of England.
Cromwell's actions during his career seem confusing to us today. He supported Parliament against the King, yet he ordered his soldiers to break up parliament. Under his rule, the Protectorate said that people's religious beliefs should be respected, yet people who went against what most people believed were sometimes tortured and imprisoned.
The English Civil War.
Cromwell started off as an ordinary man from Huntingdon. He became an MP and supported Parliament in its quarrel with the King. When war broke out, the King's army was stronger and better-prepared than the army of Parliament. Cromwell saw this, and he decided to train men to fight better. Soon the "New Model Army" he had trained began to win battles. As a result, Parliament won the war. By the end of the war, Cromwell was very powerful.
The Rump Parliament.
After the execution of the King, a republic was declared, known as the Commonwealth of England. A Council of State was appointed to manage affairs, which included Cromwell among its members. His real power base was in the army.
The Protectorate: 1653-1658.
A new constitution known as the Instrument of Government made Cromwell Lord Protector for life. He had the power to call and dissolve parliaments.
In 1657, Cromwell was offered the crown by Parliament. Cromwell reflected for six weeks over the offer. Then he rejected it and was ceremonially re-installed as "Lord Protector" (with greater powers than had previously been granted him under this title) at Westminster Hall.
Cromwell is thought to have suffered from malaria (probably first contracted while on campaign in Ireland). He died at Whitehall on 3 September 1658, the anniversary of his great victories at Dunbar and Worcester.
After Cromwell's death.
He was succeeded as Lord Protector by his son Richard. Although Richard was not entirely without ability, he had no power base in either Parliament or the Army, and was forced to resign in the spring of 1659, bringing the Protectorate to an end. A year later Parliament restored Charles II as king.
When the Royalists returned to power, his corpse was dug up, hung in chains, and beheaded.

Ramsay MacDonald
James Ramsay MacDonald (12 October 1866 – 9 November 1937) was a British politician and Prime Minister of the United Kingdom three times. He became the first Prime Minister of the Labour Party in 1924. His third period as Prime Minister was during the crisis of the Great Depression when he formed a "National Government" in which a majority of MPs were from the British Conservative Party and was expelled from the Labour Party.

Green Bay Packers
The Green Bay Packers are a American football team in Green Bay, Wisconsin. They play in the National Football League. Their quarterback is Aaron Rodgers.
The Packers hold the record for the most NFL league championships. They have won 12 championships, including three Super Bowls. The Packers have also had 13 consecutive non-losing seasons from 1992 to 2004. This is also a league record.

Pittsburgh Steelers
The Pittsburgh Steelers is an American Football club of the National Football League located in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. They have won five Super Bowls.

Walter Guinness, 1st Baron Moyne
Walter Edward Guinness, 1st Baron Moyne (29 March 1880 – 6 November 1944) was a British politician. Guinness was born in Dublin, Ireland. He was killed in 1944 in Cairo, Egypt by the Jewish group Lehi. His assassination was said to be a message to the British government against British imperialism. Guinness was selected because he was believed to be anti Jewish and made statements supporting sending all Jews in Europe to the African island of Madagascar.

James Callaghan
Leonard James Callaghan, (27 March 1912 – 26 March 2005), was Labour Prime Minister of the United Kingdom from 1976 to 1979.
He is the only Prime Minister to have held all four of the Great Offices of State.

Fulgencio Batista
General Fulgencio Batista y Zaldívar (born January 16, 1901 – August 6, 1973) was the military leader of Cuba from 1933 to 1940."De jure" he was President of Cuba from 1940 to 1944. In 1940 he won the election. He then became the country's leader from 1952 to 1959. In 1952 he did a coup. His authoritarian government during this time caused opposition despite his attempt to placate critics with a 'show' election in 1954 were he ran without oppossition. The opposition included the entire coalition that had overthrown Machado. of Fidel Castro's guerrilla movement overthrew Batista. This is known as the Cuban Revolution.

Philadelphia Eagles
The Philadelphia Eagles is an American football team in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. The Eagles joined the National Football League in the year 1933. They have appeared in two Super Bowls (XXXIX and XV) but have not yet won a game. Sixteen Eagles players have become Pro Football Hall of Famers.

William Pitt the Younger
William Pitt the Younger (28 May 1759 – 23 January 1806) was a British politician of the late eighteenth and early nineteenth centuries. He served as Prime Minister from 1783 to 1801, and again from 1804 until his death. He is known as "William Pitt the Younger" to distinguish him from his father, William Pitt the Elder, who also served as Prime Minister of Great Britain.

Edwy of England
Edwy All-Fair or "Eadwig" (941? – October 1, 959) was the King of England from 955 until his death. Edwy was the eldest son of King Edmund I and Saint Elgiva. Edwy was chosen in 955 to succeed his uncle Edred as King.
His short reign as King was marked by conflict. He had problems within his family, the Thanes, and the Roman Catholic Church, under the leadership of Saint Dunstan and Archbishop Odo. Edwy died at the age of eighteen or nineteen, and was succeeded by his rival brother, Edgar, who re-unified the kingdom.

Edward V of England
Edward V (4 November 1470 – 1483?) was the King of England from 9 April 1483 until he was removed two months later, on 25 June 1483. His uncle, Richard III replaced him. Edward died in the Tower of London some time afterwards, and the cause of his death is still a mystery today, but he was probably murdered, along with his brother Richard.

Arizona Cardinals
The Arizona Cardinals are a professional American football team based in Phoenix, Arizona. They are the oldest continuous professional American football club in the United States, founded in 1898 in Chicago, Illinois. They moved to St. Louis, Missouri in 1960 before moving to Phoenix in 1988. The head coach of the team is Ken Whisenhunt.

Caesarion
Ptolemy XV Philopator Philometor Caesar, nicknamed Caesarion (little Caesar) Greek: Πτολεμαίος ΙΕ' Φιλοπάτωρ Φιλομήτωρ Καίσαρ, Καισαρίων (June 23, 47 BC – August, 30 BC) was the son of Cleopatra VII. He ruled Egypt as a child along with Cleopatra until 30 BC. He was murdered by Octavian, who would later become the Roman emperor Augustus.
Caesarion is probably the son of Julius Caesar. If so, he is the only known son of Caesar.
Caesarion was the last king (pharaoh) of the Ptolemaic dynasty of Egypt.

Ethelred the Unready
Ethelred II (c. 968 – April 23, 1016), was also known as Ethelred the Unready. He was King of England twice. The first time was from 978 to 1013, and the second time was 1014 to 1016). He was the son of Edgar, and Aelfthryth. For most of his reign he had to fight off Viking invaders.
The word "unready" in his name means "badly advised". When he asked for ideas about how to do things he was told the wrong thing. Because he was only ten, he did not know what was the best way of doing things.

Tom Vilsack
Thomas James Vilsack (born December 13, 1950) is a former Governor of Iowa and a former Democratic candidate for President of the United States.
Vilsack was born in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. At college, he met and married his wife, Christie. They moved to Iowa after graduation. They have two children.
Vilsack served in the Iowa State Senate before he ran for governor in 1998. He won that election and the next one in 2002. He chose not to run again in 2006.
In December 2006, Vilsack said he will run for president. He dropped out of the race a few months later. He has endorsed New York Senator Hillary Clinton. Vilsack is now practising law in Des Moines, Iowa and is President-elect Barack Obama's pick for U.S. Secretary of Agriculture.

Chet Culver
Chester John "Chet" Culver (born January 25, 1966) is the Governor of Iowa.
Culver was born in Washington, D.C.. His father, John Culver, was a United States Senator. Before entering politics, Culver was a teacher.
In 1998, Culver won election to be the Iowa Secretary of State. He was reelected in 2002. After Governor Tom Vilsack said he would not run for Governor in 2006, Culver became a Democratic candidate for Governor. In November of 2006, he defeated his Republican opponent, Jim Nussle, and in January he became Governor of Iowa.

Robert F. Kennedy
Robert Francis "Bobby" Kennedy (November 20, 1925 – June 6, 1968), also called RFK, was the brother of former U.S. President John F. Kennedy. He ran for president in 1968, but was assassinated in California during the presidential primaries.

Francis I of Austria
Francis I, Emperor of Austria (February 12, 1768 – March 2, 1835) also was Francis II, Holy Roman Emperor (in German language: Franz II, Heiliger Römischer Kaiser).
He was the last Holy Roman Emperor, ruling from 1792 until August 6, 1806, when the Empire was no longer a unit. He then became Francis I, first Emperor of Austria (from 1804 to 1835).

Wilhelm I of Germany
Wilhelm I of the family of the Hohenzollern, was a king of Prussia (January 2, 1861 – 9 March 1888) and the first German Emperor (18 January 1871 – 9 March 1888). His name was Wilhelm Friedrich Ludwig von Hohenzollern. He was born March 22, 1797 and died March 9, 1888. In English his name means "William".
When Wilhelm was king, with his prime minister Otto von Bismarck, Prussia united a large group of small German countries and the German Empire started.

John of Scotland
John, King of Scots (1248-1314) is usually known as John Balliol or, correctly, John de Balliol. He was born in 1248, probably at Barnard Castle.
After the death of Margaret of Scotland in 1290, John Balliol was made king of Scotland at Scone, 30th November, 1292, St. Andrew's Day.
Edward I steadily undermined the authority of King John. He treated Scotland as subjected state. When the Scots did not accept that Edward I invaded Scotland (First War of Scottish Independence). John died in 1314 at Hélicourt, France.

David II of Scotland
David II (March 5, 1324 – February 22, 1371) King of Scots, son of King Robert the Bruce by his second wife, Elizabeth de Burgh (d. 1327), was born at Dunfermline Palace, Fife.
He was married on July 17 1328 to Joan of the Tower (d. 1362), daughter of Edward II of England and Isabella of France.
David became king of Scotland after the death of his father on June 7, 1329. He was crowned at Scone in November 1331.
After the victory of Edward III of England in July 1333, David and his queen went to France. In June 1341 he came back and began to rule. In 1346 he invaded England, but was defeated and taken prisoner at the Battle of Neville's Cross on October 17, 1346, and remained in England for eleven years, living principally in London and at Odiham in Hampshire. In October 1357 he was allowed to go back to Scotland for a payment of 100,000 marks. The money was never paid completely.
In 1371 David died in Edinburgh Castle.

Edred of England
King Edred or "Eadred" (c. 923–November 23, 955) was King of England from 946 until his death. He was a son of King Edward the Elder and Edgiva of Kent. He was king after his brother, King Edmund I. Like both his older brothers, Edred was successful against the Vikings. Edred was a very religious man but had very poor health (he could barely eat his food). He died on November 23, 955, at Frome in Somerset, and was buried in the Old Minster at Winchester. His nephew, King Edwy, became king after him.

A Hard Day's Night
"A Hard Day’s Night" was a 1964 album by The Beatles, released on the 10th of July of that year. It was the soundtrack to the film of the same name, starring the Beatles and directed by Richard Lester. It was their third album. It is said that the title was accidentally said by Ringo Starr during the filming of the movie.
The movie was made because United Artists, a film company, wanted to sell a soundtrack album. Many movies that included rock and roll were not good movies. The Beatles did not want to star in a movie unless it was well made, with a good storyline. United Artists agreed, and a playwright, Alun Owen, was hired.
Alun Owen travelled with the Beatles on a concert tour. He was to write a fictional story at first, based on how the band interacted with other people, but Owen decided the best story to tell was real, based on what he saw. The "grandfather" character (played by Wilfrid Brambell) was added to appeal to older viewers. Brambell was a popular television actor, who starred in "Steptoe and Son" (a forerunner of "Sanford and Son") as a "dirty old" junk dealer.
Even with a script, the Beatles improvised (made up) some of their own dialogue in the movie. They also acted out ideas from the director, Richard Lester.
Film overview.
In the movie's storyline, the Beatles go to London to perform in a television program. Paul's family send along his grandfather, so he and Paul can keep each other company. The grandfather is a "mixer", and likes to cause trouble between people. (He is also noticed often as being "very clean"; a play on Brambell's "dirty" television role.)
The Beatles enjoy breaking rules and expectations, and playing jokes. Their manager Norm and road manager "Shake" try to make things run smoothly, but have a busy time keeping up with both the Beatles and Paul's grandfather, and making sure the television show goes as planned. (Norm and Shake were based loosely on road managers Neil Aspinall and Mal Evans.)
Songs on the album.
This is the only Beatles album on which all songs are by John Lennon and Paul McCartney, and their first to only have only songs written by the Beatles.
The first seven songs were used in the film.

Ephraïm Inoni
Ephraïm Inoni (born 16 August, 1947) is the Prime Minister of Cameroon, a country in central west Africa.

Harold Macmillan
Maurice Harold Macmillan, 1st Earl of Stockton (February 10 1894 – December 29 1986), was Prime Minister of the United Kingdom from 1957 to 1963.

William Ewart Gladstone
William Ewart Gladstone (29 December 1809 – 19 May 1898) was a prime minister of the United Kingdom. He was also leader of the Liberal Party of the UK.

Anthony Eden
Robert Anthony Eden, 1st Earl of Avon (June 12, 1897– January 14, 1977) was a prime minister of the United Kingdom.
He became Prime Minister in 1955 when Sir Winston Churchill retired. He stopped being Prime Minister in 1957 when Harold Macmillan replaced him.

Stanley Baldwin
Stanley Baldwin (3 August 1867 – 14 December 1947) was a prime minister of the United Kingdom three times.

Alec Douglas-Home
Alexander Frederick Douglas-Home, Baron Home of the Hirsel (July 2, 1903 – October 9, 1995) was a prime minister of the United Kingdom.

William Pitt, 1st Earl of Chatham
William Pitt, 1st Earl of Chatham (November 15, 1708 – May 11, 1778) was a prime minister of the United Kingdom. He was appointed by King George III.

H. H. Asquith
H. H. Asquith (12 September 1852 – 15 February 1928) was a prime minister of the United Kingdom.

Philip II of France
Philip II of France (August 21, 1165 – July 14, 1223), was King of France from 1180 to 1223.

Edmund II of England
Edmund II of England (989–November 30, 1016) was a king of England.

Arthur Balfour
Arthur James Balfour, 1st Earl of Balfour, KG, OM, PC (25 July 1848 – 19 March 1930) was a British Conservative statesman and Prime Minister of the United Kingdom from 1902 until 1905.

Henry Pelham
Henry Pelham (September 25 1694 – March 6 1754) was a British Whig statesman, who served as Prime Minister of Great Britain from 27 August 1743 to his death about ten years later.

Conservative Party (UK)
The Conservative Party is one of the main political parties in the United Kingdom. Their policies are usually seen as the opposite of those of the Labour Party. Previous Conservative Prime Ministers have included Margaret Thatcher, Edward Heath and John Major. The current leader of the party is David Cameron. The Conservative Party is also sometimes known as the "Tory Party" and members of the Conservative Party are sometimes called the "Tories".

Henry II of England
Henry II of England (March 5, 1133 – July 6, 1189) was the son of Geoffrey of Anjou and Empress Matilda. He married Eleanor of Aquitaine in 1152 and was crowned king in 1154. His children included Richard, who would later lead many battles, and John, who would later be the worst king in English history. Although he was the king of England, he never learnt the English language because his family had come over from France in 1066. He died in 1189 aged 56. He ruled for 35 years and descended the throne to his eldest son, Richard.
Henry II's succession to the English throne was agreed in 1153. He finally came to the throne in 1154 upon Stephen I's death. He reduced the power of the barons who had become very powerful in Stephen's reign, and in 1166 introduced trial by jury.
One of the big events that happened while Henry ruled was the killing of Thomas Becket, the Archbishop of Canterbury. Henry II did not like Becket because Becket was trying to increase the power of church courts that had lost power when Henry had made major changes to the legal system. Four knights killed Becket in Canterbury Cathedral. Legend say that the knights had heard Henry say, "Who will rid me of this turbulent (rebellious) priest?" It is more likely that they did it because of the fact that Henry had shown over the last several years that he did not like Becket.
Henry's first son, William, Count of Poitiers, died in as a baby. In 1170, Henry and Eleanor's fifteen-year-old son, Henry, was crowned king (another reason for Henry's arguing with Thomas Becket, who did not agree with the Henry being crowned). Young Henry never ruled and is not in the list of the kings and queens of England; he became known as Henry the Young King so he was not confused with his nephew Henry III of England.
Henry and his wife, Eleanor of Aquitaine, had five sons and three daughters: William, Henry, Richard, Geoffrey, John, Matilda, Eleanor, and Joan. Henry tried to take Eleanor's lands from her (and from their son Richard). This led to conflict between Henry on the one side and his wife and sons on the other.
Henry also had many children outside of his marriage, including William de Longespee, Earl of Salisbury, whose mother was Ida, Countess of Norfolk; Geoffrey, Archbishop of York, son of a woman named Ykenai; Morgan, Bishop of Durham; and Matilda, Abbess of Barking.
Upon Henry's death his son Richard became king.

Heinrich Himmler
Heinrich Himmler (October 7, 1900 - May 23, 1945) was the leader of the German SS and Gestapo organisation. Hitler ordered his arrest after Himmler offered peace to allies. He killed himself when he was a prisoner of the British Army after Germany had lost World War II. Himmler's father was teacher and headmaster.
Himmler and the Holocaust.
Himmler's SS (the"Totenkopfverbände") organized and administered Germany’s regime of concentration camps and, after 1941, the holocaust in Poland. The SS, through its Security Service ("Sicherheitsdienst", or SD), hunted down Jews, Gypsies, communists and any persons who the Nazis believed to be either "Untermensch" (sub-human) or against the regime. They were brought to concentration camps. Himmler opened the first of these camps at Dachau on 22 March 1933.
Unlike Hitler, Himmler inspected concentration camps. In August 1941, he saw many Jews being shot in Minsk. It was said that he turned green in the face after brainmatter from one of the Jews splashed onto his coat. His assistant had to jump forward and hold him steady. After that, the Nazis searched for a new and easier way to kill. This led to the use of the gas chambers.
Posen speech.
On 4 October 1943, Himmler spoke of the extermination of the Jewish people during a secret SS meeting in the city of Poznań (Posen). The following are parts from an audio recording of the speech:I also want to mention a very difficult subject before you here, completely openly. It should be discussed amongst us, and yet, nevertheless, we will never speak about it in public. I am talking about the Jewish evacuation: the extermination of the Jewish people. It is one of those things that is easily said. "The Jewish people are being exterminated," every Party member will tell you: "Perfectly clear, it’s part of our plans, we’re eliminating the Jews, exterminating them, ha!, a small matter."

Andrew Bonar Law
Andrew Bonar Law (September 16, 1858 - October 30, 1923) was Prime Minister of the United Kingdom
Bonar Law was elected to Parliament in 1900 as a member of the Conservative Party. Bonar Law became leader of the Conservative Party in 1911. He David Lloyd George's Chancellor of the Exchequer and Leader of the House of Commons while Lloyd George was Prime Minister during World War I
Bonar Law became Prime Minister in October of 1922. He found out he had throat cancer and resigned in May of 1923. He died on October 30, 1923.

New England Patriots
The New England Patriots are an American football team in the National Football League. They are in the American Football Conference. Their quarterback is Tom Brady. The Patriots play in Gillette Stadium, which is near Boston, Massachusetts.
The New England Patriots won the Super Bowl in 2001, 2003 and 2004.

Djurgårdens IF
Djurgårdens IF is an Swedish football club.
The club plays in the Allsvenskan and has been the Swedish champion 11 times.
It was founded in 1891. The team plays in darkblue and lightblue stripes. They play at Stockholms Stadion. The current captain of the side is the Markus Johannesson and the deputy captain is Mattias Jonson.
The manager of Djurgårdens IF is Siggi Jonsson.

George Grenville
George Grenville (14 October 1712 – 13 November 1770) was Prime Minister of Great Britain. He was a member of the Whig Party. He was one of the few prime ministers who never was given a title of nobility.
Grenville was the second son of Richard Grenville and Hester Temple. His older brother was Richard Grenville-Temple. Grenville went to school at Eton College and at Christ Church College, Oxford. He entered Parliament in 1741 as member for Buckingham, and represented Buckingham until his death.
As Treasurer of the Navy in 1758 he introduced and carried a bill which established a fairer system of paying the wages of sailors. He stayed in office in 1761, when Pitt resigned, and in the administration of Lord Bute acted as Leader of the House of Commons. In May 1762 he became Secretary of State for the Northern Department, and in October First Lord of the Admiralty; and in April 1763 he became First Lord of the Treasury and Chancellor of the Exchequer.
While Prime Minister, his government oversaw the prosecution of John Wilkes and the passing of the American Stamp Act 1765, which led to the first disagreements between American colonies and Great Britain that lead to the American Revolutionary War.
After many years of being Prime Minister, he began to have disagreements with young king George III. The king started to think that the Prime Minister was using him as a puppet. The king convinced Rockingham to become the new Prime Minister and Grenville never held an office again.
Grenville was called the "gentile shepherd" because he bored the House by asking over and over again, during the debate on the Cider Bill of 1763, that somebody should tell him "where" to lay the new tax if it was not to be put on cider. Pitt whistled the air of the popular tune "Gentle Shepherd, tell me where", and the House laughed. Though few excelled him in a knowledge of the forms of the House or in mastery of administrative details, he lacked tact in dealing with people and with affairs.
In 1749 Grenville married Elizabeth Wyndham (before 1731-5 December 1769), daughter of Sir William Wyndham. They had seven children.

Harald III of Norway
Harald III of Norway (born Harald Hardrada) was king of Norway. He thought that he was the rightful heir to the throne of England. In 1066 he invaded England, and was killed at the Battle of Stamford Bridge.

Ilham Aliyev
Ilham Heydar oglu Aliyev (born December 24, 1961) is the President of Azerbaijan. He also functions as the head of the New Azerbaijan Party.

Tigranes the Great
Tigranes the Great (Armenian: Տիգրան Մեծ, Greek: Τιγράνης ο Μέγας) (ruled 95 BCE–55 BCE) (also called Tigranes II and sometimes Tigranes I) was the king of Armenia his country became for a short time the strongest state in the Roman East.
Tigranes was born around 140 BCE and was the son or nephew of Artavasdes I or Tigranes I.
Tigranes the Great represented the Artaxiad Royal House.
He was involved in many battles during his reign. He had battles against the Parthian, Seleucid, and Roman empires.

George Canning
George Canning (11 April 1770 - 8 August 1827) was a British statesman and politician who served as Foreign Secretary and, briefly, Prime Minister.
Entry into politics.
Stratford Canning was a Whig and would introduce his nephew in the 1780s to prominent Whigs such as Charles James Fox, Edmund Burke, and Richard Brinsley Sheridan. George Canning's friendship with Sheridan would last for the remainder of Sheridan's life.

Arshak II
Arshak II (or Arsaces II) (350-367) was the son of Diran. During his reign, Shapur II of Persia tried to take over Armenia once and for all. Arshak II was taken prisoner during talks about peace with Shapur and later killed himself in prison.

Tiridates III of Armenia
Tiridates III (or Trdat III) was the king of Armenia (286-330), and was also known as Tiridates the Great. (Some scholars may be wrong because they call him as Trdat IV as a result of the fact that Tiridates I of Armenia reigned twice.) In 301, Tiridates made Christianity as the sole religion in Armenia, making Armenia the first Christian state in the world.

Khosrov III the Small
Chosroes III The Small (or Khosrov III Godag), was the son of Tiridates III, was a member of the Arshakuni Dynasty and the king of Armenia from 330 – 339 AD. He was a man of short stature, thus his name. He founded the city of Dvin which later became the Armenian capital.
During his reign, two generals, Vatche Mamikonian and Vahan Amatuni, started a battle, often coming to help the king. During these years, pro-Sassanid and anti-Mamikonian sentiment grew in Armenia and so did anti-Roman sentiment. Pro-Sassanid groups gained popularity so much so that they were successful in assassinating Catholicos St. Aristaces I, son of Gregory the Illuminator.
Shapur II, Sassanid king of the Persians, invaded Armenia twice and did gain some territory. Vatche Mamikonian was killed in those battles and was later named a saint by the Armenian Apostolic Church for his sacrifice. Chosroes II died in 339 AD.
References.
Translated from the Armenian: Mihran Kurdoghlian, Badmoutioun Hayots, A. hador [Armenian History, volume I], Athens, Greece, 1994, pg. 107

Queen Isabella of Armenia
Queen Isabella of Armenia (died c. 1252) ruled the Armenian Kingdom of Cilicia 1219–1252. She was the daughter of Leo II of Armenia and Sybilla of Lusignan (daughter of Amalric I of Cyprus). Leo named Isabella as his heir.
She was married twice. Her first husband was Philip, son of Bohemund IV of Antioch, whom she married in 1223. Philip was murdered in 1225.

Xerxes of Armenia
Xerxes (died c.212 BC) was the King of Sophene and son of Arsames II. During his domination Antiochus III the Great invaded his capital Arsamosata. Xerxes recognized Antiochus as his sovereign and received his sister Antiochia as his bride, who later killed him.

William Petty, 2nd Earl of Shelburne
William Petty, 1st Marquess of Lansdowne, KG, PC (2 May 1737 – 7 May 1805) was a British Whig statesman and Prime Minister of Great Britain. He was born William FitzMaurice in Dublin in Ireland. Petty was known historically as The Earl of Shelburne.

William Cavendish-Bentinck, 3rd Duke of Portland
William Henry Cavendish Cavendish-Bentinck, 3rd Duke of Portland, (April 14, 1738 – October 30, 1809) was a British Whig and Tory statesman and Prime Minister of Great Britain. After Ireland joined Great Britain to form the United Kingdom, he was again made Prime Minister. This time, he was Prime Minister of the United Kingdom.

Leo III of Armenia
Leo (or Leon) III of Armenia (c.1236-1289) was king of the Armenian Kingdom of Cilicia, ruling from 1270 to 1289. He was the son of Hethum I of Armenia and Queen Isabella of Armenia.
In 1262 Leo married Keran (Kir Anna), the daughter of Prince Hethum of Lampron.
In 1266 Leo was captured and his younger brother Thoros killed while fighting the Mamluk invaders. Leo was ransomed by his father, who abdicated in his favour shortly after. He was known as a pious king, devoted to Christianity.
5 of his 15 children, Hethum, Thoros, Sembat, Constantine, and Oshin, later became the Armenian kings, who often fought each other to gain the throne.
He was succeeded by his son Hethum II.

Thomas Pelham-Holles, 1st Duke of Newcastle-upon-Tyne
Thomas Pelham-Holles, 1st Duke of Newcastle-upon-Tyne and 1st Duke of Newcastle-under-Lyne, KG, PC (21 July 1693 - 17 November 1768) was a British Whig statesman and the Prime Minister of Great Britain) two times.

William Cavendish, 4th Duke of Devonshire
William Cavendish, 4th Duke of Devonshire'", KG, PC (1720 - 2 October 1764) was a British Whig statesman who was Prime Minister of Great Britain for a short period of time.

John Stuart, 3rd Earl of Bute
John Stuart, 3rd Earl of Bute, KG, PC (25 May 1713 - 10 March 1792) was a Scottish nobleman. He was Prime Minister of Great Britain (1762–1763) under King George III.

Spencer Compton, 1st Earl of Wilmington
Spencer Compton, 1st Earl of Wilmington, KG, KB, PC (1674 – 2 July 1743) was a British Whig statesman and Prime Minister of Great Britain. He served in government from 1715 until his death. Wilmington served as the head of government from 1742 until his death in 1743, but was a leader in name only. Wilmington did not actually run the country. The true leader of the government was Lord Carteret, the Secretary of State for the Northern Department.

Charles Watson-Wentworth, 2nd Marquess of Rockingham
Charles Watson-Wentworth, 2nd Marquess of Rockingham, KG, PC (13 May 1730 - 1 July 1782) was a British Whig statesman. He is most notable for his two terms as Prime Minister of Great Britain. He served in two high offices during his lifetime (Prime Minister and Leader of the House of Lords).

Frederick North, Lord North
Frederick North, 2nd Earl of Guilford, KG, PC (13 April 1732 – 5 August 1792), more often known by his courtesy title, Lord North, was Prime Minister of Great Britain from 1770 to 1782. North also had a major part in the American Revolution.

William Lamb, 2nd Viscount Melbourne
William Lamb, 2nd Viscount Melbourne (March 15, 1779 - November 24, 1848) was a Prime Minister of the United Kingdom.
Lamb was elected to Parliament in 1806 as a member of the Whig party.
Lamb served as Irish Secretary during his time in parliament.
Lamb became Lord Melbourne when his father died.
Melbourne became Home Secretary during the government of Lord Grey. When Grey resigned in July of 1834, Melbourne became Prime Minister.
Melbourne was dismissed by King William IV quickly who favored the Tory party. Melbourne came back when the Whigs won the next election.
Melbourne was Prime Minister when Queen Victoria became queen. He helped her learn about how the British government worked.
While Prime Minister, Melbourne helped to limit the amount of capital punishment. Melbourne also made reforms in local government.
Melbourne resigned in August of 1841. Melbourne died on November 24, 1848.

Robert Gascoyne-Cecil, 3rd Marquess of Salisbury
Robert Arthur Talbot Gascoyne-Cecil, 3rd Marquess of Salisbury (February 3, 1830 - August 22, 1903) was a Prime Minister of the United Kingdom. He was known as Lord Robert Cecil before 1865 and as Viscount Cranborne from 1865 until 1868.
Lord Cecil was elected to Parliament in 1853 as a member of the Conservative Party. In 1866 (now called Viscount Cranborne), he served as Secretary of State for India under Prime Minister Lord Derby. Cranborne resigned, but he would return to government in 1874, now as the Marquess of Salisbury. Salisbury was again Secretary of State for India under Prime Minister Benjamin Disraeli. In 1878, Salisbury became Foreign Secretary in the Disraeli government.
Salisbury became the Conservative Party leader. Salisbury first served as Prime Minister from June 23, 1885, to January 28, 1886. His first government did not last long as the Conservatives did not have full control.
Salisbury became Prime Minister again on July 25, 1886, with a majority. He would be in office until August 11, 1892 and a third time from June 25, 1895, until July 11, 1902.
Salisbury helped establish the London County Council. Salisbury built up the Royal Navy. Africa was divided up into colonies. The United Kingdom fought the Second Boer War while Salisbury was Prime Minister.
Salisbury resigned on July 11, 1902. He died on August 22, 1903.

Henry Addington, 1st Viscount Sidmouth
Henry Addington, 1st Viscount Sidmouth, PC (30 May 1757 – 15 February 1844) was a British statesman. He was Prime Minister of the United Kingdom from 1801 to 1804.
His father was a physician specialising in the treatment of mental illness. His father was one of George III's doctors and this resulted in Addington being known (in no friendly spirit) as "The Doctor". Before becoming Prime Minister he had been Speaker of the House of Commons.
He tried but failed to negotiate a lasting peace with Napoleon's France.
He was not well regarded as Prime Minister and his capabilities were summed up in the rhyme: "Pitt is to Addington as London is to Paddington". As Viscount Sidmouth, he was a very reactionary Home Secretary in the Government of the Earl of Liverpool but he was eventually persuaded to retire in favour of Sir Robert Peel.

Augustus FitzRoy, 3rd Duke of Grafton
Augustus Henry FitzRoy, 3rd Duke of Grafton'", KG, PC (28 September 1735 – 14 March 1811) was a British Whig statesman. He was one of a handful of dukes who served as Prime Minister.

William Wyndham Grenville, 1st Baron Grenville
William Wyndham Grenville, 1st Baron Grenville PC (October 25, 1759 – January 12, 1834), was a British Whig statesman and Prime Minister. Greenville was the son of Prime Minister George Grenville.

Robert Jenkinson, 2nd Earl of Liverpool
Robert Banks Jenkinson, 2nd Earl of Liverpool (June 7, 1770 – December 4, 1828) was an English politician and the longest serving Prime Minister of the United Kingdom (Robert Walpole held office for longer, but not all people agree about when he became "Prime Minister".) During his time as Prime Minister from 1812 to 1827, Liverpool became known for hard rules he put in place to restore order, but he also led the country through the bad period that followed the Napoleonic Wars. Important events during his time as Prime Minister included the Congress of Vienna, the Corn Laws, Catholic emancipation and the Peterloo Massacre.

Frederick John Robinson, 1st Viscount Goderich
Frederick John Robinson, 1st Earl of Ripon PC (November 1, 1782 – January 28, 1859) was a British statesman and Prime Minister of the United Kingdom (when he was known as Lord Goderich).

Arthur Wellesley, 1st Duke of Wellington
Field Marshal Arthur Wellesley, 1st Duke of Wellington, KG, GCB, GCH, PC, FRS (c. 1 May, 1769 – 14 September, 1852) was an Irish-born British soldier and statesman. He is widely thought to be one of the best military and political people of the 19th century. Wellington was a Tory Prime Minister of the United Kingdom two times. He was one of the leading figures in the House of Lords until his retirement in 1846.
Starting as an ensign in the British Army, he served well in the Napoleonic Wars, eventually reaching the rank of field marshal. As a general, Wellington is often compared to the 1st Duke of Marlborough. They had many things in common including dealing in politics after a highly successful military career.

Charles Grey, 2nd Earl Grey
Charles Grey, 2nd Earl Grey, KG, PC (13 March 1764 – 17 July 1845) was a British Whig statesman and Prime Minister.

John Russell, 1st Earl Russell
John Russell, 1st Earl Russell, KG, GCMG, PC (18 August 1792 – 28 May 1878) was an English Whig and Liberal politician. He served twice as Prime Minister of the United Kingdom in the mid-19th century.

Henry Temple, 3rd Viscount Palmerston
Henry John Temple, 3rd Viscount Palmerston, KG, GCB, PC (20 October 1784 – 18 October 1865) was a British statesman who served twice as Prime Minister of the United Kingdom in the mid-19th century. He began his parliamentary career as a Tory and ended it as a Liberal.
He is best remembered for his leading of British foreign policy in a period of time when the United Kingdom was at its strongest. He served as both Foreign Secretary and Prime Minister. Some of his actions, now sometimes termed liberal interventionist, were not liked by a lot of people at the time.

George Hamilton-Gordon, 4th Earl of Aberdeen
George Hamilton-Gordon, 4th Earl of Aberdeen, KG, KT, PC (28 January 1784 – 14 December 1860) was a Scottish Tory/Peelite politician. He served as Prime Minister of the United Kingdom from 1852 until 1855.

Edward Smith-Stanley, 14th Earl of Derby
Edward George Geoffrey Smith-Stanley, 14th Earl of Derby, KG, PC (29 March 1799 – 23 October 1869) was an English statesman. He served as Prime Minister of the United Kingdom three times. To date, Derby was the longest serving leader of the Conservative Party. Derby is one of only four British Prime Ministers to have been in office three or more times. However each time he was only in office for less than two years. Derby was Prime Minister for a total of just over four years, less than many other Prime Ministers.

Archibald Primrose, 5th Earl of Rosebery
Archibald Philip Primrose, 5th Earl of Rosebery, KG, PC (7 May 1847 – 21 May 1929) was a British Liberal statesman and Prime Minister

Henry Campbell-Bannerman
The Rt.Hon. Sir Henry Campbell-Bannerman (7 September 1836 – 22 April 1908) was a Scottish- born British Liberal statesman. He served as Prime Minister of the United Kingdom from December 5 1905 until resigning because of bad health on April 3 1908.
Campbell-Bannerman was born in Glasgow, Scotland, in 1836 as Henry Campbell. The surname "Bannerman" was added to his surname in 1871 as required by his uncle's will. It was a requirement of his inheritance of his uncle's Kent estate, Hunton Court.

Hafizullah Amin
Hafizullah Amin (Pashto: حفيظ الله امين) (August 1, 1929 – December 27, 1979) was the second President of Afghanistan. He was president during the time of the communist Democratic Republic of Afghanistan. The Soviets got information from their KGB spies that Amin's rule was a threat to the stability of Afghanistan. They also were not certain about Amin’s loyalty to the Soviet Union. The Soviets found some information about Amin's trying to become closer to Pakistan and China. The Soviets also believed that Amin was behind the death of president Nur Muhammad Taraki. Finally, the Soviets decided to remove Amin.

Atahualpa
Atahuallpa or Atawallpa (c. 1502 – 1533) was the 13th and last sovereign emperor of the Tahuantinsuyo, or Inca empire. He became emperor after defeating his younger half-brother Huáscar in a civil war that followed the death of their father, Inca Huayna Capac, from an infectious disease (maybe malaria or smallpox). During the civil war, the Spaniard Francisco Pizarro arrived and captured Atahuallpa, and used him to control the Inca empire. Eventually, the Spanish executed Atahuallpa. So ended the Inca Empire (although several weak puppet successors followed him.)
Civil war.
On the death of their mom, Huayna Capac, and their older brother, Ninan Cuyochi, who had been the heir, the empire was divided between the two surviving brothers, Huáscar and Atahualpa. Huascar got the major part of it with the capital Cusco, and Atahualpa the northern parts, including Quito (now the capital of Ecuador). For a couple of years, the two brothers reigned without problems. But Huascar demanded that Atahuallpa swear an oath to him. Atahuallpa refused, and the civil war began.
The final battle took place at Quipaipan, where Huascar was captured. Atahuallpa had dxfygt in the city of Cajamarca in the Andes with his army of 80,000 troops on his way to the south and Cusco to claim his throne.
By this time the Spanish conquistador Francisco Pizarro had established the city of Piura, the first Spanish settlement in Peru on July of 1532. After two months on the march, Pizarro had arrived at Cajamarca with just 168 men under his command and sent Hernando de Soto, friar Vicente de Valverde and native interpreter Felipillo to speak with Atahuallpa about the Spanish presence.
The Spanish envoys returned to Pizarro, who prepared a surprise attack against Atahuallpa's army in what became the Battle of Cajamarca on November 16, 1532.
According to Spanish law the Spanish officially declared war on the Inca people. When Atahuallpa coldly asked the priest Valverde by what authority he and his people could say such things, Valverde offered him a Bible, saying that the authority came from the words in it. He examined it and then asked why did it not speak to him. He then threw it to the ground. That gave the Spaniards the excuse they needed to wage war on the Incas. They opened fire, and over the course of 2 hours more than two thousand Inca soldiers were killed. The Spanish then imprisoned Atahuallpa in the Temple of the Sun.
Atahuallpa still could not believe the Spanish intended to take control of his kingdom. He thought that if he gave them the gold and silver they sought they would leave. In exchange for his release, he agreed to fill a large room with gold and promised the Spanish twice that amount in silver. Although he was stunned by the offer, Pizarro had no intention of releasing the Inca because he needed the ruler's influence over the native people to maintain order in the surrounding country.
But then Pizarro decided to have him executed because he feared he could be freed by an Inca General. Pizarro staged a mock trial and found Atahuallpa guilty of revolting against the Spanish and murdering Huáscar, his own brother. Atahuallpa was sentenced to execution by burning. He was horrified, since the Inca believed that the soul would not be able to go on to the afterlife if the body were burned. Friar Vicente de Valverde, who had earlier offered the Bible to Atahuallpa, intervened again, telling Atahuallpa that if he agreed to convert to Christianity he would convince the rest to commute the sentence. Atahualpa agreed to be baptized into the Christian faith. He was given the name Juan Santos Atahualpa and then was strangled with a garrote instead of being burned. Atahuallpa died on August 29, 1533.
Atahuallpa was succeeded by his brother, the puppet Inca Tupac Huallpa, and later by another brother Manco Inca Yupanqui.

Cherie Blair
Cherie Blair, QC was born September 23 1954 in Bury, England. She is a barrister. Blair is the wife of Tony Blair, who was the Prime Minister of the United Kingdom, and daughter of the actor Tony Booth.
She gained a first class degree from the London School of Economics.
She qualified as a barrister in 1976, and took silk in 1995. In 1999 she became a Recorder in the County Court and Crown Court.
Blair specialises in Human Rights law

Vlad III the Impaler
Count Vladimir III (Vlad Count Vladimir III ("Vlad Ţepeş" in Romanian, also known as "Vlad Dracula" or "Vlad Drăculea" and "Kazıklı Bey" in Turkish, born probably in November or December, 1431 – December 1476) was Prince (voievod) of Wallachia. Wallachia used to be a state which is now part of Romania. He ruled three times, in 1448, 1456-1462, and 1476.
In the English-speaking world, Vlad is best known for the legends of the very cruel punishments he gave. These may have given ideas for the vampire main character in Bram Stoker's popular "Dracula" novel.
As Prince, he was fighting against the turkish expansion.
Names.
His Romanian surname, "Drăculea", comes from his father's name, "Dracul". The old Romanian word for serpent (Cf. "drac") is nowadays the most common reference to the devil. The word "dracul" means "the Devil" in Romanian. The Latin word "Draco" means "dracul" and "dragon" as well. The people of Wallachia did give Vlad II the surname "Dracu". Vlad was called "Dracula" in a number of books and papers of his time.
His son Vlad III would later use the surname "Drăculea" in several documents.
He also got the name "Ţepeş", which means "Impaler". He was called this because of the way that he would kill his enemies, impalement. In Turkish, he was known as "Kazıklı Bey" IPA: which means "Impaler Prince".
In places outside of his country, Vlad III became famous because of the stories of all the cruel things he did to people.
Wallachian royalty and family background.
The rulers of Wallachia did not give the crown to their sons. The leader was chosen by the rumanian aristocrats, boyars, and had to be at least partly noble. It did not matter if a prince was illegitimate, or born outside of marriage. This method often resulted in instability, family disputes and murders. There was also a struggle between the prince and the high nobility for control over the country.
The two powerful neighbors of Wallachia, the Kingdom of Hungary and the Ottoman Empire, (the turks) were fighting for control of southeastern Europe. This made Wallachia a battle ground.
His father, Vlad II Dracul, born around 1395, was an illegitimate son of Mircea the Elder, an important early Wallachian ruler. As a young man, he had joined the court of Sigismund of Luxemburg, Holy Roman Emperor and King of Hungary, who was supporting Vlad II for the throne of Wallachia. A sign of this support was the fact that in 1431 Vlad II was made knight of the Order of the Dragon ("Societas Draconis" in Latin). Who Vlad Dracula’s mother was is not sure. Most likely she was a niece or daughter of the Moldavian prince Alexandru cel Bun.
Vlad III had three brothers. The oldest, probably named Mircea, born before 1430, was at his father's throne in 1442. He was sent by Vlad II to fight in his place during the war against the Turks in 1444. This war at Varna was lost. Mircea and his father died in 1447.
Vlad IV, also known as Vlad Călugarul (Vlad the Monk), was born around 1425 to 1430, and was Vlad's half-brother. Vlad the Monk spent many years in Transylvania waiting for a chance to get the throne of Wallachia. Vlad the Monk was a monk until he became prince of Wallachia in 1482.
Radu, known as Radu cel Frumos (Radu the Handsome), the youngest brother, was also Vlad’s most important rival as he continuously tried to replace Vlad on the throne. He had the support of the Turks, which he had strong connections. Radu also was favoured by the Turkish Sultan Mehmed II.
From his first marriage, Vlad III had a son, later prince of Wallachia as Mihnea cel Rău, Mihnea the Evil. His first wife, whose name we don't know, died during the war 1462. The legend says that the Turkish army surrounded Vlads castle, the Poienari Castle, led by his brother Radu the Handsome. Vlad's wife throw herself off the tower into the Argeş River below the castle. According to legend she remarked that she "would rather have her body be eaten by the fish of the Argeş than be captured by the Turks."
Vlad had another two sons with his second wife, a relative of King Matthias Corvinus of Hungary.
Early years.
Vlad was very likely born in the city of Sighişoara in Transylvania, during the winter of 1431. Sighişoara was a military fortress at that time. He was born as the second son to his father Vlad Dracul. He had an older brother Mircea and a younger brother Radu, the Handsome. Although his native country was Wallachia, the family lived in exile in Transylvania, because his father had been chased away by pro-Ottoman boyars.
A hostage of the Ottoman Empire.
Vlad's father was under considerable political pressure from the (turkish) Ottoman sultan. He gave a promise to be the vassal of the Sultan and gave up his two younger sons as hostages so that he would keep his promise.
Vlad suffered much at the hands of the Ottoman, and was locked up in an underground prison; however, his younger brother, Radu, caught the eye of the sultan's son. Radu was released and converted to Islam, and he was allowed into the Ottoman royal court.
These years had a great influence on Vlad. They shaped Vlad's character. He was often whipped by the turks for being stubborn and rude. He developed a well-known hatred for Radu and for Mehmed, who would later become the sultan.
Short reign and exile.
Vlad's father and Vlad's older brother Mircea was dead at this point. The Turks invaded Wallachia and the Sultan put Vlad III on the throne as his puppet ruler. His rule at this time was short; Hunyadi invaded Wallachia and chased him away the same year. Vlad fled to Moldavia and was put under the protection of his uncle, Bogdan II.
War.
Bogdan was assassinated. Vlad took a chance and fled to Hungary. Impressed by Vlad's knowledge of the Ottoman Empire Hunyadi pardoned him and took him in as an adviser. Later Hunyadi made him the Kingdom of Hungary's candidate for the throne of Wallachia.
In 1456, Hungary invaded Serbia to chase away the Turks, and at the same time Vlad III invaded Wallachia. Both invasions were successful. Hunyadi suddenly died of the plague. Vlad became prince of Wallachia.
Main reign (1456–62).
Vlad was spending most of his time at the court of Târgovişte. He made laws, met foreign ambassadors, made public appearances and juged trials. He reinforced some castles and probably enjoyed hunting with his friends.
The constant state of war since the death of his grandfather Mircea the Elder in 1418, led to increased crime levels and less agricultural production. Trade had almost disappeared in Wallachia.
Vlad tried to solve these problems with severe methods. He needed an economically stable country.
Vlad wanted to eliminate all threats to his power, mainly the rival nobility groups, for example the boyars. This was done mainly by killing them and reducing the economic role of them.
The Wallachian nobility had connections with the Saxon merchants. The saxons populated the free towns of Transylvania, making trade to flourish. Vlad was eliminating these towns trade privileges with Wallachia and he started war against them.
The he gave key positions in the Prince’s Council to obscure individuals, but who manifested loyalty towards Vlad. Vlad prefered to knight men from the free peasants.
Vlad III was always on guard against the Dăneşti clan. Some of his attacks into Transylvania may have been efforts to kill or capture Dăneşti princes. Several members of the Dăneşti clan died at Vlad's hands. Rumors say that thousands of citizens of the free towns that sheltered his rivals were impaled by Vlad. One captured Dăneşti prince was forced to read his own funeral speech while he kneeled before an open grave before his execution.
Personal crusade.
There was a war between the Ottoman Empire and the Hungarian Kingdom. Following family traditions, Vlad decided to side with the Hungarians. To the end of the 1450s there was once again talk about a war against the Turks, in which the king of Hungary, Matthias Corvinus would play the main role. Knowing this, Vlad stopped paying money to the Ottoman in 1459 and around 1460 made a new alliance with Corvinus. The Turks did not like this and tried to remove him from power but they failed. In the winter of 1461 Vlad attacked and devastated the area between Serbia and the Black Sea, leaving over 20,000 people dead.
In response to this the Sultan Mehmed II headed towards Wallachia with an army of 60,000 men in the spring of 1462. With his army of 20,000-30,000 men Vlad was not able to stop the Turks from entering Wallachia. The Turks occupied the capital Târgovişte (June 4, 1462) and chased Vlsad away. Vlad was hiding and made small attacks on the Turks. On the night of June 16, Vlad and some of his men entered the main Turkish camp, wearing Turkish clothing and attempted to kill Mehmed. Later the Turkish army retired and left Vlad’s brother, Radu the Handsome, as the new ruler prince.
Radu the Handsome gathered support from the nobility and Vlad fled to Transylvania.
In August 1462 Radu made a deal with the Hungarian Crown.
In captivity.
Vlad escaped to Hungaria but he got imprisoned there. The exact time of Vlad's captivity is not sure. Apparently his imprisonment was not to dangerous. He was able to gradually win his way back into the graces of King Matthias. He was able to meet and marry a member of the royal family (the cousin of King Matthias)
He had two sons with his new wife. Vlad also adopted Catholicism. It is not likely that a prisoner was permitted to marry into the royal family. Diplomatic correspondence from Buda during this time show that Vlad's actual period of imprisonment was short.
The openly pro-Turkish policy of Vlad's brother, Radu was probably a cause in Vlad's rehabilitation. It is interesting to note that the Russian texts, normally very favorable to Vlad Ţepeş, tells that even in captivity he could not give up his favorite games; he often captured birds and mice which he to tortured and mutilate, some were impaled on tiny spears.
The years before his final release in 1474 (when he began preparations for the reconquest of Wallachia), Vlad lived with his new wife in a house in the Hungarian capital. His sons were about ten years old when he reconquered Wallachia in 1476.
Return to Wallachia and death.
Around 1475 Vlad and Stefan Báthory of Transylvania invaded Wallachia with a mixed force of Transylvanians, some dissatisfied Wallachian boyars, and Moldavians sent by Prince Stephen III of Moldavia, Vlad's cousin. Vlad's brother, Radu the Handsome, died a couple of years earlier and had been replaced on the Wallachian throne by another Turkish candidate, Prince Basarab the Elder, a member of the Dăneşti clan. When Vlad's army arrived, Prince Basarabs army fled, some to the Turks, others in the mountains. After placing Vlad Ţepeş on the throne, Stephen Báthory and his forces returned to Transylvania, leaving Vlad in a very weak position. Vlad had little time to get support before a large Turkish army entered Wallachia to put back Prince Basarab on the throne. Vlad's cruelties over the years made the boyars to belive that they had a better chance to survive under Prince Basarab. Even the peasants, tired of the cruelty of Vlad, abandoned him. Vlad had to meet the Turks with the small forces at his disposal, less than four thousand men.
There are several variants of Vlad III the Impaler's death. Some sources say he was killed in battle against the Turks near Bucharest in December of 1476. Others say he was killed by disloyal Wallachian boyars in the war against the Turks, or during a hunt. Others belive Vlad was killed in the war, surrounded by the bodies of his loyal Moldavian bodyguards. Still other reports claim that Vlad was accidentally killed by one of his own men. Vlad's body was decapitated by the Turks and his head was sent to Istanbul preserved in honey. The sultan had it displayed on a stake as proof that "Kazıklı Bey" was dead. The exact place of his grave is unknown.
Legacy.
Romanian tales and legends about Vlad stayed a part of folklore among the Romanian peasants. By constant retelling they have become confused and created an ideal picture of a big national hero. Among the Romanian peasants, Vlad Ţepeş was sometimes remembered as a prince who defended his country. But the Romanian tales also remember Vlad as a very cruel and often capricious ruler. There are several events that are common to all tales.
There is a tale about some foreign ambassadors received by Vlad Ţepeş at Târgovişte and all versions agree that Vlad, in response to some real or imagined insult, (perhaps because they refused to remove the hats in Vlad's presence), had their hats nailed to their heads.
"He was not very tall, but very stocky and strong, with a cruel and terrible appearance, a long straight nose, distended nostrils, a thin and reddish face in which the large wide-open green eyes were enframed by bushy black eyebrows, which made them appear threatening. His face and chin were shaven but for a moustache. The swollen temples increased the bulk of his head. A bull's neck supported the head, from which black curly locks were falling to his wide-shouldered person."
His famous portrait, was rediscovered in the late 1800s, in the gallery of horrors at Innsbruck's Ambras Castle.
Cruelty.
Vlad III Ţepeş has been characterized by some, as very cruel. Impalement was Ţepeş's preferred method of torture and execution. His method of torture was a horse attached to each of the victim's legs as a sharpened stake was gradually forced into the body.
Vlad often had the stakes arranged in various geometric patterns. The most common pattern was a ring outside of a city that was his target. The height of the spear indicated the rank of the victim. The corpses were often left there for months.
Some say that thousands of people were impaled at a single time. One such tale says 10,000 were impaled in the Transylvanian city of Sibiu (where Vlad the Impaler had once lived) in 1460. Another tale says that on Saint Bartholomew's Day (in August), Vlad the Impaler had 30,000 of the merchants and officials of the free Transylvanian city of Braşov impaled. One of the most famous woodcuts of the period shows Vlad the Impaler feasting amongst a forest of stakes outside Braşov, while a nearby executioner cuts apart other victims.
Impalement was Vlad the Impaler's favorite but, not his only method of torture. The list of tortures: nails in heads, cutting off of limbs, strangulation, burning, cutting off of noses and ears, mutilation of sexual organs (especially in the case of women), scalping, skinning, exposure to the elements or to animals, and boiling alive.
No one was immune to Vlad the Impaler's attentions. His victims included women and children, peasants and great lords, ambassadors from foreign powers and merchants. However, the vast majority of his European victims came from the merchants and boyars of Transylvania and his own country, Wallachia. Many have tried to justify Vlad's actions on the basis of nationalism. Most of the merchants in Transylvania and Wallachia were the German speaking Saxons who were seen as bad people because they were not Romanians. He saw the boyars as people who were not loyal (Vlad's own father and older brother were murdered by boyars).
Almost as soon as he came to power, he gave a party for his boyars and their families to celebrate Easter. Vlad was aware that many of these nobles were part of the conspiracy around his father's death. Vlad to revenge his fathers death had all the assembled nobles arrested. The older boyars were impaled on the spot. The younger nobles and their families were marched north from Târgovişte to the ruins of Poienari Castle in the mountains above the Argeş River. The boyars and their families were forced to work for months rebuilding the old castle. According to the reports, they worked until the clothes fell off their bodies and then were forced to continue working naked. Very few survived the building of Vlad's castle.
Vlad Ţepeş is believed to committed even more impalements and other tortures against the Turkish forces. It was reported that an invading Ottoman army turned back when they saw thousands of rotting corpses impaled on the banks of the river Danube. It has also been said that in 1462 Mehmed II, returned to Constantinople after being sickened by the sight of 20,000 impaled corpses outside of Vlad's capital of Târgovişte. Many of the victims were Turkish prisoners of war.
Anecdotal evidence.
Much of the information we have about Vlad III Ţepeş comes from pamphlets (texts) published in the Holy Roman Empire and texts written in Russian. The first known German texts dates from 1488 and it is possible that some were printed during Vlad’s lifetime. The texts were also a form of mass entertainment in a society where the printing press was new. The texts were reprinted many times over the thirty years following Vlad's death. The German texts painted Vlad Ţepeş as someone who terrorized the land and killed innocents. The Russian texts took a somewhat different view. The princes of Muscovy were also having trouble with boyars. They preferred to see Vlad's actions as justified. Despite the differences in interpretation, the texts, regardless of their land of origin, agree on details. This make most historians to believe that some events actually occurred.
Vlad's cruelty against his own people of Wallachia were seen as attempts to make them behave better. According to the texts, he was particularly cruel against women. Young unmarried girls who lost their virginity, unfaithful wives, and widows who had sex were all targets of Vlad's cruelty. Such women often had their sexual organs cut out. They were also often impaled.
Vlad wanted his people to work hard. Merchants who cheated their customers were likely to be killed.
The vampire legend.
It is unclear why Bram Stoker chose this Wallachian prince as the model for his fictional vampire. Stoker was a friend of a Hungarian professor (Arminius Vambery/Hermann Vamberger) from Budapest, and many have suggested that Vlad's name might have been mentioned by this friend. Regardless of how the name came to Stoker's attention, the cruel history of the Impaler was suitable for Stoker's purposes. The events of Vlad's life happened in a region of the world that was still basically medieval in Stoker's time.
There have always been vampire-like creatures in various stories from across the world. However, the vampire, as he became known in Europe, largely originated in Southern Slavic and Greek folklore. The vampire tale is virtually absent in Romanian culture. A veritable epidemic of vampirism swept through Europe beginning in the late 17th century. Philosophers in the West began to study the phenomenon. It was during this period that Dom Augustine Calmet wrote his famous text on vampirism in Hungary. It was also during this period that authors and playwrights first began to explore the vampire legend. Stoker's novel was a work of a long series of works that were inspired by the reports coming from the Balkans.
Perhaps it is natural that Stoker should place his great vampire in the heart of the region that gave birth to the story.

The Black Parade
"The Black Parade" is a 2006 album by the band, My Chemical Romance. It is the third album from the band. The album is a concept album. The songs on this album follow the life of The Patient, a man dying of cancer. The album takes the listener into The Patient's mind, fears, regrets, and accomplishments.
Much like their first two albums, "The Black Parade" offers a message of hope.
"The Black Parade" is: Ray Toro, Mikey Way, Gerard Way, Frank Iero, and Bob Bryar.

George V of the United Kingdom
George V (born George Frederick Ernest Albert; June 3, 1865 - January 20, 1936) was the first ruler of the United Kingdom with the family name "Windsor". He was king from 1910 to 1936. He became king after the death of his father Edward VII. His son, Edward VIII became king after him.

Kiss (album)
Kiss is the self-titled debut album from the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on February 8, 1974.

Hotter Than Hell
Hotter Than Hell is the second album from the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss.It was released on October 22, 1974.

Love Gun
Love Gun is the sixth studio album by the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on June 30, 1977.

Alive II
Alive II is the second live album and eight album overall by the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on November 28, 1977.

Henry IV, Holy Roman Emperor
Henry IV (1050 – 1106) was King of Germany from 1056 and Holy Roman Emperor from 1084, till he was forced to step down in 1105. He was the third emperor of the Salian dynasty and one of the most interesting and important figures of the eleventh century. His reign was marked by the Investiture Controversy with the Papacy and several civil wars with pretenders to his throne in Italy and Germany.
Biography.
Henry was the eldest son of the Emperor Henry III, by his second wife Agnes de Poitou, and was probably born at the royal palace at Goslar. When Henry III unexpectedly died in 1056, the six-year-old Henry IV became king without problems. The Empress Agnes acted as regent, and the German pope Victor II was named as her counsellor.
Unlike Henry III, Agnes could not influence the election of the new popes, Stephen IX and Nicholas II. These popes worked together with the Normans of southern Italy.
But the first great problem startet when Nicholas claimed influence in the election of German bishops.
Investiture controversy.
When Gregory VII, a reformist monk, was elected as pope in 1073. This is when the controversy between emperor and pope began.
In the higher ranks of the German clergy, Gregory had many enemies. Therefore King Henry declared Gregory to no longer pope and the Romans should choose a new pope. When Gregory heard of this he
excommunicated Henry IV, declared he was no longer emperor and canceled the oaths the people had sworn to King Henry.
The excommunication of the king made a deep impression both in Germany and Italy. Thirty years before, Henry III had deposed three popes, but when Henry IV tried to copy this procedure he had not the support of the people. The Saxons began a second rebellion, and the anti-royalist party grew in strength.
To Canossa.
The situation now became extremely critical for Henry. It became clear that at any price he had to get his absolution from Gregory. At first he tried this by an embassy, but when Gregory rejected this, he went to Italy in person.
The pope had already left Rome. Henry tried to force the pope to grant him absolution by doing penance before him at Canossa, where Gregory stayed. For a Christian it seemed impossible to deny a penitent re-entrance into the church, and therefore Gregory removed the ban. But a new conflict followed because Henry IV thought the end of excommunication meant he was king again. But Gregory did not decide that.
Second excommunication of Henry.
The opposition of the rebellious German nobles used the excommunication of Henry to set up a rival king Duke Rudolph of Swabia (Forchheim, March 1077). At first Gregory seemed to be neutral because the two parties (emperor and rebels) were of fairly equal strength. But finally he decided to support Rudolph of Swabia after his victory at "Flarchheim" (January 27, 1080) and declared the excommunication and deposition of King Henry again (March 7, 1080).
This was widely felt to be an injustice. When Rudolph of Swabia died on October 16 of the same year, Henry began to fight to be king. In 1081 he opened the conflict against Gregory in Italy. Gregory had now become less powerful, and thirteen Cardinals stopped supporting him. Rome surrendered to the German king, and Guibert of Ravenna was enthroned as Clement III (March 24, 1084). Henry was crowned emperor by his rival, while Gregory himself had to flee from Rome in the company of his Norman "vassal," Robert Guiscard.

Gene Simmons (album)
"Gene Simmons" is a solo album by Gene Simmons, the bass player of the American hard rock/heavy metal band, Kiss. It was released on September 18, 1978, as one of four solo albums released by the members of Kiss.

Paul Stanley (album)
Paul Stanley is a solo album from the guitarist of the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on September 18, 1978, as one of four solo albums released by the members of Kiss.

Ace Frehley (album)
Ace Frehley is a solo album from the guitarist of the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on September 18, 1978, as one of four solo albums released by the members of Kiss.

Peter Criss (album)
Peter Criss is a solo album from the drummer of the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on September 18, 1978, as one of four solo albums released by the members of Kiss.

Helen Clark
Helen Elizabeth Clark (born February 26, 1950) was the Prime Minister of New Zealand. She became the PM in December 1999. She is currently the Labour Party spokesman for Foreign Affairs. In 2006, she is ranked by "Forbes" magazine as the 20th most powerful woman in the world.
Early life.
Clark grew up as the eldest of four daughters from a Waikato farming family. Her mother, Margaret, worked as a primary school teacher and her father, George, was a farmer who supported the National Party during the 1981 election.
Clark studied at the University of Auckland, where she graduated with a MA (Honours) in 1974. Her thesis research focused on rural political behaviour and representation.

Lick It Up
Lick It Up is a studio album by the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on September 18, 1983.

Animalize
"Animalize" is a studio album by the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on September 13, 1984.

Crazy Nights
"Crazy Nights" is a studio album by the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on September 18, 1987.

Hot in the Shade
Hot in the Shade is a studio album by the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on October 17, 1989.

Joseph Goebbels
Paul Joseph Goebbels (German pronunciation:) (29 October 1897 – 1 May 1945) was a German politician and the minister of propaganda during the Nazi regime. He studied literature and philosophy.
He was a close friend of Adolf Hitler. Goebbels stayed with Hitler in the Fuehrerbunker until Hitler's suicide on April 30 1945. After Hitler's death Goebbels was chancellor for one day, before he and his wife Magda Goebbels also killed themselves. Just before she died, Magda killed their six children.

Alive III
"Alive III" is a live album by the American hard rock and heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on May 18, 1993.

Kiss Unplugged
Kiss Unplugged is an album featuring the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss performance in MTV Unplugged on August 8, 1995. The album was released on March 12, 1996.

Psycho Circus
Psycho Circus is a studio album by the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on September 22, 1998.

Dirty Deeds Done Dirt Cheap
Dirty Deeds Done Dirt Cheap is a studio album by the Australian hard rock band DC. It was released in November 1976 in Europe and delayed for release in USA until 1981.

Let There Be Rock
Let There Be Rock is a studio album by the Australian hard rock band DC. It was released on June 23, 1977.

Jon Corzine
Jon Stevens Corzine (born January 1, 1947) is an American politician. He is the 54th and current Governor of the state of New Jersey. He represented New Jersey in the United States Senate from 2001 until 2006, when he stepped down to take his seat as governor.

Barack Obama
Barack Hussein Obama II (born August 4, 1961) is a United States Senator from Illinois, and will be the 44th president of the United States. Obama won the 2008 United States presidential election on November 4, and will be the first African-American president when he is inaugurated.
Education.
At the Columbia University in New York City he studied political science, with a focus on international relations and he got a bachelor degree in 1983.
He also studied jurisprudence (science of law) for three years at the Harvard Law School. In 1991 he made his Juris Doctor degree 'magna cum laude' ('with great honor').
Presidential campaign.
Barack Obama's presidential campaign for the White House started in early June 2008 when he defeated Hillary Clinton in the 2008 Democrat primaries. He decided not to accept public funding and chose to raise all of his money himself. He has raised the most amount of money ever for a presidential campaign. He defeated Republican candidate John McCain in the election on November 4 by a wide electoral majority of 365 to 173. The popular vote was closer, with Obama receiving 53%, McCain 46%.
Family.
Obama has been married to Michelle Obama since 1992. She has a Bachelor of Arts degree and also a Juris Doctor degree from Harvard Law School. She worked as a lawyer.
They have two daughters, Malia Ann who was born in 1998 and Natasha ("Sasha"), born in 2001. They still live in Chicago, and are moving into the White House on January 20, 2009. He is planning on having a family dog after his inauguration.

Tampa Bay Buccaneers
The Tampa Bay Buccaneers are a American Football team in the National Football League (NFL). They are a part of the Southern Division of the National Football Conference. The Buccaneers are from Tampa, Florida. The team was founded in 1976. And are the champions from Super Bowl XXXVII.

Tomorrow Never Knows
Tomorrow Never Knows is a song from The Beatles's "Revolver" album, from 1966.
John Lennon wrote the song based on his readings of "The Psychedelic Experience", which adapted the "Tibetan Book of the Dead" for use as an LSD "user's manual", intending to give users a kind of religious experience. The song's title came from his bandmate Ringo Starr, who was known for his quirky but insightful comments about life.
Lennon wanted the sound of monks chanting, to complement the Beatles' recording of the song. It was not possible to do this, but Lennon's voice was played through a special speaker (called a Leslie speaker), to give it a warbling sound, like a voice calling from a hilltop. Other sounds on the record came from tape loops, playing over and over, and from a sitar.
The song has also been recorded by other artists. A dance cover version appeared in the 1990s.

Roman Abramovich
Roman Abramovich (born 24 October 1966 in Saratov, Russia) is a Russian businessman. He is one of the richest men in the world. According to 2006 Forbes Magazine, he has a net worth of $18.2 billion. He owns Chelsea F.C., an English Premiership football club. He has given Chelsea much money to pay players. He is governor of a region of Russia.

McLaren
McLaren is a Formula 1 racing team which has recently diversified into other areas, such as making the Mercedes McLaren SLR supercar at its Woking factory. McLaren did set up for Bruce McLaren in 1963. McLaren's drivers are Lewis Hamilton and Heikki Kovalainen. In two last races of 2007, Hamilton lost the championship to Kimi Raikkonen. However, in 2008 McLaren won the title in Brazil after overtaking Timo Glock on last lap.

John Taverner
John Taverner (born about 1490 – died 18 October, 1545) was the most important English composer of his time. He was also an organist.
We cannot be sure exactly when Taverner was born. Some people think that he was a boy chorister at the church of Tattershall in Lincolnshire but his name does not appear on the list of choristers there. People now think that he worked there later as a lay clerk.
He got a job at Cardinal College (now called Christ Church) in Oxford but he could not stay very long because King Henry VIII made lots of changes to the way people had to worship in church. Taverner even hid some books which the king had forbidden under the floor, and he got into trouble for doing this. In the end the Cardinal did not punish him because, he said, he was “only a musician”.
In 1530 he seems to have gone back to Lincolnshire and stayed there for the rest of his life. He probably wrote no more music, but he was quite rich.
Taverner composed eight masses. The most famous one is called the "Western Wynde". It was a “parody mass”, which meant that it used a popular tune with that title. Another mass was called "Gloria tibi trinitas". This work set a fashion for pieces which were called "In Nomine"s, because the tune was from the Benedictus in the mass which sets the words “in nomine domine” (“in the name of the Father”). “In nomine”s were compositions for instruments which used this tune.
Taverner also wrote magnificats and motets.

Wolfgang Schüssel
Wolfgang Schüssel (born June 7, 1945 in Vienna) was the Chancellor of Austria from February 4 2000 until January 11 2007. From January 2006 until June 2006 he was the president of the European Union.

Alfred Gusenbauer
Alfred Gusenbauer (born February 8, 1960 in St. Pölten, Austria) has been the chancellor of Austria since January 2007. He is the leader of the political party SPÖ.

Bruno Kreisky
Bruno Kreisky (January 22, 1911 – July 29, 1990) served as Chancellor of Austria from 1970 to 1983. He is remembered in Austria as one of the people who helped shape the Austrian State Treaty. This treaty is the foundation of modern-day Austria. It was signed in 1955.

New York Giants
The New York Giants are an American football team. They are a part of the National Football League (NFL). Even though they are called the New York Giants they do not play in New York. They play in East Rutherford, New Jeresy. New York is right across the Hudson river from East Rutherford,so they consider New York as home. The Giants play in Giants Stadium in which they share with the New york Jets. However in 2009 a new stadium will be opened right next to the sight of the old stadium. The New York Giants started playing in 1925. They have won six championships. On February 3, 2008, the Giants beat the New England Patriots (17-14) to win their third Super Bowl championship.The previous two Super Bowl victories came against the Denver Broncos and the Buffalo Bills (when they won the game on a missed last second field goal that went "wide right".

Chicago Bulls
Chicago Bulls are a American professional basketball team. They play in Chicago, Illinois. The Bulls are a part of the National Basketball Association (NBA).

Ali Khamenei
Grand Ayatollah (Persian: آیت‌الله سید علی حسینی خامنه‌ای "ayatollah Seyyed `Ali Ḥoseyni Khamene'i") (born 17 July 1939), also known as Seyyed Ali Khamene'i, is the current Supreme Leader of Iran. He was the president of Iran from 1981 to 1989.

Clovis I
Clovis I (variously spelled Chlodowech or Chlodwig, giving modern French "Louis" and modern German "Ludwig") (c. 466 – November 27 511) was the first king of the Franks who united that nation. He succeeded his father Childeric I in 481 as King of the Salian Franks, one of two main groups of Frankish tribes, They were occupying the area west of the lower Rhine at that time, with their centre around Tournai and Cambrai along the modern frontier between France and Belgium. Clovis conquered the neighbouring Frankish tribes and established himself as sole king before his death.
Clovis converted to Catholicism, as opposed to the Arian Christianity that was common among Germanic peoples, because his wife, the Burgundian Clotilde, was a Catholic. He was baptized in the Cathedral of Reims. This act was very important in the following history of France and Western Europe in general, because he expanded his reign over almost all of the old Roman province of Gaul (roughly modern France). He is considered to be the founder both of France (which his state closely resembled geographically at his death) and the Merovingian dynasty, which ruled the Franks for the next two centuries.

Double Nickels on the Dime
"Double Nickels on the Dime" is a hardcore punk album made by the Minutemen. The album was recorded in 1984 and was given to the public in the same year. The album is very long and has 43 songs. It is thought to be a very good album and one of the best of the genre.

Sumer Is Icumen In
"Sumer Is Icumen In" is a very old English song which can be sung as a round. It is the oldest example of a round that we know of. The composer is unknown. It was written down around the middle of 13th century by a monk, but we do not know whether that monk composed it, or whether it had been composed earlier.
The title means "Summer has come in". The round can be sung in six parts. There are also two parts which can be repeated again and again (an ostinato) throughout the piece. The language is Middle English and is based on the dialect spoken in Wessex, England at the time.
Music.
To sing as a round, one singer (or group of singers) would begin at the beginning, a second singer would start at the beginning as the first got to the point marked with the red cross, then the third would join in when the second singer got to the red cross, and so on until all six were singing. The repeated pattern is marked "Pes". The instructions are written in Latin.

Dookie
Dookie is the 3rd album by the band Green Day. It was released in 1994.

Joe Manchin
Joseph (Joe) Manchin III (born August 24, 1947 in Farmington, West Virginia) is an American politician. He was elected Governor of the state of West Virginia in the 2004 election. Manchin took office on January 17, 2005.

Nicolas Sarkozy
Nicolas Sarkozy, born on 28 January, 1955 in Paris, France,
has been President of France since 16 May 2007, succeeding Jacques Chirac.
He was the leader of the UMP, and was elected President of the French Republic on 6 May, 2007. He defeated Ségolène Royal, of the Socialist Party.
Sarkozy is known for his conservative law and order politics and his admiration for a new economic model for France. He wants a more liberalised economy for France because he sees the United States and the United Kingdom as positive examples. Until 26 March 2007, he served as the Minister of the Interior of France. His nickname Sarko is used by both supporters and opponents.

Ségolène Royal
Marie-Ségolène Royal (born 22 September 1953 in Dakar, Senegal), known as is a French politician. She is the president of the Poitou-Charentes region, a member of the National Assembly and a prominent member of the Socialist Party. On 16 November 2006, Socialist Party members elected her as their candidate for the 2007 French presidential election.
In the first round of voting in that election, on April 22, 2007, Royal received 25.87 percent of votes to qualify for the second round to face Nicolas Sarkozy who received 31.18 percent. On May 6, 2007 Sarkozy was elected to be the next President. Sarkozy won the election on May 6 with 53.06 percent of the votes, compared to Royal's 46.94 percent.
She is known for her admiration for some "Third Way" policies, for her controversial insistence on law and order issues and for her support of devolution and participatory democracy.
Bibliography.
Royal is the author unless otherwise noted.

Union for a Popular Movement
The Union for a Popular Movement (French: "Union pour un Mouvement Populaire", UMP), is the main French centre-right political party.
The party has an absolute majority in the National Assembly but relies on its reluctant junior partner, the UDF, in the Senate. The UMP is a member of the European People's Party (EPP), of the Christian Democrat International (CDI) and of the International Democrat Union (IDU).
History.
Since the 1980s, the political groups of the parliamentary right joined forces around the values of economic liberalism and the building of Europe. Their rivalries had contributed to their 1981 and 1988 electoral defeats. Therefore some politicians were in favour of the formation of a confederation, a party.
UMP was founded from the merger of the Gaullist-conservative Rally for the Republic ("Rassemblement pour la République", RPR), the conservative-liberal Liberal Democracy ("Démocratie Libérale", DL), and a part of the centrist Union for French Democracy ("Union pour la Démocratie Française", UDF). Many Christian Democrats (such as Philippe Douste-Blazy and Jacques Barrot), the social-liberal Radical Party and the centrist Popular Party for French Democracy (both associate parties to UDF until 2002) joined the party.
The party was thus born out of the meeting of four major French political traditions: Gaullism, Liberalism (Republicanism), Christian Democracy (Popularism) and Radicalism.
The UMP generally supported the policies of President Jacques Chirac. However, in 2004, the party showed increasing signs of independence. The unpopularity with the electorate of Jacques Chirac and Jean-Pierre Raffarin's government led most members of the UMP to support Nicolas Sarkozy, a rival of Chirac. The party also publicly disapproved of Turkey's proposed membership in the European Union, which Chirac was in favour of.
The first president of the UMP, Alain Juppé, a close associate of Jacques Chirac, resigned on 15 July 2004. On 29 November 2004, Nicolas Sarkozy announced that he would officially take over the presidency of the UMP.
In the 2004 French regional elections the UMP suffered a heavy blow, securing only 2 out of 22 regions in Metropolitan France and half of the departments. This led to the fall of the Jean-Pierre Raffarin government (2001-04), and to the formation of a new cabinet, presided by another UMP politician, Dominique de Villepin.
On April 22, 2007 Nicolas Sarkozy won most of the votes in the first round of the 2007 presidential election. In the second round, he faced Socialist Candidate Ségolène Royal. On May 6, 2007 he won the Presidential election, garnering 53.35% of the vote.

Samuel Adams
Samuel Adams (September 16 (OS), 1722–October 2, 1803) was an American leader, politician, writer, and political philosopher, and one of the Founding Fathers of the United States. Adams helped gather support in the American colonies to rebel against Great Britain. This led to the American Revolution. Adams was one of the key makers of the principles of American politics.
Adams, born and raised in Boston, Massachusetts, was brought up in a religious family. He was educated at Boston Latin School and Harvard College. He started his life as a businessman, but did not like his occupation. He then turned his interest to politics, and became an influential political writer. Adams urged the colonists to withdraw from Great Britain and form a new government. He told the colonies to defend their rights and liberties at town meetings in Boston. He wrote protests against Parliament's taxes against the colonies, such as the Stamp Act of 1765. Adams also organized the Boston Tea Party in 1773 and he was a member of the Continental Congress. He also fought for the Declaration of Independence at the Second Continental Congress in 1776.
Adams helped write the Massachusetts Constitution with James Bowdoin and his cousin John Adams. Later, Adams helped draft the Articles of Confederation. After the Revolutionary War ended, he ran for the House of Representatives in the 1st United States Congressional election. He lost the election to Fisher Ames. He was elected Lieutenant Governor of Massachusetts in 1789. After John Hancock's death in 1793, Adams served as the acting governor. He was then elected governor in January of 1794. He served in that position until June 1797. He then retired from politics and settled in his home in Boston. He died six years later on October 2, 1803.
Further reading.
Many of the foremost works on Adams' life are from the late 19th and early 20th centuries. Much of the information in more recent biographies is attributed to these earlier works.

Aden Abdullah Osman Daar
Aden Abdulle Osman Daar ("Aaden Cabdulle Cusmaan Daar") (1908-2007), was a Somali politician.
In February 1944, he joined the Somali Youth Club (later called the Somali Youth League). The group was a nationalist party that wanted independence for Somalia. Daar became a member of the party's steering board. In 1946, he was appointed as the secretary of one section of the party. He was chairman of the Somali Youth League from 1954 to 1956, and again from 1958 to 1959. In 1956, he was elected chairman of the Legislative Assembly.
When Somalia gained its independence on July 1, 1960, Daar was elected as the first president of Somalia. He was beaten in the 1967 presidential election against Abdirashid Ali Shermarke. He finished his term as president on June 10, 1967.

Nasjonal Samling
Nasjonal Samling (Norwegian for "National Gathering" or "National Unity") was a fascist party in Norway, active in the period 1933-1945. The party was founded by Vidkun Quisling and a group of sympathisers. The party's paramilitary wing was called "Hirden" (the Hird).

Michaëlle Jean
Her Excellency the Rt. Hon. Michaëlle Jean (born September 6, 1957, in Port-au-Prince, Haiti) is a Haitian-born Canadian politician and journalist. She has been the Governor-General of Canada since 2005, replacing Adrienne Clarkson.

Ruhollah Khomeini
Ayatollah Sayyed Ruhollah Mustafavi Khomeini (born September 21, 1900 in Khomein, Persia, died June 4, 1989) (Persian: روح الله موسوی خمینی) sometimes shortened to Ayatollah Khomeini was a Muslim religious leader. Khomeini was the political leader of the Iranian Revolution in 1979. In 1964, Khomeini was arrested and sent to exile. He was exiled to Iraq, Turkey and then to France. Khomeini had many speeches in France against Mohammad Reza Pahlavi, the last Shah of Iran. On January 16,1979, Mohammad Reza Pahlavi leaved Iran. Two weeks later, on February 1, 1979, Khomeini returned to Iran. On February 11, Khomeini appointed his own prime minister, Medhi Bazargan. On March 30, 1979 a referendum took place in Iran and as a result, the monarchy was replaced with an Islamic Republic. After the revolution, Khomeini became Supreme Leader of Iran. Khomeini was a poet too. His poems are collected in a Divan. Khomeini died of cancer on June 3,1989, at the age of 87.

Ali Meshkini
Ayatollah Ali Meshkini (born in 1922) has been the chairman of the Assembly of Experts of the Islamic Republic of Iran since 1984.

Mahmoud Hashemi Shahroudi
Ayatollah Seyyed Mahmoud Hashemi Shahroudi (born in 1948) has been the head of the judiciary of the Islamic Republic of Iran since 1999.
He was Born in Najaf, Iraq.
Ayatollah Shahroudi is best know for ordering a moratorium on stoning as a form of the death penalty. However later this was proven that executions by stoning are still carry out, despite his claims, but inside prison, without a public presence.

Nicholas II of Russia
Nicholas II of Russia, (May 18, 1868 – July 17, 1918) was the last Tsar or Emperor of Russia. He became Tsar in 1894 after his father, Tsar Alexander III died, but was forced to quit in 1917, during the Russian Revolution. He married Princess Alix of Hesse, who was the granddaughter of Queen Victoria, and they had five children, Olga, Tatiana, Maria,Anastasia, and Alexi. There were many problems during his time as Tsar, and many people in the country did not like him. His son, Alexi suffered from a disease called haemophilia, which was a problem as well. In 1917, he abdicated (gave up being Tsar) and he and his family were held under house arrest. On July 17, 1918, Nicholas, his wife, and their children were all killed by a firing squad. In 1981, the executed royal family were made Saints by the Russian Orthodox Church. In 1990, the bones of the Tsar and his family were found in the woods and given a proper burial in 1998.

Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono
General Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono (born September 9, 1949 in Pacitan, East Java, Indonesia), is an Indonesian retired military general and politician. He is the sixth President of Indonesia. Yudhoyono is the first president to be elected directly by voters. Yudhoyono won the presidency in September 2004. He defeated President Megawati Sukarnoputri. Yudhoyono became president on 20 October 2004.

John Hancock
John Hancock (January 12, 1737 (O.S.) – October 8, 1793 (N.S.)) was President of the Second Continental Congress and of the Congress of the Confederation; first Governor of Massachusetts; and the first person to sign the United States Declaration of Independence.

Hashemi Rafsanjani
Ali Akbar Hashemi Rafsanjani (Persian: اکبر هاشمی رفسنجانی "Akbar Hāshemī Rafanjānī"), Hashemi Bahramani (هاشمی بهرمانی) born on August 25, 1934, is an influential Iran ian politician. He has been the Chairman of the Expediency Discernment Council of Iran since 1989.
Forbes magazine listed Rafsanjani in their list of richest people in the world and has written that as the real power behind the Iranian government, he "has more or less run the Islamic Republic for the past 24 years." His wealth has earned him the infamous nickname of "Akbar Shah" in Iran.
He served as President of Iran from 1989 to 1997, losing on the second ballot to Mahmoud Ahmadinejad in the 2005 election on his attempt for a third term in office. After this, he has tried to use his position in the Expediency Council to denounce President Ahmadinejad's administration. He said he would do some privatizations and change foreign policy. However, President Ahmadinejad has noted Rafsanjani's failure to make a difference between privatization and self takeover of government-owned companies. Ahmadinejad has also commmented on the foreign policies of Rafsanjani's administration which lead to sanctions against Iran in 1995 and 1996.
Currently, one of his sons has been accused of receiving a bribe. Analysts expect that his son will not be put on trial, however.

Micheline Calmy-Rey
Micheline Calmy-Rey (born July 8, 1945) is a Swiss politician. She has been a member of the Swiss Federal Council since 2003. Calmy-Rey is head of the Federal Department of Foreign Affairs (the Swiss foreign minister) and President of the Confederation for 2007.

Hugo Chávez
Hugo Rafael Chávez Frías (IPA:) (born July 28, 1954) is the current president of Venezuela. He is the leader of the "Bolivarian Revolution" and promotes his vision of democratic socialism, Latin American integration, and anti-imperialism. Chávez is also an ardent critic of neoliberal globalization and U.S. foreign policy.
Chávez is career military officer. He founded the left-wing Fifth Republic Movement after a failed coup d'état against former President Carlos Andrés Pérez. Chávez was
elected to serve as president in 1998. This was mainly because he promised to help the poor majority of Venezuelan people. He was re-elected in 2000, and 2006. He started a movement called Bolivarian Missions. Its goal is to fight disease, illiteracy, malnutrition, and other social problems. Abroad, Chávez is known for supporting alternative models of economic development. He has also spoken in favor of a collaboration of poor nations, especially those in Latin America.
Chávez's reforms have caused controversy, both inside Venezuela, and outside the country. Some people criticized the reforms, others supported them. Those people who support the reforms say that he has given more power to the poor, and that he has stimulated economic growth. Those who argue against the reforms say that he is an autocraŧ who has mismanaged the economy.
Some governments, especially the government of the United States see Chávez as a threat to global oil prices, as well as to regional stability. Others sympathize with his ideology or welcome his bilateral trade and reciprocal aid agreements.
In 2005 and 2006 he was named one of "Time" magazine's 100 most influential people.

Socialist Party (France)
The Socialist Party ("Parti Socialiste", PS) is one of the largest political parties in France. It replaced the French Section of the Workers' International (SFIO) in 1969.
It is one of the social democratic parties.
It first won power under the Fifth Republic with François Mitterrand's victory at the 1981 presidential election.
The party's candidate for the 2007 presidential election, Ségolène Royal, was defeated by Nicolas Sarkozy by about 53% to 47%.
French socialism until 1969.
After the failure of the Paris commune (1871), French socialism was figuratively beheaded. Its leaders were killed or exiled. France's first socialist party, the Federation of the Socialist Workers of France ("Fédération des travailleurs socialistes de France" or FTSF), was founded in 1879.
In 1899, the participation of Millerand in Pierre Waldeck-Rousseau's cabinet caused a debate about socialist participation in a "bourgeois government". Three years later, Jaurès, Allemane and the possibilists founded the French Socialist Party while Guesde and Vaillant formed the Socialist Party of France. Then, in 1905, during the Globe Congress, the two groups merged in the French Section of the Workers International ("Section française de l'Internationale ouvrière" or SFIO). Jaurès became the party leader.
The French socialists were strongly pacifist, but following the assassination of Jaurès in 1914 they were unable to resist the wave of militarism which followed the outbreak of World War I.
The Socialists suffered a severe split over participation in the wartime government of national unity. In 1919 the anti-war socialists were heavily defeated in elections. In 1920, during the Tours Congress, the majority and left wing of the party broke away and formed the French Section of the Communist International ("Section française de l'Internationale Communiste" or SFIC). This party joined the Third International, that was founded by Lenin. The right wing, led by Léon Blum, kept the "old house" and remained in the SFIO.
In 1934, the Communists changed their line, and the three parties came together in the Popular Front, which won the 1936 elections and brought Blum to power as France's first Socialist Prime Minister.
After the liberation of France in 1944, the SFIO had a coalition with a powerful Communist Party (which became the main left-wing party) and the Christian Democratic MRP. This alliance did not survive the Cold War. Blum proposed the construction of a Third Force with the center-left and the center-right, against the Gaullists and the Communists. However, his candidate to lead of the SFIO, Daniel Mayer, was defeated by Guy Mollet.
Mollet was supported by the left wing of the party. Paradoxically, he spoke a Marxist language without questioning the alliance with the center and the center-right. He was Prime Minister at the head of a minority government in 1956. The SFIO returned to opposition in 1959.
The SFIO did not nominate a candidate for the 1965 election. Consequently, it supported the candidacy of François Mitterrand, a former minister of the Fourth Republic who had been a conservative, then an independent of the left. He was resolutely anti-Gaullist. He obtained an honourable result and faced De Gaulle in an unexpected second ballot. He thus appeared as the leader of the non-Communist left.
In order to exist between the Communist Party, leading the left, and the Gaullist Party, leading the country, the SFIO, Radicals, and left wing republican groups created the Federation of the Democratic and Socialist Left under Mitterrand's leadership.
The foundation of the PS and the "Union of Left" (1969-1981).
In 1969 the SFIO was replaced by the Socialist Party ("Parti socialiste" or PS). It was joined by pro-Pierre Mendès-France clubs (Union of Clubs for the Renewal of the Left led by Alain Savary) and left-wing republican groups (Union of Socialist Groups ad Clubs of Jean Poperen). During the Issy-les-Moulineaux Congress, Alain Savary was elected First Secretary with the support of his predecessor Guy Mollet. He proposed an "ideological dialogue" with the Communists.
Two years later, pro-François Mitterrand clubs (Convention of the Republican institutions), joined the party. Mitterrand defeated the Savary-Mollet duo by proposing an electoral programme with the Communists.
Mitterrand's presidency and the practice of power (1981-1995).
In 1981 Mitterrand defeated the conservative, Valéry Giscard d'Estaing, to become the first socialist elected President of France by universal suffrage.
The PS lost the majority in the French National Assembly in 1986, forcing Mitterrand to "cohabit" with the conservative government of Jacques Chirac. Nevertheless, Mitterrand was re-elected President in 1988 with a moderate programme entitled "united France". He proposed neither nationalisations nor privatisations. He chose as Prime Minister the most popular and moderate of the Socialist politicians, Michel Rocard. His cabinet included 4 center-right ministers but it was supported by only a plurality in the National Assembly elected in June 1988.
During his second term, Mitterrand focused on foreign policy and European construction.
Jospin and the "Plural Left" (1995-2002).
In opposition, the PS reconstructed a coalition with the other left-wing forces: the PCF, the Greens, the Left Radical Party and the MDC. This "Plural Left" ("Gauche plurielle") gained the 1997 legislative election and Jospin became Prime Minister of the third "cohabitation".
His policy was broadly progressive but had little to do with socialism as traditionally understood. The Aubry laws reduced the working time to 35 hours a week. A universal medical cover was instituted. However, the policy of privatization was pursued.
On April 21, 2002 Jospin was eliminated at the first round of the presidential election.
After the 2002 shock.
In the 2004 regional elections, the Socialists had a major comeback. In coalition with the former "Plural Left", they gained power in 20 of the 22 metropolitan regions (all except Alsace and Corsica) and in the four overseas regions. In fact, it benefited from a "sanction-vote" against the right.
On December 1, 2004, 59% of the members of the Socialist Party decided to approve the proposed European Constitution. However, several well-known members of the Party, including Laurent Fabius, and left-wingers Henri Emmanuelli and Jean-Luc Mélenchon, asked the voters to vote "no" in the 29 May 2005 French referendum on the European Constitution, at which the proposed Constitution was rejected.
2007 presidential elections.
For the 2007 presidential election, many potential candidates appeared: François Hollande, Laurent Fabius (who has joined the left-wing of the party), Dominique Strauss-Kahn (who claimed he represented "social-democracy"), Jack Lang, Martine Aubry and Ségolène Royal, who was favourite according to the polls.
On November 16, 2006, the members of the Socialist Party chose Ségolène Royal to be their candidate with a majority of 60%. Her challengers, Strauss-Kahn and Fabius, obtained 21% and 19% respectively.
After obtaining 25% of the vote in the first round of France's presidential elections Ségolène Royal qualified for the second round of voting but lost to Nicolas Sarkozy on May 6, 2007.

New Jersey Devils
The New Jersey Devils are an ice hockey that is part of the NHL. They play in the state of New Jersey. They have won the Stanley Cup, awarded to the best team team in the NHL, 3 times.

Nashville Predators
The Nashville Predators are a professional ice hockey team based in Nashville, Tennessee. They play in the National Hockey League (NHL). Their name is sometimes shortened to the "Preds."

Dallas Stars
The Dallas Stars are a professional ice hockey team based in Dallas, Texas. They play in the National Hockey League (NHL). They have won 1 Stanley Cup, in 1999.

Florida Panthers
The Florida Panthers are an ice hockey team that plays in the NHL. They play near Miami.

Carolina Hurricanes
The Carolina Hurricanes are an ice hockey team that plays in the NHL. They won the Stanley Cup during 2005-2006 season, by beating the Edmonton Oilers. They play in Raleigh, but they moved in 1997 from Hartford.

New York Islanders
The New York Islanders are an ice hockey team that plays in the NHL. They were a very good team between 1980 and 1983, winning four Stanley Cups. They play in Uniondale, New York.

Phoenix Coyotes
The Phoenix Coyotes are an ice hockey team that plays in the NHL. They play in Glendale, Arizona. In 1996, the team moved to Phoenix from Winnipeg,Canada. As of 2007, they have not won a Stanley Cup.
Their head coach is Wayne Gretzky and their general manager is Don Maloney.

Buffalo Sabres
The Buffalo Sabres are an ice hockey team that plays in the National Hockey League. Between 1996 and 2001, the team's goaltender was Dominik Hašek, a very famous player.

Columbus Blue Jackets
The Columbus Blue Jackets are an ice hockey team that plays in the NHL. They are one of the youngest teams in the NHL, having being formed only in 2000. The Blue Jackets have never made the playoffs yet. The coach right now is Ken Hitchcock. The Blue Jackets play at Nationwide Arena.

Atlanta Thrashers
The Atlanta Thrashers are an NHL ice hockey team. The team plays in Atlanta, Georgia. They have made the playoffs only once in seven seasons.

Ron Paul
Ronald Ernest Paul (born August 20, 1935) is a Republican Congressman from the state of Texas.
He tried to become President of the United States in 2008. He also tried to become President in 1988 but he was defeated. He is for lower taxes, minimal government and against interventionism. He supports making United States money worth a certain amount of gold.

San Jose Sharks
The San Jose Sharks are an ice hockey team that plays in the National Hockey League. The team is based in San Jose, California and was founded on May 9th, 1990. It started playing in the NHL in autumn 1991. The team colours are pacific teal, grey, burnt orange and black. Because of this it is often called "Team Teal".
The Sharks host their games at HP Pavilion and are coached by Todd McLellan since summer 2008. Famous players for the Sharks are Joe Thornton, Jonathan Cheechoo, Rob Blake, Evgeni Nabokov, Dan Boyle and team captain Patrick Marleau.

Chen Shui-bian
Chen Shui-bian (陳水扁) (born October 12, 1950 in Guantian, Tainan, Taiwan) is the President of Taiwan. His nickname is "Ah-bian" (阿扁). Chen is a member of the Democratic Progressive Party. He took office in 2000. This ended 55 years of Kuomintang rule in Taiwan.
Early years.
Chen Shui-bian is raised from a poor family in southern Taiwan. He worked hard and studied at National Taiwan University. He passed a test and became a lawyer in his junior year. He graduated from university in 1974.

Kurt Waldheim
Kurt Josef Waldheim (21 December 1918 – 14 June 2007) was an Austrian diplomat and conservative politician. He was Secretary-General of the United Nations from 1972 to 1981, and President of Austria from 1986 to 1992. At the time of his death he was the oldest living former Secretary-General of the United Nations and the oldest living former President of Austria. On June 14, 2007, Waldheim died of heart failure.
Shortly before 1986, Waldheim published an autobiography. During his campaign to become president in 1986, it became public that some statements in that biography were not true. These were about his past. Waldheim was an officer for Germany in the Second World War. There was a commission of several historians who looked at the issue. They did find that Waldheim had behved as he should have done. He did not commit any War crimes. However, in his role of an officer, he must have known about the deportation of about 40.000 Jews into concentration camps. These transports, as well as the shooting of soldiers were a clear breach of law.
Because of this, he was not allowed to travel to the United States any more.
In 1990, he had a success: Saddam Hussein held several foreigners as hostages at the start of the Second Gulf War. When Waldheim heard this, he personally went to Baghdad. Through talks he could get Saddam to release the Austrian and the Swiss hostages (both countries are neutral)

Lucky Town
"Lucky Town" is a music album by Bruce Springsteen. It was produced by Bruce Springsteen with Jon Landau and Chuck Plotkin. The album was recorded by Toby Scott and mixed by Bob Clearmountain. It was released in 1992 under the copyright of Bruce Springsteen and was distributed by Sony Music.
Songs.
Bruce Springsteen plays all the instruments except the drums, which are played by Gary Mallabar.

Thomas More
Sir Thomas More or Saint Thomas More (February 7, 1478 – July 6, 1535), was an English writer, lawyer, and statesman. He held many important jobs including Speaker of the House of Commons, Lord Chancellor and advisor to the King Henry VIII. He also invented the world "utopia", which means: "an ideal place to live". This is described in a book called "Utopia". When King Henry left the Roman Catholic Church because the Pope would now allow him a divorce from his first wife, he started The Church of England. More, a devout Catholic, did not accept the King as head of the Church. Because of this, he was arrested and executed for treason. He was thought of as a martyr and made a saint by the Roman Catholic Church in 1935. His feast day is on June 22 and he is the patron of lawyers and politicans. A play and movie called A Man For All Seasons is based on his life.

Juan Perón
Juan Domingo Perón (October 8, 1895 – July 1, 1974) was an Argentine general and politician. He served as President of Argentina from 1946 to 1955, ruling with Eva and again from 1973 to 1974 with his wife Isabel, who was his vice president. In Argentina, he and his second and wife Eva or Evita are considered icons by many people, especially members of Peronist party, which he started and is still popular today. He was elected in 1946. In 1955 he was overthrown and force to leave the country. In 1973, he returned and ran for President again with his third wife Isabel as Vice-President and was elected. He died less than a year after being elected. His widow, Isabel took his place, which made the first woman to be the head of a country's government in the Western hemisphere.

Nation of Domination
The Nation of Domination (NoD) was a professional wrestling stable (a group of wrestlers who work together) in the World Wrestling Federation (WWF). The group was based on the Nation of Islam. It was created in the WWF by Faarooq. There were usually no more than four or five members of the NoD at any one time but as members left or became injured, other wrestlers would replace them. Members of the NoD included Rocky Maivia (The Rock), Crush, Savio Vega, D'Lo Brown, Ahmed Johnson, Kama Mustafa, Mark Henry and Owen Hart. The NoD separated in October of 1998.
The NoD fought mainly against Degeneration X, led by Triple H.

Emperor Jimmu
Emperor Jimmu (January 1, 660 BC - March 11, 585 BC) was a legendary figure in the history of Japan. In myths, he is the founder of Japan and is also first in the traditional list of emperors. The royal family once based its claim to rule Japan because they are thought to be descended from, or related to him.
The name "Jimmu" means "god-warrior" or "divine might." This name was given after his death.
In Shinto belief, he is thought to be a descendant of the sun goddess Amaterasu.
According to that legend, she gave him 3 symbols of power: a jewel, a sword and a mirror.
Before Jimmu's apperance, there was havoc in Japan. There was no united law or leadership, but several villages making their way alone. The first emperor united these groups and set up a system, with the old leaders as his samurai, or political leaders, and as shogun, the military powers.
Names.
His personal name was "Kamuyamato Iwarebiko", but it would not be considered polite to call an emperor by this name.
He is also known as "Wakamikenu no Mikoto or Sano no Mikoto".

Emperor Suizei
Emperor Suizei was the second emperor of Japan.
Emperor Suizei was thought to have ruled Japan from 581 BC to 549 BC, but he is thought to be legendary. He was traditionally believed to have existed, but no studies show that he actually lived. It was said that he ruled from the palace of Takawoka, in Kadzuraki.
According to legend, he was the son of Emperor Jimmu.
Names.
His posthumous name, a name given after his death, means "joyfully healthy peace".
His personal name was "Kamu Nunagawamimi no Mikoto", but it would not be considered polite to call an emperor by this name.

Emperor Annei
Emperor Annei was the third emperor of Japan. He was thought to have ruled Japan from 549 BC to 511 BC, but is thought to be legendary. He is traditionally believed to existed, but no studies show that he actually lived.
Names.
His posthumous name, a name given after his death, means "steady tranquility".
His personal name was "Shikitsuhiko Tamademi no Mikoto", but it would not be considered polite to call an emperor by this name.

Emperor Itoku
Emperor Itoku was the fourth emperor of Japan. He is believed to have ruled Japan from 510 BC to 476 BC, but is thought to be legendary. He is traditionally believed to existed, but no studies show that he actually lived.
Names.
His posthumous name, a name given after his death, means "benign virtue".
His personal name was Oho Yamatohiko Sukitomo no Mikoto, but it would not be considered polite to call an emperor by this name.

Dawn Fraser
Dawn Fraser AO, MBE (born September 4, 1937) is an Australian champion swimmer. She is one of only two swimmers to win the same Olympic event three different times.
Swimming.
On 21 February 1956, at the age of 18, Fraser broke Willy den Ouden's world record for the 100m freestyle Ouden had held the record for twenty years. On 1 December of the same year, Fraser and the other swimmers for the Australian team won all three medals in the 100m freestyle at the 1952 Summer Olympics in Melbourne. Fraser beat her own world record winning that race. She got a second gold medal and world record as part of the Australian team in the 4x100m freestyle relay and got a silver medal in the 400m freestyle.
Four years later, at the 1960 Olympics in Rome, Fraser won the 100m again. This made her the first woman to defend an Olympic swimming title. She also placed fifth in the 400m and won silver medals in the medley relay and freesyle relay. This was the first time the medley relay was an Olympic event. On 27 October 1962, in Melbourne, Fraser became the first woman to swim the 100m in less than one minute. She swam the longer distance of 110 yards in 59.9 seconds.
At the 1964 Games in Tokyo, Fraser won the 100m again in a close race with Sharon Stouder of the United States. She became the first Olympic swimmer of either sex to win the same event three times. She also won a silver medal in the freestyle relay and placed fourth in the 400m. While in Tokyo, Fraser was arrested for taking a flag from the entrance to the Emperor's Palace. She said she was sorry she took it and the charges were dropped. The Emperor gave her the flag as a gift.
Politics.
In 1988, Fraser was elected to the parliament of New South Wales. She served until 1991.

Fouad Siniora
Fouad Siniora (in Arabic: فؤاد السنيورة, Fu'ād As-Sanyūrah) is the Prime Minister of Lebanon. He has been Prime Minister since July 19, 2005, after Najib Mikati left office.
His early life.
Fouad Siniora is a Sunni Muslim, who was born in Sidon in 1943. He finished his studies at the American University of Beirut. Then, he worked for Citibank, and in the 1970s, he became a teacher at the American University of Beirut. Later, he worked for the Central Bank. In 1982, he started to work for the late Prime Minister, Rafik Hariri. He became part of Hariri's business. Siniora was Minister of Finance in Lebanon after the civil war ended.

Hassan Nasrallah
Hassan Nasrallah (in Arabic: حسن نصرالله) (born August 30, 1960 - in Bourj Hammoud, Beirut) is the leader of the Islamist party in Lebanon called Hezbollah. He is also a Shi'a Muslim cleric. Some countries, like the United States and Britain, consider him to be a terrorist.
His early life.
Hassan Nasrallah was born in Bourj Hammoud, east Beirut. He was among ten children in his family. He went to Al Najah school, and then a public school in Sin el-Fil, Beirut. The civil war in 1975 caused his family to move to their old home in Bassouriyeh. There, he finished his secondary education at the public school in Tyre. He then joined the Amal Movement, a militant group that represents the Shi'a Muslims in Lebanon.

Rafik Hariri
Rafik Baha ad-Din Hariri (November 1, 1944 – February 14, 2005), (in Arabic: رفيق بهاءالدين الحريري) was a billionaire and a businessman. He was also the Prime Minister of Lebanon from 1992 to 1998, and he became Prime Minister again in 2000. But in October 20, 2004, he quit his job. He helped a lot in rebuilding Beirut, which was damaged from the fightings during the civil war.
Hariri was killed on February 14, 2005. 1000 kg of TNT exploded near his car. His car was passing through the St. George Hotel in the Lebanese capital, Beirut. People are still trying to learn who did it, and it is done with help from the United Nations. Serge Brammertz is leading this investigation. Many people in Lebanon said that the government of Syria and its friends did it. So far, Brammertz said that a DNA evidence collected from the exploded area shows that the killing was done by a young man. It is believed that his man blew himself up at the time.

National Democrats (Sweden)
National Democrats (Swedish: "Nationaldemokraterna") is a minor political party in Sweden. It was formed in October 2001. The chairman of the party is Marc Abramsson.

Manuel Fraga Iribarne
Manuel Fraga Iribarne (born November 23, 1922 at Vilalba) was a Spanish and Galician politician. Fraga was a politician in Spain under Francisco Franco's dictatorial regime and in the democracy after Franco's death. He was the President of Galicia for 15 years until he died. Fraga governed Galicia strictly with a hard hand but he did a lot of good things for Galicia, helping build a strong economy of farming, fishing and construction.

Mitt Romney
Willard Mitt Romney (born March 12, 1947) is the former Governor of Massachusetts. He is a Mormon and part of the Republican Party. He ran for the President of the United States in 2008. Romney stopped trying to become President on February 7, 2008.

Volta (album)
"Volta" is a 2007 album by Björk. She has claimed the album is about "returning to her roots".

Armenian Revolutionary Federation
The Armenian Revolutionary Federation (ARF or ՀՅԴ) (Armenian: – Hay Heghapokhakan Dashnaktsutiun, Dashnaktsutiun, – Dashnak or Tashnag) is an Armenian political party founded in Tiflis (Tbilisi in modern day Georgia) in 1890 by Christapor Mikaelian, Stepan Zorian, and Simon Zavarian. The party works in Armenia and in countries where the Armenian diaspora is active, notably in Lebanon and the ethnically Armenian-dominated de facto Republic of Nagorno-Karabakh.
Museum.
The Armenian Revolutionary Federation History Museum was created during an official ceremony Friday 2007 at Yerevan's Kristapor Mikaelian Center, with the party's leaders and supporters on hand to mark this momentous occasion.
Opened in 1946, the ARF History Museum was in Paris and during the years has collected more than 3,000 artifacts describing the party's history. After the ARF's return to Armenia, the museum and the ARF archives have been sent to Armenia.
Giro Manoyan is one of the leaders of ARF.

Varazdat
Varasdates or Varazdat (, Varazdat) was an Armenian prince who succeeded his uncle King Papes as King of Armenia in 374.
Following the murder of King Papes, Valens sent Varazdat, a nephew of Pap, a young man highly reputed for his mental and physical gifts, to hold the Armenian throne. Shapur II, having failed on the battlefield, now proposed to Valens in 375 that Armenia be divided between the two powers. The Emperor rejected the proposal, but sent Victor Magistrianus to the Persian King to discuss the question. This emissary was cozened into exceeding the bounds of his authority and agreeing to the Persian proposal. In the meantime, the internal condition of Armenia was imperiled through friction between King Varazdat and the nakharars, culminating in the assassination of Musel Mamikonian, the leader of the latters' party. Manuel, the son of Musel, took up arms against the King and compelled him to flee from Armenia in 378, after four years of reign. Varazdat's life was saved, but the country was thrown into confusion. The Persians took advantage of the turmoil and invaded Armenia; but their occupation was a short-lived one. Shapur II died in 379, and the Persians evacuated in haste. Manuel, the dynamic Mamikonian, had rallied a formidable national force for action.

Rhadamistus
Rhadamistus (other names Ghadam or Radamisto) was an Iberian prince who reigned in Armenia from 51 to 53 and 54 to 55 CE.

Yuri Andropov
Yuri Vladimirovich Andropov (1914-1984) was a Soviet politician and General Secretary of the CPSU from November 12, 1982 until his death just fifteen months later.

Mona Sahlin
Mona Ingeborg Sahlin (born Andersson on March 9, 1957 in Sollefteå, Sweden) is the new leader for the Swedish Social Democratic Party after Göran Persson's 10 years as leader. She was the minister responsible for gthe handling of the Heart 2 Art Exhibition in Stockholm 2002.Sahlin will lead the party into the new election in 2010 where she can become the first female Prime minister in Sweden if the party wins the election.

Swedish Social Democratic Party
The Swedish Social Democratic Party is Swedens biggest political party. The party has been in the lead with a Prime minister for the longest and most amount of time in Sweden. Mona Sahlin is the current and so far only leader for the party who has been a women. The party lost to the Moderate party in the 2006 elections and will have a new chance to take over the power again in 2010.
Olof Palme one of Sweden's most famous politicians was the party leader for many years before hes murder in 1986.

Olof Palme
Olof Palme (January 30, 1927 – March 1, 1986) (murdered) was a Swedish politician. He was the leader of the Social Democratic Party from 1969-1986 to his death and Prime Minister of Sweden from 1969 - 1976 and 1982 - 1986. He was shot dead in Stockholm after going to the cinema on February 28 1986. The killer has never been arrested, and the gun has never been found. His murder is still a mystery for Swedish police, even though many people have been arrested during the years.

Ingvar Carlsson
Ingvar Carlsson (born 9 November 1934 in Borås, Västra Götaland County (then Älvsborg County), Sweden), is a Swedish politician, former Prime Minister of Sweden (March 1986–October 1991; October 1994–March 1996) and leader of the Social Democratic Party (March 1986–March 1996).

Democratic Progressive Party
The Democratic Progressive Party (DPP) (Traditional Chinese:; Simplified Chinese:; abbreviated to or; Hanyu Pinyin: Mínjìndǎng) is a major political party in the Republic of China (Taiwan). The party has been linked with the pan-green coalition and de-jure Taiwan independence movementy. The DPP is a member of Liberal International and a founding member of the Council of Asian Liberals and Democrats. The DPP represented Taiwan in the Unrepresented Nations and Peoples Organisation.

Help!
"Help!" is a 1965 movie starring The Beatles, and also the name of the movie's theme song, and of its soundtrack album. The movie was directed by Richard Lester, the same as their first movie, "A Hard Day's Night". While "A Hard Day's Night" was filmed in black-and-white, "Help!" was in color. George Martin produced the Beatles's songs for the album, and all their recordings for the movie.
Movie.
"Help!" is a fantasy story, that makes fun of spy movies, which were popular at the time. A religious cult has lost a special ring, worn by people they plan to sacrifice to their goddess, Kaili. It turns out one of their members sent the ring to Ringo Starr (drummer for the Beatles, who loved to wear rings). When the cult finds out, they try to capture Ringo, and either sacrifice him to Kaili or get their ring back. He tries to give it back, but the ring will not come off his finger. The other Beatles try to help, but also end up in danger. A defector (quitter) from the cult tries different ways to remove the ring, and a scientist also tries to steal it. Scotland Yard hides the Beatles at Buckingham Palace, but the cult even sneaks in there. The band escapes to the Bahamas in disguise, but are followed. Tired of running, the Beatles finally face down the cultists.
The movie's co-stars were Leo McKern, Eleanor Bron, Roy Kinnear, and Victor Spinetti. Spinetti also appeared in "A Hard Day's Night", and later in "Magical Mystery Tour". The movie was going to be called "Eight Arms to Hold You", but the title was changed when John Lennon wrote a song titled "Help!" that suited the movie's theme.
"Help!" was filmed partly in England, partly in Austria, and partly in the Bahamas. The Beatles started a company in the Bahamas, as a tax shelter, but it did not work out. While they were filming, a Hindu believer gave each Beatle a book about reincarnation. George Harrison became a follower of Hinduism. He also enjoyed the Indian music featured in "Help!", bought a sitar, and took music lessons with Ravi Shankar.
Soundtrack album.
"Help!" was the fifth album by the Beatles. The first seven songs appeared in the movie. The album includes the title song, "Ticket To Ride", George Harrison's "I Need You", and Paul McCartney's "Yesterday", the song with the most versions by other artists of all time. "Help!" was the last Beatles album with songs written by other people.
Songs on the album.
All songs were written by John Lennon and Paul McCartney unless noted otherwise.

Please Please Me
"Please Please Me" was a 1963 album by The Beatles. It was their first album. Ten of its songs were recorded all in one day, on February 11th 1963, and was an example of what they played live at the time.
Songs on the album.
Songs not credited above were written by John Lennon and Paul McCartney, two members of the band.

Sarah Palin
Sarah Louise Heath Palin (born February 11, 1964) is the Governor of Alaska and was the Republican Party's nominee for Vice President in the 2008 United States presidential election, however lost to Joe Biden.
Palin was a member of the Wasilla, Alaska city council from 1992 to 1996 and the city's mayor from 1996 to 2002. After a failed campaign for lieutenant governor of Alaska in 2002, she led the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission from 2003 to 2004. She was elected Governor of Alaska in November 2006 by defeating the incumbent governor in the Republican primary and then defeating a former two-term Democratic governor in the general election. She is the first female governor of Alaska, and the youngest person elected to the position.
On August 29, 2008, Republican presidential candidate John McCain announced he had chosen Palin as his running mate, and she was formally nominated at the 2008 Republican National Convention in Saint Paul, Minnesota. She was the first woman to run on the Republican Party's presidential ticket and the first Alaskan nominee of either major party.
She is married and has five children. Her youngest child, Trig, has Down syndrome. She has a son serving in the U.S. Army.

Samvel Babayan
Samvel Babayan (Armenian: Սամվել Բաբայան), was the Commander in Chief of the Nagorno-Karabakh Defense Army from 1994 to 2000.
At a February 26 meeting on a case of the March 22, 2000, an assassination attempt against Arkady Ghoukasyan in Stepanakert. Babayan was sentenced to 14 years in prison.

I'm with You
"I'm with You" is one of Avril Lavigne's most popular songs. She played it at her wedding. The song was released in 2002 (North America) and 2003 (UK). It is on her first album, "Let Go". The song was the top rated song in Mexico as well as reaching a rank in the top five in the United States, Ireland, and Italy. It also reached #7 in the UK. The song was a part of the soundtrack for the movie "Bruce Almighty".
Formats and tracklistings.
These are the formats and track listings of major single-releases of "I'm with You".

Edmund Burke
Edmund Burke (January 12, 1729 - July 9, 1797) was an important Irish politician, and writer. Many people consider Burke to be one of the founders of conservatism. He became a member of the British House of Commons in 1765, and was known for his support for the American Revolution and his attacks against the French Revolution. His most famous book was "Reflections on the Revolution in France", which created many of the ideas in conservatism. Some of his other writings include the book ' and the treatise on beauty "A Philosophical Enquiry into the Origins of Our Ideas of the Sublime and Beautiful". He was also one of the founders of the "Annual Register", a review of politics which was published every year and had information on the history of the last year.

Ali
Ali ibn Abi Talib (‘Alī ibn Abī Tālib) ()‎ (Approximately: March 17, 599 - February 28, 661) was an early Islamic leader. He was the fourth Sunni caliph and the first Shia imam.

Edward VII of the United Kingdom
Edward VII (November 9, 1841 – May 6, 1910) was the King of the United Kingdom from 1901 to 1910, which is called the Edwardian period. He was the only British ruler whose royal house was called the House of Saxe-Coburg and Gotha. The name was changed to Windsor by his son, George V in 1917 and still used today. Edward was born Albert Edward and was the oldest son of Queen Victoria and her husband, Prince Albert. He was Prince of Wales and heir to the throne, longer than any person in the British Royal family. His mother reigned for 63 years and Edward was 59 years old when he became King. In his younger years as Prince of Wales, he known as a playboy and popularized many trends in fashion, he was married to Alexandra of Denmark, but had many mistresses. Edward only ruled as King for about 9 years before he died at the age of 68.

Home Alone
Home Alone is a 1990 comedy movie. It was written and produced by John Hughes and directed by Chris Columbus. It stars Macaulay Culkin as Kevin McCallister, a boy who is left behind by his family when they go on a vacation to France, over Christmas. While his family is gone, Kevin must stop two burglars trying to rob his house. The movie was very popular and three sequels were made.

Old World Underground, Where Are You Now?
"Combat Baby" was also a single in the UK.
Track listing.
All tracks written by Metric.
Official samples.
Metric's official website has short clips of this album on their.
Lyrics.
Lyrics for this album can be found on.

Mohammad Reza Pahlavi
Mohammad Reza Pahlavi (Persian: محمد رضا پهلوی, October 16, 1919 - July 27, 1980) was the last Shah of Iran. He was the Shah of Iran from 1941 until the Iranian Revolution in 1979. After the 1979 revolution, the government of Iran changed into an Islamic republic.

Mehdi Bazargan
Medhi Bazargan (September, 1907? - January 20, 1995) (Persian:مهدی بازرگان) or Mahdi Bazargan was an Iranian scholar. He protested against the Shah regime in Iran. He was jailed many times for political reasons. Bazargan was Iran's first prime minister after the Iranian Revolution in 1979. He was against the United States Embassy hostage taking. He was also against the continuation of Iran-Iraq war. He resigned on November 4 1981. Bazargan died of a heart attack on January 20, 1995 when he was travelling from Tehran to Zürich, Switzerland.

Henry Clay
Henry Clay, Sr. (April 12, 1777 – June 29, 1852) was an American politician from Kentucky. He served in the House of Representatives (as Speaker), in the Senate, and was Secretary of State. He ran for President several times but never won. He started the Whig Party to oppose Andrew Jackson. He wanted the United States to fight the British in the War of 1812. He helped pass the famous compromises over slavery leading up the Civil War, including the Missouri Compromise and the Compromise of 1850. He is considered to be one of the greatest Senators in United States history.

Daniel Webster
Daniel Webster (January 18, 1782 – October 24, 1852) was a United States politician. Webster served in the House of Representatives from both New Hampshire and Massachusetts. He later served for many years in the Senate for Massachusetts. He helped start the Whig Party. He was Secretary of State under Presidents William Henry Harrison and John Tyler. Webster was a lawyer and argued many important cases to the Supreme Court. Webster was against slavery but would put the Union (the United States) staying together above anything. He is considered to be on the greatest Senators in United States history.

Richard Childress Racing
Richard Childress Racing is a NASCAR racing team that is owned by Mr. Richard Childress. The team has operated for over 10 years and has provided many victories for their employees. Notable racers include Dale Earnhardt and Jeff Burton and they drive Chevrolet cars.

Pratibha Patil
Pratibha Patil (Marathi: प्रतिभा पाटील, born December 19, 1934) is the 13th and is now India's president. She is the first woman to hold this post. She was sworn into the nation's top office on July 25, 2007 by the Chief Justice of India K. G. Balakrishnan. She succeeds Dr. A.P.J. Abdul Kalam.

Socialist Unity Party of Germany
The Socialist Unity Party of Germany (SED) (German: "Sozialistische Einheitspartei Deutschlands") was the governing party of East Germany from 1949, when East Germany was created, until the elections of 1990.
The SED was created in 1946 when the Soviet Union forced the Social Democratic Party of Germany (SPD) members and the Communist Party of Germany (KPD) members who lived in the Soviet-occupied parts of Germany and Berlin. After 1990, the party reformed itself as the Party of Democratic Socialism (later in 2005, the Left Party.PDS). It is still popular in the former East German territory, winning seats at state and local elections. In the September 2005 Bundestag election the PDS was in coalition with WASG (Electoral Alternative for Labour and Social Justice), which was formed by Oskar Lafontaine who left the SPD. The PDS and WASG are joining together in 2007.
A famous SED poster read: "To learn from Stalin means to learn how to win". Later, the word "Stalin" was replaced with "the USSR". When Gorbachev was president of the USSR the famous slogan was abandoned, as the SED did not believe there was anything to learn from his ideas about perestroika.
At first the SED had a branch in West Berlin, but in 1962 the West Berlin branch was separated from the SED proper and became a "separate" party called the Socialist Unity Party of West Berlin ("Sozialistische Einheitspartei Westberlins" - SEW).
The Final Days.
Between the fall of the Berlin Wall in November 1989 and the election in March 1990, the old Social Democratic Party was re-established as a separate party, while the rest of the SED lost a lot of members and renamed itself the Party of Democratic Socialism (PDS) at a special party meeting in December 1989. By becoming the PDS the party survived the reuniting of East Germany any West Germany, and eventually started growing again, managing to get representatives elected to the Bundestag.
General Secretaries of the Central Committee of the SED.
"(known as "First Secretary" from 1953 - 1976)"
These three party leaders are also the equivalent of the Prime Minister or President in other countries.

Buck the World
"Buck the World" is the second album by rapper Young Buck. Its title is a play on the expression "Fuck the World". "Buck the World" was released on March 27, 2007.
Production included Dr. Dre, Jazze Pha, J.U.S.T.I.C.E. League, Polow Da Don, and Lil Jon amongst others. Guest appearances included 50 Cent, Chester Bennington (from Linkin Park), Young Jeezy, Bun B, Trick Daddy, and Lyfe Jennings amongst others.
The first single was "I Know You Want Me" produced by Jazze Pha, who also made a guest appearance on the track. The second single was "Get Buck", produced by Polow Da Don. The third single, "U Ain't Goin' Nowhere", was released on May 18 2007.

Johannes Rau
Johannes Rau (January 16, 1931, Wuppertal – January 27, 2006, Berlin) was a German politician of the SPD. He was the eighth President of the Federal Republic of Germany from July 1, 1999 until June 30, 2004 and minister president of North Rhine-Westphalia from 1978 to 1998.
Education and work.
He was born in Barmen, Wuppertal. His family was Protestant, and he was active in the Confessing Church, a part of the German Protestant Church which was against Nazism.
Rau left school in 1949 and worked as a journalist and publisher.
Political biography.
Rau was a member of the All-German People's Party (GVP), which was founded by Gustav Heinemann, who also became a president of Germany. This party only existed from 1952 until 1957.
In 1958 Rau and Heinemann joined the Social Democratic Party of Germany (SDP), where he was active in the Wuppertal branch. He served on the City Council (1964-1978), where he was as chairman of the SDP Group (1964-1967) and later as Mayor (1969-1970).
In 1958 Rau was elected a member of the "Landtag" (state parliament) of North Rhine-Westphalia. In 1967 he became chairman of the SPD group in the Landtag, and in 1970 Minister of Science and Education in the cabinet of Minister President Heinz Kühn. He founded five universities in North Rhine-Westphalia during the 1970s. He also startedand initiated Germany's first distance learning university at Hagen (modelled on the "Open University" in Britain).
In 1978 Rau became Minister President of North Rhine-Westphalia, where he remained until 1998, winning four elections for the SPD, which became biggest party in the Landtag each time and gained an absolute majority three times, in 1980, 1985, 1990 and finally 1995. From 1995 onwards, Rau led an SPD-Greens coalition in NRW.
In 1987 Rau tried to become chancellor of Germany for the SPD, but lost to Helmut Kohl's Christian Democrats (CDU). In 1994 Rau tried for the first time to become Federal President, but lost to Roman Herzog.
Rau twice served as President of the Bundesrat in 1982/83 and 1994/95, and was deputy for the Federal President. In 1998 Rau stepped down from his positions as SPD Chairman and Minister President, and on May 23, 1999, was elected Federal President by the Federal Assembly of Germany to succeed Roman Herzog (CDU). On July 1, 2004, he was succeeded by Horst Köhler.
In 2000 Rau was the first German head of state since the Holocaust to address the Knesset, the Israeli parliament, in German. Some Israeli delegates to walked out, but Israeli President Moshe Katsav supported and praised him for bridging the gap between the two states.
Following a long history of heart disease, he died a few days after his 75th birthday.
Private life.
Johannes Rau was a practising Christian. He was sometimes called, "Brother John", to make fun of his intense Christian belief; but, he sometimes used this term himself.
On August 9 1982 he married the political scientist Christina Delius (born 1956). Christina Rau is a granddaughter of Gustav Heinemann, former President of Germany. The couple had three children: Anna Christina, born 1983, Philip Immanuel, born 1985 and Laura Helene, born 1986.
After leaving office, Rau lived with his family in the federal capital Berlin. However, they also kept a house in Wuppertal.
Johannes Rau died on January 27, 2006 in Berlin.

Roman Herzog
Roman Herzog (born April 5, 1934) is a German politician (CDU) and was the President of Germany from 1994 to 1999.
Biography.
He studied law in Munich, Bavaria and took the first stage law exam in 1957. In 1958, he gained the title Dr.jur. (doctor of laws) and worked in the University of Munich until 1964, where he passed his second law exam. He wrote "Die Wesensmerkmale der Staatsorganisation in rechtlicher und entwicklungsgeschichtlicher Sicht" ("Characteristics of State Organization from a Juristic and Developmental-Historical Viewpoint"), and was given the title of professor in 1964. In Germany "professor" is a title meaning senior teacher, not a job name. Herzog taught at the University of Munich until 1966. From 1966 he taught state law and political science as a full professor at the Free University of Berlin (FUB). In 1969 he moved to the FUB in Speyer, and was the University President from 1971 to 1972.
In 1973 he entered politics, and became a member of the Bundesrat for Rhineland-Palatinate. He was minister for culture and sports in the Baden-Württemberg Land Government from 1978. In 1980 he was elected to the State Parliament ("Landtag"), and took over the state Ministry of the Interior.
Roman Herzog was also always active in the Protestant Church. Since 1982 he has been a member of the synod (parliament) of the Protestant Church of Germany. He has been a member of the Evangelical Church in Germany since 1972.
In 1983 he became vice president of the Federal Constitutional Court of Germany in Karlsruhe, and president over from 1987 to 1994, when he was elected President of Germany by the Bundesversammlung ("Federal Convention"). His term ended in 1999, when he was succeeded by Johannes Rau.
His wife, Christiane Herzog, died on June 19, 2000. He later married Alexandra Freifrau von Berlichingen.

Gerry Adams
Gerard Adams (Irish Gearóid Mac Ádhaimh(born 6 October, 1948) is an Irish Republican politician.
He is a member of the Northern Ireland Assembly in Belfast. He is also a member of the British Parliament for Belfast West. He does not go to Parliament because he does not believe that Britain should control Northern Ireland.
He is President of Sinn Féin. Sinn Féin became the largest nationalist, republican or pro-Belfast Agreement political party in Northern Ireland in the 2005 UK general election.
Adams is a spokesman for the "Irish republican movement" or the "Provisional movement". This includes Sinn Féin and the Provisional Irish Republican Army (PIRA). The IRA is illegal in the United Kingdom and the Republic of Ireland, because it is a terrorist group.
Adams is thought to have persuaded the IRA to give up its "war" against the UK in return for devolved government for Northern Ireland.
From the late 1980s, Adams was an important figure in the Northern Ireland peace process, started when he met first the SDLP (Social Democratic and Labour Party’s) leader John Hume and later the Irish and British governments, and then other parties.
In 1995 the IRA stopped fighting, and in 2005 the IRA said the war was over.
Although Adams and the other Sinn Féin members elected to the UK parliament in London do not attend, Sinn Féin changed this policy (called abstentionism) towards Leinster House (Ireland’s Parliament in Dublin) in 1986 and later to took seats in the Northern Ireland Assembly.
Background.
Gerry Adams was born in West Belfast. He has 4 brothers and 5 sisters.
His parents, Gerry Adams Sr. and Annie Hannaway, came from strong republican backgrounds. Adams's grandfather, also named Gerry Adams, had been a member of the Irish Republican Brotherhood (IRB) during the Irish War of Independence. Two of Adams's uncles, Dominic and Patrick Adams, had been interned (jailed without a trial) by the governments in Belfast and Dublin. His uncle Dominic was a senior figure in the IRA of the mid-1940s, but not the chief of staff as some people say. Gerry Sr. joined the IRA when he was sixteen. In 1942 he was in an IRA ambush on an RUC police patrol, but was shot, arrested and sentenced to eight years imprisonment.
Adams's mother’s grandfather, Michael Hannaway, was a member of the Fenians during their dynamiting campaign in England in the 1860s and 1870s. Michael's son, Billy, was election agent for Éamon de Valera in 1918 in West Belfast but refused to follow de Valera into democratic and constitutional politics upon the formation of Fianna Fáil. Annie Hannaway was a member of Cumann na mBan, the women's branch of the IRA. Three of her brothers (Alfie, Liam and Tommy) were also IRA members.
Early republican career.
In the late 1960s, a civil rights campaign started in Northern Ireland, to get equal treatments for Roman Catholics Adams was an active supporter and joined the Northern Ireland Civil Rights Association in 1967. Instead of leading to change, the civil rights movement there were protests counter-demonstrators called Loyalists. In August 1969 there was rioting in Northern Ireland’s big cities of Belfast and Derry, and the Government of Northern Ireland asked for the British army to help keep control.
This is when the IRA and its political counterpart in Sinn Féin, restarted. Gerry Adams was active in Sinn Féin at this time. In 1970 the republican movement (that is the peaceful politicians and the fighters like the IRA who all want the United Kingdom not to control Northern Ireland) split. Adams aligned himself with the active "Provisional" part based in Belfast. The "Official" part based in Dublin was not interested in fighting for people in Belfast, and the "Official" Sinn Féin was more interested in spreading Marxism rather than making Ireland united.
In August 1971, internment without trial was introduced in Northern Ireland. Adams was arrested in March 1972 and interned HMS Maidstone, but was set free in June to take part in secret talks in London. There was a short-lived truce and some members of the IRA met with William Whitelaw the British government minister in charge of Northern Ireland.. The IRA delegation included Sean Mac Stiofain (Chief of Staff), Daithi O'Conaill, Seamus Twomey, Ivor Bell, Martin McGuinness and Gerry Adams. The IRA insisted Adams be included in the meeting and he was released from internment to participate. Following the failure of the talks he helped to plan a bombing campaign in Belfast known as Bloody Friday. He was re-arrested in July 1973 and interned at Long Kesh internment camp, which was later called the Maze Prison. After attempting to escape he was sentenced to imprisonment, which was also served at the Maze.
During the Hunger Strikes of 1981, Adams played an important policy-making role.. the hunger strikes saw his Sinn Féin party become more important as a political force. In 1983 he was elected president of Sinn Féin and became the first Sinn Féin MP elected to the British House of Commons since the 1950s. Following his election (as MP for Belfast West) the British government lifted a ban on him travelling to Britain. In line with Sinn Féin policy, he refused to sit in the House of Commons.
On 14 March 1984, Adams was seriously wounded in an assassination attempt when several Ulster Freedom Fighters (UFF) gunmen fired about twenty shots into the car in which he was travelling. After the shooting, under-cover plain clothes police officers seized three suspects who were later convicted and sentenced. One of the three was John Gregg. Adams claimed that the British army had prior knowledge of the attack and allowed it to go ahead.
Alleged IRA Membership.
Adams has often said that he has never been a member of the Provisional Irish Republican Army (IRA). However, several writers and journalists such as Ed Moloney, Richard English, Peter Taylor and Mark Urban have all said Adams was part of the IRA leadership during the 1970s. Adams has called Moloney's claims "libellous."
President of Sinn Féin.
In 1978, Gerry Adams became joint-vice-president of Sinn Féin and he led a challenge to the Sinn Féin leadership of President Ruairí Ó Brádaigh and joint-Vice President Dáithí Ó Conaill. Others who supported Adams and were from Belfast included Jim Gibney, Tom Hartley, and Danny Morrison. Some say Ruairí Ó Brádaigh was a more traditional Irish nationalist and that the northern leadership which surrounded Adams wanted to act faster and in different ways if they had to.
The 1975 IRA-British truce is often viewed as the event that began the challenge to the original Provisional Sinn Féin leadership, which was said to be Southern-based and dominated by southerners like Ó Brádaigh and Ó Conaill. However, the Chief of Staff of the IRA at the time, Seamus Twomey, was a senior figure from Belfast. Others in the leadership also lived in the North, including Billy McKee from Belfast. Adams was supposed to have become the most senior figure in the IRA Northern Command because he wanted only military action, but during his time in prison Adams came to thought about his ideas and became more political.
It is alleged that "provisional" republicanism was founded on its opposition to the communist-inspired "broad front" politics of the Cathal Goulding-led Official IRA, but this too is disputed.
Some of the main reasons that the Provisional IRA was founded in December 1969 and provisional Sinn Féin was founded in January 1970, was that people like Ó Brádaigh, O'Connell, and Billy McKee wanted new political bodies and did not want to work in or with the existing bodies such as the Parliament in London. Another was the failure of the Goulding leadership to defend of nationalist areas against attacks by Loyalists and sometimes even the police. At the December 1969 IRA convention and the January 1970 Sinn Féin Ard Fheis (the Irish words for a party conference or convetion) the delegates voted to participate in the Dublin (Leinster House), Belfast (Stormont) and London (Westminster) parliaments, the organisations split into Provisional and Official parts. Gerry Adams, who had joined the Republican Movement in the early 1960s, did not go with the Provisionals until later in 1970.
End of Abstentionism.
Republicans like Ruairí Ó Brádaigh said that the only legitimate country in Ireland was the Irish Republic declared in 1916. They said the legal government was the IRA Army Council because the last remaining anti-Anglo-Irish Treaty deputies of the Second Dáil made them the government. (Gerry Adams keep to this idea of republican political legitimacy until quite recently - however in his 2005 speech to the Sinn Féin Ard Fheis he rejected it.)
If Sinn Féin any won seats in the British or Irish parliaments they never went to the parliaments. At its 1986 Ard Fheis, Sinn Féin changed its and constitution to allow its members to sit in the Dublin parliament (Leinster House/Dáil Éireann). This made Ruairí Ó Brádaigh lead a small walkout, just as he had done years earlier to create Provisional Sinn Féin. This minority which still believed in abstentionism, called themselves Republican Sinn Féin (or Sinn Féin Poblachtach in Irish), and saysy that they are the true Sinn Féin.
Adams' leadership of Sinn Féin was supported by a Northern-based group that included people like Danny Morrison and Martin McGuinness. Adams and others, over time, pointed to Sinn Féin election wins in the early and mid-1980s, when hunger strikers Bobby Sands and Kieran Doherty were elected to the British House of Commons and Dáil Éireann, and they pushed to get Sinn Féin become more political and less paramilitary. This policy was a success and Adams and McGuinness, and others, were elected to the House of Commons, but never attend. Sinn Féin still abstains from Westminster.
Voice ban.
At this time most ordinary people in Britain knew about Gerry Adams because they could not hear him. Prime minister Margaret Thatcher banned radio and television stations from broadcasting his voice. All Irish republican organisations and unionist terrorist organisations were banned like this, but Adams was the only person important enough to appear regularly on TV. This ban was imposed after the BBC interviewed Martin McGuinness. and the British Government thought that some groups were getting too much publivity.
A similar ban, known as Section 31, had been law in the Republic of Ireland since the 1970s. However media outlets soon found ways around the ban, first by the use of subtitles, and later and more commonly by using actors to read his words over the pictures of him speaking.
This ban was madefun of in cartoons and satirical TV shows, notably "Spitting Image", and in "The Day Today". It was also criticized by freedom of speech organisations worldwide and British media personalties, including BBC Director General John Birt and BBC foreign editor John Simpson. The ban was lifted by Prime Minister John Major on 17 September, 1994.
Moving into mainstream politics.
Sinn Féin continued its policy of refusing to sit in the Westminster parliament even after Adams won the Belfast West constituency. He lost his seat to Joe Hendron of the Social Democratic and Labour Party (SDLP) in the 1992 general election. However, he easily regained it at the next election in May 1997.
Under Adams, Sinn Féin moved away from being a political voice of the Provisional IRA to becoming a professionally organised political party in both Northern Ireland and the Republic of Ireland.
SDLP leader John Hume MP realised that i a negotiated settlement might be possible and began secret talks with Adams in 1988. These discussions led to unofficial contacts with the British Northern Ireland Office under the Secretary of State for Northern Ireland, Peter Brooke, and with the government of the Republic under Charles Haughey – although both governments maintained in public that they would not negotiate with "terrorists".
These talks provided the basis for what was later to be the Belfast Agreement, as well as the Downing Street Declaration and the Joint Framework Document.
These negotiations led to the IRA ceasefire in August 1994. The new Irish Taoiseach (prime minister) Albert Reynolds had played a key role in the Hume/Adams talks through his Special Advisor Martin Mansergh, thought the ceasefire as permanent. However the IRA ended its ceasefire because of the slow pace of developments, partly because British prime minister John Major needed the votes of the Ulster Unionist Party in the House of Commons.
Later there was a new ceasefire, and there were talks between teams from the British and Irish governments, the Ulster Unionist Party, the SDLP, Sinn Féin and representatives of loyalist paramilitary organizations, under the chairmanship of former United States Senator Mitchell. The talks produced the Belfast Agreement (also called the "Good Friday Agreement" as it was signed on Good Friday, 1998). Under the agreement, structures were created to show that some people on the island of Ireland were Irish and others wanted to be British. A British-Irish Council and the Northern Ireland Assembly were set up
Articles 2 and 3 of the Republic's constitution, "Bunreacht na hÉireann", which claimed sovereignty over all of Ireland, were reworded, and a power-sharing Executive Committee was provided for. As part of their deal Sinn Féin agreed to abandon its abstentionist policy regarding a "six-county parliament", and took its seats in the new Assembly based at Stormont Sinn Féin ran the and running the health and social services and the education ministries in the power-sharing government.
Opponents in Republican Sinn Féin accused Sinn Féin of "selling out" by agreeing to participate in what it called "partitionist assemblies" in the Republic and Northern Ireland. However Gerry Adams insisted that the Belfast Agreement provided a way to make Ireland united by non-violent and legal means, much as Michael Collins had said of the Anglo-Irish Treaty in 1922
When Sinn Féin came to nominate its two ministers to the Executive Council, the party, like the SDLP and the Democratic Unionist Party (DUP) did not to include its leader among its ministers. (When later the SDLP chose a new leader, it selected one of its ministers, Mark Durkan, who then opted to remain a minister.)
Adams remains the President of Sinn Féin, with Caoimhghín Ó Caoláin serving as Sinn Féin parliamentary leader in Dáil Éireann, and Martin McGuinness the party's chief negotiator and effective party head in the Northern Ireland Assembly. His son, Gearoid is a primary school teacher and has represented Co. Antrim in gaelic football.
On 8 March, 2007 it was Adams was re-elected to the Northern Ireland Assembly.
On 26 March, 2007, he met with DUP leader Ian Paisley face-to-face for the first time, and the two came to an agreement regarding the return of the power-sharing executive in Northern Ireland.

Gro Harlem Brundtland
(IPA:) (born April 20, 1939) is a Norwegian politician, diplomat, and physician, and an international leader in sustainable development and public health. She is a former Prime Minister of Norway, and was the Director General of the World Health Organization. She now is a Special Envoy on climate change for the United Nations Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon.

Edward VIII of the United Kingdom
Edward VIII (born Edward Albert Christian George Andrew Patrick David Wettin, June 23, 1894 - May 28, 1972) was King of the United Kingdom from January 20, 1936 until December 11, 1936. Edward was born in White Lodge, Richmond Park, London.
Edward "abdicated" (resigned) the throne because he wanted to marry the American Wallis Simpson. Simpson had been married twice before. As King, he was Head of the Church of England and the Church did not support divorce at the time. After abdicating as king, he was Prince Edward, Duke of Windsor.
As King, he was head of all of the British Orders of Chivalry. After he abdicated, his brother, King George VI made him a member of all of the orders again. This make Edwards the world record holder as the person with the most "post-nominal" letters (letters after the name)

Darius I of Persia
Darius the Great (c. 549 BC– 486/485 BC) was the son of Hystaspes and Shah of Iran from 522 BC to 485 BC. After Darius became Shah of Iran, he divided the Persian Empire into twenty provinces, and appointed a governor for each province. He introduced golden coins and developed commerce within the empire and trade without. Darius allowed Jews to rebuild the Temple of Solomon in Jerusalem. He also built many temples in Egypt. The largest building that was built by Darius, is the new capital of Persepolis, near Pasargadae. Darius died in Persepolis. His tomb was cut into a rock face near Persepolis. After his death, Xerxes became the Shah of Iran.

Xerxes
Xerxes the Great was a Shah of Iran (485 BC-465 BC) of Achaemenid dynasty. Xerxes was son of Darius I and Atossa, the daughter of Cyrus the Great. After Darius died, Xerxes became the Shah of Iran. At the Battle of Thermopylae, Xerxes defeated Greek warriors. After winning at Thermopylae, Xerxes took control of Athens with his army. Finally, Greek warriors won the Battle of Salamis against Xerxes in 480 BC.

Otis R. Bowen
Otis R. Bowen, M.D. (born February 26, 1918), was the governor of the American state of Indiana from 1973 to 1981. He was the first governor of Indiana to serve two consecutive terms. He was also the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services on the cabinet of President Ronald Reagan.
Bowen was born in a farmhouse in Fulton County, Indiana. He raised his family, practiced medicine, and began his political career while living in Bremen, Indiana, where he still lives today.

Mansa Musa
Mansa Musa was a 14th century Mansa (king). He ruled the Mali Empire. He is famous for his Hajj. On it, he is said to have given out millions of US dollars worth of gold. As a matter of fact, he gave out so much gold in Cairo that the value stayed relatively low for many years. It also helped to spread Islam.

Tokugawa Yoshimune
Tokugawa Yoshimune (徳川 吉宗 "Tokugawa Yoshimune", November 27, 1684 - July 12, 1751) was a shogun of Japan. He was the eighth shogun of the Tokugawa shogunate. He ruled from 1716 until he resigned in 1745. He was the son of Tokugawa Mitsusada, the grandson of Tokugawa Yorinobu, and the great-grandson of Tokugawa Ieyasu.

Toyotomi Hideyoshi
(February 2, 1536 or March 26, 1537 – September 18, 1598) was a military leader of Japan. He rose to become a daimyo. Hideyoshi came to power after his master, Oda Nobunaga, died. Then he unified Japan. The period of his rule is usually called the Momoyama period. "Azuchi" was the name of Hideyoshi's castle.
Toyotomi Hideyoshi made many reforms in laws and culture. For example, he decreed that only the samurai could carry weapons.

Baudouin I of Belgium
Baudouin I (French: "Baudouin Albert Charles Léopold Axel Marie Gustave" or Dutch: "Boudewijn Albert Karel Leopold Axel Marie Gustaaf") (7 September 1930 – 31 July 1993) was the King of the Belgians from 1951 to 1993. He was the oldest son of King Leopold III (1901-1983) and his first wife, Princess Astrid of Sweden (1905-1935).

George II of Great Britain
George II (George Augustus), lived between 10 November 1683 – 25 October 1760. George was born in Germany and was last British Monarch born out side of Great Britain.
He became King of Great Britain and King of Ireland, he even was a prince of the Holy Roman Empire.
He died of heart problems.

Huo Qubing
Huo Qubing (Chinese: 霍去病 140 BC - 117 BC) was a Chinese general of the Han Dynasty under Emperor Wu. He was very good at shooting with his bow on a horse. When he was 18, he was ordered to attack the Xiongnu with 800 cavalries. Finally, his troops killed about 2,000 enemies and kidnapped the imperial officials. In the spring of 121 BC, Emperor Wu ordered Huo Qubing invading the Xiongnu with 10,000 cavalries. He occupied 5 cities within 6 days and finally killed 8,000 enemies. In order to fairly eliminate the main force of the Xiongnu, Huo Qubing and Wei Qing led 100,000 cavalries and fought with the enemies in desert in the spring of 119 BC. Huo Qubing was died in Chang'an (present-day Xi'an), the capital of Han Dynasty, when he was 24.

My December
"My December" is Kelly Clarkson's third album. The songs Never Again, Sober and One Minute have been released.

Alberto Gonzales
Alberto Gonzales (born August 4, 1955) is an American jurist who is the 80th Attorney General of the United States. Gonzales was appointed to the position in February 2005 by President George W. Bush. While Bush was Governor of Texas, Gonzales was part of his general counsel, and later was the Secretary of State of Texas and then was on the Texas Supreme Court. From 2001 to 2005, Gonzales served in the Bush Administration as White House Counsel.
On August 27, 2007, Gonzales announced that he is quitting his position as Attorney General, and that his last day will be September 16, 2007. He did not say why he is leaving. He is the highest-ranking Hispanic ever in the United States federal government.

Colorado Avalanche
The Colorado Avalanche are an NHL team that plays in Denver, Colorado.

Minnesota Wild
The Minnesota Wild are a NHL team based in Saint Paul, Minnesota

Odoacer
Odoacer (Flavius Odoacrus/Odovacar/Odowaker/Odoacer; b. around 435, † probably March 15, 493 in Ravenna) was a soldier in the army of the West Roman Empire. Perhaps he was of Germanic descent. When he forced the last Western Roman Emperor Romulus Augustus to quit in 476, he became King of Italy. That event is considered the end of Ancient history and the beginning of the Middle Ages.

Toy Story 2
"Toy Story 2" is a 1999 computer-generated animation movie and the sequel to "Toy Story". It is the third Disney / Pixar full-length movie. It is about toys that come alive when people are not around.

Let It Be
"Let it Be" was a 1970 album and movie, by rock band The Beatles. It was the last Beatles project finished before the band broke up.
History.
After the "White Album" ("The Beatles") was released in late 1968, the Beatles talked about making a television special, where they would play songs from the album for an audience. It would be the band's first live public performance since 1966.
As 1969 began, the band decided instead to begin work on a new set of songs, and film the process of rehearsing and recording all the songs, then performing them live. The project was titled "Get Back", and a song by that name was worked up during rehearsals. The band agreed to perform all the songs without studio retouching or overdubs, as they had long used.
First week: Twickenham Film Studios.
The Beatles rented a soundstage at Twickenham Film Studios, where their instruments and equipment were set up. They were used to working from afternoons until late at night on music, but had to arrive between eight and ten o'clock in the morning, to meet the filming schedule. The band did not use this setup for long. The early hours and the cold, huge soundstage made them uncomfortable.
There was also friction between the Beatles, and it showed. The Beatles could not agree on where to perform the show, and for how large an audience. The suggested locations ranged from Los Angeles, California to Tunisia, and the size of the audience from a few dozen to thousands of people. Nobody had a location in mind that the rest liked, and George Harrison decided he did not want to perform a public concert at all.
Paul McCartney took charge of the rehearsals, and drove the band hard to play his new songs just the way he imagined them. The other Beatles became tired of this, because it did not give them much chance to improvise, the way they were used to doing. George Harrison got especially tired of McCartney telling him what to play, and his own songs not getting the attention they deserved. John Lennon also had new songs, but was more interested in spending time with Yoko Ono than in making another Beatles record. He was also critical of Harrison's new songs. Yoko Ono gave her opinions on the band's music, which they were not used to hearing from anyone but their producer, George Martin. McCartney and Harrison resented Ono's being at Lennon's side constantly. Ringo Starr tried to play the peacemaker, but did not always succeed. Harrison walked out during one lunch break, saying he had had enough. The band stopped work on the production, and decided to find a new location to work.
The next weeks: Apple Studio.
Harrison went to a Beatles business meeting, a few days after he left the rehearsal. McCartney agreed to mend his ways, and let Harrison have more input. Lennon and Harrison also made up. The idea of finishing "Get Back" with a public show was dropped. Nobody wanted to return to the movie studio, and they began to look for another place to work on their new songs.
"Magic Alex", a Greek-born inventor, had been hired by the Beatles to build them a new recording studio, in the basement of the townhouse which was the home of their company, Apple Corps. Alex spent a great deal of money over many months, trying to make a first-rate facility. He did not understand recording or studio technology well, though, and the studio he made had many technical problems. The Beatles only found this out when they tried to use the place to record. Things did not work, and this added to the tension felt by the band, and the people who worked for them.
George Martin was able to help the Beatles, by working around the problems in the basement studio. He borrowed recording equipment so the band could finish their project. The movie cameras were also set up in the basement, and the Beatles went back to work on their music. This time things were as crowded as the first location was cavernous, and again the band and their crew were uncomfortable.
The Beatles usually "warmed up" by playing old songs they had learned growing up. Many of these were captured on camera or tape during the sessions. Not all the songs were complete, or true to their original versions. When the band went from playing old songs to trying out new ones, problems came up. Lennon, McCartney, and Harrison each wanted certain things for their music, and enough time to make the records the best they could be. This did not always work out, and they sometimes insulted each other for trying to outdo the others, or for letting their musical influences show. It made the sessions unpleasant.
George Harrison helped the morale of the band, when he brought a guest musician, Billy Preston, to the sessions. All of the Beatles liked Preston, and got along while he was there. He played keyboards along with the band, and gave the records a fuller sound. McCartney's girlfriend Linda brought her daughter Heather to the studio, and they helped cheer things up. Linda sang background vocals on "Let it Be", a gospel-like song by McCartney.
The question of where and when to finally perform the new songs was settled, when the Beatles decided to give a show on the roof of Apple headquarters. This happened on January 30, 1969, early in the afternoon. The Beatles performed for the movie cameras, and for anyone who could hear them outside.
As it happened, the music coming from the rooftop caused a traffic jam along Savile Row, where the building was located. Local police came to Apple, and tried to stop the show. Mal Evans, one of the Beatles's most trusted helpers, went downstairs and talked to the police, to stall them until the band could finish playing. After performing "Get Back", "Don't Let Me Down", "I've Got A Feeling", "One After 909", "Dig A Pony", and another version of "Get Back", the band went inside.
The next day, the Beatles gave another show, back in the Apple basement. This show was for the cameras, though, and not a live audience. They performed "Two of Us", "Don't Let Me Down", "Let it Be", "Get Back", and "The Long and Winding Road". Some of these songs were too hard to record outdoors, with their keyboard parts.
Post-Production.
The film crew shot more than a hundred hours of movie footage, which was more than enough to make a television special. The Beatles worked a little longer on the recordings of the "Get Back" songs, ending up with over twenty-nine hours of session tapes. The problem was, nobody was happy with the music that had come from the sessions. The band members had argued and disagreed on camera, and did not always make their best efforts on each other's songs, or to get along. This was plain to anyone who saw the footage, or listened to the dialogue between songs.
George Martin tried to remix the recordings, and make an album from the songs, while the Beatles' film personnel tried to edit the movie footage into the TV special the band wanted. The band's problems were only magnified by the results, and they blamed each other, and the people who worked for them, for what showed. The Beatles decided to abandon the project, and work on other things. Only one single was released from the sessions, with the songs "Get Back" and "Don't Let Me Down". Billy Preston's name appeared underneath the band's, and stories started that Preston might join the Beatles. He never did, but he signed a recording contract with Apple Records, their record label. The other songs stayed "in the can".
The "Get Back" project became another problem that was dividing the Beatles. There was also trouble with Apple Corps, and personal issues between the band members. They had begun to make music apart the year before, and this increased as they stopped getting along as people. McCartney and Lennon both married their girlfriends, and lost control of their publishing company, Northern Songs. George Harrison began to play with musicians outside the Beatles. Ringo Starr started a new career as an actor in movies. The Beatles issued a new single, with the songs "The Ballad of John and Yoko" and "Old Brown Shoe". John and Paul played on the first song, and George and Ringo on the second. They had stopped working as a unit, and George Martin stopped coming to recording sessions, which he had never done before.
"Abbey Road".
During the summer of 1969, the Beatles felt sorry for the way the "Get Back" sessions had gone. They wanted to forget that time, and make another new album of songs, back at Abbey Road Studios. George Martin decided to come back, on the band's promise that they really would work together "like the old days", with Martin taking charge. The band kept their promise. "Abbey Road" was the result, and was issued in the early fall. As the record was being released, the Beatles met to discuss future projects. John Lennon, freshly back from his first non-Beatles concert, playing in Toronto, surprised everyone by announcing that he was quitting the band. He agreed to not make a public announcement, because this would have hurt the band's chance to renegotiate their recording contract. Lennon instead focused on his and Yoko Ono's new group, the Plastic Ono Band.
"Let it Be".
At the end of the year, Apple's accountants told the Beatles that they would have to release some kind of album and program from the "Get Back" sessions. They had spent too much money on the project to just forget about it. Glyn Johns, a young music producer, tried to assemble an album from the session tapes, but he also couldn't please the Beatles. Anxious fans and insiders worked together and released a bootleg album from Johns's mix. Even though it was an unauthorised album, it sold many copies and received radio airplay. The public wanted to hear the songs, good or bad.
Phil Spector, a legendary producer who predated the Beatles, had always wanted to work with them. Allen Klein brought Spector to England early in 1970 to meet them. John Lennon and George Harrison got along well with Spector, who produced a record of Lennon's song "Instant Karma!" the same day he wrote it. Lennon and Harrison gave their OK for Spector to work on the recordings, and Ringo Starr played along with the musicians Spector hired, to make overdubs. This went against the original plan to present the songs live, but was accepted to "sweeten" – and finish – the recordings.
An eighty-minute program was edited together from the film footage, and the band decided it would make a better movie than a television show. The Beatles had a contract with United Artists, who agreed to distribute the movie, which was titled "Let it Be". (The "Get Back" title was dropped, since "Get Back" had already appeared as a single almost a year earlier.)
Some of the new songs that appeared in the movie, including "Across the Universe" and "I Me Mine", were not finished on record. A session was scheduled in January 1970 to record full versions of some songs, but John Lennon refused to attend. George Harrison made a joke about this, during a take of "I Me Mine", referring to Lennon as "Dave Dee", another British musician.
Spector applied his "Wall of Sound" style to the Beatles recordings, including an old tape of "Across the Universe", so it could appear on record. His finished album was listenable, and showed none of the troubles that affected the band during the sessions, but it didn't sound the same as other Beatles albums. Paul McCartney hated the changes Spector made to his songs on the album, especially "The Long and Winding Road", but he could not stop the album from being issued.
Another problem was the timing of the record's release. Allen Klein had succeeded in remaking the Beatles's recording deal, and McCartney wasn't bound by the same promise Lennon had been, to not say he was leaving the band. His first solo album, finished early in 1970, included a press release stating that he had no further plans to work with the Beatles. This effectively broke up the band. He also wanted the album released ahead of "Let it Be".
Ringo Starr, who also had a solo record ("Sentimental Journey"), due to appear, was sent to ask McCartney to change his release date. The two argued, and McCartney threw Starr out of his house. The release schedule was changed, so McCartney could have his wish. Starr's album appeared earlier than planned, and "Let it Be" was pushed back from April to May.
Reception.
"Let it Be" was both a hit movie and a hit album, and won a Grammy Award for Best Soundtrack. Paul McCartney accepted the award. The news that the Beatles were breaking up was very sad to their fans, however, and the knowledge made watching the movie a bittersweet experience. Many fans and critics did not like Spector's changes to the Beatles style on record, and said so publicly.
A souvenir book was also issued, but instead of being a real document of the sessions, the book was censored and heavily edited, and reflected little of what was intended. It never appeared in the United States.
Late in 1970, John Lennon issued a solo album, "John Lennon/Plastic Ono Band", which made his feelings plain in its last song, "God": Lennon sang "I don't believe in Beatles." He gave a long interview to "Rolling Stone" magazine, which was later published as a book, "Lennon Remembers". He told his side of the "Let it Be" story, declared "That movie was set up by Paul, for Paul", and said he regretted not announcing that he quit the Beatles first.
When home video came along in the 1970s, "Let it Be" became a popular rental and sales title. Over time, the Beatles asserted their copyright control over the movie, and copies were withdrawn. The movie has been planned as a reissue many times, but has yet to be officially released on DVD.
In 2003, recording engineers went back to the old session tapes, and used digital remastering to make a new version of the familiar "Let it Be" songs. The new version was close to what the Beatles had wanted to make in the first place, and had none of Spector's post-production work. The album was issued as "Let it Be... Naked", and was praised as a "real"-sounding recording.

Scream 2
Scream 2 is a 1997 horror film directed by Wes Craven and written by Kevin Williamson. Neve Campbell, Jamie Kennedy, Courteney Cox, David Arquette, and Liev Schrieber all reprised their roles from the first film with the supporting cast including Sarah Michelle Geller and Laurie Metcalf. The film was released Dimension Films on December 12, 1997
Plot.
Two years after the events of Woodsboro, Sidney Prescott and Randy Meeks have enrolled at Windsor College trying to move on with the lives. Gale Weathers has written a bestselling book based on the events of Scream entitled The Woodsboro Murders which in turn has been turned into a film called Stab. Dewey Riley remained in Woodsboro where he continued to work as a police officer.
At the premiere of Stab, two Windsor College Seniors, Maureen Evans and Phil Stevens, were brutally murdered. Now the Scream survivors and the new characters band together to try and figure out if it is happening again. Following the murder of the next victim, CiCi Cooper, they realize someone's trying to make a sequel.
As if her life wasn't complicated enough, Cotton Weary, who was released after Billy and Stu were killed, has suddenly showed back up into her life. Eventually a list of suspects is beginning to be made including Cotton Weary and eventually Derek Feldman (Sidney's boyfriend) after he shows up immediately after Sidney's first attack in a sorority house.
Shortly later, Randy Meeks, a survivor of Scream is murdered in a van. The police decide to put Sidney in hiding. Her roommate, Hallie, goes with her. Meanwhile, the killer attacks Gale and Dewey. Gale is safe in hiding, but the killer stabs Dewey several times.
While at a red light on a deserted street, the killer shows up and quickly kills one of the officers by slashing his throat. The killer than jumps into the car and runs over the other officer after he gets out of the car and is killed when the killer drives into a pile of poles and one of them goes thorugh his head. Sidney and Hallie are trapped, but are lucky when they see the killer is unconscious. They manage to escape and start to run, but Sidney stops when she realizes she can find out who the killer is. She runs back, but when she gets there she sees the killer is gone. She turns around and warns Hallie and than the killer jumps out from behind a building, grabs Hallie, and stabs her to death. Sidney takes off running.
Meanwhile, Gale leaves her hiding place and bumps into Cotton- who has blood all over his hands. He tries to tell Gale he found Dewey and was trying to help him, but Gale doesn't buy it and runs where she calls the police after stealing the phone from Debbie Salt, another reporter.
In the meantime, Sidney runs into the theater where she hears music playing. She sees no one there and tries to leave, but the set comes down and locks her in. That's when a cross falls and Derek is tied to it, gagged. She wakes him up and tries to get him down, but the killer shows up and reveals himself- Mickey! He manages to trick Sidney into thinking Derek is the other killer. Then, Mickey shoots and kills Derek.

Zine El-Abidine Ben Ali
Zine El-Abidine Ben Ali (born September 9, 1936) is the second president of Tunisia, after Habib Bourguiba.
Birth.
Zine El-Abidine Ben Ali was born in Hammam-Sousse on September 9, 1936
Work before Presidency.
He was assigned to manage (direct and take care) the Defense Military Security in 1964, and worked there until 1974. He was then promoted (his grade was changed to a superior one) to director-general of National Security at the Ministry of Interior in 1977. After that, he was assigned to take care of relations between Tunisia and the Kingdom of Morocco.
After being the ambassador of Tunisia in Poland, he returned to National Security.
Right before becoming the President of Tunisian Republic, Zine El-Abidine Ben Ali has been promoted to Prime Minister and the constitutional successor on October 1, 1987.
Five weeks after his promotion he, officially, became the Second President of Tunisia.
Controversy.
The way that Zine El-Abidine Ben Ali governs had cause some problems with groups including the Al-Jazeera channel. Al-Jazeera does not believe it is correct for Ben Ali to say that Muslim women wearing headscarves (religious clothes) in public places must take then off and say that they will not wear them in public again.

Louis XV of France
Louis XV (February 15, 1710 – May 10, 1774) was a French king, who ruled from 1715 until his death in 1774. He was called "The Beloved" (French: le Bien-Aimé). His father was Louis, Dauphin of France and his mother Princess Marie-Adélaïde of Savoy.

Mikhail Saakashvili
Mikhail Saakashvili (born December 21, 1967) is a Georgian politician and is now the President of Georgia.

Cats (musical)
Cats is a musical by Andrew Lloyd Webber, who wrote the music. Most of the words come from "Old Possum's Book of Practical Cats", which is a book of poems by T.S. Eliot. In this musical, the cats act like people and have different personalities. Many things happen in this musical, but one of the important things is that a cat is chosen to go to the "Heaviside Layer", which is like a heaven for cats.
Cats was first shown in London in 1981, with Elaine Paige first playing the role of Grizabella who sings "Memory", a memorable song in the show. It was shown on Broadway starting in 1982. The musical has since been made into many languages, and it has been shown around the world.

Boy (album)
Boy was Irish rock group U2's first album, from the year 1980.
History.
Before this album came a single, a song that is played on its own, called "I Will Follow". It was very popular, and was played on college radio stations and made people know who U2 were. People mostly thought of "I Will Follow" as a Christian song, showing how all of the members of U2 were Christians, but none of the band members has said that that is true. This album is somewhat about Bono's life as a child, and his mother's death when he was 14.
At first, the producer of band Joy Division, Martin Hannett, was supposed to produce (help record) the album, but he was sad about the suicide of Ian Curtis, so he did not help record the album. It was produced by Steve Lillywhite, and recorded in a Dublin studio called Windmill Lane Studios. Some songs were written in the studio, like "An Cat Dubh" and "The Ocean". Some other songs had already been written, and U2 were performing them often, like the songs "Stories for Boys", Out of Control", and "Twilight". The Edge, U2's guitarist, recorded all of the songs using his Gibson Explorer guitar and his Fender Stratocaster guitar.
"Boy" reached #63 on the Billboard album charts, a list of the most popular albums in the U.S., and was not on the popularity charts in the United Kingdom. The song "I Will Follow" reached #20 on a popularity chart called the Mainstream rock charts. People said that their live shows were too predictable and that Bono, the singer, used too much echo in his singing, but their playing showed that they could play very well. People also said that Bono was a "charismatic and passionate" singer, meaning that he sang very emotionally and that people could connect to him. "Boy" is the only U2 album that every song has been played live, including all of the b-sides (songs that are extra songs on a single). On the list of the 500 greatest albums of all time, made by the rock magazine Rolling Stone, "Boy" was 417th on the list.
Album Cover.
The boy on the cover of the album is a boy named Peter Rowan. Rowan is the brother of Bono's friend Guggi, and he is a famous Irish photographer. He has been on other U2 album covers, including Three and War. The person who took the picture has made other U2 covers, too. In case that the band could be blamed for pedophilia, they changed the cover to a stretched picture of the four band members.
Track Listing.
All of the songs were written by U2, and all of the lyrics were written by Bono.
There were two singles released from this album. They were "I Will Follow" and "A Day Without Me". The album that came before "Boy" was called "Three". On very early copies of "Boy", there is a 30-second instrumental piece that is am early version of "Fire", which was on a later album called "October".

Team Milram
Team Milram is an Italian-registered UCI ProTeam established in 2006. The team is often called a German team because its main sponsor is Milram, part of the Nordmilch company from the "Land" Bremen.
Milram took over the ProTeam licence of Domina Vacanze. Erik Zabel and Alessandro Petacchi are the team’s top cyclists. There are 25 other riders, mainly from Germany and Italy. Milram is the third team in the UCI ProTour with a German main sponsor.
The team manager is led by Italian Gianluigi Stanga, who has been a team manager in professional cycling since 1983. The directeurs sportifs (Sports Directors) are the Italians Vittorio Algeri, Antonio Bevilacqua and Oscar Pellicioli. Gerry van Gerwen from the Netherlands is the commercial manager.
Milram only joined the UCI ProTour in 2006. Since then they have won 88 podium positions (that is, finished a race either first, second, or third) (24 first, 29 second, 35 third).
Team MILRAM reorganised itself for its second season. Five new riders joined and eight riders left the team. The most prominent new rider is Igor Astarloa, 2003 World Champion from Spain. Additionally, the team added Brett Lancaster, the up-and-coming riders Marcel Sieberg and Niki Terpstra, as well as neo pro Sebastian Schwager. After breaking his kneecap in 2006, Alessandro Petacchi regained his top form and won some races.
There is a MILRAM Continental Circuit Team, and those young riders and those from other U23 teams are helped so they can develop their skills
2007 ProTeam.
As of January 5, 2007.

Kathleen Blanco
Kathleen Babineaux Blanco (born December 15, 1942) is the current governor of Louisiana.

Yasuo Fukuda
Yasuo Fukuda (福田康夫) was Prime Minister of Japan, 2007-2008. He was born on July 16, 1936 in Japan. He was preceded by Shinzo Abe. He hosted the G8 meeting in Hokkaido in July 2008, but resigned on September 1 2008, due to low approval ratings and political deadlock. He was suceeded by Taro Aso.

Levon Ter-Petrossian
Levon Ter-Petrosyan (Armenian: Լևոն Տեր-Պետրոսյան; Russian: Левон Тер-Петросян) (born January 9, 1945), also Levon Ter-Petrosyan, was the President of Armenia from 1991 to 1998. Because of many economic and political problems, he resigned on February 3, 1998. He was replaced by Robert Kocharyan. Levon Ter Petrosian, announced he will run again for office in the presidential election which will start next year.

Douglas Hyde
Douglas Hyde (or Dubhghlas de hÍde Born January 17 1860 Died July 12 1949) was the first President of Ireland from 1938 to 1945. He founded the Gaelic League, one of the most influential cultural organisations in Ireland. He promoted use of the Irish language, using the Irish spelling of his name and the pseudonym "An Craoibhin Aoibhinn"
Background.
Hyde was born at Longford House in Castlerea in County Roscommon, while his mother was on a short visit there. His father, Arthur Hyde, was a Church of Ireland rector.. He became fascinated with hearing the old people in the locality speak the Irish language. At the time the Irish language was looked down on seen as backward and old-fashioned.
He founded the Gaelic League, or in Irish, "Conradh na Gaeilge", in the hope of saving it from extinction in 1893.
Conradh na Gaeilge.
The league was set up to encourage the Irish culture, music, dances, and language. Many of the new generation of Irish leaders who played a central role in the fight for Irish independence in the early twentieth century, including Patrick Pearse, Éamon de Valera (who married his Irish teacher Sinéad Flanagan), Michael Collins, and Ernest Blythe first became passionate about Irish independence through their involvement in Conradh na Gaeilge or "(Gaelic League)".
Hyde himself was uncomfortable at the league becoming political instead of cultural and resigned as its president in 1915. He was replaced by the radical political activist and Irish-language teacher, Patrick Pearse (1879-1916). Pearse led the Easter Rising, and his election showed that the league had been infiltrated by the Irish Republican Brotherhood, just like the Irish Volunteers and the Gaelic Athletic Association)
Senator.
Hyde had no association with Sinn Féin or the Independence movement. But he did accept an appointment to the senate, part of the Irish Free State parliament.
In November 1925 he lost the election to the senate because of lies about his support for divorce (in fact he was anti-divorce) and his Protestantism.
He became Professor of Irish at University College Dublin, where one of his students was future Attorney-General and President of Ireland, Cearbhall Ó Dálaigh.
President of Ireland.
In April 1938 he was retired, but Taoiseach Éamon de Valera appointed him to Seanad Éireann. He was not a Senator for very long, because he was chosen to be first President of Ireland.
Hyde was inaugurated as the first President of Ireland in June 1938 and moved into the old "Vice Regal Lodge", the old home of the British Lords Lieutenant of Ireland. The lodge was also used by Governors General of the Irish Free State. Hyde renamed it the House of the President or Áras an Uachtaráin.
Hyde said the Presidential oath of office in Irish. The recording of his Roscommon dialect is one of the few recordings of the dialect, which has now died out.
"Fine and scholarly old gentleman" says F.D.R..
Hyde was a popular president. United States President Franklin D. Roosevelt called him a "fine and scholarly old gentleman". President Hyde and King George VI corresponded about stamp collecting. (George VI was legally King of Ireland until 1 April 1949)
However in April 1940 he suffered a massive stroke. Plans were made for his lying-in-state and state funeral, but to the surprise of everyone he survived, albeit paralysed and having to use a wheelchair.
President Hyde twice asked the Supreme Court, if a bill was Constitutional (so that the Bill in question can be signed into law).
On the first occasion, the court held that the Bill referred - Offences Against the State (Amendment) Bill, 1940- was Constitutional.
The second reference, the Court decided that the particular provision referred - section 4 of the School Attendance Bill, 1942 - was "repugnant to the Constitution". and told the Dáil he was refusing to sign it.
Retirement and death.
Hyde left office on 25 June 1945. Due to his ill-health he did not return to his Roscommon home Ratra. Instead he was moved into the former Secretary to the Lord Lieutenant's residence in the grounds of Áras an Uachtaráin, which he renamed "Little Ratra" and where he lived out the remaining four years of his life. He died quietly at 10pm on 12 July 1949, aged 89.
State funeral.
As a former President of Ireland he was given a state funeral. As an Anglican his funeral service took place in Dublin's Church of Ireland St. Patrick's Cathedral. But the Catholic church did not let Roman Catholics attend services in Anglican churches. As a result all but one member of the Catholic cabinet, Dr. Noel Browne, remained outside the cathedral while Hyde's funeral took place. They then joined the cortège when his coffin left the cathedral. Éamon de Valera, by now Leader of the Opposition, was represented by a senior Fianna Fáil figure who was a member of the Church of Ireland, Erskine Childers, a future President of Ireland himself. Hyde was buried in County Roscommon, where he had spent most of his childhood life.

Cearbhall Ó Dálaigh
Cearbhall Ó Dálaigh (12 February 1911 – 21 March 1978,) served as fifth President of Ireland, from 1974 to 1976. He was elected after the death of President Childers, but he resigned in 1976 after a clash with the government. He also had a notable legal career, including serving as Chief Justice of Ireland.
Cearbhall Ó Dálaigh was born in Bray, County Wicklow.
Career.
Ó Dálaigh trained as a lawyer. He became Ireland's youngest Attorney-General in 1946 under Taoiseach Éamon de Valera. He was re-appointed as Attorney-General in 1951 and in 1953 he became the youngest member of the Supreme Court. Less than a decade later, he became Ireland's youngest Chief Justice.
When Ireland joined the European Economic Community, Jack Lynch appointed Ó Dálaigh as Ireland's judge on the European Court of Justice. When President Childers died suddenly in 1974, all parties agreed to nominate Ó Dálaigh for the post.
President of Ireland.
Ó Dálaigh proved to be a mixed success as president. While popular with Irish language enthusiasts and artists he had a strained relationship with the Coalition Government.
In 1976 he decided to refer a series of tough state security Bills to the Supreme Court to test their constitutionality. This worried and angered members of the to the Fine Gael-Labour national coalition government. Ó Dálaigh then announced that he would sign the bill at midnight of the 15th of October, which he made public. There was a historical precedent for the referral of this bill. Dubhghlas de hÍde referred the Offences Against the State (Amendment) Act of 1939 to the Supreme Court. Jim Duffy claims that, as a result of this, the PIRA arranged an attack in Mountmellick which resulted in the killing of Garda Clerkin. Others would dispute that the PIRA would have held the President's opinion in such high regard as their members at the time did not recognise the State of which Ó Dálaigh was then the Head.
Ó Dálaigh's actions were seen by government ministers to have contributed to the killing of this Garda and greatly abgered them. The following day, following a minor car accident, Paddy Donegan, a controversial and outspoken Minister for Defence, described the incident as a "thundering disgrace". The president thought the minister meant that the "President was a disgrace", not what the "President was doing was a disgrace". Donegan, a known alcoholic, was likely under the influence of alcohol at the time he spoke. He was speaking to members of the Irish Defence Forces, and was only at the barracks to open a new cookhouse. Donegan insulted the President, who is Head of the Defence Forces in front of the defence forces. created a major political incident. Ó Dálaigh thoughtvthat the President and the Minister of Defence would be unable to work together.
The apologetic Donegan immediately offered his resignation, But Taoiseach Liam Cosgrave refused the offers an offer he repeated subsequently. Cosgrave never met the President personally to apologise, added to two years in which Cosgrave had failed to do his constitutional duty to regularly brief the President, and the manner in which his government treated the President, it was the last straw for President Ó Dálaigh.
He became the first Irish president to resign.
The incident meant even more people saw the Government as arrogant and out of touch with public opinion and contributed to their defeat in the 1977 general election.
The opposition proposed outgoing EEC Commissioner Patrick Hillery for the presidency. Hillery served two unchallenged terms of office before retiring at the end of his second term in 1990.
Death and assessment.
Ó Dálaigh died in 1978, less than two years after leaving office. He is buried in Sneem, County Kerry.
Cearbhall Ó Dálaigh was the most politically naïve president, but the Government he worked with was notable for its own inability to offer him the help to overcome the problem. The Taoiseach did not support Ó Dálaigh when Donegan attacked him.

Curtis (50 Cent album)
"Curtis" is the third album by rapper 50 Cent. The album was released on September 11 2007. The album features production from Dr. Dre, Eminem, and Timbaland, among others. Guest appearances include Akon, Justin Timberlake, Nicole Scherzinger, and other notable musicians. 50 Cent divides between "hard" songs and "soft" songs on the album.
"Curtis" was released and sold 691,000 copies in its first week on the "Billboard" 200. It sold the most copies in one week for an East Coast album since Jay-Z's "Kingdom Come" sold 680,000 copies sold. The album's sales competition with Kanye West's "Graduation" was considered to be a "great day for hip hop".

Éamon de Valera
Éamon de Valera (born with the name Edward George de Valera,) (14 October, 1882 –) was one of the dominant political figures in 20th century Ireland. Co-owner of one of the Irish Press Newspapers, he served in public office from 1917 to 1973. Several times he was either head of state or head of government in Ireland.
de Valera was a leader of Ireland's struggle for independence from the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Ireland. He also led opposition to the anti-Treaty in the Irish Civil War. de Valera was the author of the Constitution of Ireland.
His family.
de Valera was born in the New York Nursery and Child's Hospital in New York City in 1882 to an Irish mother; he said that his parents were Catherine Coll Wheelwright, an immigrant from Bruree, County Limerick, and Juan Vivion de Valera, a Spanish-Cuban settler and sculptor, and that they were married in 1881 in New York.
In 1885, after his father's death, de Valera was taken to Ireland by his Uncle Ned. He was brought up by his grandmother Elizabeth Coll, her son Patrick and her daughter Hannie, in County Limerick. At the age of sixteen, he won a scholarship to Blackrock College, County Dublin. In his first year in Blackrock College he was Student of the Year. In 1903 was became mathematics teacher at Rockwell College, County Tipperary. When he graduated in mathematics from the Royal University of Ireland he went back to Blackrock College He taught in many other colleges, including Belvedere college where he taught Kevin Barry, the young Irish republican by the British during the Irish War of Independence.
Early political activity.
de Valera was an active "gaeilgeoir" (Irish language enthusiast). In 1908 he joined the Conradh na Gaeilge (the Gaelic League), where he Dubhghlas de hÍde, later first President of Ireland, and also Sinéad Flanagan, another teacher who he married on 8 January, 1910 at St Paul's Church, Arran Quay, Dublin.
Easter Rising.
On 25 November, 1913 when he joined the Irish Volunteers. He was soon elected captain of the Donnybrook company, then commandant of the Third Battalion and adjutant of the Dublin Brigade. He also joined the Irish Republican Brotherhood, which secretly controlled the central executive of the Volunteers.
On 24 April, 1916 the rising began. de Valera occupied Boland's Mills, Grand Canal Street in Dublin. After the fighting de Valera was court-martialled, convicted, and sentenced to death, but the sentence was changed to for life imprisonment. This was because he was not kept in Kilmainham Jail with the first prisoners executed. The delay meant British authorities started to check if he really was an American citizen, and wonder how the United States would react to the execution of one of its citizens.
de Valera's supporters say he showed leadership skills and a great ability for planning. His enemies claim he suffered a nervous breakdown during the Rising.
After imprisonment in Dartmoor, Maidstone and Lewes prisons in England, de Valera and other prisoners were released under an amnesty in June 1917. On 10 July, 1917 he was elected member of the British House of Commons for East Clare (the constituency which he represented until 1959) in a by-election after MP Willie Redmond died fighting in World War I.
President of Sinn Féin.
British newspapers and picture postcards often called the Easter Rising the Sinn Féin rebellion. From 1917 de Valera was president of Sinn Féin. He and the other survivors of the Rising took over Sinn Féin and then turned into a republican party. The previous president, Arthur Griffith, had wanted an Anglo-Irish "dual monarchy", with an independent Ireland governed separately from Britain, their only link being a shared monarch, like Canada and Britain today.
That had been the way Ireland was governed with the so-called Constitution of 1782 under Henry Grattan, until Ireland joined with Great Britain to form the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Ireland in 1801.
President of Dáil Éireann.
Sinn Féin won 73 out of 104 Irish seats in the 1918 general election. Alot more people wanted an independent Ireland after the leaders of the Easter Rising were executed of the 1916 leaders and the threat of conscription. In January 1919, these Sinn Féin MPs, or "TD"s, met in the Mansion House (City Hall), Dublin and formed the First Dáil Éireann ().
de Valera was not at this meeting because he had been arrested. He escaped from Lincoln Prison in February 1919, and when he got back to Dublin he replaced Cathal Brugha as Prime Minister. The Dáil Constitution passed by the Dáil said that the Príomh Aire was prime minister not head of state.
In September 1919 the British authorities said that The Dáil was illegal) escalated into the Irish War of Independence (also called the 'Anglo-Irish War').
President of the Republic.
In January 1921, got back from The United States with a loan of $5.500.000. This made him very popular.
In August 1921 de Valera had Dáil Éireann change the 1919 Dáil Constitution to upgrade his title from prime minister to President of the Republic. X He said that as Irish head of state he would not go to the Treaty Negotiations of October–December 1921 because the British head of state, King George V would not be there either.
The Treaty.
The Treaty replaced the Republic by a dominion of the British Commonwealth with the King represented by a Governor-General of the Irish Free State. This was just how Canada was governed. Treaty was finally signed on 6 December, 1921.
de Valera's opponents said that he did not join the negotiations because he knew that the British would only allow an Irish dominion, not a republic, and did not want to be blamed for giving up the idea of a republic. de Valera said he was angry because the delegates working out the treaty had not ssked him before signing the treaty. But at a secret session of the Dáil during the Treaty Debates and publicised in January 1922, his ideas for a treaty included dominion status, the 'Treaty Ports',a veto by the parliament in Belfast, and the king as head of the Commonwealth. Ireland's would pay ashare of the imperial debt.
When the Treaty was accepted by 64 votes to 57, de Valera and a large minority of Sinn Féin TDs left Dáil Éireann. He resigned and Arthur Griffith was elected President of Dáil Éireann in his place.
In March 1922, de Valera made an angry speech saying that, if the Treaty was accepted, it might be necessary to "wade through Irish blood" to achieve Irish freedom. Later he said that de Valera's enemies said that this was encouraging civil war.
Civil War broke out in late June 1922.
Civil War.
Fighting in the Irish Civil War started on 28 June 1922 and ended in May 1923 when the pro-treaty Free State forces beat the anti-Treaty IRA.
de Valera was supposed to be the head of the anti-Treatyites, but he had little power. Usually he had little influence with the IRA Chief of Staff, Liam Lynch. de Valera formed a republican government on 25 October 1922 but it had no real authority and was never like the Dáil governments of 1919–21, which was an alternative government to the British, even running their own courts.
When the IRA's new Chief of Staff called a ceasefire Frank Aiken on 30 May 1923 the government had won. Many republicans were arrested when they came out of hiding and returned home. de Valera was arrested in County Clare and interned until 1924.
The 'empty formula'.
de Valera resigned from the presidency of Sinn Féin after losing a vote to accept the Free State Constitution (if the Oath of Allegiance was dropped). In March 1926 he formed a new party, Fianna Fáil (Soldiers of Destiny). It is still the largest party in Ireland. Fianna Fáil was successful in elections, but for over a year a it did not take its seats in the Dáil. When a new law made candidates promise to take the oath if elected, de Valera and his TDs took the Oath of Allegiance in 1927. They said the oath was "an empty formula" that is, just words they had to say, they did not have to believe them.
Back in Power.
Six years after it was founded Fianna Fáil won 72 seats in the 1932 general election, and had a "plurality" in the Dáil. That is, it was the largest party but had less than half of all of the seats, which would be a "majority". On 9 March Governor-General James McNeill appointed de Valera President of the Executive Council. He abolished the oath and stopped paying money owed to Britain.
de Valera called a general election in January 1933 and won 77 seats, giving him an overall majority. Under his leadership, Fianna Fáil won further general elections in 1937, 1938, 1943 and 1944.
de Valera was his own Minister for External Affairs. He attended meetings of the League of Nations, and was president of the Council of the League on his first appearance at Geneva in 1932. In 1934, he supported the admission of the Soviet Union into the League. In September 1938 he was elected nineteenth president of the Assembly of the League, a tribute to the international recognition he had won by his independent stance on world questions.
de Valera's new constitution – Bunreacht na hÉireann.
During the 1930s, de Valera changed a lot of the Irish Free State constitution.
The Governor-General of the Irish Free State could "reserve" or "deny" the Royal Assent to any changes after being advised (ordered) by "His Majesty's Government in London". After a legal argument with the British Government the power this was changed to "His Majesty's Government in the Irish Free State"
That meant that de Valera was tge only person who could stop a bill becoming law.
When King Edward VIII abdicted (resigned) as "King of Ireland" de Valera passed two Bills;
In July 1936, de Valera wrote to King Edward in London saying that he planned to introduce a new constitution. This was only a little different from the "Bunreacht na hÉireann" (meaning literally the Constitution of Ireland).
The new constitution was not an act of the Dáil but was voted for in a referendum, because de Valera wanted a new start for the new country he was setting up.
Neutrality in World War II.
Ireland stayed neutral in World War II, which was called The Emergency in Ireland. Both the possibility of a German invasion and a British invasion were discussed in the Dáil.
To be neutral de Valera visited the German minister in Dublin, to express sympathy over the death of the Führer. Along with President Douglas Hyde, de Valera was the only head of government to do this. de Valera did not visit the American embassy following the death of Roosevelt, as David Gray, the American Ambassador said he would not receive de Valera. All flags were flown at half mast on Roosevelt's death on de Valera's instructions
Post–war period.
After sixteen years in power, Fianna Fáil lost the 1948 election. John A. Costello was Taoiseach of a coalition Government. It was Costello who declared Ireland a republic, making de Valera's friend President Ó Ceallaigh Ireland's head of state. In 1951 de Valera was returned to power but without an overall majority. Many people thought this was his worst government. He spent several months in the Netherlands where he had six operations on his eyes.
Fianna Fáil was defeated again in the 1954 general election, but in 1957 de Valera, won a majority of nine seats. This was the beginning of another sixteen year period in office for Fianna Fáil. But de Valera was only Taoiseach for two years.
In 1959 he was elected President of Ireland, as which he served until 1973. At his retirement at the age of 90, he was the oldest Head of State in the world.
Éamon de Valera died in Linden Convalescent Home, Blackrock, County Dublin on 29 August, 1975 aged 92. His wife, Sinéad de Valera, four years his senior, had died the previous January, on the eve of their 65th wedding anniversary. He is buried in Dublin's Glasnevin Cemetery.
Overview.
In his recent controversial biography by Tim Pat Coogan says that his failures are more thanhis achievements, and that de Valera's popularity fell as Michael Collins's rose.
Garret Fitzgerald summarised his last term as Taoiseach;
"Total economic stagnation marked de Valera's last seven years as leader of his party - because all of the chickens of his disastrous commitment to an inward-looking policy of self sufficiency were coming home to roost."

Erskine Hamilton Childers
Erskine Hamilton Childers (11 December 1905 – 17 November 1974), was the son of Robert Erskine Childers (author of the spy thriller "The Riddle of the Sands". He was the fourth President of Ireland from 1973 until his death in 1974, and a TD from 1938 until 1973.
He was appointed Tánaiste in 1969.
Biography.
Childers was born in London. He moved to Ireland after the First World War and lived in County Wicklow with his father Robert Erskine Childers. His father helped bring guns to Ireland for the Easter Rising, and opposed the treaty that set up the Irish Free State. The younger Childers was educated at Gresham's School, Holt, and Trinity College, Cambridge, hence his striking British upper class accent.
In 1922, when Childers was 16, his father was executed by the Irish Free State. Before his execution the older Childers made his son promise from to find every man who had signed his father's death warrant out and shake his hand.
After finishing college in Britain Childers worked in a tourism board in Paris, until Éamon de Valera invited him back to Ireland to work for the Irish Press. He became a naturalised Irish citizen in 1938.
As member of Fianna Fáil, he held a number of ministerial posts in the cabinets of Éamon de Valera, Seán Lemass and Jack Lynch, becoming Tánaiste Deputy head of the government) in 1969. Erskine's period as a minister was controversial. One commentator described his ministerial career as "spectacularly unsuccessful", but others praised his willingness to take tough decisions.
Childers was elected the fourth President of Ireland on 30 May, 1973, defeating Tom O'Higgins by 635,867 votes to 578,771. Childers, though 67, was an extremely hard-working and He died suddenly of a heart attack in November 1974, while making a public speech to the Royal College of Physicians in Dublin.
Childers' state funeral in St. Patrick's Cathedral, Dublin, was attended by world leaders including Nelson Rockefeller, Vice-President of the United States, Earl Mountbatten of Burma (representing Queen Elizabeth II), Harold Wilson, the Prime Minister of the United Kingdom and presidents and crowned heads of state from Europe and beyond. He was buried County Wicklow. At first it was expected that President Childers' widow, Rita, would be offered the office of president to continue his work, but it went instead to the former Chief Justice, Cearbhall Ó Dálaigh.
One of Childers' sons, also called Erskine was a UN civil servant and Secretary General of the World Federation of United Nations Associations. A daughter by 2nd wife Rita, Nessa Childers, is a councillor for the Green Party on Dún Laoghaire-Rathdown County Council.
Additional reading.
John N. Young, "Erskine H. Childers: President of Ireland"

Patrick Hillery
He was Ireland's first EuropeanCommissioner, serving for three years until he became President in 1976. He never faced an election, because both time he ran for president he was unopposed.
Early & private life.
Patrick John Hillery, known as "Paddy Hillery", was born in Spanish Point, Miltown Malbay, County Clare in 1923. He attended University College Dublin, where he studied medicine. In 1947 he returned to his home town where he followed in his father’s footsteps as a doctor. A a doctor he also spent a year working as coroner for West Clare.
Hillery married Mary Beatrice (Maeve) Finnegan on October 27, 1955. Together they had a son, John, and a daughter, Vivienne, who died after a long illness in 1985, shortly before her eighteenth bithday.
Domestic political career.
Hillery was asked by Éamon de Valera to be his running mate in the 1951 general election. won the election and Hillery was successful on his first attempt to get elected. He only became a minister after de Valera retired as Taoiseach in 1959.
Government minister: 1959-1973.
As Minister for Education, Hillery established comprehensive schools and Regional Technical Colleges.
After another election win in 1969 Hillery became Minister for External Affairs (renamed Foreign Affairs in 1972), one of the top cabinet posts. After "Bloody Sunday"), he travelled to the United Nations in New York to demand UN involvement in peace-keeping on the streets of Northern Ireland. In 1972, he negotiated Irish membership of the European Economic Community, a process that was completed in 1973.
European Commissioner.
Following Ireland's successful entry into Europe Hillery was rewarded by becoming the first Irishman to serve on the European Commission. He was appointed Vice-President of the Commission as well as having special responsibility for Social Affairs. Hillery's most famous policy was to force EEC member states to give equal pay to women.
In 1976 the new Fine Gael–Labour Party National Coalition Government of Liam Cosgrave said they would not re-appointed him the Commission. He thought about returning to medicine, perhaps moving with his wife, Maeve (also a doctor) to Africa. When President Cearbhall Ó Dálaigh resigned, Hillery agreed to become the Fianna Fáil candidate in the election.
President.
He was elected without a contest as the only candidate, becoming President of Ireland on 3 December, 1976.
After 1982 people thought he was a very good and honest President. Before then he had been written off as boring and dull. In 1982 the Taoiseach, Fine Gael's Garrett Fitzgerald, lost a vote in Dáil Eireann. Dr Fitzgerald asked for a general election. As President he did not have to agree, and Dr Fitzgerald would have had to resign. This meant Dáil Éireann might choose Charles Haughey as Taoiseach. Hillery thought a new election was best, but many people from the President's own party tried to persuade him otherwise.
President Hillery refused to speak to any opposition party politicians, but when Charles Haughey, who was Leader of the Opposition, had rang the President's Office he "threatened" to end the career of the army officer answered and refused on Hillery's "explicit" orders to put the call through to the President. Hillery called the Irish Army's Chief of Staff the following day and as Commander-in-Chief of the Army had ordered the Chief of Staff to make sure that no politician ever interfered with the career of the young army officer.
In 1983 Hillery was again elected unopposed. Hillery left office in 1990 (he had served the maximum two terms), widely applauded for his integrity, honesty and devotion to duty. However he re-entered public life in 2002 during the second referendum on the Nice Treaty, when he urged a "yes" vote. The referendum was carried.

Mary Robinson
Mary Robinson (; born 21 May 1944) was the first female President of Ireland, serving from 1990 to 1997. She she had been an academic, barrister, and member of the Irish senate from 1969 to 1989.
She defeated "Fianna Fáil's" Brian Lenihan and Fine Gael's Austin Currie in the 1990 presidential election, the first time Fianna Fáil had lost a presidential election.
She resigned the presidency four months ahead of the end of her term of office to begin a five year term in the United Nations, as United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees. In 2002 Robinson became Honorary President of Oxfam International.
Background.
Born Mary Therese Winifred Bourke in Ballina, County Mayo in 1944, Mary Robinson was the daughter of two medical doctors. The Bourke family has been in Mayo since the thirteenth century. One ancestor was a leading activist in the Irish National Land League in Mayo and the Irish Republican Brotherhood; an uncle, Sir Paget John Bourke, was knighted by Queen Elizabeth II after a career as a judge in the Colonial Service; while another relative was a Roman Catholic nun.
Robinson got the permission of the then Archbishop of Dublin, John Charles McQuaid to study in Trinity College, Dublin(TCD); at the time Roman Catholics were forbidden by church rules from studying in TCD without special permission, called a dispensation.. TCD once did not allow Catholics to study. In her twenties, she was appointed Professor of Law in the college.
Career in Seanad Éireann.
She was elected one of Trinity College's three members of Seanad Éireann in 1969.
In 1982, the Labour Party entered into a coalition government with Fine Gael. Many expected Robinson to be the attorney-general, but the Labour party leader instead picked an unknown, new senior counsel called John Rogers. Shortly afterwards, Robinson resigned from the party in protest at the Anglo-Irish Agreement, she said that unionist politicians in Northern Ireland should have been consulted as part of the deal.
Robinson decided not to seek re-election to the senate in 1989. One year later she agreed to become the first Labour candidate for the presidency and the first woman candidate in what was only the second presidential election to be contested by three candidates since 1945.
Candidates from other parties.
The main opposition party, Fine Gael was no well organised. They gambled that former Taoiseach Garret FitzGerald would run as its candidate (but for two years he had been saying no), then they asked Peter Barry, who had previously been willing to run but had run out of patience and was no longer interested. The party's third choice was the former civil rights campaigner Austin Currie, a new TD and former minister in Brian Faulkner's power-sharing executive in Northern Ireland from 1973-1974.
Fianna Fáil chose Tánaiste and Minister for Defence, Brian Lenihan. Lenihan was popular and widely seen as humorous and intelligent. Like Robinson he had made liberal policy reforms. In the 1960s he abolished censorship, for example. He was seen as a near certainty to win the presidency. The only question asked was whether Robinson would beat Currie and come second.
But Taoiseach Charles Haughey of Fianna Fáil was not popular, and the Labour Party leader Dick Spring was becoming more popular.
Election Campaign.
During the campaign people found out that what Lenihan had told friends in private showed he had lied in public about the 1982 dissolution of Dáil Éireann.
Lenihan denied he had pressured the President but then a tape was produced of an 'on the record' interview he had given to a postgraduate student the previous May where he talked about trying to apply pressure. Lenihan claimed that "on mature recollection" he hadn't pressured the President and had been confused in his interview with the student. But the government threatened to fall over the issue.
Lenihan was dismissed as Tánaiste and Minister for Defence.
Lenihan still managed to win the first count. In the Single Transferable Vote system Austin Currie was eliminated and his second choice votes were counted. Most were for Robinson. Lenihan became the first Fianna Fáil presidential candidate in the history of the office to lose a presidential election. Robinson now became President.
Presidency.
Robinson was a popular president, before he died in 2002 Brian Lenihan said that she was a better president than he ever could have been. She often visited Britain, and became the first Irish president to visit Queen Elizabeth II at Buckingham Palace. She welcomed visits by senior British royals, most notably the Prince of Wales to Áras an Uachtaráin. On one trip to Belfast she met with the local MP, Gerry Adams, the President of Sinn Féin. Foreign Minister Dick Spring, who was leader of the Labour Party, privately advised her not to meet Adams. However the Government did not formally advise her not to meet with him, so she felt it would be wrong,not to meet the local member of parliament during her visit, and was photographed publicly shaking his hand. During her various visits to Northern Ireland, she in fact regularly met politicians of all parties, including David Trimble of the Ulster Unionist Party and John Hume of the Social Democratic and Labour Party.
Charles Haughey died not like her, even stopping her from delivering the important BBC Dimbleby Lecture. Haughey's successors as Taoiseach, Albert Reynolds (Fianna Fáil: 1992-94), John Bruton (Fine Gael: 1994-97) and Bertie Ahern (Fianna Fáil:1997-) never hid their admiration of her work. Bruton and Ahern both tried to get her the United Nations High Commissioner for Human Rights.
High Commissioner for Human Rights.
Robinson became the United Nations High Commissioner for Human Rights on 12 September 1997, resigning the Presidency a few weeks early with the approval of Irish political parties in order to take up the post. Newspaper reports say that she had been asked by Secretary General of the United Nations Kofi Annan to become a public campaigner
Robinson was the first High Commissioner for Human Rights to visit Tibet, making her trip in 1998. During her tenure she criticised the Irish system of permits for non-EU immigrants, and criticised the United States' use of capital punishment. Though she had initially announced her intention to serve a single four-year period, she extended the term by a year following an appeal from Annan, allowing her to preside over the 2001 World Conference against Racism, Racial Discrimination, Xenophobia and Related Intolerance in Durban, South Africa, as Secretary-General. Robinson's posting as High Commissioner ended in 2002.
Trinity College.
Mrs Robinson is the twenty fourth, and first female, Chancellor of University of Dublin.
The Elders.
On July 18, 2007 in Johannesburg, South Africa, Nelson Mandela, his wife Graça Machel, and Desmond Tutu convened a group of world leaders to contribute their wisdom, independent leadership and honesty to tackle some of the world's toughest problems. Nelson Mandela announced the formation of this new group, The Elders, in a speech he delivered on his 89th birthday.
Archbishop Tutu will serve as the Chair of The Elders. The founding members of this group also include Graça Machel, Kofi Annan, Ela Bhatt, Gro Harlem Brundtland, Jimmy Carter, Li Zhaoxing, Mary Robinson and Muhammad Yunus.
The Elders will be independently funded by a group of Founders, including Richard Branson, Peter Gabriel, Ray Chambers; Michael Chambers; Bridgeway Foundation; Pam Omidyar, Humanity United; Amy Robbins; Shashi Ruia, Dick Tarlow; andThe United Nations Foundation.
As president she signed two very important Bills that she had fought for throughout her political career
Other source material.
Media coverage in "The Irish Times", "The Irish Independent", "The Examiner" (now renamed the "Irish Examiner"), "The Star", The Irish Mirror, "The Irish Sun", "Sunday Tribune", "The Sunday Independent", "The Sunday Times", "The Times", "The Daily Telegraph" and "The Guardian". Also briefing notes issued on various occasions (notably state, official or personal visits by Robinson abroad) supplied by the Irish Department of Foreign Affairs, The Foreign and Commonwealth Office, Buckingham Palace, Áras an Uachtaráin, the Holy See and the press offices of the United Nations (including the text of her Romanes Lecture in November 1997). Some background came via an interview with Mrs. Robinson.
"The Korea Liberator:" Criticism of Robinson's failure to speak out while North Korea deliberately starved two million of its people to death, largely during her tenure (warning: graphic image).

Achtung Baby
"Achtung Baby" is the seventh studio album by Irish rock band U2. It was put in stores on 19 November 1991. The album came almost two years after the lead singer, Bono, said that the band would "have to go away and dream it all up again," after their 1988 album, "Rattle and Hum" was criticized.
"Achtung Baby" shows a very big change in U2's sound because they began to use alternative rock and electronic sounds in the rhythm, more production, and more guitar effects, also including darker and more personal song words. The results were much more adventurous and less traditionally rock-based than their previous albums, and "Achtung Baby" is one of U2's best-selling and most-liked albums.

John McCain
John McCain (born August 29, 1936 in the Panama Canal Zone) is a United States Senator from Arizona. He was been chosen by the Republican Party for the party's candidate in the United States presidential election, 2008. He is married to business woman Cindy McCain.
McCain's father and grandfather served in the U.S. Navy. McCain went to the U.S. Naval Academy and later served during the Vietnam War. His plane was shot down. He was captured by the "Viet Cong", a name given to the North Vietnamese military who finally took over the entire country. While captured, he was called a "POW" (Prisoner of War). He was held in prison for several years and tortured, resulting in long-term damage to his body.
Presidential campaigns.
Later, he became a U.S. Senator. He tried to get the Republican Party to choose him to be their candidate for President of the United States before, but George W. Bush got it. He tried again for it in 2008, and got chosen this time. He was defeated in the election on November 4 by Barack Obama.

Leo von Caprivi
Georg Leo von Caprivi, later Georg Leo "Graf" von Caprivi de Caprara de Montecuccoli (), born; February 24, 1831 – February 6, 1899) was a German major general and politician, who succeeded Otto von Bismarck as Chancellor of Germany. Caprivi was German Chancellor from March 1890 to October 1894.
Biography.
Born in Charlottenburg, Berlin to a family of Italian and Slovenian origin, Caprivi joined the army in 1849 and fought in the Austro-Prussian War in 1866 and the Franco-Prussian War in 1870.
He liked Bismarck, and once said. Kaiser Wilhelm II was arguing with Bismarck about changes to the government. In February 1890 the Kaiser told Caprivi to come back to Berlin. Caprivi was told that he would take over from Bismarck if Bismarck did not do what the Kaiser wanted. Caprivi became chancellor on March 18 1890.
Caprivi's government was friendlier to the Social Democrats and to the United Kingdom. The Zanzibar treaty of July 1890, meant Germany gave control of Zanzibar, an island near German East Africa to Britain in return for the island of Heligoland in the North Sea. Caprivi also got the Caprivi Strip added to German South West Africa. This is a narrow strip of land that links German South West Africa (now called Namibia), to the Zambezi River.
In 1892 Caprivi resigned as Prussian Minister President and was replaced by Count Botho zu Eulenburg. Prussia was so powerful in the German Empire that having different people as Imperial Chancellor and Minister President made it hard to govern the country. Caprivi and Eulenburg were dismissed in 1894 and Prince Chlodwig of Hohenlohe-Schillingsfürst took both jobs.

B'Day Anthology Video Album
"B'Day Anthology Video Album" is a video album, released by the American R&B singer-songwriter Beyoncé. It was released alongside "B'Day Deluxe Edition" on April 3, 2007.

Upgrade U
"Upgrade U" is an R&B/hip hop song written by Beyoncé Knowles.

Recep Tayyip Erdoğan
Recep Tayyip Erdoğan is the prime minister of Turkey. In 1998, he was convicted. He was impeached, or not in office, for ten months.

Dangerously in Love
"Dangerously in Love" is the solo debut album by American R&B singer Beyoncé, released on June 24 2003 in the United States and June 23 2003 in the United Kingdom on Columbia Records.

B'Day
"B'Day" is the second studio album by American R&B singer Beyoncé, released by Columbia Records on 1 September 2006 outside North America, on September 4, 2006 worldwide, and on September 5, 2006 in Canada and the United States. The album's title comes from the fact that September 4, the date of worldwide release, is Beyoncé's birthday (2006 being her 25th). "B'Day" won the award for "Best Contemporary R&B Album" at the 49th Annual Grammy Awards. A two-CD deluxe edition of the album, including previously unreleased material in English and Spanish, was released on April 3 2007.
B'Day Deluxe Edition.
Columbia Records released "B'Day - Deluxe Edition", an expanded two-CD edition of R&B singer Beyoncé Knowles's "B'Day", on Tuesday, April 3 2007 in the U.S. and on Monday, April 23 2007 in the UK. In addition to the original twelve tracks from the album, disc one features five brand-new songs in English and disc two features six new Spanish language tracks. The album also featuers a cover of Des'ree's "Kissing You" renamed "Still in Love (Kissing You)". On the same day, a DVD featuring video clips for all tracks from "B'Day" was released as a Wal-Mart exclusive. With the release of the deluxe edition, "B'Day" made a jump from number sixty-nine back up to number six on the Billboard 200, selling 126,000 copies, and also went to number one on the Top R&B/Hip-Hop Albums.
The Australian, European, and Japanese versions include both the deluxe edition of "B'Day" as well as the music video DVD.
In the week of April 22, the Deluxe Edition of B'Day and the Anthology Video album, which include the song "Still in Love (Kissing You)", were pulled from distribution because of a lawsuit filed by British singer Des'ree. The lawsuit is over Beyoncé's cover of Des'ree's "I'm Kissing You", which was given permission, but within certain limits; the song could not be used in video form, and the title should not be changed. On March 27, according to the complaint, they discovered that Beyoncé and her record label planned to include the song on the re-release anyway, changing the title of the song and making a video. In a letter to Beyoncé's lawyer and her distribution group Sony, the Royalty Network called the move "completely unacceptable". The version of the Deluxe Edition with the track has been discontinued and replaced by a version with the international track "If" and placing "World Wide Woman" in the main track list.

Richard von Weizsäcker
Dr. Richard Freiherr von Weizsäcker (born April 15 1920) is a German politician, and a member of the CDU party. He was President of Germany from 1984 to 1994.
He was born in Stuttgart as the son of the diplomat Ernst von Weizsäcker and brother of physicist and philosopher Carl Friedrich von Weizsäcker. His grandfather Carl von Weizsäcker had been Minister President of Württemberg
In war he served in the German Army. He was wounded in East Prussia in 1945 and was sent home to Stuttgart. Then he continued his study of history in Göttingen and eventually studied law. As a law student he was a member of his father's defence team at the Eleventh secondary Nuremburg Trial. He took his first judicial state exam in 1950, the second in 1953, and in 1955 was promoted "doctor juris". In 1953 he married Marianne von Kretschmann; they have four children.
Richard von Weizsäcker joined the CDU in 1954 and was a member of the Bundestag (German Parliament) from 1969 to 1981. He was elected vice president of the Bundestag 1979-1981, but did not stand for re-election, because he became the Governing Mayor () of West Berlin (1981-1984).
He was elected President of Germany by the Bundesversammlung (Federal Convention) in 1984, succeeding Karl Carstens.
Although now an elder statesman, Richard von Weizsäcker is still involved in politics and charitable affairs. He was the chair of a commission installed by the then SPD-Die Grünen government for reforming the Bundeswehr.
He has served on many international commissions. He was chairman of the Independent Working Group on the future of the United Nations and was one of three 'Wise Men' appointed by European Commission President Romano Prodi to consider the future of the European Union.
von Weizsäcker has written may books, including
His autobiograghy called is "From Weimar to the Wall: My Life in German Politics" (1999).

Pervez Musharraf
Pervez Musharraf () (born August 11, 1943) was the twelfth President of Pakistan. Previously, he was Chief Executive of Pakistan as well as former Chief of Army Staff of the Pakistan Army.

Franz Josef Strauß
Franz Josef Strauß () (September 6, 1915 – October 3, 1988) was a German politician (CSU) and minister-president of the state of Bavaria. Press reports called him the "Strong Man of Europe".
Early years.
Born as "Franz Strauß" in Munich as the second child of a butcher. Strauß studied at the University of Munich from 1935 to 1939.
He became a member of the "NSDStB" (Nationalsozialistischer Deutscher Studentenbund), (). All students had to be members, or they would not be allowed to study.
In World War II, he served in the German army, on the Western and Eastern Fronts. While on furlough, he passed the German state exams to become a teacher. He got severe frostbite on the Eastern Front at the end of 1942, so he became an "Offizier für wehrgeistige Führung" (political officer) at the antiaircraft artillery school in Altenstadt, near Schongau, Bavaria.
Soon after the war he changed his name to Franz Josef Strauß.
In 1957 Strauß married Marianne Zwicknagl. They had three children (Max Josef, Franz Georg and Monika. Monika also became a Bavarian minister and member of the Bavarian parliament.
Political life.
After the war, he was appointed deputy "Landrat" (county president) of Schongau by the American army, and helped to found the local CSU there.
He became a member of the first "Bundestag" (Federal Parliament) in 1949 and, in 1953, Federal Minister for Special Affairs in the second cabinet of Chancellor Konrad Adenauer. In 1955 he became Federal Minister of Nuclear Energy, and in 1956 defence minister. As defence minister he helped to build-up of the new "Bundeswehr".
He became chairman of the CSU in 1961.
"Der Spiegel" scandal.
Strauß had to resign as defence minister in 1962 because of the Spiegel scandal. The important magazine "Der Spiegel" said that the Bundeswehr could not defend Germany. Strauß said this was treason and Rudolf Augstein, editor of the magazine, was arrested for 103 days.
Strauß had to admit that he had lied to the Bundestag, and had to to resign. He complained that he was treated like a "Jew who had dared appear at an NSDAP party convention".
Rivalry between Kohl and Strauß.
Strauß became minister of finance in 1966, in the cabinet of Kurt Georg Kiesinger.
He worked with the SPD minister for economy, Karl Schiller, but after the SPD was able to form a government without the CDU/CSU, in 1969, Strauß lost his job and became a critics of Willy Brandt's "Ostpolitik."
In 1976, when Helmut Kohl failed to become chancellor Strauß cancelled the alliance between the CDU and CSU parties in the Bundestag. He only started the alliance again when the CDU threatened to move into Bavaria.
In the 1980 federal election Strauß was the CDU/CSU candidate for chancellor. Some people thought that this showed that the CDU and CSU leaders thought Strauß had better policies and style than Kohl. Others said that the CDU/CSU thought that Helmut Schmidt and the SPD was bound to win the 1980 election, and felt that they had nothing to lose in running Strauß: but it might stop Strauß criticising anyone whon disagreed with him.
Final decade of life.
From 1978 until his death in 1988, Strauß was minister president of Bavaria. He served as President of the Bundesrat in 1983/84.
After he lost the 1980 federal election, he left federal politics. But he did not stay quiet, and often commented on federal affairs from his safe seat in Bavaria. He especially criticised Kohl's ideas, even after Kohl ascended to the Chancellorship.
In 1983, Strauß helped to arrange a loan of 3 billion Deutschmarks for East Germany. This was not popular, and today it is regarded by some as having artificially prolonged the life of the then-bankrupt communist state.
Visit to Albania.
Strauß visited communist Albania on August 21, 1984, while Enver Hoxha, the absolute dictator from the end of World War II until his death in 1985, was still alive. Strauß was one of the few Western leaders to visit Albania in decades. Some thought Strauß might be helping to start diplomatic links between Albania and West Germany but the visit did not result in anything concrete.
Death.
On October 1, 1988, Strauß collapsed while hunting with the Prince of Thurn and Taxis in the Thurn and Taxis forests, east of Regensburg. He died in a Regensburg hospital on October 3 without having regained consciousness.
Legacy.
Strauß was very important in post-war Germany even though he was not very well known outside Germany. He polarized (split) the public like few other politicians.
A well known spokesman for conservatives, and brilliant speech-maaker, he was a "red flag" to the left (his ideas made left wing people very angry).
He transformed Bavaria from the a farming state to a centre of technology in Germany. He was an aerospace enthusiast, and supported the Airbus in the 1970s. This is why the new airport in Munich was named after him in 1992 (see Franz Josef Strauß International Airport).

Maximilien de Robespierre
Maximilien François Marie Odenthalius Isidore de Robespierre (; 6 May 1758 – 28 July 1794) is one of the best-known leaders of the French Revolution. Most people know him as Maximilien de Robespierre. He studied in Paris and became a lawyer. His supporters called him "The Incorruptible". He was an important member of the Committee of Public Safety. He was a leader in the period of the Revolution commonly known as the Reign of Terror that ended with his arrest and execution in 1794.
Politically, Robespierre was a disciple of Jean-Jacques Rousseau, among others. He was very well able to say what the left-wing bourgeoisie thought. He was described as physically unimposing and immaculate in attire and personal manners.

Irreemplazable
"Irreemplazable" is a Spanish and Spanglish fare EP by female R&B singer Beyoncé Knowles. It was released on August 28 in US. At the same time, a CD/DVD combo was released exclusively at Wal-mart. The DVD features behind the scenes documentary entitled La Evolucion Latina de Beyoncé (The Latin Evolution of Beyoncé) as well as the music video for Beyoncé's "Get Me Bodied" (Timbaland remix) featuring Voltio.

Dangerously in Love 2
Knowles re-recorded the song for her debut solo album, "Dangerously in Love" (2003), under the title "Dangerously in Love 2". Featuring a modified arrangement and background vocals by Kelly Rowland and Michelle Williams, Knowles's version received a generally positive response from music critics. In the U.S. the song went for radio airplay only and was never released as a single in other countries. No music video exists for the song, though the performance on her DVD "Live at Wembley" was shown frequently on BET.
Knowles frequently performs the song live — often as a prelude to "Crazy in Love", and more recently with her live cover of the Jill Scott song "He Loves Me" — often to show her vocal power and range. She performed "Dangerously in Love 2" at the 2004 Grammy Awards, where it won in the category of "Best Female R&B Vocal Performance".
Other versions of the Knowles solo version of the song include an a cappella, an instrumental and the Svella remix.

Suga Mama
"Suga Mama" is an R&B/soul/funk/rock song written by Beyoncé Knowles, Rich Harrison, and Makeba, and produced by Knowles and Harrison for Knowles' second solo album, "B'Day" (2006). It features a sample of Jake Wade and the Soul Searchers' song "Searching for Soul", which was written by Chuck Middleton. The music video for the song was released on television in the United Kingdom in April 2007.
Music video and other promotion.
The "Suga Mama" music video was released to UK music channels in April 2007. It is black-and-white and was co-directed by Melina and Knowles for the "B'Day Anthology Video Album", which was released the same month; it was one of eight videos shot in two weeks for the album. It begins with Knowles sitting in a chair, wearing men's clothing and smoking a cigar. She gets up and begins to pole dance. The remainder of the video presents Knowles dancing on top of a sugar cube, dancing with backing dancers whose faces are partially concealed, lying in a circle of light and riding a mechanical bull. Knowles said she is meant to "slowly become a woman" during the video, adding "Well, a sexier woman — I'm always a woman."
Knowles rehearsed the pole dancing using two ballet bars, which was when it was decided to add a pole above her head to form an arc. Though Knowles is from Texas, she had never previously been on mechanical bull. There were no problems during warm-ups, but the man operating the bull during the video shoot programmed it to go faster, causing Knowles to fall off when she tried to perform tricks such as lifting up her foot, leaning back and turning around. To minimise the time Knowles spent on the bull, the director shot the sequence at twelve frames per second (see frame rate) and Knowles sang twice as quickly, but it wasn't until 4:00 a.m. that they completed work.
"Suga Mama" was included on the set list of Knowles's 2007 tour, The Beyoncé Experience, and "The Tennessean" wrote that the song "was even sexier and more gutbucket than on record". A remix of the song features rapper Consequence.

Friedrich Ebert
Friedrich Ebert (February 4, 1871 – February 28, 1925) was a German politician (SPD).
He was Chancellor of Germany and its first president during the Weimar period.

Walter Simons
Walter Simons (1861 - 1937) was a German politician. He was president of the German Supreme Court from 1922 - 1929. After the death of Friedrich Ebert in February, 1925 he was acting president of the Weimar Republic from 12 March, 1925 until 12 May, 1925 when the next president, Paul von Hindenburg, was elected and assumed office.

Paul von Hindenburg
Paul Ludwig Hans Anton von Beneckendorff und von Hindenburg (), known as Paul von Hindenburg (). October 2, 1847 – August 2, 1934). He was a German field marshal and statesman.
Hindenburg retired from the army in 1911. He rejoined the army at the start of the First World War. He became famous when he won the Battle of Tannenberg in 1914.
Hindenburg retired again in 1919, but returned to public life one more time in 1925 to be elected as the second President of Germany.
He was 84 years old and in poor health, but had to run for re-election in 1932 as the only candidate who could defeat Adolf Hitler. He tried to stop the Nazi Party's rise to power, but had to appoint Hitler as Chancellor in January 1933. In March he signed the Enabling Act of 1933 which gave special powers to Hitler's government. Hindenburg died the next year, after which Hitler declared the office of President vacant and made himself Head of State.
The famous zeppelin "Hindenburg" that was destroyed by fire in 1937 had been named in his honour, as is the causeway joining the island of Sylt to mainland Schleswig-Holstein, the Hindenburgdamm, built during his time in office.
1925 election.
In 1925, Hindenburg had no interest in running for public office. After the first round Admiral Alfred von Tirpitz, one of the leaders of the DNVP, visited Hindenburg and asked him to run.
Hindenburg eventually agreed to run in the second round of the elections as a non-party independent, although he was a conservative. Because he was Germany's greatest war hero, Hindenburg won the election in the second round of voting held on 26 April, 1925.
He was helped when the Bavarian People's Party (BVP), switched its support from Marx, the SPD candidate and the Communist Party of Germany (KPD) to did not withdraw its candidate, Ernst Thälmann. If they had their supporters would most likely have voted for the SPD and Hindenburg may not have won.
First term.
Hindenburg tried to stay out of day-to-politics, and be a ceremonial president. He liked the monarchy, but took his oath to the Weimar Constitution seriously.
Hindenburg often complained that he missed the quiet of his retirement and, that politics was full of ideas like economics that he did not understand.
He advisers included his son, Oskar, his old army aide General Wilhelm Groener, and General Kurt von Schleicher. They did not like the democratic rules of the Weimar Republic, and wanted a change. The younger Hindenburg served as his father's aide-de-camp and controlled politicians' access to the President.
Schleicher came up with the idea of "Presidential government", and the "25/48/53 formula".
Schleicher's wanted to have Hindenburg appoint a chancellor that Schleicher's chose. If that chancellor needed any laws he could use article 48. If the Reichstag should threaten to cancell any of those laws d, Hindenburg could threaten a dissolution, and call new elections. Hindenburg did not like the idea, butwas pressured into going along with them by his son and his other advisors..
Presidential government.
The first try at "presidential government" in 1926 – 1927 failed for lack of political support. During the winter of 1929 – 1930, Schleicher had a series of secret meetings with Heinrich Brüning, the leader of the Catholic Center Party ("Zentrum").
Schleicher then set about splitting the "Grand Coalition" government of the Social Democrats and the German People’s Party. As a reult the government fell in March 1930 and Brüning was named Chancellor by Hindenburg.
Brüning's first act was to introduce a budget calling for steep spending cuts and sharp tax increases. When the budget was defeated in July, Brüning had Hindenburg sign the budget as an emergency law under Article 48. When the Reichstag voted to cancel the budget, Brüning had Hindenburg dissolve Reichstag only two years into its mandate, and had the budget passed again by Article 48. The Nazis got 17% of the vote in the September 1930 elections. The Communist Party of Germany also made gains.
Brüning ruled through Article 48; the Social Democrats never voted not to cancel his Article 48 bills in order not to have another election that could only benefit the Nazis and the Communists.
1932 Election.
In the first round of the election held in March 1932, Hindenburg was the frontrunner, but did not have an absolute majority. In the runoff election of April 1932, Hindenburgbeat Hitler for the Presidency.
After the presidential elections had ended, Schleicher held a series of secret meetings with Hitler in May 1932, and thought that Hitler had agreed to support the new "presidential government" Schleicher was building.
In May 1932 Schleicher had Hindenburg sack Groener as Defence Minister to humiliate both Groener and Brüning. On 31 May 1932, Hindenburg sacked Brüning as Chancellor and replaced him with Schleicher's suggestion, Franz von Papen.
von Papen's government openly wanted to destroy German democracy. Like Brüning's government, von Papen's government was a "presidential government" that governed through the use of Article 48.
As Schleicher wanted, Hindenburg dissolved the Reichstag and set new elections for July 1932. Schleicher and von Papen both believed that the Nazis would win the majority of the seats and would support von Papen's government.
The Nazi party did became the largest party in the Reichstag, and expected Hitler would be Chancellor. When Hindenburg met Hitler on 13 August 1932, in Berlin, Hindenburg rejected Hitler's demands for the Chancellorship.
Hindenburg issued a press release about his meeting with Hitler that seemed to say that Hitler had demanded absolute power and that the President had refused. Hitler was enraged by this press release.
When the Reichstag met in September 1932, its first and only act was to pass a massive vote of no-confidence in von Papen’s government. In response, von Papen had Hindenburg dissolve the Reichstag for elections in November 1932. In the 1949 constitution, a vote of no confidence must be accompanied by the election of a new chancellor, so this could not happen.
In the second Reichstag elections of 1932 the Nazis lost some support, but stayed the largest party in the Reichstag. There ensued another round of talks between Hindenburg, von Papen, von Schleicher on the one hand and Hitler and the other Nazi leaders on the other.
Hitler still demanded that Hindenburg give him the Chancellorship. Hindenburg could not accept this, so von Papen suggested Hindenburg declare martial law and do away with democracy.
Von Papen got Oscar Hindenburg to support the plan, and they persuaded the president to ignore his oath to the Constitution and go along with this plan. Schleicher saw von Papen as a threat so he blocked the martial law plan by saying it would make the Nazi SA and the Communist Red Front Fighters rebel, and that the Poles would invade and the Reichswehr would be unable to cope.
von Papen to resigned in December 1932 and von Schleicher replace him. von Papen still believed that he could control Hitler from behind the scenes and decided to support him for Chancellor. von Papen then started pressuring Hindenburg into naming Hitler as Chancellor.
Hindenburg hated the idea of Hitler as Chancellor, but under pressure from Meißner, von Papen and Oskar Hindenburg the President decided to appoint Hitler Chancellor. On the morning of 30 January 1933, Hindenburg swore Hitler in as Chancellor at the Presidential Palace.
The "Machtergreifung".
Hindenburg played key role in the Nazi "Machtergreifung" (Seizure of Power) in 1933. He was not involved in the planning, but did not stop Hitler. In the "Government of National Concentration" headed by Hitler, the Nazis were in the minority. Most of the ministers were from the von Papen and von Schleicher governments. Besides Hitler, the only other Nazi ministers were Hermann Göring and Wilhelm Frick.
Hindenburg thought that the Nazis' power was limited, especially as his favourite politician, von Papen, was the Vice-Chancellor and the Reich Commissioner for Prussia.
Hitler's first act as Chancellor was to ask Hindenburg to dissolve the Reichstag so that the Nazis and D.N.V.P. could increase their number of seats, Hindenburg agreed.
In early February 1933, von Papen had an Article 48 bill signed into law that limited the freedom of press. After the Reichstag fire, Hindenburg signed into law the "Reichstag Fire Decree".
At the opening of the new "Reichstag" on 21 March 1933, at the Kroll Opera House, the Nazis staged an elaborate ceremony, in which Hindenburg played the leading part, that was meant to mark the continuity between the Prussian-German tradition and the new Nazi state.
The ceremony at the Kroll Opera House had the effect of reassuring many Germans, especially conservative Germans, that life would be fine under the new regime. On 23 March 1933, Hindenburg signed the Enabling Act into law.
Hindenburg was still very popular, but his health was getting worse. The Nazis made sure that whenever Hindenburg did appear in public Hitler was with him, and that Hitler was always very respectful to the President. The nazi propagandists hooped people would think Hindenburg liked Hitler, and nHitler would become more poular.
The only time Hindenburg ever tried to stop a Nazi bill was in early April 1933. The Reichstag had passed a "Law for the Restoration of the Professional Civil Service]". This said that all Jewish civil servants working for the "Reich", the "Länder", or the local districts should be sacked immediately.
Hindenburg refused to sign this bill into law unless all Jewish veterans of World War I, Jewish civil servants who served in the civil service during the war and those Jewish civil servants whose fathers were veterans were allowed to stay in office. Hitler agreed, in order to get the law signed, even though he believed that the Jews had tried to undermine Germany during the Great War. It was Hindenburg who said that Germany lost the First World War because of politicians and others "stabbing the Army in the back". Hindenburg did not believe the story. He said it so that his wartime deputy Erich von Ludendorff would not write bad things in his memoirs. But Hitler did believe the story, and used it to gain power.
Hindenburg stayed president until he died from lung cancer at his home in "Neudeck", East Prussia on 2 August 1934.
One day before Hindenburg's death, Hitler flew to "Neudeck" and visited him. Hindenburg, old and senile, thought he was meeting Kaiser Wilhelm II, and called Hitler "Your Majesty".
He would be Germany's last president until 1945, when Karl Dönitz was appointed president in Hitler's last will. Following Hindenburg's death, Hitler declared the office of President to be permanently vacant, effectively merging it with the office of Chancellor under the title of Leader and Chancellor ("Führer und Reichskanzler"), making himself Germany's Head of State and Head of government.
Burial.
Hindenburg was buried in the Tannenberg memorial near Tannenberg, East Prussia (today: Stębark, Poland). But Hindenburg always said he wanted to be buried next to his wife. In 1945, German troops removed his and his wife's coffins, to save them from the approaching Soviet troops.

Live in Atlanta
Destiny's Child: Live in Atlanta features Destiny's Child performing live in Atlanta, Georgia at Philips Arena on July 15, 2005 during their Destiny Fulfilled... And Lovin' It which sponsored by McDonald's, it was also known as the last tour of Destiny's Child. It has been released on March 28, 2006 in the United States. The DVD debuted at #1 on the Billboard Music DVD charts breaking record sales about 500,000 copies at first week, instead of those numbers Nielsen SoundScan tracked sales of 50,000 because the restrictions about retail, international deliveries and e-packages, RIAA already certified the DVD as Platinum.
This was also released as a two-disc CD but only seemingly in Japan.

Socialist Reich Party
The Socialist Reich Party of Germany (German: "Sozialistische Reichspartei Deutschlands") was a political party in West Germany. It was formed in 1949.
It was openly Neo-Nazi and admired Hitler. It split from the German Empire Party. Leaders included Otto Ernst Remer, a former Major General, and Fritz Dorls.
The SRP claimed West Germany's first Chancellor, Konrad Adenauer only did what the United States told, and that Karl Dönitz was the last legal of Germany.
The SRP also said that the Holocaust never happened, and that the ovens of the Dachau concentration camp were built by the United States after 1945. The SRP also wanted Europe to be led by a reunited German Reich, and that it would not be capitalist or communist.
The SRP never criticised the Soviet Union because the Russians funded the SRP because it was anti-American. The only other party modern in postwar Germany was ehe Communist Party of Germany. It did not get Soviet funds because the Russians thought it was useless.. SRP leader Remer once said that if the USSR ever did invade Germany, he would "show the Russians the way to the Rhine".
The SRP had its own paramilitary organisation, the Reichsfront.
The SRP had about ten thousand members and it won 16 seats in the Lower Saxony Landtag election, and 8 seats Bremen.
It was banned in 1952 by the Federal Constitutional Court of Germany, the only court with the power to do so.

Lutz Graf Schwerin von Krosigk
Johann Ludwig (Lutz) Graf Schwerin von Krosigk'", (August 22, 1887 – March 4, 1977) was a German politician.
Early life.
Johann Ludwig von Krosigk was born in Rathmannsdorf, in the Kingdom of Saxony. His father was from a noble family in Anhalt, his mother was a daughter of one of the Counts ("Graf") von Schwerin. He studied law and politics in Halle, in Lausanne and, as a Rhodes Scholar, at the University of Oxford.
He became a Lieutenant in the German Army during World War I, and he won the Iron Cross. In 1918, Krosigk married Baroness Ehrengard von Plettenberg. They had four sons and five daughters.
Pre-World War II.
Schwerin von Krosigkut was a conservative, but not a member of any political party when was appointed Minister of Finance by Franz von Papen in 1932. President Paul von Hindenburg asked him to stay in office under Kurt von Schleicher. Hitler kept him as finance minister throughout the period of Nazi Party rule, even though several members of his family took part in attempts to kill Hitler.
World War II.
On May 1, 1945, Schwerin von Krosigk was asked to be the Chancellor ("Reichskanzler") of the Acting Government by new President ("Reichspräsident") Karl Dönitz.
On May 7th, 1945, Dönitz allowed the German Army to surrender at Rheims before General Eisenhower.
Winston Churchill recognised the Flensburg Government de facto because he said the surrender was allowed by "Grand Admiral Dönitz the designated Head of State". The government was dissolved when its members were captured by British forces on May 23, 1945, at Flensburg.
Schwerin von Krosigk was tried at Ministries Trial at Nuremberg along with other leading members of the Nazi Government. Schwerin von Krosigk was sentenced to 10 years imprisonment but was released during an amnesty in 1951.
After World War II.
In later years Schwerin von Krosigk wrote several books about economics policy and two versions of his memoirs.
He was one of the first to talk about an "Iron Curtain" coming down across Europe, in a broadcast to the German people on May 2, 1945, a phrase which he had picked up from an article by Joseph Goebbels, and later used by Winston Churchill in a speech that made the phrase famous.
Schwerin von Krosigk died in 1977 in the town of Essen, Germany, aged 89.

Trdat of Iberia
T'rdat (Georgian: თრდატი), sometimes Latinized as "Tiridates"), of the Chosroid Dynasty, was the king of Iberia (Kartli, eastern Georgia) from c. 394 to 406.
Georgian chronicles have said that he is the son of Rev, son of Mirian III, the first Christian king of Iberia. He is reported to have succeeded by his relative and son-in-law, Varaz-Bakur II, and to have been forced to pay tribute to the Sasanids of Iran. The chronicles praise his piety and credit Trdat with the construction of churches at Rustavi and Nekresi.

Amadou Toumani Touré
General (ret) Amadou Toumani Touré (born November 4, 1948 in Mopti, Mali) is the president of Mali. He took power from a military ruler, Moussa Traoré in 1991, then he gave power to civilian (non-military) authorities in 1992. He won the presidential election in 2002. He won the next election easily in 2007.

Mike Gravel
Maurice Robert Gravel, better know as Mike Gravel (born May 13, 1930 in Springfield, Massachusetts) is an American politician, a member of the Democratic Party. He served as a United States Senator from Alaska (1969-1981) and, previously, as member of the Alaska House of Representatives (1953-1966, speaker from 1965-1966). He is currently a candidate for the Democratic Presidential nomination in 2008.
Gravel is primarily know for his successful effort to end military draft during the Vietnam War and put the Pentagon Papers into the public record in 1971.
Currently as a Presidential candidate he is advocating imminent withdrawal of US Armed Forces from Iraq, expanding of the health care, and social security, preventing global warming. He is also one of the earliest and the most prominent advocates of direct democracy in the United States.

Iva Zanicchi
Iva Zanicchi (born January 18, 1940) is a italian singer

António de Oliveira Salazar
António de Oliveira Salazar called a dictator by some people and a Statesman by others was perhaps the only politician in modern Portuguese history to stir passions years after his passing away.An academic, Dr Salazar was a Professor of Economics and perhaps the most educated and urbane European leader of the time.
Following a military revolution in 1926 which overthrew a civilian government of squabbling politicians and a country close to penury Dr. Salazar was invited to put right the finances of what was then a failed state, Dr Salazar was Finance Minister for 13 days, resigned in disgust over interfering politicians and soldiers and went back to his university. He was again persuaded to take over as Finance Minister in 1928 which he did conditionally on an assurance of greated powers for himself and minimal interference from the government. Salazar continued as minister until 1932 and was widely credited with turning the flagging economy around.
Dr Salazar was Prime Minister from 1932 until 1968.
He ruled Portugal for almost 40 years, managing to keep Portugal away from the Second World War and preventing also a Spanish invasion by keeping friends on both sides. Salazar died in 1970. Often called a fascist by his opponents, Dr Salazar's regime was instrumental in issuing Portuguese nationality documents to thousands of fleeing Jews though Europe and ultimately through Portugal a boarding point for the ultimate flight to North America.Unfortunately Dr Salazar's contribution to this humanitarian cause was never acknowledged as this activity had to be toned down & wound up in the later years of the war. Embassy staff in Europe particularly in Vichy France some say for reasons other than just humanitarian turned a limited covert operation into a massive flood, provoking a angry rumble from a powerful Germany. Ironically some such embassy officials are feted to this day as the valiant individuals who helped the desperate Jews.
A little known fact is that Salazar's Portugal was the only European nation at the time to have non white people at all levels of administration and judiciary. Dark skinned people termed "colonial subjects" in other colonial empires were accorded full civil status by Portugal. It was the only State anywhere in the western world to have non European Members of Parliament. This status was however not universally available to the Blacks of the African territories i.e. those who were not "assimilados" (literately translated to "assimilated")which meant those Africans who had not given up their tribal customs nor reached minimum educational standards.Roughly 4% of the African populace was considered "assimilado" whilst in the overseas colonies of Cape Verde,India and China 100% were considered assimilados even though in the latter two territories, people were not largely of the Roman Catholic faith nor did most speak the Portuguese language.
In the mid sixties Portugal and its colonies found themselves in the front line of the Cold war, with a proxy war which drained Portugal of its resources. Salazar was blamed for a War he had no control over and the consequent impoverishment of his country. Thousands from mainland Portugal fled into neighbouring European countries particularly France to avoid the military draft and the war in africa. Most took up menial jobs and were a convinient source of low cost labour in Europe. This expatriate segment of society got increasingly empowered after a Military coup overthrew the government of Salazar's successor Marcello Caetano in 1974. Many returned to Portugal to become next generation Politicians.
The the term "fascist regime" probably stems from a attempt by this sizable group to demonize the fallen regime and justify their flight from a country at war.
Salazar is still loved by some of the people of Portugal today, and was voted the greatest Portuguese man of all time. Apologists say that it was more as a way of showing frustration with the current political events and politicians in Portugal than actually a true devotion.A great segment of the Portuguese people though may beg to differ.

Walter Scheel
Walter Scheel (born July 8, 1919) is a German politician (FDP).
Biography.
Scheel was born in Solingen.
During World War II, he served in the Luftwaffe, the last years of the war as a Radar operator on a Me 110 night fighter.
He was federal minister of economic cooperation and development (1961-1966), but he persuaded the FDP to leave Ludwig Erhard's coalition government in late 1966. This forced elections in Germany, and Kurt Georg Kiesinger became chancellor.
In 1969 his party formed a new coalition with the Social Democrats. He became Foreign Minister and Vice Chancellor. With Willy Brandt his foreign policy meant the Federal Republic of Germany promised not to try and get back the parts of Germany given to Poland and the USSR. The treaty with Poland actually defined the western border of Poland, not the border between Poland and Germany. It is the same thing, but meant Poland could sign a treaty with West Germany that described the border of East Germany.
When Brandt resigned on May 7 1974, Scheel, was acting chancellor, for about a week, until Helmut Schmidt was elected Chancellor.
A few weeks later, Scheel was elected Federal President of West Germany, a post he held from July 1974 until June 1979.
Like most ex German presidents, Scheel retired from political life term ended. He did sometimes appears on political talk shows or events. At the funeral of the murdered businessman Hanns Martin Schleyer in October 1977, Scheel gave a speech entitled "shame".

Co-operative Party
The Co-operative Party is a small socialist political party, in the United Kingdom. It does not put candidates for election, its candidates must be members of the Labour Party as well, and stand as "Labour and Co-operative Party" candidates.
The party today.
It is the political arm of the wider British co-operative movement, and all members of the party must be members of a co-operative business. Those who want to stand for election must also be members of the Labour Party.
Most of the party’s income is from grants made by the retail co-operative societies, and from the fee charged for managing the political affairs of Co-operatives UK, formerly known as the Co-operative Union. Local parties are not based on constituencies, but around a major local retail society, which gives most of the money a local Party Council has. The Party council organises local branches to organise local activity and liaise with Constituency Labour Parties. Some Parties exist without Society support, known as voluntary parties.
At first the Co-operative Party was mostly concerned with the trading and commercial problems of the co-op movement. Since the 1930s it has become a more mainstream political, but it still wants better recognition and protection for co-operative business, the social economy, and to advance support for co-operatives and co-operation across Europe and the developing world. The party also stands for a sustainable economy and society.
In 2005 there were 29 MPs in the Co-operative Parliamentary Group, who are also members of the Parliamentary Labour Party in the British House of Commons, 8 Members of the Scottish Parliament, 4 Members of the Welsh Assembly and 11 Members of the House of Lords, as well as over 700 local councillors. There is also an informal Co-operative Party group in the European Parliament.
The election agreement between the Co-operative and Labour Parties means that 30 candidates can stand as "Labour Co-operative" candidates, and get money for election expenses from the Co-operative Party. There are many other Labour MPs who are Co-operative Party members but are not sponsored. One of these was Gareth Thomas MP, chair of the Co-operative Party since 2001 and of the Co-operative Congress in 2003, who was invited to join the parliamentary group in 2003. The Party has not registered a logo with the electoral commission for use on ballot papers, as candidates use the Labour Party "Rose" logo. Under UK law a party and a logo must be registered if either are to be used on a ballot paper in an election
The Party holds an annual conference. The 2006 conference was held in Sheffield in September 2006.
The current General Secretary is Peter Hunt..
Joint Parliamentary Committee.
The "Joint Parliamentary Committee" was set up in 1881 by The Co-operative Union. It was not set up to get MPs elected, but to watch over what was happening in parliament, and to lobby sympathetic MPs. The Co-operative Union Annual Congress tried to get a regular party set up but the retail societies would not give any money.
The Great War.
At the start of the war, the many retail societies in the Co-op movement grew, partly because they were very public about "anti-profiteering". Making a large profit in war time was seen as not being patriotic or helping the country. When conscription (men were ordered into the army) was started and food and fuel supplies restricted, the co-op societies began to suffer. The co-ops were started by ordinary workers, but the government distribution committees and draft tribunals were usually run by members of the upper classes and gentry. Co-ops smaller amounts of food to sell, and coop managers were often drafted, whereas business opponents were able to have even clerks declared vital for the war effort. Co-op Societies were also made to pay "excess profits tax" even though as co-operatives they made no profits.
The 1917 Congress in Swansea decided to set up a Co-operative Party, the decision was passed by 1979 votes to 201.
Central Co-operative Parliamentary Representation Committee.
An Emergency Political Conference was held on 18 October 1917. As a result the "Central Co-operative Parliamentary Representation Committee" was formed in 1917, with the objective of putting co-operators into the House of Commons. This was soon re-named the Co-operative Party.
At first the party put forward its own candidates. The first was H J May, later Secretary of the International Co-operative Alliance. He was unsuccessful at the 1918 Prestwich by-election.
Ten people stood in the 1918 general election. One candidate was elected: Alfred Waterson who became a Member of Parliament for the Kettering seat. Waterson took the Labour whip in Parliament. In 1919, 151 Co-operative Party local councillors. Waterson retired from Parliament in 1922, but four new Co-operative MPs were elected that same year, including A.V. Alexander. All of them took the Labour whip. Six were elected in 1923 and five in 1924.
However, since the 1927 Cheltenham Agreement, the party has had an electoral agreement with the Labour Party, which allows for a limited number of "Labour Co-operative" candidates. This means that the parties do not waste resources by opposing each other. The agreement has been changed several times, most recently in 2003. The 2003 agreement was the first between the Labour Party and the Co-operative Party, instead of the Co-operative Societies. After the first formal agreement, nine Labour Co-op MPs were elected at the 1929 general election, and Alexander was made a cabinet minister. However, only one was returned at the 1931 election against the backdrop of a massive defeat for Labour.
The rise of the sister party.
The Labour party recovered from the bad election of 1931 and was in government during World War II. This helped the Co-operative Party through the formal election links.. In 1945, 23 Labour Co-op MPs were elected and two had high office in the Labour government - Alexander and Alfred Barnes, who had been chair of the Party.
After the war the co-operative movement declined and so did the influence of the Party. By 1983 only eight Labour Co-op MPs were elected. However, in 1997, all 23 candidates won seats in Parliament and, in 2001, only one was defeated, Faye Tinnion who had stood against the Leader of the Conservative Party, William Hague. Gordon Brown is very interested in the co-operative principles of self-help, and this support allowed the co-operative movement to make representations, and sponsor important bills on updating company law, employee share ownership and micro-generation of energy.
Noted co-op politicians.
See and List of Labour Co-operative Members of Parliament for wider lists.
Nicholas Russell, the 6th Earl Russell (and grandson of the philosopher, 3rd Earl Bertrand Russell) is a strong supporter of the Co-operative Party and secretary of its Waltham Forest branch; he is vocal in his call for the abolition of the House of Lords.

Die Linke
Die Linke or "The Left" is a political party in Germany. It was formed on June 16 2007, when The Left Party.PDS joined with WASG to form a unified party.

Massoud Barzani
Massoud Barzani (born 16 August, 1946) is the first president of Iraqi Kurdistan.

Nechervan Idris Barzani
Nechervan Idris Barzani (Kurdish:نێچیرڤان بارزانی, Nêçîrvan Îdrîs Barzanî) (born September 21, 1966) has been the Prime Minister of Iraqi Kurdistan since March 2006.

Fatah
Fatah is a Palestinian nationalist political party. Fatah is an acronym for Harakat At-Tahriri Al-Filistiniya. That means Palestinian National Liberation Movement in English. It was created by Yasser Arafat in the late 1950s. In 1968 Fatah joined the Palestinian Liberation Organization, and in 1969 it got a leadership role. When it was founded, it did not accept the existence of Israel, but now the group officially does. The political part of the party is not considered a terrorist group by any country, but its military part, the al-Aqsa Martyrs Brigades is considered a terrorist group. Fatah says that the Brigades are not a part of the party but Israel says that Fatah supports the al-Aqsa Martyrs Brigades.
Fatah and the Al-Aqsa Martyrs' Brigades.
Leaders of the brigades, and other members have said they are a military group that is a part of Fatah. On their website, and on posters they post the Fatah Emblem. Leaders of Fatah have said they didn't create the brigades, or make them the military of Fatah. Since 2002 leaders in Fatah have tried to get the brigades to stop attacking Israeli citizens.

Diego Velázquez de Cuéllar
Diego Velázquez de Cuéllar (1465 - 1524) was a Spanish soldier and colonial administrator (a "Conquistador").He conquered and governed Cuba for Spain. He is often called "Diego de Velázquez" by Dominican historians (that is the name used in the).
He was born in Cuéllar, near Segovia, Spain. He came to America in the second voyage of Christopher Columbus in 1493. He spent 17 years in the Hispaniola, living most of the time in the southwestern region of the island.
He worked together with the Spanish governor Nicolás de Ovando in the fight against the Taíno Indians of the region. He founded and governed several towns: Azua de Compostela (1504), San Juan de la Maguana (1503), Bánica (1504), Salvatierra de la Sabana (1504, now Les Cayes, Haiti), Santa María de la Verapaz (near the present Port-au-Prince, Haiti), Villanueva de Yáquimo (now Jacmel, Haiti).
In 1511, he left from Salvatierra de la Sabana with 300 men and three or four ships to the island of Cuba to conquer that island. He was the first governor of the island and he founded several cities, Nuestra Señora de la Asunción de Baracoa (the first European city in Cuba and its first capital) in 1511, San Salvador del Bayamo (1513), Santiago de Cuba in 1514 and Havana in 1515.
In 1517 he sent Juan de Grijalva to explore the coast of Mexico and in 1518 he sent Francisco Hernández de Córdoba to explore the coast of Yucatán. Then in 1519 he sent his secretary, Hernán Cortés, to conquer Mexico with about 450 soldiers but when Cortés got to México (in Veracruz), he broke all relations with Velázquez.
Diego Velázquez de Cuéllar died in Santiago de Cuba in 1524.

Seattle Seahawks
The Seattle Seahawks are a professional American football team from Seattle, Washington. They started playing football in 1976. They are currently members of the Western Division of the National Football Conference (NFC) in the National Football League (NFL). The Seahawks played football in the SuperBowl in 2005, but were defeated by the Pittsburgh Steelers. The Quarterback (player who either throws the ball or gives it to a runner) for the Seahawks is Matt Hasselbeck.

Communist Party of China
The Communist Party of China (spelled as 中国共产党 in Chinese, also called the CPC) is the dominant political party and founder of the People's Republic of China. The leader of the CPC is named Hu Jintao

Kevin Rudd
Kevin Rudd (born 21 September 1957) is the 26th Prime Minister of Australia. He is the leader of the federal Australian Labor party. He won the federal 2007 election and is now Australia's 26th prime minister.
Before he was elected to Parliament, Rudd was a diplomat and a government worker. Rudd won a seat in Parliament in 1998. The Australian Labor party elected him the Leader of the Opposition in December 2006. He won the 2007 federal election because of work agreements and global warming. As Prime Minister he has already signed the Kyoto Protocol and will take Australian troops out of the Iraq conflict.

Miami Heat
The Miami Heat (also known as just HEAT) are a team in the National Basketball Association in Miami, Florida. It was started in 1988. They won the 2006 NBA Finals. Dwyane Wade is their current star player.

Destiny Fulfilled
"Destiny Fulfilled" is the fourth studio album by the American R&B trio Destiny's Child. The album features the top five singles "Lose My Breath" and "Soldier" along with the top twenty single "Cater 2 U" and top thirty single "Girl".
"Destiny Fulfilled" debuted prematurely at number-nineteen on the Billboard 200 selling 61,000 copies a week before its official release. During its first official week of sales the album sold over 497,000 (558,000) copies and rocketed to number two on the pop charts behind Eminem's "Encore" and number one on the Top R&B/Hip-Hop Albums chart (for two weeks). The album sold over 337,000 copies in its second week (number four), 164,000 in its third (number nine) and 214,000 in its fourth (number seven). "Destiny Fulfilled" was certified Triple platinum by the RIAA after only eight weeks on the chart in January, 2005. It spent nine weeks in the top ten and fifty weeks on the Billboard 200 and has sold 2.7 million copies in the US according to Nielsen SoundScan. The album has sold 6 million copies worldwide, to date.

Mohammed Zahir Shah
Mohammed Zahir Shah (16 October 1914 – 23 July 2007) was the last King ("Shah") of Afghanistan, reigning for four decades, from 1933 to 1973.
Mohammed Zahir Shah became king of Afghanistan at the age of nineteen after the assassination of his father in November 1933. Since he was so young, his uncle, "Shah Mahmood Khan" ran the government. Mohammed Zahir Shah took control and was able to maintain Afghanistan’s neutral position in international politics.
In July 17, 1973, Mohammed Zahir Shah was no longer king after a bloodless coup. He died on

Dennis Kucinich
Dennis John Kucinich (born October 8, 1946) is a United States Representative from Ohio. He is a hopeful for President of the United States in 2008. He is a Democrat.

Bill Richardson
William Blaine "Bill" Richardson III (born November 15, 1947) is the Governor of the United States state of New Mexico. He was a candidate for President of the United States in the 2008 election. He is a Democrat.

Mike Huckabee
Michael Dale "Mike" Huckabee (born August 24 1955) is a former governor of the U.S. state of Arkansas. He was governor from 1996 to 2007. He is a Republican. He is also a Southern Baptist minister. He wanted to be President of the United States in the 2008 election, but did not get picked by his party.

Rudy Giuliani
Rudolph William Louis "Rudy" Giuliani (born May 28, 1944) is a politician from New York in the United States. He is a Republican and campaigned to become President of the United States in 2008. Giuliani was mayor of New York City from January 1, 1994 to December 31, 2001. Giuliani became more well known during and after the September 11, 2001 attacks on the World Trade Center. In 2001, "Time" magazine named him "Person of the Year" and he received an honorary knighthood from Queen Elizabeth II in 2002.
Rudy was campaigning in 1993 with the show Seinfeld where he appeared as the NYC Mayor candidate as the "over count" cholesterol man by eating too much yogurt. This "product placement" of Mayor Giuliani is often referred to as an excellent example of electioneering and boosted his popularity accordingly.

Minutes to Midnight
"Minutes to Midnight" is third studio album by American nu metal band, Linkin Park. It was released on May 14, 2007 all over the world and on May 15, 2007 in North America. Rick Rubin and Mike Shinoda produced the album.
The name "Minutes to Midnight" comes from the Doomsday Clock.

Oskar Lafontaine
Oskar Lafontaine (; born September 16, 1943 in Saarlouis-Roden) is a left-wing German politician and a founder member of the new political party "Die Linke".
Education and family.
Lafontaine studied physics at the Bonn University and the Saarland University from 1962 to 1969.
He is Roman Catholic and is married to Christa Müller who leads a campaign against genital mutiliation in Africa. They have a son, Carl Maurice, born 1997.
Political rise.
Lafontaine's political career began locally as mayor of Saarbrücken. He became widely known as a critic of chancellor Helmut Schmidt's support for the NATO plan to put Pershing II missiles in Germany. From 1985 to 1998 he was minister-president of the Saarland. As minister-president, Lafontaine tried to keep the traditional industries of steel production and coal mining in the state with subsidies. He was also President of the Bundesrat in 1992/93.
Chancellor candidacy.
In the German federal election of 1990, Lafonntaine was the SPD's Chancellor candidate. The party lost because of support for the CDU who were the government during reunification. During the campaign he was attacked with a knife by a mentally deranged woman after a speech in Cologne. His carotid artery was slashed and he remained in a critical condition for several days.
Political comeback.
At the "Mannheim convention" in 1995, Lafontaine was elected chairman of the SPD, replacing Rudolf Scharping. He was mainly responsible for bringing the whole of the SPD against Helmut Kohl and his CDU party, instead of cooperating with the CDU. Lafontaine said that any help given to Kohl would only help to keep the CDU in government.
This idea put the SPD ahead in the opinion polls in September 1998. He was appointed Federal Minister of Finance in the first government of Gerhard Schröder.
Minister of Finance.
During his short time as Minister of Finance, Lafontaine was a figure of attack by UK Eurosceptics. This was especially because he wanted to make taxes the same in the European Union. This would have meant some UK taxes would increase.
On March 11, 1999, he resigned from all his official and party offices, saying that not getting any help from other members of the cabinet. Later he become known for his attacks against Angela Merkel's government in the tabloid Bild-Zeitung which is generally considered conservative.
The Left Party.
On May 24, 2005 Lafontaine left the SPD. On June 10, he said he would run as the lead candidate for the The Left Party.PDS (Die Linkspartei), a coalition of the Electoral Alternative for Labour and Social Justice (WASG), which is based in western Germany, and the Party of Democratic Socialism (PDS), which was the successor to the East German communist party
He joined the WASG on June 18, 2005 and was selected to head their list for the 2005 Federal Election in North Rhine-Westphalia on the same day. He also stood in the Saarbrücken constituency, but lost. Nevertheless, the result of the Linkspartei in the Saarland was the best in any of the federal states in the West of Germany.
Criticisms of Lafontaine.
An article by Lafontaine on Erich Honecker, state and party leader of the GDR and a Saarländer like him, in the magazine Der Spiegel was criticized by many people who said it concentrated on a few good things Honecker did, and ignored the bad things. In the late 80s and early 90s he lost some support from left-wing people because he seemed to want pro-business policies and he called for a reduction of the influx of Germans from Eastern Europe and asylum-seekers.
Books.
Oskar LaFontaine: "The Heart Beats on the Left" Polity, ISBN 0745625827

Karl Dönitz
Karl Dönitz () (September 16, 1891 – December 24, 1980) was a German naval leader. He commanded the German Navy ("Kriegsmarine") during the second half of World War II. Dönitz was also President of Germany for 23 days after Adolf Hitler's suicide. For his role in World War II, Dönitz was referred to as "der Löwe" (the Lion).
Dönitz was born in the Berlin. He entered the Imperial German Navy ("Kaiserliche Marine") in 1911. During World War I, he served on surface ships. Later he was transferred to submarines (U-boats). He remained in the navy after the war and rose through the ranks of the German Navy of the Weimar Republic ("Reichsmarine") and the German Navy of the Third Reich ("Kriegsmarine"). He became a "Großadmiral". He served as Commander of Submarines ("Befehlshaber der Unterseeboote", "B.d.U."). Later, he became Commander-in-Chief of the German Navy ("Oberbefehlshaber der Kriegsmarine"). He got this position, even though he never joined the Nazi Party. Under his command, the U-boat fleet fought the Battle of the Atlantic. He also served as "Reichspräsident" for 23 days after Adolf Hitler's suicide. He ended the war as a prisoner-of-war of the British.
After the war Dönitz was charged and convicted of "crimes against peace" and "war crimes" at the Nuremberg Trials. He served ten years in prison. He ordered the unrestricted submarine warfare which was done by Germany in the North Atlantic. With this, he caused Germany to be in breach of the Second London Naval Treaty of 1936.
At his trial, evidence was show that the Allies had acted similarly. For this reason, this breach of international law had no impact on his sentence. After his release from prison, Dönitz moved to Aumühle, a small village near Hamburg. During his later years, he wrote two autobiographies. In them, he covered different periods in his life. He died of a heart attack on Christmas Eve, 1980.

François Arago
François Jean Dominique Arago (Catalan: Francesc Joan Dominic Aragó; February 26, 1786 – October 2, 1853) was a French mathematician, physicist, astronomer and politician.

Aaron Burr
Aaron Burr, Jr. (February 6, 1756, – September 14, 1836) was an American politician, Revolutionary War hero and adventurer. He was the third Vice President of the United States (1801 – 1805).
Burr fought in the American Revolutionary War, reaching the rank of Colonel.
Burr served in the New York State Assembly, as New York State Attorney General, and as a United States Senator before serving as Vice President.
Burr killed Alexander Hamilton in a duel in 1804, when Burr was still Vice President.
Burr conspired to form a new country in the southwest territories. He wanted to create a war with Spain to achieve that goal. Some people, including President Thomas Jefferson, who had picked a different Vice President for his second term, saw Burr's actions as treason. However, Burr was found innocent of the charges.

George Clinton (vice president)
George Clinton (July 26, 1739 – April 20, 1812) was an American soldier and politician. He was the first (and longest-serving) Governor of New York, and then Vice President of the United States under Thomas Jefferson and James Madison.
Clinton was born in the state of New York. Clinton fought with the British in the French and Indian War.
Clinton was a member of the Continental Congress and voted for the Declaration of Independence. He was a friend of George Washington and served with and supplied the Continental Army.
Clinton was a member of the Democratic-Republican Party. Clinton was vice president under two different presidents. He is one out of two vice presidents who did this; John C. Calhoun served under two presidents as well. He was also a candidate for president in the 1808 election and did receive six electoral votes.

Spice (album)
Spice was the first album by the Spice Girls. It was released in the United Kingdom in 1996, and in the United States in 1997. It was the most successful album by a girl group ever. It sold 23 million copies around the world.
There were 5 songs that were very successful from this album. The most successful was "Wannabe," which went to #1 on many music charts around the world.

Charles XII of Sweden
Charles XII (Swedish: Karl XII) was the king of Sweden from 1697 to 1718. He was born on June 27, 1682.
During his time as a king, he tried to expand Swedens empire. He took part in the Nordic War (1700-1721), in which his enemies were Denmark, Poland and Russia. England and the Netherlands supported him his armies won over the Danes during sea battle.He also won over Peter I Russian Tsar.
After these successes, he attacked Poland, where during this time Augustus II the Strong was the king. This war was closed by the peace of Altranstadt.
Charles attacked Russia once again in 1707, where he allied with the Ukrainian leader, hetman Mazeppa. After more than a 1000 km long walk in 1709, the Swedish king suffered a defeat from the Russian Tsar so he had to flee to Turkey. He could only return to Sweden in 1714. He tried to compensate the lost territories by a war against Norway, but during the battle he suffered a lethal wound. The wars of Charles XII made Sweden weaker and the land lost a lot of prestige.

Meteora (album)
"Meteora" is the second studio album by Linkin Park. It was released on March 25, 2003. The album has sold 5.5 million copies in the USA and over 15 million worldwide also.

Elbridge Gerry
Elbridge Thomas Gerry (July 17, 1744 – November 23, 1814) was an American politician from Massachusetts. As a Democratic-Republican he was elected the fifth Vice President of the United States, serving under James Madison, from March 4, 1813, until his death a year and a half later.
Gerry was a member of the Continental Congress and was a signer of both the Declaration of Independence and the Articles of Confederation.
He was a delegate to the United States Constitutional Convention in 1787 but did not sign it.
Gerry was elected to the House of Representatives and served there from 1789 to 1793.
Gerry was elected Governor of Massachusetts in 1810 and served for two years. While serving as governor, Gerry supported a plan that would re-create voting districts in Massachusetts to give more power to the political party that he belonged to. The word gerrymander used today when a party tries to create more favourable voting districts was named for Elbridge Gerry.
Gerry was Vice President under James Madison and died in office on November 23, 1814.

Social Democrat Hunchakian Party
The Social Democrat Hunchakian Party (SDHP) (), also known as Hentchak is one of the oldest political parties in Armenia and the first Socialist party in the Ottoman Empire and in Persia in the 1880s. It was founded in 1887 by Avetis Nazarbekian, Mariam Vardanian, Ruben Khan-Azat and others, who studied in Geneva, Switzerland, with the goal to gain Armenia's independence from the Ottoman Empire, which is part of Armenian national liberation movement. Its name, taken from its newspaper "Hunchak," means "Bell" in English, and is taken by party members to represent "awakening, enlightenment, and freedom."
History.
All of the 7 founders of Hunchakian party were Russian-Armenian Marxist students who had left Russia to continue their higher education in universities of Western Europe. They were young persons, in their twenties, and were from well‑to‑do bourgeois families who were financially supporting them. For the purpose of furthering revolutionary activity in Turkish Armenia, they formed the Hunchakian Revolutionary Party in August, 1887.
Hunchak party fought many battles against the Ottoman Empire, to free the Armenian people from Turkish rule. One of Armenia's famous national heroes Andranik Ozanian, at first, joined the Hunchak party, but disagreement with party policies led Andranik to leave the Hunchak ranks and join the Dashnak party.
Democratic Republic of Armenia.
The party also played role in establishment of Democratic Republic of Armenia, as party members took part in the Battle of Sardarapat, during the World War I at Caucasus Campaign, which defended the Armenian capital of Yerevan from Army of Islam of Ottoman Empire.
Activities in Lebanon.
In the 1950s, it clashed, sometimes violently, with the Dashnak Party, due to tensions that escalated when the ARF elected Bishop Zareh as Catholicos of Cilicia, a move that was rejected by the Hunchaks. In the midst of increasing sectarian strife in the late 1960s and early 1970s, however, Lebanon's Armenian community began to close ranks, and in 1972, the Hunchakian Party ran a joint ticket with the Dashnaks. In 2000, the Hunchakian Party joined forces with Rafik Hariri's Dignity party, which swept the city of Beirut.
Modern.
In the early 1990s, the party took part in the Nagorno Karabakh conflict. The party today forms part of the opposition "Justice" bloc.
This party is also active in Lebanon, where it competes for the six National Assembly seats reserved for ethnic Armenians. The party subscribes to a socialist ideology and advocates a planned economy for Lebanon.
Affiliate organizations.
The Hunchakian party has established affiliate organizations such as the AEBU which is an organization that helps with educational, health and social care, the Armenian Dkhrouhi Youth Association and HMM (Homenmen) which is a sporting organization (not to be confused with Homenetmen).

Saint Louis IX of France
Saint Louis IX (25 April 1214 – 25 August 1270), also called Saint Louis, was King of France from 1226 to his death. He established the Parlement of Paris. Louis died on 25 August 1270 and was canonised (made a saint) in 1297 by Pope Boniface VIII.
Source.
Jean de Joinville was a close friend of Louis and wrote a famous biography of the king, from which we have most of our information about him.
Other sources.
Two other important biographies were written by the king's confessor, Geoffrey of Beaulieu, and his chaplain, William of Chartres. While several other people wrote biographies about the king, only Jean de Joinville, Geoffrey of Beaulieu, and William of Chartres had reliable information.
Early life.
Louis was born in 1214 at Poissy, near Paris
Family.
He was the son of Louis VIII of France and Blanche of Castile. Louis was eleven years old when his father died on November 8, 1226. He was crowned king the same year in the cathedral at Reims. Because Louis was so young, his mother ruled France as regent while he was a child.
His younger brother Charles I of Sicily (1227 – 85) was made count of Anjou.
On May 27, 1234 Louis married Marguerite of Provence (1221 – December 21, 1295), whose sister Eleanor was the wife of Henry III of England.
Crusading.
At the age of 15, Louis brought an end to the Albigensian Crusade in 1229 after signing an agreement with Count Raymond VII of Toulouse.
Louis's kindness towards the poor was much celebrated. He went on crusade twice, in his mid-30s in 1248 and then again in his mid-50s in 1270. Both crusades were complete disasters; after initial success in his first attempt, Louis's army of 15,000 men was met by overwhelming resistance from the Egyptian army and people where he was captured. After his release from Egypt, Louis spent four years in the crusader Kingdoms of Acre, Caesarea, and Jaffe.
Alliances.
In 1252, Louis attempted an alliance with the Egyptians, for the return of Jerusalem if the French assisted with the subduing of Damascus.
In 1253, Louis tried to seek allies from the Ismailian Assassins and the Mongols.
Religion.
Louis was Catholic, and he built the "Sainte Chapelle" ("Holy Chapel") on the "Île de la Cité" in the centre of Paris. It is thought that the French monarchy was trying to establish the kingdom of France as the "new Jerusalem."
Louis IX tried to make France, which was seen as being a very religious place, a protector of the Church. It worked, and between the 12th and 13th centuries, France and the pope were very close.
Death.
During his second crusade, Louis died at Tunis, August 25, 1270, and his son, Philip III, replaced him as king. He may have died either of bubonic plague or dysentry.
His body was taken to the French royal necropolis at Saint-Denis in Lyon.
Places named after Saint Louis.
The cities of San Luis Potosí in Mexico, Saint Louis, Missouri, Saint-Louis du Sénégal in Senegal, Saint-Louis in Alsace, Lake Saint-Louis in Quebec, and the Mission San Luis Rey de Francia in California.
Many places in Brazil are called São Luís in Portuguese are named after Saint Louis.

Karl Carstens
Karl Carstens (December 14, 1914 - May 29, 1992) was a German politician. He served as the fifth Federal President of West Germany.
Biography.
Born in Bremen, Carstens studied law and political science at the universities of Frankfurt am Main, Dijon, Munich, Königsberg, and Hamburg from 1933 to 1936. In 1949 he received a Master of Laws (LL.M.) degree from Yale Law School.
Carstens joined the Nazi Party in 1940. This was when he was a law clerk. He said he had to join the oarty or he would not be treated fairly. But this does not explaijn why Carstens had joined the SA, another Nazi party group, in 1933.
In 1955 he joined the CDU.
In July 1960 Carstens started to work for the government. He was a secretary of state in the Ministry of Foreign Affairs. In the same year he was also appointed as professor for public and international law at Cologne University. During the Grand coalition government (1966-1969), he was in the Ministry of Defence, and in 1968 he became Director of the Chancellor's Office.
In 1972 Carstens was elected into the Bundestag. He stayed a member until 1979. He often spoke against the left-wing ideas in German society and accused the governing SPD of being to soft on left-wing extremists. He also famously denounced the author Heinrich Böll as a supporter of the Baader-Meinhof Gang.
On 14 December 1976, the CDU/CSU became the largest group in parliament, and Carstens was elected president of the Bundestag.
On May 23, 1979 Carstens was elected as President of the Federal Republic of Germany. Carstens wass well known for hiking around Germany during his term in order to decrease the gulf between politics and the people.
In December 1982, the recently elected Chancellor Helmut Kohl deliberately lost a motion of confidence in order to hold new general elections. On January 7 1983, President Carstens dissolved the Bundestag and called for new elections. In February 1983 the Federal Constitutional Court said that deliberately losing the vote was allowed, so the general elections could take place.
In 1984 he decided not to seek a second term on account of his age and left office on 30 June, 1984.

Norbert Lammert
Dr. Norbert Lammert (born November 16, 1948 in Bochum) is a German politician, and a member of the CDU party.
After military service Lammert studied political science, sociology, modern history and social economics at the university of Bochum and the University of Oxford (England) from 1969 to 1975. He graduated in 1972 but carried on studying to get a doctorate in social sciences in 1975.
Although he has worked as a lecturer, Lammert became a member of the Bochum City Council in 1975. He was elected to the Bundestag in 1980, and has been a member ever since.
Dr Lammert was a Vice-President of the Bundestag from October 2002 to 18 October 2005, when he became President.
In 2005, he was elected the President of the Bundestag, the German parliament. Even though the President of the Bundesrat acts as deputy for the Federal President, according to the German order of precedence, Dr Lammert, as President of the Bundestag, is Germany's highest ranking official after President Horst Köhler.
Literature.
Michael F. Feldkamp (ed.), "Der Bundestagspräsident. Amt - Funktion - Person." 16. Wahlperiode, München 2007, ISBN 978-3-7892-8201-0

François Fillon
Francois Fillon, born 4 March 1954 in Le Mans, France is the current Prime Minister of France. He was given the job in May 2007.

Erich Honecker
Erich Honecker (25 August 1912 – 29 May 1994) was an East German Communist politician who led the German Democratic Republic from 1971 until 1989.
After German re-unification, he went to the Soviet Union but was sent back by the new Russian government to Germany, where he was imprisoned and tried for high treason and crimes committed during the Cold War. However, as he was dying of cancer, he was released from prison. He died in exile in Chile about a year and a half later.
Origins and early political career.
Honecker was born in Neunkirchen, now Saarland. He had two brothers and three sisters.
He joined the Young Communist League of Germany (KJVD), the youth section of the Communist Party of Germany (KPD), in 1926 and joined the KPD itself in 1929. Between 1928 and 1930 he worked as a roofer, but did not finish his apprenticeship. Thereafter he was sent to Moscow to study at the International Lenin School and for the rest of his life remained a full-time politician.
He returned to Germany in 1931 and was arrested in 1935 after the Nazis had come to power ("Machtübernahme"). In 1937, he was sentenced to ten years for Communist activities and remained in captivity until the end of World War II. At the end of the war, Honecker started working for the communist party again under leader Walter Ulbricht. In 1946, he became one of the first members of the new Socialist Unity Party of Germany ("Sozialistische Einheitspartei Deutschlands", SED), made up of the old KPD and the Social Democrats of eastern Germany.
He was a member of the parliament in the Soviet Occupied Zone after the elections of October 1946. The German Democratic Republic was created on October 7, 1949. Its constitution set up a system of government like the Soviet Union's. In 1950 Honecker became a candidate member of the secretariat of the Central Committee in 1950 and full member in 1958.
Leadership of East Germany.
In 1961, Honecker was in charge of the building of the Berlin Wall. In 1971, he started a political power struggle. The Soviet's supported him, so Hoinecker became the new leader, or "General Secretary", of the Socialist Unity Party, replacing Walter Ulbricht. In 1976, he also became Chairman of the Council of State ("Staatsratsvorsitzender").
Under Honecker there was a big improvement in living standards, even though the GDR had the highest standard of living in the Eastern bloc countries. More consumer goods were made availabile and new house-building was speeded up
Although Honecker was more caring to the people about goods and housing he did not allow criticism of the government. The most obvious way this was showed was the Berlin Wall. About 125 East German citizens were killed during this period while trying to cross the border into West Berlin.
In foreign relations, Honecker would never allow a unified Germany. He was very loyal to the USSR, but accepted détente (that is, becoming friendlier to western countries). Under his government East Germany even became friendlier to West Germany. In September 1987, he became the first East German head of state to visit West Germany.
In the late 1980s Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev introduced glasnost and perestroika, reforms to liberalize communism. Honecker and the East German government, however, refused to implement similar reforms in the DDR. As the reform movement spread across Central and Eastern Europe there were demonstrations against the East German government. The biggest were the 1989 Monday demonstrations in the city of Leipzig. The other leaders of the DDR decided to get rid of Honecker, and forced him to resign on October 18, 1989. Egon Krenz took over instead.
Post-1989.
After the German reunification Honecker stayed in a Soviet military hospital near Berlin. Then he fled to Moscow with his wife, to avoid prosecution over charges of Cold War crimes. The German government said he should be prosecuted because 192 East Germans died trying to leave East Germany. After the Soviet Union broke up in December 1991, Honecker went to the Chilean embassy in Moscow, but was sent back by Boris Yeltsin's government in 1992. The trial started in early 1993, but Honecker was released due to ill health and on 13 January of that year moved to Chile to live with his daughter Sonja, her Chilean husband Leo Yáñez, and their son Roberto. He died in exile of liver cancer in Santiago on 29 May 1994.
Personal.
Honecker married Edith Baumann in 1950 and divorced her in 1953. They had a daughter, Erika (b. 1950). In 1953 he married Margot Feist and they remained married until his death. They had a daughter, Sonja, born in 1952. Margot Honecker was the Minister for National Education in East Germany.
Literature.
Honecker's autobiography "Aus meinem Leben" is translated into English as "From my life".
New York: Pergamon, 1981. ISBN 0080245323

Oakland Raiders
The Oakland Raiders are a professional American football team in the National Football League. They are located in Oakland, California and play at McAfee Coliseum. They were created in 1960 as a new American Football League team. They play in the Western Division of the American Football Conference. Division rivals are Denver Broncos, Kansas City Chiefs, and San Diego Chargers.
American Football League years (1960-1969).
Few moths after AFL's first draft in 1959, owners of the Minneapolis new team (later known as the Minnesota Vikings) accepted the invitation to join the established National Football League. Needed a replacement, the AFL tried to find one quickly. Oakland was a unlikely city to have a professional American football team. The AFL owners selected Oakland after Los Angeles Chargers owner Barron Hilton threatened to lose his team unless a second team was placed on the West Coast. So, the city of Oakland was awarded the eighth AFL team on January 30, 1960, and the team took over the Minneapolis club's draft picks. In the early years, the Raiders struggled. When Al Davis came in as head coach and general manager, the Raiders improved. Davis hired John Rauch and went to the their first AFL Championship against the Houston Oilers and won it 40-7. After winning their first AFL championship they earned a shot at Super Bowl II and lost to Green Bay Packers 33-14. The next two years, the Raiders again won Western Division titles, only to lose the AFL Championship to the eventual Super Bowl winners—the New York Jets (1968) and Kansas City Chiefs (1969).
National Football League years (1970-present).
After the 1969 season, the AFL decided to merge with the NFL. The Raiders join the American Football Conference as a Western Division member. John Madden was hired as head coach. Madden took the Raiders to their first Super Bowl win against Minnesota Vikings 32-14 in Super Bowl XI. Later, Madden left for a commentary career. The Raiders hire Tom Flores, the first Hispanic head coach in NFL history. Flores took the Raiders for their second Super Bowl win against Philadelphia Eagles 27 10 in Super Bowl XV. The Raiders became the first wild card team to win a Super Bowl.
Los Angeles Raiders (1982-1995).
Al Davis signed a note to make the Raiders move to Los Angeles. The Raiders won their third Super Bowl against the Washington Redskins.
Oakland Raiders (1995-present).
The Raiders move back to Oakland. Currently, the Raiders have struggle since 2003 season.
Season-by-season records.
"Note: W = Wins, L = Losses, T = Ties"
+ = Due to a strike-shortened season in 1982, all teams were ranked by conference instead of division.

Daniel D. Tompkins
Daniel D. Tompkins (June 21, 1774 – June 11, 1825) was an entrepreneur, jurist, Congressman, Governor of New York, and the sixth Vice President of the United States.

David Ben-Gurion
David Ben-Gurion, born David Grün on 16 October 1886, died 1 December 1973) was the first Prime Minister of Israel. After leading Israel to victory in the 1948 Arab-Israeli War, Ben-Gurion helped build the state institutions. He retired from political life in 1970 and moved to Sde Boker, where he lived until his death.
After he died, Ben-Gurion was named one of "Time Magazine's" 100 Most Important People of the Century.

Julius Streicher
He published "Der Stürmer" newspaper, became a part of the Nazi propaganda machine. His publishing firm released three anti-Semitic books for children, including the 1938 "Der Giftpilz" ("The Poison Mushroom"), one of the most widespread pieces of propaganda. The book said that Jews were dangerous, just like an attractive yet deadly mushroom. After the war, he was convicted at the Nuremberg Trials of crimes against humanity and executed.
Early life.
Streicher was born in Fleinhausen, Bavaria. He was an elementary school teacher until joining the German Army in 1914. Streicher won the Iron Cross and was a lieutenant by the time the Armistice was signed in 1918. In 1913 Streicher married Kunigunde Roth, a baker's daughter, in Nürnberg. They had two sons, Lothar (born 1915) and Elmar (born 1918).
National Socialism.
In 1919 Streicher was active in the "Schutz- und Trutz-Bund", an anti-Semitic organization. In 1920 he turned to the newly formed German Socialist Party ("Deutschsozialistische Partei"). This party had nearly the same ideas as the Nazi Party. Streicher wanted to make it more anti-Semitic. Most members of the German Socialist Party did not want this, so Streicher and his followers moved to the "German Working Community" () in 1921. This community wanted to unite the various anti-Semitic movements. In 1922, Streicher joined his followers with those of Adolf Hitler, almost doubling the membership of the Nazi Party, and earning Hitler's lifelong gratitude. Streicher took part in the Munich Beer Hall Putsch in 1923. Later he had the privilege of marching at the front of the annual reenactment of the putsch after the Nazi takeover of power in 1933.
In 1923 Streicher founded the racist newspaper, "Der Stürmer". He was also the editor. Streicher used the newspaper to stir up a deep hatred of everything and everyone Jewish. Eventually the newspaper reached a peak circulation of 480,000 in 1935.
Streicher argued in the newspaper that the Jews had contributed to the depression, unemployment, and inflation in Germany which afflicted the country during the 1920's. He claimed that Jews were white-slavers and were responsible for over 90 percent of the prostitutes in the country.
After the refounding of the Nazi party, Streicher became Gauleiter (district leader) of Franconia. After 1933, he practically ruled the city of Nuremberg and was nicknamed "King of Nuremberg" and the "Beast of Franconia." In 1940, he was stripped of all party offices after being involved in major financial scandals involving Jewish property seized after the anti-Semitic outburst of Kristallnacht in November 1938, and also for spreading untrue stories about Hermann Göring, several attacks on other Gauleiters and unconcealed adultery. Streicher, however, remained on good terms with German dictator Adolf Hitler until the latter committed suicide on April 30, 1945. On May 23, two weeks after Germany's surrender, Streicher was captured by the Americans.
Streicher's wife, Kunigunde Streicher, died in 1943 after 30 years of marriage. Streicher was married to his former secretary, Adele Tappe, just days before his arrest.
Trial and execution.
Julius Streicher was found guilty of crimes against humanity at the Nuremberg War Crimes Trial and sentenced to death on October 1, 1946.
Streicher was not a member of the military and was not part of planning the Holocaust, the invasion of Poland, or the Soviet invasion. But because he encouraged so much support for the hatred and extermination of Jews the prosecutors' decided to include him in the indictment.
His last words on October 16, 1946, were "Heil Hitler," and, "The Bolsheviks will hang you one day!". He is also reported to have cried out "Purim Fest 1946!" - i.e., Streicher thought that Jews would start a new Holiday on the date of the hanging of himself and his fellow Nazis, just as they had started Purim to mark the execution of Haman.
The hanging of Julius Streicher was not as planned. Most eyewitnesses say that he died by slow strangulation rather than by the quick death from breaking the neck. Streicher was not the only Nazi this happened to. It was because of the type of hanging used at Nuremberg. It is thought that the executioner had to intervene under the gallows to silence and finish Streicher, who was still groaning and swinging on the rope some time after the release of the trap-door

National Democratic Party of Germany
The National Democratic Party () is a right wing political party in Germany. It is usually just called the NPD.
It started after the Deutsche Reichspartei dissolved in 1964.
It is not the same as the old Hessian Nationaldemokratischen Partei. That was one of the parties which joined to form the Deutsche Reichspartei in 1949.
The German government tried to get the NPD banned in 2003, but the Bundesverfassungsgericht threw the case out when some of the leaders of the party turned out to be agents or informers of German security services, including the Bundesamt für Verfassungsschutz, the "Federal Office for the Protection of the Constitution", which still lists the NPD as a dangerous organisation because its policies are a threat to the peace and stability of Germany and the constitution. The NPD is also referred to as being Neo-Nazi, as it openly opposes Turks, blacks, gays and Jews.

Ernst Reuter
Ernst Reuter was born on July 29 1889 in the small Prussian town of Apenrade (today Aabenraa in Denmark).
After getting his abitur in 1907 at the Gymnasium in Leer (East Frisia) he went to Marburg to study philosophy and social sciences. In 1909 he moved to the university in Munich. In Munich he first came in touch with the ideas of socialism. He returned to Marburg in the autumn of 1910 and in 1912 took the state examination there.
Ernst Reuter then worked as a private tutor in Bielefeld. He joined the Social Democratic Party in Bielefeld, but soon went to the SPD party executive to Berlin where he worked in the central education committee.
Reuter did not believe in war. He founded the pacifist, group "Neues Vaterland".
In 1916 Reuter was ordered into the imperial army. He was a courier on the eastern front. He was seriously wounded and became a Russian prisoner. He studied Russian in the prison camp, followed the Bolsheviks, and was appointed People's Commissar in the Volga German Republic in December 1917.
But Reuter returned to Germany in November 1918. He joined the Communist Party (KPD) and became First Secretary of the Berlin city party in 1920. The KPD expelled him in January 1922, and later that year Reuter returned to SPD.
In 1926, after having been editor of the SPD newspaper "Vorwärts" ("Forwards"), he started working for the Berlin Transport Department. Reuter oversaw the creation of the "Berliner Verkehrs-Aktien-Gesellschaft" (BVG) in 1928. The BVG was a merger of all of the underground, tram, and bus companies in the city. At the time the BVG was the largest public transport company in the world. It still operates today, as part of the Berlin-Brandenburg Transport Group.
Reuter was mayor of Magdeburg from 1931 up to the take-over by the National Socialists; he belonged to the SPD parliamentary group in the Reichstag at the same time. After being arrested several times Ernst Reuter was freed from a concentration camp after help from English friends. He moved to live in the Netherlands, then Great Britain and Turkey. He worked as an adviser for the Turkish government in traffic matters. In 1938 he became a professor for urban development and town planning at the Administration Academy in Ankara.
Ernst Reuter returned to Berlin in November 1946 and became head of the city's traffic department again.
The Soviet veto stopped Reuter from becoming mayor in June 1947. But he played on a central role also under the acting Mayor Louise Schröder.
The elections set for December 5 1948 could only take place in the western sectors. The SPD gained almost two-thirds of the votes so they were the strongest party. On December 7 the old city council met once again and elected Ernst Reuter as mayor. This choice was confirmed by the new parliament on January 14 1949. Although the SPD lost about 20 per cent of the votes in the elections on December 3 1950, Ernst Reuter remained in the office. The vote in parliament between Reuter and the CDU candidate Walther Schreiber had ended with a stalemate. Schreiber withdrew in favour of Reuter who took the new official title of Regierender Bürgermeister, at the head an all-party coalition with the from SPD, CDU and FDP.
Ernst Reuter stayed in charge of Berlin for another two years and eight months. He died of a heart attack in Berlin on September 29 1953.

Benazir Bhutto
Benazir Bhutto (21 June 1953 - 27 December 2007) was a Pakistani politician. Bhutto was the first woman elected to lead a Muslim state. She was elected Prime Minister of Pakistan two times. She was sworn in for the first time in 1988 but removed from office 20 months later under orders of then-president Ghulam Ishaq Khan on grounds of alleged corruption. In 1993 Bhutto was re-elected but was again removed in 1996 on similar charges, this time by President Farooq Leghari.
Assassination.
On December 27, 2007, Benazir Bhutto was killed while getting into a vehicle to leave a political meeting for the Pakistan Peoples Party in Rawalpindi, Pakistan. An assassin shot her in the neck and chest before detonating an explosive vest. This killed about 30 people and wounded many others. She is called Shaheed-e-Jaumhuriat (Martyr of Democracy) by her fans.

Ray Nagin
Clarence Ray Nagin, Jr. () (born June 11, 1956) is the mayor of New Orleans. He was first elected on March 2, 2002, to succeed his fellow Democrat, Marc Morial. Nagin gained international attention in 2005 in the aftermath of Hurricane Katrina, which devastated the New Orleans area.

Thomas de Maizière
Thomas de Maizière (born 21 January 1954 in Bonn) is the Minister for Special Affairs in the German government. He is also Head of the Federal Chancellery.
His father was Ulrich de Maizière, who was Inspector General of the Bundeswehr. The senior officer in all German Armed Forces. In the UK, he would be Chief of the Defence Staff and in the US, Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff,
Thomas' cousin Lothar de Maizière was the only democratically elected Prime Minister of the German Democratic Republic.

Revolver (album)
"Revolver" is a 1966 album by British rock band The Beatles. Its front cover is a collage, designed by Klaus Voormann, a artist friend of the Beatles from Germany.
The album was recorded at Abbey Road Studios in London, England. While most of the Beatles's records were made in Studio Two, it was being used for another project, so much of "Revolver" was made in Studio Three, which was much smaller and meant for use by soloists. Space was cramped, and the sound of the record was different from their earlier ones.
The album also got a different reception from earlier Beatles albums. The band felt free to "branch out" into new themes and ideas, that nobody had tried in a pop music recording before. "Taxman" commented on the tax system in England. "Eleanor Rigby" was about loneliness. "Yellow Submarine" became a hit with children. "Good Day Sunshine" and "Got to Get You Into My Life" were covered by other bands.
A few of the songs made references to drugs, particularly John Lennon's songs. "She Said She Said" was about a party in Los Angeles the Beatles had gone to, and had taken LSD. "Doctor Robert" was about a New York doctor (Charles Roberts) who overprescribed sedatives and "feel-good" drugs for his patients. "Tomorrow Never Knows" came from Lennon's reading "The Psychedelic Experience", which adapted the "Tibetan Book of the Dead" as a drug-user's guide.
Beatles lead guitarist George Harrison was pleased to have three of his own songs included on "Revolver", "Taxman", "Love You To", and "I Want to Tell You". Most Beatles albums only had one or two Harrison songs. "Love You To" did not feature guitars, but Harrison instead played a sitar. World-famous sitarist Ravi Shankar heard the song, but did not like it, and offered to teach Harrison to play sitar properly. Shankar and Harrison went on to become lifelong friends.
Three songs from the album were "borrowed" by Capitol Records in the United States, and used on a compilation album, "Yesterday... and Today", which came out before "Revolver". The songs were "I'm Only Sleeping", "Doctor Robert", and "And Your Bird Can Sing". Capitol Records then released "Revolver" in a shortened version. The compact disc edition for sale today follows the original British version.
"Revolver" came out while the Beatles were on a concert tour. Bands normally perform songs from their latest album as a routine part of a concert. Strangely, the Beatles did not perform any "Revolver" songs on tour, but instead played the same music as on earlier tours. This got them criticism from some listeners. The tour also turned out to be the band's last. They played their final public concert in San Francisco, California on August 29, 1966.
Songs.
Songs with an asterisk (*) were not included in the American release, by Capitol Records.

Karl Arnold
Karl Arnold (* 21. March 1901 in Herrlishöfen; + 29. June 1958 in Düsseldorf) was a German politician. He was Minister President of North Rhine-Westphalia from 1947 to 1956.
Life and profession.
After 1920 Arnold worked full-time basis for the Christian trade union movement. He became Secretary of the Düsseldorf District of the Christian trade union in 1924.
In 1928 Arnold married Arnold Liesl Joeres. Their son Gottfried was born in 1933 and was a member of the German Bundestag between 1961 and 1983.
Arnold was partner in a business in Düsseldorf in 1933. During the Third Reich the Gestapo watched and followed him. He was arrested after Count von Stauffenberg tried to assassinate (murder) Hitler on 20 July 1944.
Arnold helped to found the industrial unions, today's DGB, with Hans Böckler in the Rhineland in 1945.
He got permission from the American Army to publish the Rheinische Post (Rhenish Post) daily newspaper. His family still own part of the paper today.
He died of a heart attack on 29 June 1958, during the Landtag (state parliament) election campaign.
Karl Arnold was buried in Düsseldorf's South Cemetery.
Political party.
Arnold joined the Centre party in 1920.
After the World War II Arnold founded the of Düsseldorf Christian democratic party in 1945. Later this became a part of CDU. Arnold was the CDU's deputy federal chairman from 1956 until his death.
Public offices.
1925 to 1933 he was a member of the city council of Düsseldorf and acting chairman the of the Centre Party group.
He was a member of the Landtag of North Rhine-Westphalia from 1946 until his death. Between 1947 and 1949 he was alao a member of the parliament of the Bizone (which was the British and American occupation zones).
In 1957 Arnold was elected to the Bundestag with 72.6% of the votes in the Gelsenkirchen-Erkelenz Jülich constituency. He was deputy chairman of the CDU/CSU parliamentary group.
On 29 January 1946 Arnold was appointed mayor of Düsseldorf by the American Military Government. He was elected mayor in the first free elections on 26 October 1946.
From December 1946 until 1956 he was Minister President of North Rhine Westphalia.
From 7 September 1949 to 6 September 1950 he was the first President of the Bundesrat.
This also mean that between 7 and 13 September he was Acting President of Germany, until Theodor Heuss was elected Federal President.
Arnold lost a constructive vote of 'no confidence' on 20 February 1956. His successor (person who followed) as Minister President was Fritz Steinhoff.
Arnold died one week before the next state elections, in 1958. He was only 57 years old.

Joe Biden
Joseph Robinette Biden, Jr. (born November 20, 1942) is an American lawyer and politician from Wilmington, Delaware. He is a member of the Democratic Party,the incumbent senior U.S. Senator from Delaware and the Vice President-elect of the United States, after the 2008 presidential election. He is the chairman of the U.S. Senate Committee on Foreign Relations. He was a candidate for the Democratic Party's nomination in the 2008 presidential election. Biden dropped out of the race on January 3, 2008 after he did not get many votes in the Iowa caucus.

Richard Mentor Johnson
Richard Mentor Johnson (October 17, 1780 – November 19, 1850) was the ninth Vice President of the United States, serving with President Martin Van Buren. A resident of Kentucky, Johnson served as a Representative and Senator from Kentucky, and in the Kentucky House of Representatives.
Johnson started his career as a lawyer representing many people for free. He was elected to the United States House of Representatives in 1806. During the War of 1812, Johnson led troops against the British.
Johnson later served in the Senate before being chosen as vice president. Johnson was elected by the Senate and not through the normal election because he did not have enough electors to win. This happened because Johnson lived with a slave named Julia Chinn, had two children with her, and treated her like his wife.
Johnson was not chosen to run with Van Buren in 1840. Johnson served in the Kentucky House of Representatives again as well as ran for a Senate seat again. In 1850 he was elected to the United States House of Representatives again but died two weeks into his term on November 19, 1850.

How to Grow a Woman from the Ground
"How to Grow a Woman from the Ground" is a 2006 album by Chris Thile, who made the album with the How to Grow a Band, credited to Chris Thile. It was released on September 12, 2006. The album is named after a song on the album; a cover of a song by American singer Tom Brosseau.
The album got mostly good reviews from important music critics, with some critics saying that the album was “fantastic, eclectic”, and “genius”. The album got Thile a Grammy Award-nomination in 2007.
Early planning and creation.
For a side project away from his band Nickel Creek, Chris Thile knew he wanted to form a five-piece string band that featured mandolin, violin, banjo, acoustic guitar, and double bass. Thile also wanted the band to feature his friend and fiddle player Gabe Witcher, but didn’t know what kind of band he wanted it to be. At the Telluride Bluegrass Festival in Colorado, Thile met banjo player Noam Pikelny and later said that “every note he played was something I wish I’d played”. At that time, Thile decided that he wanted “put [his] stamp” on the normal bluegrass band. Thile wanted to find five people to make the five-piece band he planned. He had already found fiddle, banjo, and mandolin players, so he just had to find double bass and acoustic guitar players. The bass player Thile was looking for turned out to be Greg Garrison, a friend of Noam Pikelny. Before this, Pikelny had played with Garrison in the band Leftover Salmon. The guitar player Thile needed became Chris Eldridge, famous as a member of the Infamous Stringdusters. The five people met up in Nashville on one day in 2005 and decided to “do something musical together”. A few days later, the group met again “to drop a ton of money, drink too much wine, eat steaks, and [talk] about our failed relationships”. That night, they formed a bluegrass band.
A few months later, the group decided to record an album. The album was recorded in two days at "Sear Sound Recording Studios" in New York City. The album was not made digitally, but in the old-fashioned way: on tape. In an interview with the United States magazine "Guitar Player", Chris Thile talked about how "How to Grow a Woman from the Ground" was recorded: "How to Grow a Woman from the Ground" was produced by Thile, and the only musicians on the album was the band that Thile chose. The band was later named the "How to Grow a Band".
Musical style.
"How to Grow a Woman from the Ground" takes influence from several musical genres, “drawing equally from traditional bluegrass, progressive acoustic, and singer-songwriter traditions”. Bluegrass mandolin player Ronnie McCoury became the album’s official “bluegrass guru” to make sure that there was “someone who could make sure we didn’t do anything clichéd or trite”. When discussing the album’s musical style, Chris Thile said that “All in all, "How to Grow a Woman from the Ground" is a bluegrass record. There are definitely some musical things that are out of the ordinary, but it sounds like a bluegrass record to me.”

Urho Kekkonen
Urho Kaleva Kekkonen (September 3 1900 -- August 31 1986) was the President of Finland between 1956 and 1982. He was also Prime Minister of Finland before that.
Kekkonen was born in Pielavesi. He took part of the Finnish Civil War. He studied law and then worked in the Finnish secret police. He opposed the Communists and later fascists.
Kekkonen became the Interior Minister in 1937, and he then tried to ban the fascist party IKL.
After Second World War, in the year 1950 Kekkonen became the first time Prime Minister of Finland. He tried to keep good relations with the Soviet Union like president Juho Kusti Paasikivi.
Kekkonen was elected the President of Finland in 1956, after president Paasikivi. He tried to keep Finland neutral country, which means it was not part of any military alliance like NATO or Warsaw Pact in Cold War.
Urho Kekkonen led the underwriting of the Helsinki Accords of the Organization for Security and Co-operation in Europe between European countries, United States and Soviet Union in 1975.
Kekkonen became sick in 1981 and gave up presidency.

Mean Girls
Mean Girls is a 2004 movie starring Lindsay Lohan. It was filmed in the United States.
Plot.
It's about a girl, Cady Heron, who used to home schooled in Africa but moves to the United States and has to go to a normal high school. On her first day at school, she hates it. She thinks it is a bit weird because she cannot go to the toilet when she wants, cannot write in green ink and has to stay in the same seat everytime she goes into a lesson. On the second day it becomes more successful as she makes new friends, Janice and Damian. When they skip a lesson, Janice and Damian give her a map of the school eating area. It is arranged into different sorts of people and their personalities. At lunch time Cady is on her way to sit with her new friends but is interrupted, then Regina, Gretchen and Karen ("The Plastics") ask her to sit with them and so she sits with them.
Soon, Cady joins the Plastics, and Janice devises a plan to shatter them. Cady convinces Regina to eat these bars that will make her gain weight instad of lose weight.
However, Cady gets too much into the Plastics, and throws a party at her parents' house without their permission. She tries to hook up with Regina's boyfriend, but he doesn't like her because she's just like a Plastic now. Janice tells Cady that she's just one of the Plastics now. Low grades in calculus class force Cady to rethink her plans. She joins the decathalon team.
Sequel.
A second film is currently being planned and developed by Paramount Pictures.

Richard Cromwell
Richard Cromwell (4 October 1626 – 12 July 1712) was the third son of Oliver Cromwell, and the second Lord Protector of England, Scotland and Ireland, for little over eight months, from 3 September 1658 until 25 May 1659. Richard Cromwell's enemies called him "Tumbledown Dick" and "Queen Dick".
Richard Cromwell was not suited to ruling the country. He followed his father as ruler only because he was Oliver's oldest surviving son, and people expected one of Oliver's sons to follow him. After a short time, he gave up power and he knew that many of the people wanted King Charles II to return from Holland and rule the country. When it was agreed that Charles would return, Richard thought it would be best for him to leave Britain, and he went to live in France for a while. He changed his name to "John Clarke" and travelled around Europe, not returning home for twenty years. When he came back, he lived quietly outside London for the rest of his life.
Stories about Richard.
There are rumours that the nursery rhyme "Hickory Dickory Dock" is actually about Richard Cromwell's reign, since the mouse in the rhyme runs down when the clock strikes one and Cromwell only reigned for one year.

Beppe Grillo
Giuseppe Piero Grillo, better known as Beppe Grillo (born July 21, 1948), is an Italian comedian and actor. He has worked in theatres and television.
Life.
Grillo was born in Savignone, a small town in the Province of Genoa, Liguria. Grillo became a comedian improvising a monologue at an audition. Two weeks later he was discovered by Italian television presenter Pippo Baudo. He participated in the variety show "Secondo Voi" for two years (1977-78). Later, in 1979, he was in "Luna Park" and "Fantastico".
In 1984 he participated to "Te la do io l'America" (four episodes) and "Te lo do io il Brasile" (6 episodes). On these shows, he spoke about his visits to the United States and Brazil and talked about their culture and lifestyle.
His popularity grew more and more. He became the protagonist of another show called "Grillometro" ("Grillometer"). Soon after this, his performances started to have more and more political satire. He often insulted politicians. In 1987 during the Saturday night television programme "Fantastico 7", he made comments about the Italian Socialist Party and its leader Bettino Craxi who had just taken a trip to China. Grillo said, "If the Chinese are all socialists, whom do they steal from?" The Italian Socialist Party did not like this because he was calling them thieves. After this episode, Grillo slowly was banned from the publicly owned television. Grillo not back on television until the political party was forced to disband several years later.
In 1993, Grillo was allowed on public television one more time. This show was watched by 16 million of Italians. This was the most viewers ever for Italian television.
His blog.
Grillo has a daily blog where he speaks about alternative energy, globalization, and technology. Versions of the blog are in English, Italian and Japanese. Posts in the Italian version will commonly get thousands of comments and replies from people. His blog is one of the 10 most viewed blogs. He often gets letters from important people who support his blog. These people include Antonio Di Pietro (Italian Minister Of Infrastructures), Fausto Bertinotti (President of the Italian Chamber of Deputies), Renzo Piano, and even Nobel Prize Winners (like Dario Fo, Joseph E. Stiglitz, Dalai Lama, Muhammad Yunus
Grillo commonly fights against corruption in his blog. He has used it to help create change in the Italian government. He wants any politician who have been found guilty of a crime to be removed from office.
Problems with justice.
In 1980 he was found guilty of manslaughter for a car accident in which he was the driver. Three passengers lost their lives.
Grillo never hesitates to name firms and people he believes are corrupt. He always supports his views with data and documents. This has caused him to be sued several times for libel by many people and organizations which he had exposed, such as Telecom Italia.
Critics.
Grillo is often criticized for his lifestyle. They do not think it is correct for him to own a motor yacht and a Ferrari when these things are against his ecological statements. Beppe Grillo said that he did own them, but that he had sold them since then. It is also said that he is just saying what is wrong about politicians based on the popular opinions of the people and does not give any other ways things should be done.

Bob Riley
Robert Renfroe "Bob" Riley (b. October 3, 1944) is the 52nd and current Governor of the U.S. state of Alabama. He was first elected to office in 2002 and re-elected in 2006. Riley was born in Ashland. He has a wife, four children (one is dead), and seven grandchildren. He is a member of the Republican party.

Gustav Heinemann
Dr. Dr. Gustav Walter Heinemann (* 23 July 1899 in Schwelm; † 7 July 1976 in Essen) was a German politician. He was Interior Minister under Chancellor Konrad Adenauer. He resigned when Adenauer started getting ready to set up the German Army. He later resigned from the CDU and joined the SPD. He also served as Justice Minister before he was elected Federal President in 1969. He served for one term, and left office in 1974.

Made of Bricks
"Made of Bricks" is the first album by the British singer-songwriter, Kate Nash. It was released on 6 August, 2007 on Fiction Records and reached number one in the UK album charts.
The album was released five weeks earlier than first planned due to the popularity of the single "Foundations". In its opening week of sales the album sold over 56,000 copies, and was certified gold.
The album has now been certified Platinum in the UK for sales of over 300,000. It has sold over 450,000 copies worldwide.

Matinée (album)
"Matinée" is the first album from British singer-'songwriter Jack Peñate. It was released on October 8 2007 on XL Recordings.

Radio 1's Live Lounge
"Radio 1's Live Lounge" is an album of live tracks played on Jo Whiley's Radio 1 show. It contains both covers and the bands' own songs.

Runaways (comics)
Runaways is a Marvel Comics comic book series created by Brian K. Vaughan and Adrian Alphona. The series is about a group of teenagers who try to make up for the evil done by their supervillain parents by becoming superheroes. They are commonly called "the Pride's kids" or "those kids in L.A." by other characters in the Marvel Universe. This is because the team does not have an official name and the most of Marvel's characters are in in New York.
In 2006, the series won the Harvey Award for best continuing/limited series.
In February 2007, series creators Vaughan and Alphona stopped making "Runaways" at issue #24 of the second series. In April 2007, long-time "Runaways" fan Joss Whedon (of "Buffy the Vampire Slayer", "Angel" and "Firefly" fame) will take over the series for 6 issues. Marvel has said that Terry Moore, creator of "Strangers in Paradise" will take over after Whedon leaves, with Humberto Ramos on art.
Overview.
"Runaways" was started in 2002 as part of Marvel Comics' "Tsunami" imprint. After Marvel cancelled the Tsunami imprint in January 2003, the series moved to the "Marvel Age" imprint. Because of this, the individual story arcs for "Runaways" are collected in small, manga-sized trade paperbacks. The hardcover collections are in normal sized books. In September 2004, the series ended at issue #18. Marvel started the series again in February 2005 and it has been published ever since.
The series is not usual in that it does not use the ideas of superhero names, uniforms, and team names. All the characters in the first series (except Alex) chose codenames, but they are used less and less throughout of vol. 1. In vol. 2, the codenames are mentioned once but never actually used. Molly is the only character who makes a costume but it is made from old bedsheets and clothes. She never wears the costume again after vol. 1 issue #8. During battle, the runaways mainly fight in their street clothes and call each other by their given names or nicknames. Also, the children never call themselves "The Runaways". Their team simply goes without a name. Other Marvel characters usually call the team "the Pride's kids" or "those kids in L.A." Vaughan even makes fun of common superhero sayings such as "Hulk smash!" or "Avengers assemble!" when Nico tells Victor that the team's rallying call is "Try not to die."

Arthur Seyß-Inquart
Dr Arthur Seyß-Inquart (born "Arthur Zajtich" on July 22, 1892 – October 16, 1946) was a prominent lawyer and later Nazi official in pre-Anschluß Austria, the Third Reich and in wartime Germany, Poland, and the Netherlands. Seyß-Inquart was executed at the Nuremberg Trials for crimes against humanity.
Life before the Anschluss.
Seyß-Inquart was born in 1892 in Stonařov ("Stannern"), Moravia, then part of the Austro-Hungarian Empire, to school principal Emil Zajtich and his wife Auguste Hyrenbach. The family moved to Vienna in 1907 where they changed the Czech Slavic name of "Zajtich" to the German "Seyß-Inquart". Seyß-Inquart later went to study law at the University of Vienna. At the beginning of World War I in August 1914 Seyß-Inquart enlisted with the Austrian Army and served in Russia, Romania and also Italy.
He was decorated for bravery on a number of occasions and while recovering from wounds in 1917 he completed his final examinations for his degree.
In 1911 Seyß-Inquart met Gertrud Maschka. The couple married in 1916 and had three children: Ingeborg Caroline Auguste Seyß-Inquart (born September 18, 1917), Richard Seyß-Inquart (born 1921) and Dorothea Seyß-Inquart (born 1928).
He went into law after the war and in 1921 set up his own practice. During the early years of the first Austrian republic he was close to the Vaterländische Front.
As a successful lawyer, he was asked to join the cabinet of Chancellor Engelbert Dollfuss in 1933.
He became a State Councillor in 1937 under Kurt Schuschnigg. He was not a member of the Austrian National Socialist party at first. By 1938 Seyß-Inquart was the highest ranking politician in the Austrian National Socialists.
In February 1938, Seyß-Inquart was appointed Minister of the Interior by Schuschnigg, after Hitler had threatened Schuschnigg. On March 11 1938 Schuschnigg resigned as Austrian Chancellor and Seyß-Inquart was appointed to the position by Austrian President Wilhelm Miklas. Hitler's plan was to have Seyß-Inquart send a telegram asking for German help to stop riots. But President Miklas did not make Seyß-Inquart chancellor until after Hitler had ordered his army into Austria. On March 13 1938, Seyß-Inquart joined the National Socialist party.
Head of Ostmark and Southern Poland.
Hitler was going to leave Austria independent, but after the welcome the German troops got during thr Anschluß he decided to mark Austria a new part of the Third Reich, called "Ostmark". Seyß-Inquart wrote the law which made Austria a province of Germany and signed it into law on March 13.
Seyß-Inquart became "Reichsstatthalter" or Governor of named Ostmark. Ernst Kaltenbrunner was chief minister and Burckel as Commissioner for the Reunion of Austria (concerned with the "Jewish Question").
Seyß-Inquart was made an SS Gruppenführer, and in May 1939 he was made a Minister without portfolio in Hitler's government.
After the invasion of Poland, Seyß-Inquart became governor for Southern Poland, but before he started work there the General Government was created, and Seyß-Inquart became a deputy to the Governor General Hans Frank.
Reichskommissar in the Netherlands.
After Germany invaded the Low Countries Seyß-Inquart became Reichskommissar for the Occupied Netherlands in May 1940. His job was to organise civil administration, with creating close economic ties with Germany and defend the interests of the Reich.
He supported the Dutch National Socialist Party (NSB) and allowed them to create a paramilitary "Landwacht", as an auxiliary police force. Other political parties were banned in late 1941 and many former government officials were imprisoned at Sint-Michielsgestel. The administration of the country was largely controlled by Seyß-Inquart himself.
He introduced measures to combat 'terror' and when a widespread strike took place in Amsterdam, Arnhem and Hilversum in May 1943 special summary court-martial were used and a collective fine of 18 million guilders was imposed. Seyß-Inquart allowed the execution of around 800 people before liberation. Some people say it was not 800 people but over 1,500, including the execution of people under the so-called "Hostage Law", the death of political prisoners who were close to being liberated, the Putten incident, and the reprisal execution of 117 Dutchmen for the attack on SS and Police Leader Hanns Albin Rauter. From July 1944 most of Seyß-Inquart's powers were transferred to the military commander in the Netherlands and the Gestapo, but he was still an important and powerful person.
There were 2 small concentration camps in the Netherlands
There was also a "Jewish assembly camp" at Westerbork and a number of other camps controlled by the military, the police, the SS or Seyß-Inquart's administration. These included a "voluntary labour recruitment" camp at Ommen. In total around 530,000 Dutch civilians worked for the Germans, of whom 250,000 were sent to factories in Germany.
Seyss-Inquart was an anti-Semite: within a few months of his arrival in the Netherlands, he took sacked Jews from government, the press and leading positions in industry. Anti-Jewish measures intensified from 1941: approximately 140,000 Jews were registered, a ghetto was created in Amsterdam and a transit camp was set up at Westerbork. In February 1941, 600 Jews were sent to the Buchenwald and Mauthausen concentration camps. Later, the Dutch Jews were sent to Auschwitz. As Allied forces approached in September 1944 the remaining Jews at Westerbork were sent to Theresienstadt. Of 140,000 registered Dutch Jews, only 44,500 survived the war.
When Hitler committed suicide in April 1945, Seyß-Inquart became the Foreign Minister in Admiral Karl Dönitz's new German government.
The Nazi regime had tried a 'scorched earth' policy, and some docks and harbours were destroyed. Seyß-Inquart, agreed with Armaments Minister Albert Speer that destroying everything to stop things being used by the allies or a new government after the war was wrong. Seyß-Inquart also helped in the so called 'hunger winter' of 1945 to distribute food and allowed Allied airplanes to drop Swedish white bread for the hungry people of the occupied north of the country. He remained Reichskommissar until May 8, 1945, when, after a meeting with Karl Dönitz to confirm his blocking of the scorched earth orders, he was captured in Hamburg.
Nuremberg Trials.
At the Nuremberg Trials, Seyß-Inquart faced charges of conspiracy to commit crimes against peace; planning, starting and fighting wars of aggression; war crimes; and crimes against humanity.
His defence lawyer was Gustav Steinbauer. Seyß-Inquart was nonetheless found guilty of all charges except conspiracy. On hearing of his death sentence, Seyss-Inquart made it clear he accepted responsibility for excesses during the war, "Death by hanging...well, in view of the whole situation, I never expected anything different. It's all right". He was hanged on October 16, 1946, at the age of 54, together with nine other Nuremberg defendants. His last words were "I hope that this execution is the last act of the tragedy of the Second World War and that the lesson taken from this world war will be that peace and understanding should exist between peoples. I believe in Germany".

Yulia Tymoshenko
Yulia Volodymyrivna Tymoshenko () (born on November 27, 1960) is a Ukrainian politician and current Prime Minister of Ukraine. She is serving her second term. Her first term was from January 24 to September 8, 2005. She was relected on December 18, 2007. She is leader of the political party the Yulia Tymoshenko Bloc. When Viktor Yushchenko lost the 2004 Ukrainian presidential election and his followers argued that the election had been corrupted she was his main ally and one of the leaders of "The Orange Revolution". She leads a two party government with her own political party and the political party of Viktor Yushchenko (the current the President of Ukraine).
Tymoshenko's first name is sometimes spelled Yuliya, Yulia, Iulia, or Julia.

Yulia Tymoshenko Bloc
The Yulia Tymoshenko Bloc () is a Ukrainian electoral alliance led by the politician Yulia Tymoshenko, current Prime Minister of Ukraine.
The alliance is especially popular in the west en center of Ukraine but is also the only "Orange party" (Yulia Tymoshenko was an important player in the Orange Revolution) winning votes in the east en south of Ukraine where the Orange Revolution wasn't popular.

Cloverfield
"Cloverfield" is a 2008 movie about a giant monster that attacks New York City. The movie was filmed to look like it was done by a personal camera. It is produced by J. J. Abrams and directed by Matt Reeves. In Tokyo, Japan, a giant monster that attacked Tokyo, and the police came to the middle of the city.

Joschka Fischer
Joseph Martin "Joschka" Fischer (born April 12 1948) was German foreign minister and Vice Chancellor in the government of Gerhard Schröder from 1998 to 2005. He was a leading figure in the German Green Party and according to opinion polls, he was the most popular politician in Germany for most of the government's duration. He left office on 22 November, 2005.
Early life.
Fischer was born in Gerabronn in Baden-Württemberg. His parents were Germans from Hungary. His nickname Joschka is from "Jóska", which is the Hungarian nickname for Joseph (). Fischer dropped out of high school in 1965, and started working for a photographer which he quit in 1966.
In 1967 he became active in the German student movement and Left-wing politics. Working in a left-wing bookstore in Frankfurt was when he started going to leftist university events as a guest student. He studied the works of Marx, Mao and Hegel and became a member of the militant group "Revolutionary Combat" ().
Fischer took part in some street battles when the anarchist "Putzgruppe" attacked the police and hurt some officers a lot. (In German the word "Putz" can mean a cleaner, but in "Putz-group" it is an acronym. That means the letters stand for other words. "Proletarische Union für Terror und Z'"erstörung", i.e. "The Workers Union for Terror and Destruction"). Photos of one battle in March 1973 show Fischer clubbing policeman Rainer Marx.
In the German Autumn () of 1977, there were a lot of terrorist attacks by the Red Army Faction (RAF). Fischer says that these attacks, especially the kidnapping and murder of Hanns-Martin Schleyer, made him give up violence as a way to get political change.
Instead, he became involved in the new social movements and later in the newly-founded German Green Party, mainly in the state of Hesse.
In May 1981 the Minister of Economics of the state of Hesse, Heinz-Herbert Karry, was murdered. The gun that killed the minister was stolen from an American army base in 1973, and Fischer's car was used in the robbery.
As Foreign Minister, Fischer apologised for the violence of his "Putzgruppe" days,
Green politician.
From 1983 to 1985, Fischer was a member of the Bundestag for the Green party. In 1985, he became Minister for the Environment in Hesse in the first Social Democrat-Green coalition (1985-1987). Fischer caused a stir when he arrived to take his oath of office ceremony wearing trainers. These trainers are now on display in a museum in Bonn.
Fischer was again Environment Minister in Hessen from 1991 to 1994, and, later on, became co-chairman of the Greens parliamentary party in the Bundestag. During his years in opposition, Fischer was respected for his speeches. For a large part of the 1990s, with the SPD was not very popular, and Fischers friends often called him "real" Leader of the Opposition.
Foreign Minister.
In September 1998 the Social Democrats, led by Gerhard Schröder, beat the Christian Democrat government of Helmut Kohl. With the SPD's 42% and the Greens' 7%, a coalition government could be formed. After several weeks of talks between Social Democrats and Greens, the new government took power on 27 October 1998. Fischer became Minister of Foreign Affairs.
In 1999 Fischer supported German participation in the Kosovo War. This was very extremely controversial within the largely pacifist Green Party, because it meant that, for the first time since World War II, German soldiers would actively go into combat. He justified this war with allegations that Serbia was planning to commit genocide against the Kosovo Albanians.
Fischer was also in favour of stationing German troops in Afghanistan, but he advised Schröder not to join the war in Iraq. He is known as a good friend of Kofi Annan. By 2005 he was the second longest-serving foreign minister in German postwar history (after Hans-Dietrich Genscher).
In 2005 Fischer was accused by critics of carelessly relaxing controls on visa regulations for Ukraine, thus allowing many illegal immigrants to enter Germany with fake identities. A parliamentary committee was established to examine the case, and unlike in other such committee hearings, Fischer's statement (and that of other top officials) was shown live on public TV. Fischer's appearance before the committee took twelve hours. (See German Visa Affair 2005).
After the defeat of the coalition government in the 2005 election, Fischer announced that he would retire to the backbench. "After 20 years of power, now I want my freedom back", he was quoted as saying. On 13 October 2005, it was announced that Frank-Walter Steinmeier (SPD) would succeed Fischer as Foreign Minister.
Life after politics.
Since the beginning of September 2006 Joschka Fischer has been a senior fellow at the Liechtenstein Institute on Self-Determination at Princeton University, a visiting professor at Woodrow Wilson School of Public and International Affairs at Princeton University. He has also spoken at other American universities, notably Brandeis University, on various topic in foreign affairs and international relations.
Private life.
Fischer has often been the most popular German politician, even among supporters of other parties. T
Until 1996, Fischer had been an outspoken lover of good wines and food. He often bet cases of expensive wine with other politicians on the outcome of elections. Fischer had also been overweight. Within a short time he lose a lot of weight. Fischer said that this was due to his giving up alcohol completely and changing his diet. He had also been doing fitness training and even running marathons. He cashed in on his weight loss by writing the book "My long race towards myself" about his experience, which became an immediate bestseller. Recently he has been putting on weight again.
Fischer has been married five times: his first four marriages, to Edeltraud Fischer (1967-1984), Inge Vogel (1984-1987), Claudia Bohm (1987-1999), and Nicola Leske (1999-2003), all ended in divorce. In October 2005 he married (in Rome) Minu Barati, who was his common-law wife for 2 years. With Inge, his second wife, he has two children: David and Lara. In April 2005 Fischer became a grandfather for the first time.
Further reading.
The following sources reflect the views of U.S. adversaries of Fischer and his policies, especially Germany's decision not to participate in the 2003 U.S.-led invasion of Iraq.
Other websites.
Joschka Fischer writes a monthly commentary series, "The Rebel Realist", for Project Syndicate, a non-profit association of newspapers around the world.

Suharto
Suharto (February 20, 1921 - January 27, 2008) was an Indonesian military and political leader. He was a military officer in the Indonesian National Revolution. He is better known as the second President of Indonesia. He held the office for a long time, from 1967 to 1998.
Suharto seized power from his predecessor, the first president of Indonesia Sukarno. For this, he used some force, but also took some political maneuvers. At the time, there was instability and unrest inside and outside of Indonesia. This helped him come to power. He took three decades to change the regime to work along militarist lines, with a strong central government. His movement was known as "Orde Baru". As he took an anti-communist position which he could defend, several Western governments supported him both in economic and political matters. This was during an era that is known as Cold War. For most of his three-decade rule, Indonesia experienced significant economic growth and industrialization. His rule, however, led to political purges and the deaths of millions of suspected Indonesian communists and Chinese-Indonesians. He also made some laws against communist parties and ethnic Chinese.
His New Order administration's authoritarian and increasingly corrupt practices led to much discontent in the 1990s. Suharto's almost unquestioned authority over Indonesian affairs slipped dramatically when the Asian financial crisis lowered Indonesians' standard of living. People inside the military and other institutions no longer supported him. There were some problems inside the country during the early 1990s. Suharto became more and more isolated, in a political way. After mass demonstrations in 1998, Suharto was forced to resign. Suharto had been the face of Indonesia for over 30 years. After retiring, he lived in seclusion. There were people who wanted to try him for genocide. This failed however, because he had a very bad health. His legacy remains hotly debated and contested both in Indonesia and abroad.
Like many Javanese, Suharto has only one name. In contexts where his religion is being discussed he is sometimes called Haji or el-Haj Mohammed Suharto, but this Islamic title is not part of his formal name or generally used. The spelling "Suharto" has been official in Indonesia since 1947 but the older spelling Soeharto is still frequently used.

Sukarno
Sukarno (June 6, 1901 – June 21, 1970) was the first President of Indonesia. He helped the country win its independence from the Netherlands. He was President from 1945 to 1967, presiding with mixed success over the country's turbulent transition to independence. Sukarno was forced to resign by one of his generals, Suharto. Suharto formally became President in March 1967.
The spelling "Sukarno" has been official in Indonesia since 1947. The older spelling Soekarno is still frequently used, mainly because he signed his signature in the old spelling. Official Indonesian presidential decrees from the period 1947-1968, however, printed his name using the 1947 spelling.
Indonesians also remember him as "Bung" Karno or "Pak" Karno. Like many Javanese people, he had one name; in religious contexts, he was occasionally referred to as 'Achmad Sukarno'.

Mary Harrison McKee
Mary Scott Harrison McKee (April 3, 1858 – October 28, 1930) was the first lady to her father, President Benjamin Harrison. She became first lady when her mother, Caroline Harrison, became sick and died. She was born in Indianapolis, Indiana on April 3, 1858.

Charles-Marie Widor
Charles-Marie Widor (born Lyons, 21 February, 1844; died Paris, 12 March, 1937) was a French organist and composer. He was one of the greatest organists of his time and he had many pupils who learned a lot from him and became famous. Widor is best known for his organ works which he called “symphonies”. The "Toccata" from his "Symphony no 5" is one of the best known of all organ pieces, often played at the end of wedding ceremonies.

Suleiman the Magnificent
Suleiman I (سليمان "Sulaymān", Süleyman; almost always "Kanuni Sultan Süleyman" in Turkish) (November 6, 1494 – September 5/6, 1566), was the tenth Sultan of the Ottoman Empire. He reigned from 1520 to 1566. That was longer than any other Ottoman sultan did. He is known in the West as Suleiman the Magnificent and in the Islamic world, as the Lawgiver (in Turkish "Kanuni";, "al‐Qānūnī"), because he reconstructed the Ottoman legal system.

Mwai Kibaki
Mwai Kibaki (born November 15, 1931) is currently the president of Kenya. He is the first President of Kenya to belong to a party other than KANU. Since he became President he has done many good things. Kenya has seen economic growth spurts of up 6%. He however has had many complaints from people who think the changes that were needed are slow to come. Many Kenyans living in diaspora have began to return to Kenya as the promise of the future has created a plenty of high paying jobs that are appealing to foreign educated Kenyans.
In 2007, several people got angry at him. They thought that he changed the election results so that he would win. They started to destroy houses and property.

Lothar Bisky
Lothar Bisky (born August 17, 1941 in Rummelsburg, Germany, now Miastko, Poland) was the chairman of the Left Party.PDS, a socialist political party with its base in the east of Germany. In June 2007 he became of the leaders of The Left, formed by a merger of Left Party.PDS and Labour and Social Justice – The Electoral Alternative.
As a child he was very poor, so when he was 18 he moved from northern West Germany to GDR. He was allowed to join the Socialist Unity Party in 1963, but did not became a leader of the party until just after the fall of communism and the old "hardliners" were throwm out of the party.
He was rector of the University of Film and Television (Potsdam-Babelsberg) from 1986 to 1990. In 1991 he became a member of the board of directors of regional television channel ORB (now part of RBB.)
In 1990 he was a member of the Volkskammer and since 1990 he has been a member of the state parliament in Brandenburg.
He was chairman of the PDS from 1993 until his resignation in 2000. He was re-elected chairman in 2003. Bisky is seen to be on the moderate, social democratic wing of the party and he is a long-time close ally of the party's most prominent figure, Gregor Gysi.
The party returned strongly to the Bundestag in the 2005 election. Bisky, one of 54 Left MPs, was going to become one of the six vice presidents of the Bundestag. When the new Bundestag met on October 18, however, he failed three times to be elected. Some MPs explained this with allegations (denied by Bisky) that he was an informant of the Stasi. Later, he failed a fourth time, and gave up his bid to be elected.
Lothar Bisky is married and the father of three sons. The oldest son, Jens Bisky, is a journalist and writer and the second-oldest, Norbert Bisky, is a painter.

Pretty. Odd.
"Pretty. Odd." is the second music album from the rock band Panic at the Disco. It is to be released on March 25, 2008.
Production and marketing.
Panic at the Disco began to creating their new album after their first album, "A Fever You Can't Sweat Out". While on tour for about two years, with they had no new songs to perform. In January 2007 the band went into "hibernation" in a cabin (just outside the strip), as they began writing new songs for the next six months hoping for a second album to be released during fall 2007. On July 7, 2007 they played the song "It's True Love" live during their first performance since going into writing. Later that night howeve, the band decided that they didn't like the music had written and scrapped all the songs they had written (which was about 3/4 of an album, as they were almost done recording).
A month later Panic announced two newly written songs, the first named "Middle of Summer" (later changed to "When the Day Met the Night"), and "Nine in the Afternoon". In December, a part of "Nine in the Afternoon" was played on an episode of the television show "Heroes". Panic then began viral marketing, building puzzles on their official website. For about two weeks the puzzle gave snippets from an unknown song, along with the caption "YOU DONT HAVE TO WORRY...". On January 1, 2008, the snippets finally were revealed to be part of a new song entitled "We're So Starving". A rough version of this song was then released for listening on their official MySpace page, but was later pulled with the release of "Nine in the Afternoon". A review from NME magazine was published on the internet with descriptions of each song. These reviews show the big different direction that Panic have taken with their new album.
The band announced the title of the new album, "Pretty. Odd.", through their website on January 9, and dropped the "!" from their band name at the same time. The band explained by saying "We've just traded the exclamation point for a few periods." They announced the next day that they would be headlining the Honda Civic Tour in support of the album. The band then began a second puzzle on January 17, challenging fans to find puzzle pieces scattered throughout Panic-related websites, in order to reveal the album cover. The cover was officially revealed on January 22. Four days later, a new scavenger hunt was hidden on the official site, showing the tracklist of the album and offering a prize to the first three people who could find all 15 song titles for the new album. This was completed later that day.
On January 28 the winners were revealed. That very same day, the band posted the final version of "Nine in the Afternoon" on their MySpace page. The band also revealed on their official site they were releasing a Deluxe Edition of "Pretty. Odd." along with a version with a different artwork.
iTunes made the Deluxe Edition and Standard Edition of the album available for pre-order on January 29, 2008.

A Fever You Can't Sweat Out
"A Fever You Can't Sweat Out" is the first album made by the rock band, Panic at the Disco. It was released on September 27 2005 by Fueled by Ramen.
The album is split in two, with tracks 1 through 7 being played by electronic instruments such as synthesizers and drum machines and tracks 9 through 13 using traditional instruments such as the accordion and organ. Track 8 (Intermission) acts as a link between the two parts, starting with techno-style dance beats before switching to the piano. On the vinyl record version of the album, side A holds songs 1-8 while side B holds songs 9-13, further showing the split in the album.
The album mostly deals with social problems that the band shows on through various songs. Topics such as sanctity of marriage, adultery, alcoholism, prostitution, and religion are seen throughout the album. Guitarist Ryan Ross also relates two of the songs to living with an alcoholic father. The album has sold more than 1.6 million copies in the U.S. alone.

Charles IV of France
Charles IV (18/19 June 1294 – 1 February 1328), was the King of France and Navarre (as Charles I) and Count of Champagne from 1322 to his death. Charles IV the last French king of the old Capetian line. He was crowned King of France in 1322 at the cathedral in Reims.
During his six years as king Charles IV raised taxes and took away land from people he did not like. In 1323 he made the Jews leave France because people thought they made secret plans with lepers and Muslims, although they did not really do those things.
Charles died without a son so there were questions about who would be the next king. He had two daughters, but the Salic law said daughters could not rule.

Philip VI of France
Philip VI (1293 – 22 August 1350), called "the Fortunate" was King of France from 1328 to his death. He was also Count of Anjou, Maine, and Valois from 1325 to 1328. He was the first king from the House of Valois part of the Capetian dynasty.

New York Jets
The New York Jets are an American football team. They are a part of the National Football League (NFL). Even though they are called the New York Jets they play in New Jersey. They hail from the same stadium as the New York Giants. They have many fans in New York and New Jersey. The New York Jets started playing in 1960. They have only won one championship.

Charles V of France
Charles V (21 January 1338 – 16 September 1380), called the Wise, was King of France from 1364 to his death and a member of the House of Valois. His reign marked a high point for France during the Hundred Years' War. His armies recovered large parts of the territory that had been given to England at the Treaty of Brétigny.

Charles the Bald
Charles the Bald (13 June 823 - 6 October 877) was King "Charles II" of France (843-877) and also "Charles II" of the Holy Roman Empire (875-877) and King of West Francia (840-877).

Louis the Stammerer
Louis the Stammerer (November 1, 846 — April 10, 879;), was the oldest son of Charles the Bald and Ermentrude of Orléans. He became King of France after his father in France in 877. Unlike his father, he never became Holy Roman Emperor.
Louis the Stammerer married twice. With his first wife Ansgarde of Burgundy he had two sons: Louis III of France (born in 863) and Carloman, King of the West Franks (born in 866). Both of them became kings of France. They also had two daughters: Hildegarde (born in 864) and Gisela (865–884). With his second wife, Adelaide of Paris, he had one daughter, Ermentrude (875–914) — who was the mother of Cunigunde, wife of the Count Palatine Wigerich of Bidgau; they were the ancestors of the House of Luxemburg —, and a posthumous son, Charles the Simple, who also became a king of France.

Cristina Fernández de Kirchner
Cristina Elisabet Fernández de Kirchner (February 19, 1953), also called Cristina Fernàndez or Cristina Kirchner, is the current President of Argentina. She was born in La Plata, Buenos Aires Province.She is a lawyer and she is married to the former argenitian president Néstor Kirchner.
She was elected President in October 2007

José de San Martín
José de San Martín (1778 - 1850) was an Argentine military commander.
He was born in Yapeyú, Corrientes, Argentina.
He liberated Argentina, Peru and Chile from Spain.
In 1817, he crossed the Andes from Mendoza to Chile
Together with Simón Bolívar, San Martín is called as one of the Liberators of South America.

Reservoir Dogs
"Reservoir Dogs" is a 1992 movie. The movie was written and directed by Quentin Tarantino and starred Harvey Keitel, Tim Roth, Michael Madsen, Chris Penn, and Steve Buscemi. It is the first movie directed by Tarantino. The movie was released on October 23, 1992. The title, and promo shots associated with the movie, was a take on the violent Sam Peckinpah movie, Straw Dogs. Although Reservoir Dogs failed at the theatre it found new life after being released on VHS and DVD, quickly becoming a cult classic.

Islam Karimov
Islam Abduganievitj Karimov born january 30, 1938 in Samarkand is the current president of Uzbekistan. He is considered a dictator and has many time violated human rights in hes country.

Hybrid Theory
"Hybrid Theory" is the first studio album by Linkin Park. It was released on March 25, 2001.
Before release.
Before Linkin Park was known as "Linkin Park," they were known as Xero. After Mark Wakefield left Xero, Chester Bennington joined, and their name was changed to "Hybrid Theory." They produced a demo tape with nine songs and sent it to several record companies, but they all refused to sponsor Linkin Park. Eventually, they were signed by Warner Bros. Records in 2000.
About the songs.
Most of the songs on "Hybrid Theory" came from early versions of them that Xero recorded with Mark Wakefield.
The songs were mostly about Chester Bennington's problems as a child, such as child abuse, social isolation, the divorce of his parents, and drug abuse. Bennington and Mike Shinoda have said that the songs turned into songs about "everyday emotions that you talk about and think about."
In 2002, all of the songs were remixed for Linkin Park's second album, "Reanimation".
List of songs.
Four of the songs from "Hybrid Theory" were released as singles: "One Step Closer," "Crawling," "Papercut," and "In the End." They were all very popular and appeared on charts. "Runaway" was not a single, but it also appeared on charts.
Critics' opinions of "Hybrid Theory".
Critics had mixed opinions of "Hybrid Theory". The magazines "Rolling Stone", "PopMatters", "The Village Voice" and "Sputnikmusic" liked the album. Robert Christgau from "The Village Voice" enjoyed listening to "Papercut" and "Points of Authority."
However, "Allmusic" and "NME" did not like the album. They thought it was a generic rock and heavy metal album, and not very creative.

Hybrid Theory EP
"Hybrid Theory EP" is an EP by the American nu metal/alternative rock band Linkin Park that was recorded and released in 1999. At this time, Linkin Park were called "Hybrid Theory", making this EP a self-titled album, or an album named after the band.
It was Linkin Park's first record. Before it, in 1997, the band only made a demo tape called "Xero". The band changed its name later in 1999, after Chester Bennington replaced Mark Wakefield as the lead singer.
About the EP.
Only one thousand were made, and the EP was sent to different record labels, such as Warner Bros. Records. The rest of the copies of the EP were sent to the first members of Linkin Park's fan club.
On November 19, 2001, Linkin Park Underground, Linkin Park's fan club, was made. The first fan club package that was sent to members had a new edition of "Hybrid Theory EP", with a note from the band. The first 500 copies of the CD were signed by all 6 members of the band.
The only ways to get the EP are to buy it from eBay, or win a contest in the Linkin Park Underground when the EP is awarded as a contest prize. But the prizes awarded by the LPU are the original EP.

Kublai Khan
Kublai Khan was a great Mongol khan who brought the empire to its greatest height. He finished the invasion of China and founded the Yuan Dynasty. He lived during the 13th century, or the 1200s AD.

Charles VII of France
Charles VII of France (22 February 1403 – 22 July 1461), was King of France from 1422 to his death. He was not crowned as king until 1429 because England controlled large parts of France. Joan of Arc took back land for him, but she died very young. The Hundred Years' War ended with France winning while Charles VII was king.

Charles VI of France
Charles VI of France (3 December 1368 – 21 October 1422), was King of France from 1380 until his death. He was not a successful king.
Often he was not able to rule the country because of mental illness and his wife Queen Isabeau of Bavaria ruled with the help of his brother Louis I de Valois, Duke of Orléans. This made his cousin John the Fearless of Burgundy very angry, so John the Fearless had Louis I assassinated. A few years after that, Henry V of England invaded and won the Battle of Agincourt.

Mieszko I of Poland
Mieszko I (c. 935 – May 25, 992) was a duke of the Polans and the first historical ruler of Poland.

Dreaming Out Loud (OneRepublic album)
"Dreaming Out Loud" is the debut album by OneRepublic, produced by Greg Wells with two songs produced by Ryan Tedder. OneRepublic has been the number one band on MySpace for over a year, and has been in MySpace Music's Top Artists since early 2006, with over 24 million total song plays and counting. The album was released in the US on November 20, 2007, although the entire album had been leaked on to the internet months before.

Shock Value (Timbaland album)
"Shock Value" is the second studio album by record producer Timbaland.

Philip II of Macedon
Philip II was a king of Macedon. He ruled from 359 BC - 336 BC. He was the father of the emperor Alexander the Great, who was born in 356 BC. He united all of Greece. He would either bring a city-state into his empire with his military or he would talk/bribe the leaders into joining his empire. It was under his reign in 338 BC at Chaerona against Athens that Alexander first showed his military genius.

Boston Celtics
The Boston Celtics are a professional basketball club. They play in Boston, Massachusetts. They are a part of the National Basketball Association (NBA) and play in the Atlantic Division.
History.
The Celtics were one of the first NBA teams. Since their start in 1946, they have been one of the most successful teams, winning seventeen NBA Championships.
The Celtics play their home games in TD Banknorth Garden.

All That We Needed
"All That We Needed" is the third album released by the band Plain White T's. The album was released January 25, 2005.

Louis III of France
Louis III of France (born 863–865, died 5 August 882), king of Western Francia, was the second son of King Louis the Stammerer and Ansgarde. He and his brother Carloman, both became king together and ruled together after his father's death in 879.
Louis won an important battle against the Viking pirates at the Battle of Saucourt-en-Vimeu, in 881. He died in August 882 at Saint Denis after falling from his horse. Because he had no children, his brother Carloman became the sole king.

Carloman II of France
Carloman II of France (c. 866 – 12 December 884), king of Western Francia, was the youngest son of King Louis the Stammerer and Ansgarde. He and his brother Louis III of France shared the kingship when their father died in 879. Carloman became sole king in 882 when his brother died.
Carloman had problems with Viking raiders during his reign. He died while hunting on December 12, 884.

Charles the Fat
Charles the Fat (13 June 839 – 13 January 888) was the King of Alemannia from 876, King of Italy from 879, Holy Roman Emperor (as Charles III) from 881, King of East Francia from 882, and King of West Francia from 884. He was lost control of East Francia, Lotharingia, and possibly Italy in 887. He died a few weeks later in January 888.

Odo of France
Odo of France (c. 860 – January 1, 898) was a king of the Franks (888 - 898). He was a son of Robert the Strong, count of Anjou, and is sometimes called duke of France and also as count of Paris. His family is known as the Robertians. Odo made Paris his capital and that was important to making the start of modern France.

Trygve Lie
Trygve Halvdan Lie () (July 16, 1896 – December 30, 1968) was a Norwegian politician. From 1946 to 1952 he was the first elected Secretary-General of the United Nations.
Lie was born in Oslo (then Kristiania) on 16 July 1896. He joined the Labour Party in 1911 and was named as the party's national secretary soon after getting his law degree from the University of Oslo in 1919. He married Hjørdis Jørgensen in 1921; the couple had three daughters, Sissel, Guri, and Mette.
Later he was elected to the Storting (Norway's Parliament). He was appointed Minister of Justice when a Labour Party government was formed by Johan Nygaardsvold in 1935. Lie was later named Minister of Trade and Industries and Minister of Supply and Shipping.
In 1940, when Norway was invaded by Germany, Lie ordered all Norwegian ships to sail to Allied ports. Lie was named as Foreign Minister of the Norwegian government-in-exile.
Lie led the Norwegian "delegation" (group) to the United Nations conference in San Francisco in 1946 and was a leader in drafting the rules to set up the United Nations Security Council. He was the leader of the Norwegian delegation to the United Nations general assembly in 1946. On February 1, 1946, he was elected as the first United Nations Secretary-General as a result of a compromise between the major powers, having only missed being elected President of the first General Assembly by a small margin. He gets much of the credit for securing the current site for the United Nations headquarters from John D. Rockefeller, Jr., and establishing the offices there.
As Secretary General, Lie supported the foundation of Israel and Indonesia. He worked for the withdrawal of Soviet forces in Iran and a stop to fighting in Kashmir. He attracted the anger of the Soviet Union when he helped gather support for the defence of South Korea after it was invaded in 1950 and later worked to end the Soviet boycott of UN meetings, though his involvement has only little to do with the eventual return of the Soviet Union to the UN. He was opposed to Spain's entry into the United Nations because of his opposition to the Franco government. He also sought to have the People's Republic of China recognized by the United Nations after the Nationalist government was exiled to Taiwan, arguing that the People's Republic was the only government which could fulfill the membership obligations in full. This did not happen until the 1970s.
He has been criticized for his failures to facilitate negotiation in the Berlin Blockade, as well as his failure to bring about a more swift end to the Korean War. His critics argue that he was under the influence of a select few in the UN Secretariat. He has also been criticized for his arrogance and stubbornness.
Over objections from the Soviet Union, his term of office was extended by the General Assembly 46 - 5 in 1950. This was the result of a Security Council impasse, in which the US refused to accept any candidate but Lie, and the Soviet Union's absolute refusal to accept him again, due to his involvement in the Korean War. The Soviet Union refused to acknowledge him as secretary general in his second term, and after having been accused by Joseph McCarthy of hiring "disloyal" Americans (an allegation which he attributed to the rapid hiring of civil servants necessary after the creation of the organization), Lie resigned on November 10, 1952.
Lie remained active in Norwegian politics after his resignation from the UN. He was the Governor of Oslo and Akershus, Chairman of the Board of Energy, Minister of the Interior, and Minister of Trade.
Lie died on December 30, 1968 of a heart attack. He was 72 years old.

U Thant
U Thant 22 January 1909 – 25 November 1974) was a Burmese diplomat and the third Secretary-General of the United Nations, from 1961 to 1971. He was chosen after his predecessor Dag Hammarskjöld was killed in a plane crash in September 1961.
"U" is a word in Burmese, roughly equal to "Mister." "Thant" was his only name. In Burmese he was known as Pantanaw U Thant. His home town is Pantanaw, so this means "Mr Thant of Pantanaw"
Civil servant.
When U Nu became the Prime Minister of the newly independent Burma, he asked Thant to join him in Rangoon and appointed him as Director of Broadcasting in 1948. In the following year he was appointed Secretary to the Government of Burma in the Ministry of Information. From 1951 to 1957, Thant was Secretary to the Prime Minister. He also took part in a number of international conferences and was the secretary of the first Asian-African summit in 1955 at Bandung, Indonesia which gave birth to the Non-Aligned Movement.
From 1957 to 1961, he was Burma's Permanent Representative (Ambassador) to the United Nations, and became actively involved in negotiations over Algerian independence. In 1960 the Burmese government awarded him the title "Maha Thray Sithu" as a commander in the Pyidaungsu Sithu Thingaha Order (similar to an order of knights).
UN Secretary General.
Thant began serving as Acting Secretary-General from November 3 1961, when he was unanimously appointed by the General Assembly, on the recommendation of the Security Council, to fill the unexpired term of Dag Hammarskjöld. He was then unanimously appointed Secretary-General by the General Assembly on November 30 1962 for a term of office ending on November 3 1966. During this first term he was widely credited for his role in defusing the Cuban Missile Crisis and for ending the civil war in the Congo.
U Thant was appointed to a second term as Secretary-General of the United Nations by the General Assembly on December 2 1966 on the unanimous recommendation of the Security Council. His term of office continued until December 31 1971, when he retired. During his time in office, he oversaw the entry into the UN of dozens of new Asian and African states and was a firm opponent of apartheid in South Africa. He also established many of the UN's development and environmental agencies, funds and programmes, including the UN Development Programme (UNDP), the UN University, UNCTAD, UNITAR and the UN Environmental Programme.
He had also led many successful though now largely forgotten peace making efforts, for example in Yemen in 1962 and Bahrain in 1968. In each case, war would have provoked a wider regional conflict, and it was Thant's quiet mediation which prevented war.
Unlike his two predecessors, Thant retired after ten years on speaking terms with all the big powers. In 1961 when he was first appointed, the Soviet Union had tried to insist on a "troika" formula of three Secretaries-General, one representing each Cold War bloc, something which would have maintained equality in the United Nations between the superpowers. By 1966, when Thant was reappointed, all the big powers, in a unanimous vote of the Security Council, affirmed the importance of the Secretary-Generalship and his good offices, a clear tribute to Thant's work.
The Six Day War between Arab countries and Israel, the Prague Spring and subsequent Soviet invasion of Czechoslovakia, and the Indo-Pakistani War of 1971 leading to the birth of Bangladesh all took place during his time as Secretary-General.
He was widely criticized in the US and Israel for agreeing to pull UN troops out of the Sinai in 1967 in response to a request from Egyptian President Nasser. U Thant tried to persuade Nasser not to go to war with Israel by flying to Cairo in a last minute peace effort.
His once good relationship with the US government deteriorated rapidly when he publicly criticized American conduct of the Vietnam War. His secret attempts at direct peace talks between Washington and Hanoi were eventually rejected by the Johnson Administration.
Thant followed unidentified flying object reports with some interest; in 1967, he arranged for American atmospheric physicist Dr. James E. McDonald to speak before the UN's Outer Space Affairs Group regarding UFOs.
On January 23 1971 U Thant categorically announced that he would "under no circumstances" be available for a third term as Secretary-General. For many weeks, the UN Security Council was deadlocked over the search for a successor before finally settling on Kurt Waldheim to succeed U Thant as Secretary-General on December 21, 1971 — Waldheim's 53rd birthday — and just ten days before U Thant's second term was to have ended.
In his farewell address to the United Nations General Assembly Secretary-General U Thant stated that he felt a 'great sense of relief bordering on liberation' on relinquishing the 'burdens of office'. In an editorial published around December 27, 1971 praising U Thant, "The New York Times" stated that "the wise counsel of this dedicated man of peace will still be needed after his retirement". The editorial was entitled "The Liberation of U Thant".
Death.
U Thant died of lung cancer in New York on November 25 1974. By this time Burma was ruled by a military junta which refused him any honors. The then Burmese President Ne Win was envious of U Thant's international stature and the respect that was accorded him by the Burmese populace. Ne Win also resented U Thant's close links with the democratic government of U Nu which Ne Win had overthrown in a coup d'etat on March 2 1962. Ne Win ordered that U Thant be buried without any official involvement or ceremony.
From the United Nations headquarters in New York, U Thant's body was flown back to Rangoon but no guard of honour or high ranking officials were on hand at the airport when the coffin arrived.
On the day of U Thant's funeral on December 5 1974, tens of thousands of people lined the streets of Rangoon to pay their last respects to their distinguished countryman whose coffin was displayed at Rangoon's Kyaikasan race course for a few hours before the scheduled burial.
The coffin of U Thant was then snatched by a group of students just before it was scheduled to leave for burial in an ordinary Rangoon cemetery. The student demonstrators buried U Thant on the former grounds of the Rangoon University Students Union (RUSU), which Ne Win had dynamited and destroyed on July 8 1962.
During the period of December 5 through December 11 1974, the student demonstrators also built a temporary mausoleum for U Thant on the grounds of the RUSU and gave anti-government speeches. In the early morning hours of December 11, 1974, government troops stormed the campus, killed some of the students guarding the make-shift mausoleum, removed U Thant's coffin, and reburied it at the foot of the Shwedagon Pagoda, where it has continued to lie.
Upon hearing of the storming of the Rangoon University campus and the forcible removal of U Thant's coffin, many people rioted in the streets of Rangoon. Martial law was declared in Rangoon and the surrounding metropolitan areas. What has come to be known as the U Thant crisis — the student-led protests over the shabby treatment by the Ne Win government of U Thant — was crushed by the Burmese government.
In 1978, U Thant's memoirs "View from the UN" was published, by the American publishing house Doubleday.

Javier Pérez de Cuéllar
Javier Pérez de Cuéllar Guerra (born January 19, 1920 in Lima) is a Peruvian diplomat who was the fifth Secretary-General of the United Nations from January 1 1982 to December 31 1991. He studied in Colegio San Agustín of Lima, and then at Pontificia Universidad Católica del Perú.
In 1995, he ran unsuccessfully against Alberto Fujimori for President of Peru. He was President of the Council of Ministers, as well as Minister of Foreign Affairs from November 2000 until July 2001, during the turbulent period following Fujimori's resignation over corruption charges. In September 2004, he stepped down from his position as Peru's Ambassador to France. When Kurt Waldheim died in June 2007, he became the oldest living former Secretary General of the United Nations.
Diplomatic career.
Pérez de Cuéllar joined the Ministry of Foreign Affairs in 1940 and the diplomatic service in 1944, serving subsequently as Secretary at Peru's embassies in France, where he met and married his first wife, the former Yvette Roberts; the United Kingdom, Bolivia, and Brazil. He later served as ambassador to Switzerland, the Soviet Union, (concurrently in Poland), and Venezuela. From his first marriage, Mr. Perez de Cuellar has a son, (Francisco, b. Paris), and a daughter, Agueda Cristina (b. London).
He was a junior member of the Peruvian delegation to the General Assembly at its first session - held in London in 1946-, and a member of the delegations to the 25th through 30th sessions of the Assembly. In 1971, he was appointed permanent representative of Peru to the United Nations, and he led his country's delegation to all sessions of the Assembly from then until 1975.
In 1973 and 1974, he represented his country in the Security Council, serving as its President at the time of the events in Cyprus in July 1974. On 18 September 1975, he was appointed Special Representative of the Secretary-General in Cyprus – a post he held until December 1977-, when he rejoined the Peruvian Foreign Service. During his time in Cyprus, Mr. Perez de Cuellar married his current wife, the former Marcela Temple Seminario.
United Nations Secretary-General.
On December 31 1981, Pérez de Cuéllar followed Kurt Waldheim as Secretary-General and was re-elected for a second term in October 1986. During his two terms, he led mediations between Britain and Argentina in the aftermath of the Falklands War and promoted the efforts of the Contadora Group to bring peace and stability to Central America. He also interceded in the negotiations for the independence of Namibia, the conflict in Western Sahara between Morocco and the Polisario Front, and the Cyprus issue.
Shortly before the end of his second term, he was unofficially requested by members of the Security Council to run for a third term of two years,to give time for a successor to be found.

Boutros Boutros-Ghali
Boutros Boutros-Ghali (Arabic: بطرس بطرس غالي, Coptic: Bουτρος Βουτρος-Γαλι) (born November 14, 1922) is an Egyptian diplomat who was the sixth Secretary-General of the United Nations from January 1992 to December 1996.
Egyptian political career.
He had long been closely associated with the ruling party in Egypt. His political career took off during the days of former president Anwar El-Sadat. He was a member of the Central Committee of the Arab Socialist Union (1974-77). He had served as Egypt's Minister of State for Foreign Affairs from 1977 until early 1991. He then became Deputy Minister for Foreign Affairs for several months before moving to the UN. As Minister of State for Foreign Affairs, he played a part in the peace agreements between Egyptian President Anwar Sadat and Israeli Prime Minister Menachem Begin.
UN career.
Elected to the top post of the UN in 1991, Boutros-Ghali's term in office remains controversial. He was criticised for the UN's failure to act during the 1994 Rwandan Genocide, which officially left about 937,000 people dead, and he appeared unable to muster support in the UN for intervention in the continuing Angolan Civil War. One of the hardest periods for his office during his term was dealing with the crisis of the Yugoslav wars after the disintegration of former Yugoslavia. His reputation thus became entangled in the larger controversies over the effectiveness of the UN and the role of the United States in the UN. For his detractors, he came to symbolise the UN's alleged inaction in the face of humanitarian crises.
Second term.
In 1996, ten Security Council members, led by African members Egypt, Guinea-Bissau and Botswana, sponsored a resolution backing Boutros-Ghali for a second five-year term, until the year 2001. However, the United States vetoed a second term for Boutros-Ghali. In addition to the United States, the United Kingdom, Poland, South Korea, and Italy did not sponsor this resolution, although all four of those nations voted in support of Boutros-Ghali after the US had firmly declared its intention to veto. Although not the first vetoed (China vetoed the third term of Kurt Waldheim in 1981), Boutros-Ghali was the first and only UN secretary-general not to be elected to a second term in office. He was succeeded at the UN by Kofi Annan.
US counter-terrorism czar Richard Clarke, Michael Sheehan, and Jamie Rubin participated in what they called "Operation Orient Express." From page 201 of Clarke's book Against All Enemies: "Albright and I and a handful of others (Michael Sheehan, Jamie Rubin) had entered into a pact together in 1996 to oust Boutros-Ghali as Secretary General of the United Nations, a secret plan we had called Operation Orient Express, reflecting our hope that many nations would join us in doing in the UN head. In the end, the US had to do it alone (with its UN veto) and Sheehan and I had to prevent the President from giving in to pressure from world leaders and extending Boutros-Ghali's tenure, often by our racing to the Oval Office when we were alerted that a head of state was telephoning the President. In the end Clinton was impressed that we had managed not only to oust Boutros-Ghali but to have Kofi Annan selected to replace him. (Clinton told Sheehan and me, 'Get me a crow, I should eat a crow, because I said you would never pull it off.')"
Later life.
From 1997 to 2002 Boutros-Ghali was Secretary-General of La Francophonie, an organisation of French-speaking nations. From 2003 to 2006, he served as the Chairman of the Board of the South Centre, intergovernmental research organisation of developing countries. He is currently President of the Curatorium Administrative Council at the Hague Academy of International Law. In 2003 Boutros-Ghali was appointed as The Director of the Egyptian National Council of Human Rights, he is still holding this position till today.
Since April 2007 Boutros-Ghali has supported the Campaign for the Establishment of a United Nations Parliamentary Assembly and was one of the initial signatories of the Campaign's appeal. In a to the Campaign, he stressed the necessity to establish democratic participation of citizens at the global level.

Robert I of France
Robert I (after September 866 – June 15, 923), king of West Francia (922 – 923), was the younger son of Robert the Strong, count of Anjou, and the brother of Odo of France. Robert I was at the Siege of Paris in 885. Robert had the title of "Dux Francorum". He did not call himself king of West Francia when his brother died in 898. Instead he served the Carolingian king, Charles the Simple and defended northern Francia from the attacks of the Norsemen.

Louis IV of France
Louis IV (920 – September 10, 954), was king of France from 936 to 954. He was a member of the Carolingian dynasty and was son of Charles III and Eadgifu of England.

Songs for Polarbears
"Songs for Polarbears" is the debut album by the alternative rock group Snow Patrol. It was released on August 31 1998. Gary Lightbody wrote all of the lyrics, and helped Mark McClelland and Jonny Quinn write the music. The name of the album is a reference to how Snow Patrol was once called 'Polar Bear', but changed their name.
"Songs for Polarbears" was re-released in 2006.

Starfighter Pilot
"Starfighter Pilot" was the debut, or first, EP from the alternative rock band Snow Patrol, and was finished in 1997. It was released on the Electric Honey record label. The song "Starfighter Pilot" was also put on the band's first full-length album, "Songs for Polarbears".

Final Straw
"Final Straw" is the third full-length album by the alternative rock band Snow Patrol. It was released in the United Kingdom in 2003 and in the United States in 2004, under Polydor Records. Gary Lightbody wrote all of the lyrics, and wrote the music with Nathan Connolly, Mark McClelland and Jonny Quinn. The album was the first by Snow Patrol to become popular outside Northern Ireland and Scotland. "Final Straw" was re-released in the UK in 2004 with two extra tracks, and then was able to be bought in the U.S. without the bonus tracks.

Eyes Open
"Eyes Open" is the fourth full-length album by the alternative rock band Snow Patrol. It was released May 1, 2006 internationally, and May 92006 in the United States. The "Special Edition" of the album has a bonus DVD with music videos of "You're All I Have". "Eyes Open was the best-selling album in the UK in 2006, and sold more than one and a half million copies.
History.
The album reached #1 in its 11th week on the New Zealand chart and reached 2x Platinum there for shipping over 30,000 units. In the UK, the album became 5x Platinum by the British Phonographic Industry. It has also reached #1 in the ARIA Albums Chart, and became 3x Platinum on January 8, 2007 (210,000+ units shipped). On November 26, 2006, it became the best-selling album of the year in the UK.
Track listing.
The untitled track is a recording of background noise and one of Jacknife Lee's young children talking.

David Cameron
David William Donald Cameron (born 9 October, 1966) is the Leader of the Conservative Party and also Leader of the Opposition in the United Kingdom.
He is the Conservative MP for the Witney UK Constituency.

Jörg Haider
Jörg Haider (26 January 1950 - October 11, 2008) was an Austrian politician that was often called to be off right-populism("rechtspopulist"). He was born in Bad Goisern, Upper Austria, and died near Klagenfurt, Austria.
At the age of 29 he became the youngest member of the Austrian parliament and in 1989 the Governor of Carinthia for the first time.
Haider lead the Freedom Party to great success so that in 1999 the party reached the second most votes with 27% behind the SPÖ with 33% and could form a coalition with the Austrian People's Party ÖVP (having for the first time only the third most votes) making Wolfgang Schüssel Chancellor of Austria.
Jörg Haider passed his leading position to other party members so that a coalition could take place and returned to Carinthia to work as Governor again.
In 2004 Haider was re-elected as Governor of Carinthia. One year later the leading members of the FPÖ as well as there party members in the government together with Jörg Haider (as there new head) founded a new Party, the BZÖ. In 2006 the BZÖ party reached the 4% (that time lead under P. Westenthaler) in the Austrian elections and so became part of the Parliament with 7 representatives.
For the snap elections in September 2008 he was voted unanimity in his party for the leading position and ran as candidate again for the elections like back in the nineties. Surprisingly the party gained 10.7% and therefore could rise its seats 3 times now having 21 representatives under the lead of Jörg Haider. However Haider promised before the votes toke place too remain Governor as he would have only changed as of becoming Chancellor. There were possibilities to build a government with Jörg Haider as chancellor (Haider already achieved to form a coalition where the ÖVP under Schüssel with the 3rd most votes got the Chancellor) or at least the BZÖ represented in the government.
For this a cooperation of BZÖ with FPÖ and ÖVP (possibly resulting in a fusion of BZÖ with Haiders Ex-Party FPÖ) was necessary, however Haider never got into this position.
On October 11, 2008 Haider died in a traffic accident near the town of Klagenfurt. He was returning home after an event that had taken place earlier. Many people living in Carinthia in reaction to his death, left public offerings as flowers, candles, cards and personal messages, austrian singer and intendant Harald Serafin called the tragic death even an "Austro-Lady-Diana-Story".

Bo Pelini
Mark "Bo" Pelini (born December 13, 1967) is the head football coach at the University of Nebraska–Lincoln. Before that, he was the defensive coordinator for the LSU Tigers. On December 2, 2007, one day after coaching in the 2007 SEC Championship Game, Pelini was named as head coach at Nebraska by athletic director Tom Osborne.

Michael Bloomberg
Michael Bloomberg (born February 14, 1942) is an American businessman and politician. He is the current mayor of New York City.

Linda Lingle
Linda Lingle (born Linda Cutter on June 4, 1953) is the current governor of Hawaii. She is a republican.

George M. Dallas
George Mifflin Dallas (July 10, 1792 – December 31, 1864) was a Senator for the United States from Pennsylvania and later served under James K. Polk as the eleventh Vice President of the United States.
Dallas was born in Philadelphia and graduated from the College of New Jersey (now the Princeton University) in 1810.

William R. King
William Rufus deVane King (April 7, 1786 – April 18, 1853) was a U.S. Representative from North Carolina, a Senator from Alabama, and the thirteenth Vice President of the United States. Excluding John Tyler and Andrew Johnson — both of whom ascended to the Presidency — he was the shortest-serving person to occupy that office (45 days, "see List of U.S. Vice Presidents by time in office").

John C. Breckinridge
John Cabell Breckinridge (January 16, 1821 – May 17, 1875) was a lawyer, Representative, Senator for the United States and the Vice President of the United States. He was also a Southern Democratic candidate for President in 1860, a American Civil War general for the Confederates, and the last Confederate Secretary of War. Breckinridge is the youngest vice president in U.S. history, starting at age 36. He was the Confederate commander at the Battle of New Market.

Hannibal Hamlin
Hannibal Hamlin (August 27, 1809–July 4, 1891) was a politician from Maine. Hamlin served as a lawmaker in Maine, Governor of Maine, in the U.S. House of Representatives, and in the U.S. Senate. He began his career as a Democrat but later became a Republican. He was the first Republican to serve as Vice President of the United States, elected as Abraham Lincoln's Vice President in the 1860 presidential election.
Early life.
Hamlin was born in Paris, Maine. He was a descendant of James Hamlin who had lived in the Massachusetts Bay Colony in 1639. He attended the area's schools, and later managed his father's farm. For the next few years he worked at several jobs. He studied law. He lived in Hampden, where he practiced law until 1848, when he moved away.

Eliot Spitzer
Eliot Laurence Spitzer (born June 10, 1959) is an American lawyer and politician of the Democratic Party. He served as New York State Attorney General before becoming Governor of New York in 2007.
He is no longer Governor, having resigned on March 18 due to a prostitution incident. David Paterson is now Governor. He was lieutenant Governor for Spitzer.

Franz Joseph I of Austria
Franz Joseph I (in Hungarian I. Ferenc József, in English Francis Joseph I) (August 18, 1830 – November 21, 1916) of the Habsburg Dynasty was Emperor of Austria, King of Hungary, King of Bohemia from 1848 until 1916. His 68-year reign is the second-longest in the recorded history of Europe (after that of Johannes II, Prince of Liechtenstein).

Pan's Labyrinth
"Pan's Labyrinth" (, literally "The Labyrinth of the Faun") is an Academy Award-winning Spanish language fantasy movie written and directed by Mexican movie-maker Guillermo del Toro.
"Pan's Labyrinth" takes place in two places, known as a duel setting: in the "real world" the story is set in Spain during the time period shortly after the Spanish Civil War, and tells a story of a girl named Ofelia who is given three tasks by a mysterious faun. Meanwhile, her stepfather, the Falangist Captain Vidal, hunts the Spanish Maquis, guerrillas who continued fighting the Franco regime in the region, as her pregnant mother grows ill. The alternate setting is a secret "fantasy world" that Ofelia enters through an overgrown labyrinth garden, where she meets all manner of strange and magical creatures who become central to her story. The movie uses make-up, puppetry, and CGI effects to create its creatures.
The director of this movie, Del Toro said that he thinks the story to be a fable, influenced by fairy tales, and that it focuses on and continues themes related to his earlier movie "The Devil's Backbone", a spiritual sequel, though not an actual sequel. The original Spanish title refers to the mythological fauns of Greek mythology, while the English title refers specifically to the faun-like Greek god Pan (intended to help English-speakers differentiate the title from the term fawn). However, Del Toro has stated that the faun in the movie is not Pan.
The movie was first shown at the 2006 Cannes Film Festival. It was released in the United Kingdom on November 24, 2006. In the United States and Canada, the movie was given a limited release on December 29, 2006, with a nationwide release on January 19, 2007. "Pan's Labyrinth" has won numerous international awards, including three Academy Awards, the Ariel Award for Best Picture, and the 2007 Hugo Award for Best Dramatic Presentation, Long Form.

John A. Macdonald
Sir John Alexander Macdonald, (January 11, 1815 – June 6, 1891) was the first Prime Minister of Canada and the dominant figure of Canadian Confederation. Macdonald's time in office spanned 19 years. So he was the second longest serving Prime Minister of Canada. He is the only Canadian Prime Minister who won six majority governments. He was for a national railway that should link Canada from the Atlantic to the Pacific Oceans. That was completed in 1885.

Hans Luther
Hans Luther (10 March 1879 - 11 May 1962) was a German politician and Chancellor of Germany. He was born in Berlin and started in politics by becoming the town councillor in Magdeburg.

Democratic-Republican Party
The Democratic-Republican Party was founded by Thomas Jefferson and James Madison in 1792. It became the dominant political party until the 1820s, when it split into competing factions, one of which became the modern-day Democratic Party. Its members spoke of the party as the Republicans, Jeffersonians, Democrats, or combinations of these (Jeffersonian republicans, etc.).
Jefferson and Madison created the party in order to oppose the economic and foreign policies of the Federalists, a party created a year or so earlier by Treasury Secretary Alexander Hamilton. Foreign policy issues were central; the party opposed the Jay Treaty of 1794 with Britain (then at war with France) and supported good relations with France before 1801. The party was against many of Hamilton's proposals concerning the Constitution.

Federalist Party
The Federalist Party (or Federal Party) was an American political party in the period 1792 to 1816. The Federalists controlled the federal government until 1801. The party was formed by Alexander Hamilton, who, during George Washington's first term, built a network of supporters, largely urban, to support his finacial policies. These supporters grew into the Federalist Party, which wanted a fiscally sound and strong nationalistic government and was opposed by the Democratic-Republicans.
With the start of the new government under the Constitution, President George Washington appointed his former chief of staff, Alexander Hamilton, to the office of Secretary of the Treasury. Hamilton wanted a strong national government with financial credibility.
By 1790 Hamilton started building a nationwide coalition. He his network of treasury agents to link together friends of the government, especially merchants and bankers, in the new nation's dozen major cities. His attempts to manage politics in the national capital to get his plans through Congress, then, "brought strong responses across the country. In the process, what began as a capital faction soon assumed status as a national faction and then, finally, as the new Federalist party."

Infinity on High
"Infinity on High" is a 2007 album by Fall Out Boy. Five singles have been released from it. They are This Ain't a Scene, It's an Arms Race, The Carpal Tunnel of Love, Thnks fr th Mmrs, "The Take Over, the Breaks Over" and I'm Like a Lawyer with the Way I'm Always Trying to Get You off (Me & You).
Track listing.
All songs written by Fall Out Boy, except when noted.

Donald Tusk
Donald Tusk (, born 22 April 1957, Gdańsk) is the Prime Minister of Poland (from 2007). He is also the leader of the biggest Polish political party, Platforma Obywatelska (Civic Platform).

Sound of the Underground
"Sound of the Underground" was a 2003 album by Girls Aloud. It was their first album. It was released in May 2003.
Songs on the album.
The album was released again in December 2003. It had other songs too.

What Will the Neighbours Say?
"What Will The Neighbours Say?" was a 2004 album by Girls Aloud. It was their second album.

Tangled Up
"Tangled Up" was a 2007 album by Girls Aloud. It was their fifth album.

Ken Hitchcock
Ken Hitchcock (born December 17, 1951 in Edmonton, Alberta) is a NHL ice hockey coach. He coaches the Columbus Blue Jackets. He has also coached the Dallas Stars and the Philadelphia Flyers in the past. Ken has won one Stanley Cup with the Dallas Stars in the 1998-99 NHL season.

The Beatles (album)
"The Beatles" is a 1968 album by the band of the same name, The Beatles. Its cover included no photographs, but was a simple white jacket, with the band's name die-stamped onto the paper. Early copies also included a serial number. The plain white cover led fans and listeners to call the record the "White Album". In time, even the band and their company, Apple Corps, began to use this name.
"The Beatles" was the band's twelfth album of new recordings, and was released in November 1968. While most albums of the time included ten to fourteen songs, "The Beatles" included thirty-four songs, and was sold as a two-disc set.
Origins.
The Beatles began writing songs for the album while they were in India, taking a teaching course in Transcendental Meditation taught by the Maharishi Mahesh Yogi in Rishikesh. They planned to become gurus, or spiritual teachers, and use their music to spread Transcendental Meditation to a wide audience. Their helpers back in England looked after their business matters, so the Beatles could have time to study, and to think about what they learned. They released a new single, "Lady Madonna", just before they left for India, so they would not be missed by their fans while they were away.
Between classes and meditation sessions, the Beatles had plenty of free time. They brought some instruments with them, including acoustic guitars, and began to write new songs. "We wrote "tons" of songs in India," John Lennon later told "Playboy" magazine. Their wives and girlfriends also came along to India. Lennon and his wife Cynthia did not spend much time together. He would leave alone in the morning, to pick up the mail. It turned out he was receiving letters and postcards from Yoko Ono, a Japanese artist friend, and did not want Cynthia to know. He said later that while he was in India, he began to think about Ono "as a woman, not just an intellectual woman", and that he might want a romantic relationship with her.
In the end, none of the Beatles finished the course, and returned home to England. Ringo Starr did not like the spicy food served at the ashram where the Maharishi lived and taught, and it made him ill. He also missed his children. Paul McCartney became tired of the long sessions, and wanted to return home. Lennon and George Harrison heard stories that the Maharishi had flirted with Mia Farrow (an American actress who also took the course), and other women at the ashram. They did not think this was right for a "holy man" to do. They confronted the Maharishi, and later left with their wives to go home, deciding the Maharishi was a fraud.
Apple Corps.
The Beatles had formed their own company, Apple Corps, before they went to India. When they returned, they went to work full-time to make Apple Corps, and especially its record label, Apple Records, a success. To raise money, the Beatles had signed a new recording contract with EMI, the company who owned Parlophone Records, which made and sold their records. They also made an agreement with EMI for them to market Apple Records.
The Beatles needed to record seventy new songs within nine years, between 1967 and 1976, to complete their contract. They believed that once they delivered those seventy recordings, they would be free to go to another record company. Between all the songs they wrote in India, and their backlog of older songs, they knew they could finish the job. They recorded demoes of many of the songs at George Harrison's house, using his four-track tape recorder, then began work on the album at Abbey Road Studios in London.
The Beatles's record producer, George Martin, thought they should take the best of the India songs, and make one especially good album. The Beatles instead decided to make a double album, with as many songs on it as possible, to help finish their contract quickly.
Personal changes.
The lives of the individual Beatles changed greatly during 1968, and the making of the "White Album". Paul McCartney was engaged to actress Jane Asher, but she came home early one day and found him with another woman, Francine Schwartz, an American who worked for Apple Corps. She and McCartney fought, then made up, but decided to break up later. McCartney also began to use cocaine. The drug made him hard to get along with. Later in the year he met another woman, Linda Eastman, an American photographer who had a daughter. McCartney loved children and wanted to start a family, while Jane Asher wanted to put her acting career first. Linda boasted that she would be proud to have McCartney's children. She and McCartney became very close, very quickly.
John Lennon invited Yoko Ono to his house, while Cynthia was away on a vacation with friends, one weekend in May. The two spent a night together in Lennon's attic studio, listening to his avant-garde recordings and finally making one of their own. Lennon discovered Ono was "as barmy (crazy) as I was", and that they connected personally in a way he and Cynthia never had. They finished the recording, and had intercourse as the sun rose that morning. They woke up late the next day, in love with each other, and decided to stay together from then on, even though they were both married to other people. Lennon's wife Cynthia and Ono's husband Anthony Cox both took the news very hard, with their children (Lennon's son Julian by Cynthia, and Ono's daughter Kyoko by Cox) caught in the middle.
George Harrison had grown as a musician and songwriter, and as a celebrity. He was the youngest member of the Beatles, and always felt "under the thumb" of Lennon and McCartney. They and George Martin limited how many of Harrison's songs the Beatles recorded, and turned down many of his songs that other bands would be happy to record. This frustrated Harrison. Almost nobody outside the Beatles knew about the situation. Friends like Ravi Shankar, who was Harrison's first real music teacher, and Eric Clapton, a phenomenal guitarist himself, treated him differently. Most of the public saw Harrison as an equal with Lennon and McCartney. Harrison began to think about making his own music, away from the Beatles.
Back at Abbey Road, Ringo Starr felt out of place during the recording sessions, and that he was not needed. Paul McCartney had not liked Starr's drumming on a song, and re-recorded the part himself when Starr was not there. This hurt Starr's feelings, and he decided to leave the band. He stayed home for a week, playing with his children and deciding what he should do next with his life. The other Beatles missed him, and invited him back. When Starr returned, McCartney and Harrison had covered his drums with flowers and welcome-back messages. Starr felt loved by his bandmates, and stayed.
The changes in the band's personal lives showed in their new recordings. Instead of sounding like a band working together, the songs sounded like solo artists working with a backing group. They also began to have problems getting along. Lennon brought Ono to the studio whenever he came, breaking a rule they had never to bring wives or girlfriends to sessions. Ono, who was also a musician, spoke her mind about how the music sounded, and it took everyone else by surprise. Harrison also began to speak up more for himself, when the band played together.
Outside the studio, people who worked for the Beatles, and the Beatles's fans in England, did not like Ono's influence on Lennon, and let the couple know often, and sometimes loudly. When they attended a play based on Lennon's writings, the audience harassed the pair, asking "Where's your wife, John?" Some members of the public made racist comments about Ono, or called her ugly.
Ono's new presence in Lennon's life even drove a wedge between him and McCartney. When the couple stayed at McCartney's house, McCartney left Lennon a note that insulted Ono greatly. He admitted later it had only been a joke, but Lennon felt like he no longer even knew McCartney, if he could make such an insult.
Neither Lennon nor Ono could believe the way they were treated by the public, by people who worked for the Beatles, and even by Lennon's friends. They felt hurt and hated. A friend suggested they try heroin, to relieve the pain they felt. Before long, the two were addicted to the drug. It caused problems with their health, and with how they acted in public.
"Hey Jude" and "Revolution".
Recording the "White Album" took much longer than the Beatles normally spent on an album. Their label, Apple Records, was expected to make a big debut over the summer, while the album would not be ready until at least that fall. In the meantime, they recorded songs for a single, as their part of the debut. Paul McCartney visited Cynthia and Julian, at their new home. He knew they were hurt by Lennon's leaving Cynthia for Yoko Ono, and he made up a song for Julian on the way, to cheer him up. Its words went "Hey Jules, it's not so bad. Take a sad song, and make it better." This turned into "Hey Jude", which became the Beatles's biggest hit single ever, and one of the first pop songs to last longer than three minutes.
The B-side of "Hey Jude" was "Revolution", a song by Lennon in reaction to the Soviet Union's crackdown on student protests in Czechoslovakia, the ongoing war in Vietnam, and calls around the world for a revolution against the status quo. He hoped the band's first recording of the song would become their next single, but it was rejected as too slow and too long. He re-recorded the song, faster this time, lying on the studio floor to give the vocals more "punch". "Hey Jude" was seen as a bigger potential hit though, so "Revolution" became the B-side. The Beatles performed both songs live for an audience, and the performances appeared on "The David Frost Show" in England, and "The Smothers Brothers Comedy Hour" in America.
Album songs.
The songs appearing on the "White Album" included "Back In The USSR", McCartney's parody of songs by The Beach Boys and Chuck Berry. (Mike Love of the Beach Boys attended the Maharishi's course in India, at the same time as the Beatles.) McCartney normally played bass guitar, and Lennon rhythm guitar, on Beatles recordings, but this time McCartney played piano, with Lennon switching to bass guitar for the song.
"Dear Prudence" was about Mia Farrow's sister Prudence, who was also at the ashram in India. She spent long stretches of time meditating, and almost never came outside. Lennon wrote the song hoping to bring her out, to spend time with everyone. The guitar style he used on the song (and many songs afterwards) was the "clawhammer", a fingerpicking technique he learned from Donovan, another musician who went to India with them.
"Glass Onion" referenced recent songs and events in the Beatles's lives, and gave a false clue: "The Walrus was Paul". Lennon said later he'd given the line as a joke, and as a way to "say hi to Paul" McCartney. "The Continuing Story of Bungalow Bill" was about another of the Maharishi's students, who left the ashram to hunt tigers, then returned to meditate. "Julia" was about Lennon's mother, who had died ten years earlier, with images of Yoko Ono, whose name means "Ocean Child" in English.
"Sexy Sadie" was about Lennon's disappointment with the Maharishi: "You made a fool of everyone." He changed "Maharishi" to "Sexy Sadie", in case the Maharishi really could use some kind of spiritual or cosmic power (or start a lawsuit) against him, but later confessed to "Rolling Stone" magazine who the song was about.
"Ob-La-Di, Ob-La-Da" was a retro song by McCartney. His songs on the album varied from old-fashioned to hard rock, such as "Helter Skelter", which was about a fairground ride. He also used fingerpicking styles on acoustic guitar, and his songs "Blackbird" and "Mother Nature's Son" included nature themes.
"While My Guitar Gently Weeps" showed Harrison's growth as a songwriter, and featured a guitar solo by Eric Clapton. It was the first time a guitar solo was played by a non-Beatle on a Beatles record. "Long Long Long" was about Harrison's rediscovery of God and spirituality as he became older. "Savoy Truffle" was about a box of Good News chocolate candies, which Clapton loved, but were harming his teeth.
Ringo Starr had tinkered with writing songs, but most were just variations on songs written by other people. "Don't Pass Me By" was one of his first efforts, from years earlier, and one of his first to sound original. He went on to write many other songs, in the years after the Beatles. Most were written with a partner, Vini Poncia.
The strangest recording included on the album was "Revolution 9", an avant-garde "picture of a revolution as it happens", as Lennon described later. George Harrison helped with ideas and narration. McCartney and George Martin did not want the track included on the album, but Lennon insisted it be used.
Release and reception.
When the recordings were ready to be mastered, Lennon and McCartney spent forty-eight hours at Abbey Road Studios, working out the running order for the songs on the album. They took stimulant drugs to help them get through the marathon session. The band had done photo sessions during the year, but could not agree on any photos to use for the cover. They decided to go with a plain white cover, which had never been done before. They and their helpers made a collage of different photos, which was included as a poster with the album. Portrait photos of each member were also taken. Black-and-white prints appeared next to the song titles on the inner jacket, and colour prints were included with the poster. They did not appear together in the pictures, and this was taken later as a sign that the band was growing apart.
The album was completed, and scheduled to be released during November 1968. Coming out at nearly the same time were two "solo albums" by Lennon and Harrison, and this caused some problems. Harrison's was "Wonderwall Music", a soundtrack album to the movie "Wonderwall" by director Joe Massot. Harrison had recorded parts of the album in India, and parts in England. The only other Beatle involved with the album was Ringo Starr, who played drums on a few songs, and attended the movie's premiere with Harrison.
Lennon's album with Ono was "Two Virgins", edited down from the recording he made with Yoko Ono the first night they were together. The cover was a pair of nude photos of the couple, and it caused a lot of controversy. EMI was willing to master and press the album, but refused to print the cover or distribute any copies. Apple Records arranged for Track Records, a label owned by The Who, to issue "Two Virgins". The album was sold in a "plain brown wrapper" like pornography, and was not a hit. Only a few copies were pressed in Britain, and more copies were impounded in America than were sold. Many people thought Lennon was trying to destroy his own public image, releasing such an album. In a way they were right. He felt that the album was an honest statement of who he "really was", appearing naked with the woman he loved.
Problems aside, "The Beatles" sold well, and was another hit for the band. The Beatles held a release party, and gave early copies of the album to people who attended. (Peter Shotton, an old friend of Lennon's who worked for Apple, was given the eighth copy pressed, as he remembered later in his memoir.) Older people liked McCartney's traditional-sounding songs. Younger listeners liked the rock and acoustic songs on the album. Many people noticed Harrison and Starr's growth as songwriters, and that Harrison's voice sounded freer, smoother, and more confident than on earlier records.
Charles Manson, an American would-be musician with a small group of followers, heard the album in California, and thought the songs "Blackbird" and "Helter Skelter" were calls for a racial war, between African-American (black) and Caucasian (white) people. His beliefs resulted in a series of murders in Los Angeles during 1969, as he ordered members of his "Manson Family" to try to spark such a war, by committing hate crimes. Later during his trial, his lawyers tried to get John Lennon (staying in California at the time) or George Harrison to testify, but this never happened. Manson and four Family members were convicted of multiple murder. They were sentenced to be executed, but when the US Supreme Court overturned the death penalty, their sentences were changed to life imprisonment. None have ever been paroled.
During 1969, Allen Klein began to work for the Beatles, and for Apple Corps. He re-read the Beatles's recording contract, and pointed out that even after the band turned in their seventy new recordings to EMI, they were still under contract with them until 1976, and could not go to any other record company until then. The fact that they were so close to meeting the requirement, though, made it possible for him to re-negotiate their contract, and get them higher royalty payments.
The personal problems that had begun to show while the Beatles were making the "White Album" continued over the next year, as did problems with Apple Corps. McCartney stopped using cocaine, while Lennon and Ono tried to stop using heroin, but this did not help mend feelings between the Beatles. They finished two more albums, "Let it Be" and "Abbey Road", but the band broke apart soon afterwards, with Paul McCartney announcing in 1970 that he was starting a solo career.
In time, budget cutbacks resulted in the album's cover no longer being die-stamped (the title was printed instead) or numbered, but when it was re-issued on compact disc, early copies were again given serial numbers.

Enoch Powell
Enoch Powell (June 16, 1912 – February 8, 1998) was a British politician in the Conservative Party. He was a government minister in the 1950s and early 1960s. He made a speech in 1968 in which he said that if the United Kingdom let too many black people to come and live there, there would be fighting. In 1974 he left the Conservative Party and became an MP in Northern Ireland.

All We Know Is Falling
"All We Know Is Falling" is the debut album the band Paramore. It was recorded in just three weeks. In April 2006, the CD was released in the UK. In 2005, a Japanese version was released, with the bonus track "O, Star".
Music videos.
Paramore released three videos from their debut album. The first was for the single "All We Know", followed by "Pressure", and "Emergency".

Óscar Arias
Oscar Arias, born on 13 September 1940 in the city of Heredia, is the current President of Costa Rica. He was also president from 1986-1990. He received the Nobel Peace Prize in 1987 for his efforts to end civil wars which were happening in several Central American countries.
Arias started on his political career in the 1970's.
In January of 2005 Arias was selected as the candidate for the National Liberation party, and he is reelected for president of Costa Rica from 2006-2010. There was a lot of polemic and criticism for his support towards the TLC process in Costa Rica, but because of his political background and determination, most Costa Ricans still trust and respect Arias and his decisions for the well-being of the country.
He is also a recipient of the Albert Schweitzer Prize for Humanitarianism and a trustee of the Economists for Peace and Security.

WWE Intercontinental Championship
The World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE) Intercontinental Championship is a professional wrestling championship in World Wrestling Entertainment. It is the first secondary title of WWE. Currently, it is the second highest ranked championship on the Raw brand.
History.
The WWE Intercontinental Championship was first known as the World Wrestling Federation (WWF) Intercontinental Championship, until the WWE/WWF 2002 Lawsuit. Following the title's introduction in 1979, Pat Patterson became the inaugural champion on September 15. The title's creation came as a result of Patterson defeating Ted DiBiase to win the WWF North American Championship and defending the title in a fictional tournament held in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil to be unified with a South American Championship.
In March 2001, the World Wrestling Federation bought World Championship Wrestling. Soon after, "The Invasion" took place in which the ECW Alliance was ultimately dismantled. At Survivor Series 2001, the title was unified with the WCW United States Championship. The United States Champion, Edge, won against the Intercontinental Champion, Test, and became the new Intercontinental Champion while the United States Championship became inactive.
After the WWE name change in 2002, the championship became known as the WWE Intercontinental Championship'". It was then unified with the European Championship in a ladder match on July 22, and later the Hardcore Championship on August 26. The Intercontinental Champion, Rob Van Dam, won against the European Champion, Jeff Hardy, and the Hardcore Champion, Tommy Dreamer. As a result, Rob Van Dam was named the last European and Hardcore Champion. Then at No Mercy 2002, it was unified with the World Heavyweight Championship. The World Heavyweight Champion, Triple H, won against the Intercontinental Champion, Kane, and countinued to be the World Heavyweight Champion while the Intercontinental Championship became inactive. In May 2003, after fan protests of the retirement of the Intercontinental Title, the title was reactivated by RAW Co-General Manager, Stone Cold Steve Austin, and was recommissioned to be the secondary championship for the RAW brand. Shortly after, the WCW United States Championship was reactivated as the WWE United States Championship by the SmackDown! brand, making the Intercontinental Championship its equal counterpart for the RAW brand.
Current champion.
The Current Champion is William Regal] who beat Santino Marella for the title on "Raw" on November 10, 2008 in Manchester, England.

George IV of the United Kingdom
George IV (born as George Augustus Frederick on August 12 1762, died on June 26, 1830) was king of the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Ireland and Hanover from 29 January 1820 until his death. The Regency, George's nine-year time as "Prince Regent", which started in 1811 and ended with George III's death in 1820, included winning the Napoleonic Wars in Europe.

William IV of the United Kingdom
William IV (William Henry; 21 August 1765 – 20 June 1837) was King of the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Ireland and of Hanover from 26 June 1830 until his death. William, the third son of George III and younger brother and successor to George IV was the last king and monarch of the House of Hanover.

How Pop Can You Get?
How Pop Can You Get? was the first and only album by American band The Bats.
Track listing.
All music and lyrics by The Bats (Jon Brion, Bill Murphy, Don Fertman)

Beggars Banquet
"Beggars Banquet" is an album by British band The Rolling Stones.

José Figueres Ferrer
José Figueres Ferrer (September 25, 1906 - June 8, 1990 was president of Costa Rica three times.
Early years.
Also known as Don Pepe, José Figueres Ferrer was born in San Ramón, Alajuela, Costa Rica. His parents were from Cataluña, Spain: Mariano Rodríguez Borges and Francisca Ferrer Mendiola. Figueres entered the Primary Boys School in San Ramón of Alajuela in 1913. He got in Costa Rica’s Lyceum finishing his Secondary studies in 1920. He went to Boston, United States to travel and study. He returned to Costa Rica in 1928 and bought a coffee farm.
Civil war.
In 1942, Figueres made a speech on Latin America Radio. In this speach, he objected to the situation in Costa Rica under president Rafael Ángel Calderón. Because of this speach, he was arrested and forced to leave the country. Figueres return to Costa Rica in 1944. He started a political party, the Democratic Party. A main goal of the party was to go against Calderon's party, the National Republican Party. In 1948, supporters of Calderón caused problems with an election for president in which Calderón lost to Otilio Ulate. Because of this, the results of the election were not used. This led to the start of the civil war in 1948. In March 11, 1948, Don Pepe began a war to support the peoples decision at the previous election. Figueres and his troops won.
President of Costa Rica.
In the same year, José Figueres Ferrer became president of the Second Republic Founder Assembly. He became president of Costa Rica for the first time and eliminated the Costa Rica army. He became President of Costa Rica for the second time in 1953 winning the election with 65% of the votes. In 1970, he became Costa Rica’s President for the third time. Figueres died June 8, 1990. Five months later he was declared Benemérito de la Patria.

With the Beatles
"With the Beatles" is The Beatles' second UK album. It was recorded four months after the band's first album, Please Please Me and was released on 22 November, 1963.

Beatles for Sale
"Beatles for Sale" is The Beatles' fourth album. It was released in late 1964. Many of its songs went into an American release, "Beatles '65", from Capitol Records.

Rubber Soul
"Rubber Soul" is the sixth album by The Beatles. It was first released in December 1965.

Abbey Road
"Abbey Road" is the twelfth official album recorded by The Beatles. It was released in 1969.

Magical Mystery Tour
"Magical Mystery Tour" is a 1967 television movie made by The Beatles. It is also the movie's title song, and the name of its soundtrack recording.
Show.
Paul McCartney had the original idea for "Magical Mystery Tour", coming back from the Monterey Pop Festival in California, during the summer of 1967. He drew a clock face on a paper plate, and filled it with parts of the show he imagined. McCartney based the idea on Ken Kesey's Merry Pranksters, who travelled the United States in a bus, and also "mystery tours", which were low-budget weekend vacation trips taken in England.
The other Beatles liked the idea for the show, and made plans to produce and direct it themselves. After they stopped giving concerts in 1966, they had started making their own promotional films (called "promos"), much like today's music videos. They had success with promos, and wanted to try making a whole programme, to appear on television during the Christmas holidays.
Beatles manager Brian Epstein helped set up the production, and the Beatles asked friends, members of their staff, and some professional actors to ride with them in a rented bus over a holiday weekend, and film whatever happened, with magical elements to be added later. Making the movie was one of the first jobs of the Beatles's new company, Apple Corps.
Epstein unfortunately died before filming began. Without him to look over business details, things ran into trouble. By the time things were set up, John Lennon and George Harrison had changed their minds about performing, and spent much of the bus trip asleep. There also was not much for scenery along the roads, or entertainment among the passengers.
What turned into a bigger event than filming "Magical Mystery Tour" was the entourage that began to surround the bus, wondering what the "tour" was all about. People followed the bus for miles, and caused traffic jams. People who saw the bus go by expected a "happening" of some kind, but none had been planned. In trying to be spontaneous, nobody had worked out a destination for the bus, or the trip. Most of the commotion ended after Lennon personally removed the MAGICAL MYSTERY TOUR lettering from the sides of the bus. Later a Beatles assistant said the traffic jams should have also been filmed.
Spots for songs and performances were included in "Magical Mystery Tour", and so was a storyline explaining what the trip was about. The songs featured in the show included "The Fool on the Hill", "I Am The Walrus", "Blue Jay Way", an instrumental song, "Flying", and "Your Mother Should Know", with a choreographed dance sequence. Another band, the Bonzo Dog Doo-Dah Band, played live during a striptease performance.
"Magical Mystery Tour" appeared on British television on Boxing Day in 1967, and was a surprising flop. Part of the reason for its failure was because it was shown in black-and-white, while colour was an important feature. Another part was because most of the viewers did not understand what was supposed to be happening. Another part was that not much had happened on camera, for long parts of the programme, and it showed.
Ringo Starr made a personal appeal to the BBC to show "Magical Mystery Tour" again, in full colour. The BBC gave it a second broadcast, but it did not change opinions. ABC in the United States cancelled plans to show "Magical Mystery Tour" in America. (It later appeared as a "midnight movie", shown in small cinemas and on college campuses.)
Soundtrack.
Even though "Magical Mystery Tour" was not a television success, its soundtrack still sold well. The show's songs were released as a double EP in England, with a storybook and pictures from the show. In America, Capitol Records added songs from recent Beatles singles to the show songs, and released a whole album. The American version outsold the EP in England, and in 1977 Parlophone Records released a British version of the album.
Songs.
+ "appeared in the show Magical Mystery Tour "
All songs were written by John Lennon and Paul McCartney, except "Flying" (by Lennon, McCartney, Harrison and Starr) and "Blue Jay Way" (by George Harrison).

Queen (album)
"Queen" is the self-titled first album from the English rock band Queen, released in 1973.

Queen II
"Queen II" is the second album by English rock band Queen, originally released in 1974.

Sheer Heart Attack
"Sheer Heart Attack" is a Queen album from 1974.

Surfer Rosa
"Surfer Rosa" is the first music album by the Pixies. It was released by a record label called 4AD in March 1988.

Superunknown
"Superunknown" is the fourth studio album by the American rock band Soundgarden. The album was released in 1994. The album is well known thanks to singles like "Black Hole Sun", "Spoonman" and "Fell on Black Days".

Badmotorfinger
Badmotorfinger is the third studio album by the American rock band Soundgarden. It is one of Soundgardens best-selling albums. The album was released October 8, 1991.
"Satanoscillatemymetallicsonatas".
"Satanoscillatemymetallicsonatas" was a bonus CD included with some editions of "Badmotorfinger" (like how "Songs from the Superunknown" was included with "Superunknown". The title is a palindrome ("Satan, oscillate my metallic sonatas.")

George Stoneman
George Stoneman, Jr. (August 22, 1822 – September 5, 1894) was a career U.S. Army officer, a Union cavalry general in the American Civil War, and the Governor of California between 1883 and 1887.

Shutter (2008 film)
"Shutter" is an American film released on March 21, 2008. It is about a newly married couple finding disturbing, ghostly images in photographs they develop after a tragic accident. Fearing the manifestations may be connected, they investigate and learn that some mysteries are better left unsolved.

Detroit Pistons
The Detroit Pistons are a team of the National Basketball Association, and are located in Detroit, Michigan. The team's home arena is The Palace of Auburn Hills. In 1948, the team was located in Fort Wayne, Indiana, but that was before moving to Detroit in 1957. The team has won NBA championships in 1989, 1990, and 2004. Their head coach is Flip Saunders, they are owned by William Davidson, and their General Manager Joe Dumars.

A Night at the Opera (Queen album)
"A Night at the Opera" is a Queen album from 1975.

A Day at the Races (album)
"A Day at the Races" is a Queen album from 1976.

Jazz (album)
"Jazz" is a 1978 album by English rock band Queen. It was the band's seventh studio album.

The Game (album)
"The Game" is a rock album by English band Queen released June 30, 1980. It was the only Queen album to reach the #1 position in both the United Kingdom and the United States.

Flash Gordon (album)
Flash Gordon is a 1980 album by English rock band Queen. It is the soundtrack album to the science fiction movie "Flash Gordon".

Hot Space
"Hot Space" is an album by English rock band Queen, released in 1982.

The Works (Queen album)
"The Works" is a 1984 pop/rock album by English band Queen. It was the band's eleventh studio album.

A Kind of Magic
"A Kind of Magic" is a 1986 album by English rock band Queen. It was the band's twelfth studio album, and is based on the soundtrack to the film "Highlander".

The Miracle (album)
"The Miracle" is a 1989 album by English rock band Queen. It was the band's thirteenth studio album.

Innuendo (album)
"Innuendo" is a 1991 album by English rock band Queen. It is the band's fourteenth studio album and the last to be composed entirely of new material. It is also the final studio album to be released while lead singer Freddie Mercury was still alive.

Made in Heaven
"Made in Heaven" is Queen's fifteenth studio album, released in November 1995. After Freddie Mercury's death in 1991, the remaining band members John Deacon, Roger Taylor and Brian May worked with vocals that Mercury had previously recorded, along with newly recorded lyrics by the remaining band members. "Made In Heaven" would be the final studio album performed by all four original band members.

Casimir III of Poland
Casimir III the Great (Polish "Kazimierz III Wielki") (April 30, 1310 - November 5, 1370) was the King of Poland from 1333 until 1370. He was the son of Wladyslaw I.
During his rule, Poland grow up after fragmentation. He held peace with the Teutonic Order for as long a time as possible. He did this because he knew Poland was weak. Because of this, Casimir III changed direction of the Polish from north and west to east. In 1340, he conquered Red Ruthenia (and with it Lviv) from Hungary. Trade laws created by him made incomes from trade come into the city. This did much to make Cracow and Lviv more important and rich.

N. T. Rama Rao
Nandamuri Taraka Rama Rao (Telugu:నందమూరి తారక రామా రావు)(28 May 1923–18 January 1996), more commonly known as N.T. Rama Rao, NTR by his fans, or Anna garu, was an Indian movie actor, director, producer, and politician. He founded the Telugu Desam Party and served three times as Chief Minister of Andhra Pradesh. His movies included mythological, social, and folk themes. He was awarded the Padma Shri by the Government of India in the 1960s for his work in Telugu cinema. After acting, Rao became a political activist and party leader.

Boleslaw I of Poland
Boleslaw I the Brave (Polish "Bolesław I Chrobry") (967 - June 17, 1025) was the duke of Poland from 992 to April 18, 1025 and King of Poland from April 18 to June 17, 1025. He was the son of Mieszko I, first known ruler of Poland.
During his ruled Poland made more powerful and strong. New lands was conquered (Slovakia, Moravia, Red Strongholds and Lusatia). He was able to rule country, which changed religion no long time before. Boleslaw was first king of Poland, but died 2 months after get the crown.
We know 7 children of Boleslaw I. Two of them, Mieszko II Lambert and Bezprym ruled later Poland.
Boleslaw was the first King of Poland to ever be crowned, even though he died two months later his son then took over for him.

James I of Scotland
James I (December 10, 1394 – February 21, 1437) was King of Scots from April 4, 1406, and ruled as King of Scots from May 1424 until February 21, 1437.
Reign.
He made many economic and legal changes. For instance, he tried to change the Parliament of Scotland to suit English lines. Many of his actions were useful, but they also upset many people. Therefore during the later years of his reign his ability was questioned, but when the king threw a party on February 21, 1437, he was assassinated by a group of Scots led by Sir Robert Graham. He attempted to escape his attackers through a sewer but couldn't because the sewer was blocked. A wave of executions followed, including the king's uncle, Sir Walter Sterwart and Sir Robert Steward.

FutureSex/LoveSounds
"FutureSex/LoveSounds" is the second solo studio album by American rhythm and blues singer Justin Timberlake. It was released on September 12, 2006 through Jive Records and Zomba Records. Timberlake started the LoveShow tour in support of the album in January 2007. He worked with several notable producers including: Danja, Rick Rubin, Timbaland and will.i.am. The album sold slightly more than his first solo album, "Justified", with worldwide sales in excess of 9 million, 4 million of which have been sold in the United States alone.

An Inconvenient Truth
"An Inconvenient Truth" is an controversial American Academy Award-winning documentary movie about global warming. The movie stars former United States Vice President Al Gore and directed by Davis Guggenheim. The movie was first shown at the 2006 Sundance Film Festival and opened in New York and Los Angeles on May 24 2006. It was released on DVD by Paramount Home Entertainment on November 21 2006.
Controversy.
On April 18, 2008, ABC News reported that one of the shots of the Antarctic glaciers in the movie was made by computer and used in the 2004 movie The Day After Tomorrow. In "An Inconvenient Truth", the audience is shown the glacier scene while "Al Gore" was saying, "And if you were flying over it in a helicopter, you'd see it's 700 feet tall. They are so majestic." The movie has received much criticism from some who feel Mr. Gore's voice-over indicates the computer shot used was a real one.

Megawati Sukarnoputri
Diah Permata Megawati Setiawati Soekarnoputri (born January 23, 1947), was President of Indonesia from July 2001 to October 20, 2004. She was the country's first female President, and the first Indonesian leader born after independence. On September 20 she lost her campaign for re-election in the 2004 Indonesian presidential election. She is the daughter of Indonesia's first president, Sukarno.

Alistair Darling
Alistair Maclean Darling (born November 28, 1953) is a Scottish politician and Chancellor of the Exchequer. He is the Member of Parliament for the Edinburgh South West constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1987 General Election for the Edinburgh Central constituency. In 2005 the constituency boundary was changed, and he was elected MP for Edinburgh South West.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

David Miliband
David Wright Miliband (born July 15, 1965) is an English politician and the current Secretary of State for Foreign and Commonwealth Affairs. He is the Member of Parliament for the South Shields, Tyne and Wear constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 2001 general election.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Jack Straw
John Whitaker Straw (born August 3, 1946), known as Jack Straw, is an English politician and the current Lord High Chancellor of Great Britain and Secretary of State for Justice. He is the Member of Parliament for the Blackburn constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1979 general election.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Jacqui Smith
Jacqueline Jill "Jacqui" Smith (born November 3, 1962) is an English politician and the current Secretary of State for the Home Department. She is the Member of Parliament for the Redditch constituency in the United Kingdom. She was first elected in the 1997 general election.
She is a member of the Labour Party.

Des Browne
Desmond Henry Browne (born March 22, 1952) is a Scottish politician and the current Secretary of State for Defence and Secretary of State for Scotland. He is the Member of Parliament for the Kilmarnock and Loudoun constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1997 general election.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Alan Johnson
Alan Arthur Johnson (born May 17, 1950) is an English politician and the current Secretary of State for Health. He is the Member of Parliament for the Hull West and Hessle constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1997 general election.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Hilary Benn
Hilary James Wedgwood Benn (born 26 November 1953) is an English politician and the current Secretary of State for Environment, Food and Rural Affairs. He is the Member of Parliament for the Leeds Central constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in 1999 in a by-election.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Douglas Alexander
Douglas Garven Alexander (born October 26, 1967) is a Scottish politician and the current Secretary of State for International Development. He is the Member of Parliament for the Paisley and Renfrewshire South constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in 1997 in a by-election.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Harriet Harman
Harriet Ruth Harman (born July 30, 1950) is an English politician and the current Leader of the House of Commons and Minister for Women and Equality. She is the Member of Parliament for the Camberwell and Peckham constituency in the United Kingdom. She was first elected in the 1982 general election for Peckham.
She is a member of the Labour Party.

James Purnell
James Mark Dakin Purnell (born March 2, 1970) is an English politician and the current Secretary of State for Work and Pensions. He is the Member of Parliament for the Stalybridge and Hyde constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 2001 general election.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Ruth Kelly
Ruth Maria Kelly (born May 9, 1968) is a British politician and the current Secretary of State for Transport. She is the Member of Parliament for the Bolton West constituency in the United Kingdom. She was first elected in the 1997 general election.
She is a member of the Labour Party.

Hazel Blears
Hazel Anne Blears (born May 14, 1956) is an English politician and the current Secretary of State for Communities and Local Government. She is the Member of Parliament for the Salford constituency in the United Kingdom. She was first elected in the 1997 general election.
She is a member of the Labour Party.

Geoff Hoon
Geoffrey William Hoon (born December 6, 1953) is an English politician and the current Chief Whip and Parliamentary Secretary to the Treasury. He is the Member of Parliament for the Ashfield constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1992 general election.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Ed Balls
Edward Michael Balls (born February 25, 1967) is an English politician and the current Secretary of State for Children, Schools and Families. He is the Member of Parliament for the Normanton constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 2005 general election.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Ed Miliband
Edward Samuel Miliband (born December 24, 1969) is an English politician and the current Minister for the Cabinet Office and Chancellor of the Duchy of Lancaster. He is the Member of Parliament for the Doncaster North constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 2005 general election.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Andy Burnham
Andrew Murray Burnham (born January 7, 1970) is an English politician and the current Secretary of State for Culture, Media and Sport. He is the Member of Parliament for the Leigh constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 2001 general election.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Shaun Woodward
Shaun Anthony Woodward (born October 26, 1958) is an English politician and the current Secretary of State for Northern Ireland. He is the Member of Parliament for the St Helens South constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1997 general election for the Conservatives but changed to Labour in 1999.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Yvette Cooper
Yvette Cooper (born March 20, 1969) is an English politician and the current Chief Secretary to the Treasury. She is the Member of Parliament for the Pontefract and Castleford constituency in the United Kingdom. She was first elected in the 1997 general election.
She is a member of the Labour Party.

George I of Great Britain
George I (George Louis) was born in Osnabrück, Germany on 28 May 1660, and was the ruler of Hanover in North Germany. He died while going back to Hanover from England on 11 June 1727.
When Queen Anne of Great Britain died in 1714, an act of parliament said the next ruler must be a Protestant. George was not the closest relative, but was the closest Protestant relative. Closer relatives were all Roman Catholic. George became King of Great Britain and Ireland on 1 August 1714.
Many people did not like the new king. It was thought that he did not speak English, but this may have been untrue.
He was the first ruler of Great Britain from the House of Hanover.

William Hague
William Jefferson Hague (born March 26, 1961) is an English politician and the current Shadow Foreign Secretary. He is the Member of Parliament for the Richmond, Yorkshire constituency in the United Kingdom. He was also the Leader of the Conservative Party from 1997 to 2001. He was first elected in the 1989 in a by-election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

George Osborne
George Gideon Oliver Osborne (born May 23, 1971) is an English politician and the current Shadow Chancellor of the Exchequer. He is the Member of Parliament for the Tatton constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 2001 general election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

Patrick McLoughlin
Patrick Allen McLoughlin (born November 30, 1957) is an English politician and the current Opposition Chief Whip. He is the Member of Parliament for the West Derbyshire constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1986 in a by-election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

Oliver Letwin
Oliver Letwin (born May 19, 1956) is an English politician and the Chairman of Policy Review, and Chairman of the Conservative Research Department. He is the Member of Parliament for the West Dorset constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1997 general election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

Caroline Spelman
Caroline Alice Spelman (born May 4, 1958) is an English politician and the current Chairman of the Conservative Party. She is the Member of Parliament for the Meriden constituency in the United Kingdom. She was first elected in the 1997 general election.
She is a member of the Conservative Party.

Philip Hammond
Philip Hammond (born December 4, 1955) is an English politician and the current Shadow Chief Secretary to the Treasury. He is the Member of Parliament for the Runnymede and Weybridge constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1997 general election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

Andrew Mitchell
Andrew John Bower Mitchell (born March 23, 1956)) is an English politician and the current Shadow International Development Secretary. He is the Member of Parliament for the Sutton Coldfield constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1987 general election for the Gedling constituency but lost in 1997. He returned to parliament in the 2001 general election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

Cheryl Gillan
Cheryl Elise Kendall Gillan (born April 21, 1952) is an English politician and the current Shadow Secretary of State for Wales.. She is the Member of Parliament for the Chesham and Amersham constituency in the United Kingdom. She was first elected in the 1992 general election.
She is a member of the Conservative Party.

Owen Paterson
Owen William Paterson (born June 24, 1956) is an English politician and the current Shadow Secretary of State for Northern Ireland. He is the Member of Parliament for the North Shropshire constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1997 general election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

Alan Duncan
Alan James Carter Duncan (born March 31, 1957) is an English politician and the current Shadow Secretary of State for Business, Enterprise and Regulatory Reform. He is the Member of Parliament for the Rutland and Melton constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1992 general election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

Theresa May
Theresa Mary May (born October 1, 1956) is an English politician and the current Shadow Leader of the House of Commons. She is the Member of Parliament for the Maidenhead constituency in the United Kingdom. She was first elected in the 1997 general election.
She is a member of the Conservative Party.

Francis Maude
Francis Anthony Aylmer Maude (born July 4, 1953) is an English politician and the current Shadow Minister for the Cabinet Office. He is the Member of Parliament for the Horsham constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1983 general election for the North Warwickshire constituency but lost in 1992. He returned to parliament in the 1997 general election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

Eric Pickles
Eric Jack Pickles (born April 20, 1952) is an English politician and the current Shadow Secretary of State for Communities and Local Government. He is the Member of Parliament for the Brentwood and Ongar constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1992 general election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

Theresa Villiers
Theresa Anne Villiers (born March 5, 1968) is an English politician and the current Shadow Secretary of State for Transport. She is the Member of Parliament for the Chipping Barnet constituency in the United Kingdom. She was first elected in the 2005 general election.
She is a member of the Conservative Party.

Andrew Lansley
Andrew David Lansley (born December 11, 1956) is an English politician and the current Shadow Secretary of State for Health. He is the Member of Parliament for the South Cambridgeshire constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1997 general election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

David Willetts
David Linsay Willetts (born March 9, 1956) is an English politician and the current Shadow Secretary of State for Innovation, Universities and Skills. He is the Member of Parliament for the Havant constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1992 general election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

Michael Gove
Michael Andrew Gove (born August 26, 1967) is an English politician and the current Shadow Secretary of State for Children, Schools and Families. He is the Member of Parliament for the Surrey Heath constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 2005 general election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

Liam Fox
Liam Fox (born September 22, 1961) is an English politician and the current Shadow Defence Secretary. He is the Member of Parliament for the Woodspring constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1992 general election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

Nick Clegg
Nicholas William Peter Clegg (born 7 January 1967), known as Nick Clegg, is an English politician and, since 18 December 2007, leader of the Liberal Democrats. He is the Member of Parliament for the Sheffield Hallam constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 2005 general election.

Cecil Rhodes
Cecil John Rhodes (July 5 1853 - March 26 1902) was an English economist. He was the starter of Rhodesia. He was also a politician.

Liberal Democrats
The Liberal Democrats, often shortened to Lib Dems, are a liberal political party in the United Kingdom. It was started in 1988 by joining the Liberal Party and the Social Democratic Party. The two parties had already been working together for seven years. The party's leader is Nick Clegg.
The Liberal Democrats are the third-largest party in the British Parliament, behind Labour and the Conservatives.

Tokugawa Ieyasu
was the founder and first shogun of the Tokugawa Shogunate of Japan. This shogunate ruled from 1603 until the Meiji Restoration in 1868. Ieyasu seized power in 1600 and received appointment as shogun in 1603. In 1605 he abdicated from office, but he had the power until his death in 1616.

Detroit Lions
The Detroit Lions are a team in the National Football League and National Football Conference. They are based in Detroit, Michigan.

San Diego Chargers
The San Diego Chargers are a professional American football team based in San Diego, California. They are currently part of the Western Division of the American Football Conference (AFC) in the National Football League (NFL). They were first called the Los Angeles Chargers, the team was started in 1960 as a charter member of the American Football League. The club spent its first season in Los Angeles, California before moving to San Diego in 1961.

San Francisco 49ers
The San Francisco 49ers are a professional American football team. The team plays its home games in San Francisco, California, while the teams head office and practice areas are located in Santa Clara. The 49ers are at this moment part of the Western Division of the National Football Conference (NFC) in the National Football League (NFL).

Tennessee Titans
The Tennessee Titans are a professional American football team located in Nashville, Tennessee. They are currently part of the South Division of the American Football Conference (AFC) in the National Football League (NFL). They used to be known as the Houston Oilers, and played in Houston, Texas, team was started in 1960 as a charter member of the American Football League. The Oilers won two AFL championships before joining the NFL as part of the AFL-NFL Merger.
The team moved to the state of Tennessee in 1997, and played in Memphis for one season before moving to Nashville. For two seasons, the team was known as the Tennessee Oilers before changing its name to the Titans in 1999.

Kansas City Chiefs
The Kansas City Chiefs are a professional American football team located in Kansas City, Missouri. The team is a part of the Western Division of the American Football Conference (AFC) in the National Football League (NFL).
Originally called the Dallas Texans, the club was founded by Lamar Hunt in 1960 as a charter member of the American Football League. The team moved to Kansas City and became the Chiefs in 1963 after then-Kansas City mayor H. Roe Bartle promised the team they would have more ticket sales. The Chiefs then joined the NFL as part of the AFL-NFL Merger.
The Chiefs hold the distinction of being the second AFL team (after the New York Jets) to beat an NFL club in an AFL-NFL World Championship Game when they beat the Minnesota Vikings in Super Bowl IV.

Jacksonville Jaguars
The Jacksonville Jaguars are a professional American football team located in Jacksonville, Florida. They are currently members of the Southern Division of the American Football Conference (AFC) in the National Football League (NFL). The Jaguars, and the Carolina Panthers, became part of the NFL as expansion teams in 1995.

Houston Texans
The Houston Texans is a professional American National Football League team located in Houston, Texas. They are part of the American Football Conference (AFC). The Texans joined the NFL in 2002 as an expansion team.

Cleveland Browns
The Cleveland Browns are a professional American football team located in Cleveland, Ohio. The team plays in the AFC North division of the American Football Conference (AFC) in the National Football League (NFL). The Cleveland Browns started playing in 1946 as a charter member of the All-America Football Conference and joined the NFL in 1950 after the AAFC folded. The team has also won four NFL Championships.

Cincinnati Bengals
The Cincinnati Bengals are a professional American football team located in Cincinnati, Ohio. They are currently members of the North Division of the American Football Conference (AFC) in the National Football League (NFL). Their first season, 1968, was as an American Football League franchise, but they joined the NFL as part of the 1970 AFL-NFL Merger.
The Bengals currently have summer training camp at Georgetown College in Georgetown, Kentucky and play home games at Paul Brown Stadium.

Baltimore Ravens
The Baltimore Ravens are a professional American football team located in Baltimore, Maryland. They play in the AFC North Division of the National Football League (NFL). The Ravens have won one Super Bowl title, Super Bowl XXXV, in the 2000 football season against the New York Giants.

Buffalo Bills
The Buffalo Bills are a professional American football team located in Buffalo, New York. They are members of the Eastern Division of the American Football Conference (AFC) in the National Football League (NFL). The Bills began started playing in 1960 as a charter member of the American Football League and joined the NFL as part of the AFL-NFL merger.
The Bills won two American Football League titles in 1964 and 1965, but the team has not won a league championship since the merger. Buffalo is also the only team to win four American Football Conference Championships one right after the other, though they did not win any of the four games.

Washington Redskins
The Washington Redskins are a professional American football team based in the Washington, D.C. area. The team plays at FedExField in Landover, Maryland. The team's head office and training area are at Redskin Park in Ashburn, Virginia. They are part of the Eastern Division of the National Football Conference (NFC) in the National Football League (NFL).

Minnesota Vikings
The Minnesota Vikings are a professional American football team located in Minneapolis, Minnesota. The Vikings play in the National Football Conference of the National Football League (NFL). They have been part of the North Division. The Vikings have won their division 16 times, which is the third most among teams that are playing in the NFL now.

T.N.T. (album)
"T.N.T." is the second studio album by Australian hard rock band DC, released in Australia December 1975.

T.N.T. (song)
T.N.T. is a song recorded in 1975 by the hard rock band DC from their Australian album T.N.T. and the international version of High Voltage. The song is written by Bon Scott, Angus Young and Malcolm Young.

Niagara IceDogs
The Niagara IceDogs are a junior ice hockey team in the Ontario Hockey League based in St. Catharines, Ontario, Canada.

Brian Cowen
Brian Cowen (born 10 January 1960) is the current Taoiseach (prime minister) of the Republic of Ireland. He became the prime minister on 7 May 2008, after Bertie Ahern left the job. He is the leader of a political party called Fianna Fáil. They are in a coalition government with the Green Party and the Progressive Democrats. Independent TDs (Irish members of parliament) also support his government.

John Edwards
Johnny Reid "John" Edwards 1953) is an American politician who served one term as U.S. Senator from North Carolina. He ran for President of the United States twice, but was defeated by John Kerry and Barack Obama in the Primaries.

Aung San Suu Kyi
Aung San Suu Kyi (Burmese language: အောင္‌ဆန္‌းစုက္ရည or); born June 19, 1945 in Yangon, Burma is a woman who tries to bring democracy to her country. She is the leader of the National League for Democracy in Burma, and a famous prisoner. She never uses violence in to make Burma democratic.
Suu Kyi won the Rafto Prize and the Sakharov Prize in 1990 and the Nobel Peace Prize in 1991. In 1992, she was awarded the Jawaharlal Nehru peace prize by India for her trying to be peaceful.
In the 1990 general election in Burma, Suu Kyi's political party won, so she should have become Prime Minister of Burma. The military did not let her party, the National League for Democracy join the government. They arrested her instead, and forced her to stay in her house and not have any visitors. They have done this many times, and she has been forced to stay in her house for 12 years.
She is sometimes called "Daw Aung San Suu Kyi"; Daw is not part of her name, but a title for older women. This name shows respect for her.
Personal life.
Aung San Suu Kyi was the third child in her family. Her name "Aung San" comes from her father, who is also named Aung San; "Kyi" comes from her mother; and "Suu" comes from her grandmother.
Her father helped to make Burma independent from the United Kingdom in 1947. He was killed in the same year. She grew up with her mother, Khin Kyi, and two brothers, Aung San Lin and Aung San Oo in Yangon. Her favourite brother Aung San Lin drowned in a pool accident when Suu Kyi was eight. Her other brother lives in San Diego, California and is an American citizen.
Suu Kyi went to Catholic schools for much of her childhood in Burma. She learned English in school.
Khin Kyi became famous as a politician. She was became the Burmese ambassador to India in 1960. Aung San Suu Kyi went to college in India at the Lady Shri Ram College for Women in New Delhi.
She continued her education at St Hugh's College, Oxford, and learned about philosophy, politics, and economics. She also went to the School of Oriental and African Studies, University of London in the 1980s.
She also worked for the government. In 1972, Aung San Suu Kyi married Michael Aris, a professor of Tibetan culture who lived in Bhutan. In 1973, she gave birth to her first son, Alexander, in London; and in 1977 she had her second son, Kim.
Political beginnings.
Aung San Suu Kyi returned to Burma in 1988 to take care of her sick mother. That year, the long-time leader of the socialist ruling party, General Ne Win, stopped being a politician. Many Burmese people wanted a democracy after the military ruled the country for several years.
She admired Mohandas Gandhi's philosophy of non-violence. She was also inspired by Buddhism.. Aung San Suu Kyi tried to work for democracy and helped make the National League for Democracy on September 27, 1988.
She was offered freedom if she left the country, but she refused.
Notes.
This article is based on the English Wikipedia article on Aung San Suu Kyi

Brad Henry
Charles Bradford "Brad" Henry (born June 10, 1963) is the Governor of the U.S. state of Oklahoma.

Beetlejuice
Beetlejuice is a television show about a teenage girl named Lydia who does not like her school peers and from nowhere a ghost name Beetlejuice appears. The show premeried on Nickelodeon until 1995 and then aired on Nick again in October 1999 and December, 1999.

Afrodisiac
"Afrodisiac" is the fourth studio album by American R&B/pop singer Brandy, released by Atlantic Records on June 28, 2004 outside North America and on June 29, 2004 (see 2004 in music) in Canada and the United States. It was mostly produced by Timbaland, with more production from Warryn Campbell, Organized Noise, Walter Millsap, Ron Feemster, Big Chuck, and Kanye West. A lot of critics liked the album, but it did not sell a lot of copies. It has sold less copies than any other album she has made so far.

Atlanta Falcons
The Atlanta Falcons are an American football team in Atlanta, Georgia. They are a member of the NFC South of the National Football Conference (NFC) in the National Football League (NFL). The Falcons joined the NFL as a 1966 expansion team. In their 42 years in the NFL, the Falcons have a record of 262-386-6 with division championships in 1980, 1998 and 2004, and appeared in Super Bowl XXXIII in Miami, Florida.

New Orleans Saints
The New Orleans Saints are a professional American football team in New Orleans, Louisiana. The Saints play in the Southern Division of the National Football Conference (NFC) in the National Football League (NFL).

St. Louis Rams
The St. Louis Rams are a professional American football team in St. Louis, Missouri. They are currently in the Western Division of the National Football Conference (NFC) in the National Football League (NFL). The team has won two NFL Championships and one Super Bowl.

Cincinnati Cyclones
The Cincinnati Cyclones are a premier "AA" hockey team in the ECHL league. The 2007-2008 season is the first to mark the Cyclones to it to the Kelly Cup championship. For the first time in 18 years the cyclones they won a championship game in Cincinnati, Ohio.

Henry A. Wallace
Henry Agard Wallace (October 7, 1888 – November 18, 1965) was the 33rd Vice President of the United States (1941–45). He was also the eleventh Secretary of Agriculture (1933–40). In addition, he was the tenth Secretary of Commerce (1945–46).

Before I Self Destruct
"Before I Self Destruct" is 50 Cent's fourth album. It will be released during 2008.
On the track "The End of My Career", on one of 50 Cent's mixtapes, he said that he has already recorded 12 tracks for the album.

William Bligh
William Bligh (9 September 1754 – 7 December 1817) was an English officer in the British Navy. He sailed with Captain James Cook on his third and final voyage in 1776. In 1787 Bligh was made captain of "HMS Bounty" and sailed to Tahiti to collect breadfruit trees. In 1806 he was made Governor of New South Wales. After going back to England, Bligh was made a Rear-Admiral and later a Vice-Admiral in the Royal Navy.
Early Life.
Bligh joined the navy at age 16 when he became an able seaman on "HMS Hunter" in 1770. In September 1771 he changed ships and served on "HMS Crescent". At 21 (17 March 1776) he was made the master of Captain James Cook's ship, the Resolution, part of Cook's third and final voyage. Bligh got back to England in 1780. He left the Royal Navy and worked as a captain in the merchant navy from 1783 to 1787.
The Bounty.
In 1787 Bligh became leader of a small expedition to be sent to Tahiti to get breadfruit trees. These would be planted in the West Indies as food for the slaves. The "Bounty" left Tahiti loaded with breadfruit trees on 4 April 1789. Three weeks later, a seaman named Fletcher Christian led a mutiny (take over) of the ship. Christian wanted to go back to Tahiti. This event is called the mutiny on the Bounty. Bligh and 18 seamen were put into a small boat, with little food or water, 4 swords, a sextant, a pocket watch, but no map. They were able to get to Batavia (now Jakarta), a distance of 6701 km, in 47 days. He finally got back to England in March, 1790. He wrote a book about the mutiny called "A Narrative of the Mutiny on board His Majesty's Ship "Bounty". In August 1791 Bligh set out again to get breadfruit trees. He was also told to find out more about Torres Strait, between Australia and New Guinea. He took 2 ships, the "Providence" and the "Assistant", getting back to England in August 1793.
Governor.
Bligh spent the next 10 years in the Royal Navy. In March 1805 he was given the job of Governor of New South Wales. He left England in February 1806 and arrived in Sydney in August. One of his jobs was to control the supply of alcohol into the young colony. In Sydney at this time, alcohol was used a form of money, which caused a lot of unrest among the settlers. The army officers and several other people in New South Wales had a monopoly on bringing alcohol into the country. They were very angry with Bligh because he tried to control their alcohol business.
The Rum Rebellion.
Image:The arrest of Bligh propaganda cartoon from around 1810.jpg|thumb|Bligh's arrestThe officers started legal actions against Bligh who then had one of the settlers John Macarthur arrested for sedition (trying to start a rebellion against the government). One of the soldiers, Major George Johnston, let Macarthur out of jail, and on 26 January 1808, he led the army to Government House and put Bligh under arrest. The army then took over the government. This became known as the Rum Rebellion. After one year Bligh was released on the condition that he went back to England. He agreed, but then sailed to Hobart to try and get help from Colonel David Collins who was the Lieutenant-Governor of Tasmania. Collins didn't offer help and Bligh remained in Hobart for another year.
The British government sent out a new governor, Lachlan Macquarie. Bligh and Major Johnston went back to London, arriving on 25 October 1810. In the legal action all the charges against Bligh were found not to be true, and Johnston was found to be guilty. Johnson was sacked from the army, and in 1811 Bligh was made a Rear-Admiral, and later a Vice-Admiral. He retired to Kent. Bligh died on a visit to London on 7 December 1817.

Pachacuti
Pachacuti Inca Yupanqui (or Pachacutec; Quechua "Pachakutiq", whose name means "He who remakes the world" was the ninth Sapa Inca (1438-1471/1472) of the Kingdom of Cuzco, which he transformed into an empire, Tawantinsuyu. He began the era of conquest that, within three generations, expanded the Inca dominion from the valley of Cuzco to nearly the whole of civilized South America. He was the fourth of the Hanan dynasty, and his wife's name is given as Mama Anawarkhi or Coya Anahurque. Their son was Tupac Inca Yupanqui.
Pachacuti reorganized the new empire, the "Tahuantinsuyu" or "the united four provinces." Under his system, there were four "apos" that each controlled one of four provinces ("suyu").
Despite Pachacuti's political and military talents, he did not improve upon the system of choosing the next Inca. His son became the next Inca without any known dispute, but in future generations the next Inca had to gain control of the empire by winning enough support from the apos, priesthood, and military to either win a civil war or intimidate anyone else from trying to get control of the empire.
Machu Picchu is believed to date to the time of Pachacuti.

Boris Berezovsky
Boris Abramovich Berezovsky (born January 23, 1946), is a Russian business man, billionaire and former mathematician. He is best known for the powerful positions he held during the 1990s when Boris Yeltsin was president of Russia. He was deputy secretary of Russia's security council, a friend of Boris Yeltsin's daughter Tatyana. He had a lot of power over what the newspapers were allowed to print and what the television stations could say. They were not allowed to say anything bad about Yeltsin.
Berezovsky made a lot of money importing Mercedes cars into Russia in the 1990s. He made a lot of money from Avtovaz cars and he owned Sibneft oil company.
When Putin came to power Berezovsky fled to London where he was given political asylum. He said that he was trying to put an end to Putin's power. The Russian authorities have accused him of trying to murder several leading critics of Putin's regime, including Alexander Litvinenko and journalist Anna Politkovskaya, in order to make Putin look bad. The Swiss have accused him of taking money illegally.
In 1994 someone tried to kill Berezovsky. Several other people may have tried to kill him. He says these people are Russian spies.

William Wilberforce
William Wilberforce was a man who helped to abolish the abhorrent business of slavery in the USA
William Wilberforce (August 24 1759 – July 29 1833) was a British politician and philanthropist. He was a leader of the movement to abolish the slave trade.

New York Americans
The New York Americans were a professional ice hockey team, the third expansion team in the history of the National Hockey League (NHL) and the second to play in the United States.
Season-by-season record.
"Note: GP = Games played, W = Wins, L = Losses, T = Ties, Pts = Points, GF = Goals for, GA = Goals against, PIM = Penalties in minutes"

California Golden Seals
The California Golden Seals were an ice hockey team in the NHL that played from 1966 to 1976. The Golden Seals entered the league at the start of the 1966-67 NHL season as the Oakland Seals. In the 1970-71 season, the team was renamed to the California Golden Seals. Due to poor attendance, the Golden Seals' owners moved to the team to Cleveland, where they became known as the Barons.

Atlanta Flames
The Atlanta Flames were an ice hockey team in the NHL from Atlanta, Georgia, USA from 1972 to 1980. The team was moved to Calgary, Alberta, Canada for the start of the 1980–81 NHL season and were renamed the Calgary Flames. The team was named after the burning of Atlanta, led by U.S. Army general William Sherman during the American Civil War.

Loose (album)
"Loose" is the third studio album by Canadian singer-songwriter Nelly Furtado, was released 9 June, 2006. It is her most successful album selling more than 8 million copis worldwide. The Hip-Hop producer Timbaland helped Furtado recording this CD. It featured many hits including the U.S number-one singles "Promiscuous" and "Say It Right" and the european hit "All Good Things (Come to an End)".

WWE United States Championship
The World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE) United States Championship is a professional wrestling championship in World Wrestling Entertainment. It was originally a National Wrestling Alliance and World Championship Wrestling title. Currently, it is the second highest ranked championship on the SmackDown brand.
History.
The WWE United States Championship was originally known as the NWA United States Heavyweight Championship of Mid-Atlantic Championship Wrestling run by Jim Crockett Promotions. Following the title's introduction in 1975, Harley Race became the inaugural champion on January 1. The title became "Undisputed" in January 1981 when no other United States title was recognized in other promotions governed by the National Wrestling Alliance. In 1986, the title became a secondary championship in Mid-Atlantic Championship Wrestling when Jim Crockett Promotions gained control of the NWA World Heavyweight Championship. The title was renamed the World Championship Wrestling (WCW) United States Heavyweight Championship in 1991 when Jim Crockett Promotions became World Championship Wrestling.
In March 2001, the World Wrestling Federation purchased World Championship Wrestling from AOL Time Warner. Soon after, "The Invasion" took place in which the ECW Alliance was ultimately dismantled. During this time, the title was referred to as the WCW United States Championship. At Survivor Series 2001, the title was unified with the WWF Intercontinental Championship. The United States Champion, Edge, defeated the Intercontinental Champion, Test, becoming the new Intercontinental Champion while causing United States Championship to become inactive.
In July 2003, the title was reactivated as the WWE United States Championship by SmackDown General Manager, Stephanie McMahon, and was commissioned to be a secondary championship to the SmackDown brand. This was done shortly after the WWE Intercontinental Championship was recommissioned by the Raw brand, making the title its equal counterpart.
The United States Championship was drafted to ECW as part of the 2008 WWE Draft on June 23, 2008 when then champion Matt Hardy was drafted to ECW. It then followed Shelton Benjamin back to SmackDown the following Sunday at The Great American Bash.
Current champion.
The current champion is Shelton Benjamin, who is in his first reign. He defeated Matt Hardy at The Great American Bash in Uniondale, New York on July 20, 2008.

WWE Divas Championship
The World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE) Divas Championship is a official championship in World Wrestling Entertainment competed for by divas. The title is exclusive to the SmackDown! brand.
History.
As a result of the WWE Brand Extension in 2002, the WWE Women's Championship was made exclusive to the Raw brand. Thereafter, only Divas on the Raw brand were able to compete for the WWE Women's Championship, while the Divas on the SmackDown brand were unable to compete for a women's-exclusive championship. The ruling was, however, ignored on rare occasions as Melina and Ashley have been the only divas who were on the SmackDown brand to challenge for the title. This led to the creation of the WWE Divas Championship, which was announced on June 6, 2008 during an episode of "SmackDown" by SmackDown General Manager Vickie Guerrero. In order to determine the competitors for the new title, two 'Golden Dreams matches', the object of which was to retrieve a star that was hanging on a pole above one corner of the ring, were held. The first Golden Dreams match was won by Natalya, and the second by Michelle McCool. The championship belt was officially unveiled on the July 4, 2008 episode of "SmackDown" prior to the second Golden Dreams match. Natalya and McCool competed against each other at The Great American Bash, which McCool won and became the inaugural champion.
Current champion.
The current champion is Maryse, who is in her first reign as champion. She defeated Michelle McCool on Smackdown with Maria as the Special Guest Referee.
List of individual reigns.
As of December 30, 2008.
List of combined reigns.
As of December 30, 2008.

Alain Vigneault
Alain Vigneault (b. May 14, 1961) is the current coach of the Vancouver Canucks.

Lindy Ruff
Lindy Ruff is the current head coach of the Buffalo Sabres. He is currently the longest-serving coach in the NHL, being Buffalo's coach since 1997.

Florida Championship Wrestling
Florida Championship Wrestling (FCW) is a professional wrestling promotion based in Tampa, Florida. It is the official developmental territory for World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE).
History.
The promotion, in its current form, was started by Steve Keirn in 2007 to be WWE's second developmental territory when they ended their relationship with the Georgia-based Deep South Wrestling in early 2007. It became their only developmental territory in early 2008 when they ended affiliation with Ohio Valley Wrestling.
FCW's first show was on June 26 2007 at Tampa, Florida's Dallas Bull. A 21 man Battle Royal was held during the show, with Harry Smith booked to win and become the first ever FCW Southern Heavyweight Champion. The next year the FCW Florida Heavyweight Championship was introduced, with Jake Hager becoming the first champion at a February 15 show after surviving a Battle Royal and defeating Ted DiBiase, Jr.. The FCW Florida Tag Team Championship was also introduced in February, with the Puerto Rican Nightmares (Eddie Colón and Eric Perez) beating Steven Lewington and Heath Miller to win it in the finals of a one night tournament. The singles titles were later unified, keeping the "Florida Heavyweight" name.
FCW currently runs shows every Tuesday at Bourbon Street nightclub, as well as spot shows on other nights at other venues in and around the Central Florida area. They are also in the getting ready to start a weekly television series when get a public restroom built in.

San Antonio Spurs
The San Antonio Spurs are a team in the National Basketball Association in San Antonio, Texas.

Atlanta Hawks
The Atlanta Hawks are a team in the National Basketball Association, in Atlanta, Georgia.

Golden State Warriors
The Golden State Warriors are a professional basketball team.

Sacramento Kings
The Sacramento Kings are a team in the National Basketball Association in Sacramento, California.

Philadelphia 76ers
The Philadelphia 76ers (or Sixers for short) are a professional basketball team in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. They play in the National Basketball Association.

New York Knicks
The New York Knicks are a team in the National Basketball Association in New York

Utah Jazz
The Utah Jazz are a team in the National Basketball Association in Utah.

Houston Rockets
The Houston Rockets are a team in the National Basketball Association in Houston, Texas.

Portland Trail Blazers
The Portland Trail Blazers are a team in the National Basketball Association in Portland, Oregon.

Scotty Bowman
William Scott "Scotty" Bowman (born September 18, 1933 in Montreal, Quebec, Canada) is a former National Hockey League head coach. He holds the record for most wins with 1,244.

Scuderia Ferrari
Scuderia Ferrari is the name for the Gestione Sportiva, the division of the Ferrari automobile company concerned with racing. Though the Scuderia and Ferrari Corse Clienti continue to manage the racing activities of numerous Ferrari customers and private teams, Ferrari's racing division has completely devoted its attention and funding to its Formula One team, Scuderia Ferrari. Scuderia is Italian for "Stable", and Ferrari is the name of its founder. The prancing horse was the symbol on Italian World War I ace Francesco Baracca's fighter plane, and became the logo of Ferrari after the fallen ace's parents, good friends with Enzo Ferrari, asked him so, to continue his tradition of sportsmanship, gallantry and boldness.
Scuderia Ferrari was founded in 1929, and raced for Alfa Romeo until 1939. Ferrari first competed in F1 in 1948 (the team's first F1 car was the Tipo 125 F1), making it the oldest and arguably the most successful team left in the championship. The team's numerous and ardent Italian fans are known as "tifosi", though the team also has a vibrant international following.
One of the most popular Ferrari drivers was Michael Schumacher, who won four Ferrari titles. He drove in this team from 1997 through 2006. Schumacher is now in co-operation with Ferrari. The team's current drivers are Felipe Massa and Kimi Räikkönen, who has signed on to Ferrari for a three-year contract after the retirement of Michael Schumacher following the 2006 season, and its test drivers are Luca Badoer and Marc Gené. Ferrari and Räikkönen are the reigning Constructors' and Drivers' title holders respectively, after the conclusion of the 2007 season.
In 2008 Massa was near Championship Title,but won Hamilton.

Ahmet Necdet Sezer
Ahmet Necdet Sezer (born September 13, 1941 in Afyonkarahisar) was the tenth President of Turkey. He was president from May 16, 2000 until August 28, 2007. He was a republican and supporter of secularism in Turkey.

Kenan Evren
Ahmet Kenan Evren (born 17 July 1918 in Alaşehir, Manisa), was the 7th president of Turkey. He was a former Turkish general and the leader of the coup d'etat on 12 September 1980.

Andrew W. Mellon
Andrew William Mellon (March 24 1855 — August 27 1937) was an American banker who also owned many industrial businesses. He was the Secretary of the Treasury from March 4 1921 until February 12 1932.
Personal life.
Mellon was a lover of art, and had a large collection which he gave to the National Gallery of Art. Mellon was also a philanthropist - someone who gives to charity in order to make the world a better place.

Egon Krenz
Egon Krenz (born 19 March, 1937) was a politician of the German Democratic Republic. He was a high-ranking member of the Sozialistische Einheitspartei Deutschlands. He was the successor to Erich Honecker as leader of East Germany in 1989, for a few weeks. He was sentenced to six and a half years in prison. He was released in 2003.

Sellapan Ramanathan
Sellapan Ramanathan (Tamil: செல்லப்பன் ராமநாதன்; born July 3, 1924) is the sixth and current President of the Republic of Singapore. Often referred to as S. R. Nathan, he became president on September 1, 1999.
Early life.
Nathan is a Singaporean from Indian; his childhood was spent with his three older sisters and parents, V. Sellapan and Apiram, in Muar, Johor, in a house near the sea.
By then the young Nathan had returned to where he was born, Singapore, to live with an uncle, and received his early education in several Anglo-Chinese Schools, such as the Rangoon Road Afternoon School, and later Victoria School. He started working before completing his studies. During the Japanese Occupation of Singapore, Nathan worked for the Japanese civilian police as a translator. After the war, while working, he completed his secondary education through self-study, and entered the University of Malaya (then in Singapore) where he graduated in 1954 with a Diploma in Social Studies (Distinction).
Becoming President.
His nomination was strongly supported by Minister Mentor Lee Kuan Yew (then holding the post of Senior Minister). He succeeded the 5th President of Singapore Ong Teng Cheong and was sworn in on September 1, 1999.
On 12 July 2005 Nathan announced that he was seeking re-election as President. He applied to the Presidential Elections Committee; by 6 August 2005 three more people had also submitted forms, but on 13 August the Committee said that the other three applicants had been rejected as unsuitable. Nathan became the president of Singapore on 17 August. He became president sfir the second time on 1 September 2005.
Personal life.
Nathan, a Hindu, is married to Urmila (Umi) Nandey and has a daughter, a son, and three grandchildren.

Fatima Jinnah
Mohtarma Fatima Jinnah (Urdu: فاطمہ جناح) (July 30, 1893 — July 8, 1967) was the sister of Quaid-i-Azam Muhammad Ali Jinnah, the founder of Pakistan and an active political figure in movement for independence from the British Raj. She is commonly known in Pakistan as Khatoon-e-Pakistan (Urdu: — "Lady of Pakistan") and Madar-e-Millat ("Mother of the Nation.") She was born in Karachi, Pakistan, then a part of British India. She was admitted to the Dr. R. Ahmed Dental College in the University of Calcutta in 1919 and went on to open her dental clinic in Bombay in 1923. She was an instrumental figure in the Pakistan movement and the primary organiser of All India Muslim Women Students Federation. After the formation of Pakistan and the death of her brother, she remained an active member of the nation's politics. In 1965, Miss Fatima Jinnah ran for President as a candidate of the Combined Opposition Party (COP); widely believed to win the election, her loss came as a shock to the world community. The election is still regarded as rigged by most historians. She continued to work for the welfare of the Pakistani people until she died in Karachi on July 8, 1967, there is also a conspiracy that she was murdered by Dictator Muhammad Ayub Khan himself.

Paul Kruger
Stephanus Johannes Paulus Kruger (or just Paul Kruger) (October 10, 1825 – July 14, 1904) was the president of the Transvaal Republic (South African Republic) from 1880 to 1900. He became famous for leading the Boers against the British at the time of the Boer War.
Early Life.
Kruger grew up on his grandfather's farm. He worked as a commando (a soldier defending farms), and became a respected leader.
First Boer War.
In 1877 the British Army took control of Transvaal, and Kruger became the leader of the resistance (the people who wanted to fight British control). On December 30, 1880, the government of Transvaal elected (chose) him to be president. In 1881, the British lost the first Boer War, and Kruger negotiated (talked with the enemy to agree) the peace.
Kruger travelled to Europe, where many people respected him.
Second Boer War.
The Second Boer War began in 1899, and Kruger had to escape to Europe in October 1900. He moved to Clarens in Switzerland, where he died in 1904. People took his body back to South Africa and buried him in Church Street Cemetery in Pretoria

Joseph Chamberlain
Joseph Chamberlain (8 July 1836 – 2 July 1914), was an important businessman and a politician. He worked to improve education, and cities. He was a Member of Parliament from 1876 to 1914, and Colonial Secretary (controlling British colonies) from 1895 to 1903. His son Austen won the Nobel Peace Prize and another son Neville was Prime Minister from 1937 to 1940.
Early life.
Chamberlain was born in Camberwell in London. His father had a successful shoe company. Joseph was a good student, and won prizes at school in French and mathematics. He left school when he was 16 years old, and became an apprentice in his father's company. When he was 18, he moved to Birmingham to work in his uncle's screw company. He worked for the company until he was 38, and the company became very successful.
Early political life.
Chamberlain was a Unitarian, a Christian who believes Christ was an example of the way to live life, but was not divine (not a part of God). Unitarians try to work to help society. There were many problems in Birmingham after the industrial revolution, and many men were not allowed to vote. In 1868 Chamberlain helped a liberal man to become the Member of Parliament for Birmingham. In 1869, he started a group working for free primary education for all children.
In November 1969, he became a member of Birmingham City Council. There he worked for cheaper land prices for rural (countryside) workers, and became very popular. In 1873 he became the Mayor of Birmingham. He bought the gas companies and water companies for the city, so people were able to have clean and safe water. He made parks, roads, schools museums and built new houses for poor people.
In June 1876 he became the Member of Parliament (MP) for Birmingham. In parliament he worked to unite radical M.P.s (MPs that wanted change) against the Whig party who were in power. His work helped William Ewart Gladstone to become Prime Minister in 1880. Chamberlain often spoke about education in parliament.
Government life.
In 1880, Chamberlain became the President of the Board of Trade, the government minister working to improve trade. He made laws to help other cities to buy private companies, as he had done in Birmingham. He worked to make rents cheaper in Ireland, which was a British colony. At that time, many people believed that Ireland should have its own parliament, but many other people, including Chamberlain strongly disagreed. Chamberlain worked to help trade unions, but warned against socialism, saying that it would bring class war.
In 1885, Lord Salisbury, a conservative, became prime minister, and Chamberlain was no longer in government. The Conservative government made many changes that pleased Chamberlain, including free education for all children. Because Chamberlain and many other liberals disagreed with the Liberal Party about Ireland, Chamberlain made a new party, the Liberal Unionists. The Liberal Unionists shared power with the Conservatives against the Liberal party from 1886, but Chamberlain was not in the government.
Colonial Secretary.
In June 1895, Chamberlain became Colonial Secretary of the government, controlling what happened in British Colonies. Because many European countries, especially Germany and France were growing stronger, Chamberlain wanted all coutries in the British Empire to work together. He also wanted Britain to take more land in Africa. He built a railway along a part of the river Niger to help a British company there to grow. This land, together with the area Sokoto, became modern Nigeria in 1901.
Chamberlain also wanted Britain to control South Africa. He asked for more British soldiers in South Africa. He asked many British colonies to help, and in return helped Australia to get its own constitution. The Boers (Dutch farmers) did not want Britain to control their land, and in 1899 they attacked the British. This was the start of the Second Boer War. At first, Britain had problems fighting the Boers, but in 1900 the British became stronger.
In Autumn 1900, Britain had a General Election. Chamberlain asked people to vote for (choose) the same government (with Prime Minister Salisbury) to help win the war. Because Chamberlain was very popular, many people voted for the government, and they stayed in control. Chamberlain helped Winston Churchill to become a Member of Parliament.
In May 1902, Britain won the Second Boer War. Chamberlain visited South Africa to try to help make a better relationship between the two countries. Back in Britain, he also spoke to Zionist Jews (Jews who wanted their own country) and spoke about giving land in Kenya to them. This plan was never realised. Chamberlain tried to make an alliance with Germany, but when this did not work he made an alliance between France and Britain. This was called the Entente cordiale, and ended hundreds of years of fighting between the two countries.
Later life.
Chamberlain believed that the countries in the British Empire should do business with each other to become strong. To do this, Britain needed to tax imports (goods from other countries). This was called Tariff Reform. The government disagreed, so Chamberlain resigned from (quit) the government. He worked with other MPs to ask for Tariff Reform.
In 1906, just after his 70th birthday, Chamberlain had a stroke that made him very sick. He couldn't work hard, so his son, Austen Chamberlain (who was also an MP) helped him with his work. He died of a heart attack on the 2nd July 1914.
Memorials.
The city of Birmingham changed a lot because of Chamberlain's work. There are many places in Birmingham that have Chamberlain's name. Birmingham University, which he helped to start, has a clock tower with his name. Chamberlain Square in the centre of Birmingham also has a memorial for him.

Olympia Snowe
Olympia Snowe (born on February 21, 1947, in Augusta, Maine) was elected to the US Senate in 1994, that made her the first woman in the United States's history in both houses of the state legislature and both houses of the Congress, and the second woman Senator in history to represent Maine. She is the first Greek woman ever elected to Congress.

Monsters, Inc.
"Monsters, Inc." is a 2001 movie produced by Pixar Animation Studios. It was Pixar's fourth computer animated movie. The movie was released to theaters by Walt Disney Pictures in the United States on November 2 2001. It was released in Australia on December 26, 2001 and in the United Kingdom on February 8, 2002.

Zulfiqar Ali Bhutto
Zulfiqar Ali Bhutto (Urdu: ذوالفقار علی بھٹو, Sindhi: ذوالفقار علي ڀُٽو), (January 5, 1928 – April 4, 1979) was a Pakistani politician who served as the President of Pakistan from 1971 to 1973 and as Prime Minister from 1973 to 1977. He was the founder of the Pakistan Peoples Party (PPP), the largest and most influential political parties of Pakistan. His daughter Benazir Bhutto also served twice as prime minister; she was assassinated on December 27, 2007.
Educated at the University of California at Berkeley in the United States and University of Oxford in the United Kingdom, Bhutto was noted for his mercurial brilliance and wit. He was executed in 1979 for authorizing the murder of a political opponent.The move was done under the directives of General Muhammad Zia-ul-Haq. His supporters add the honorific title Shaheed, the Urdu word for "martyr", before his name, thus: Shaheed-e-Azam Zulfiqar Ali Bhutto ("The Great Martyr") or sometimes called by his supporters as Quaid-e-Awam (The Leader the Community).

Édouard Daladier
Édouard Daladier (18 June 1884 - 10 October 1970) was a French socialist politician, and Prime Minister of France at the start of the Second World War. He was one of the politicians who tried to stop the war at the Munich conference in 1938, together with the British prime minister, Neville Chamberlain and the two dictators of Germany and Italy, Adolph Hitler and Benito Mussolini.

Shaun of the Dead
"Shaun of the Dead" is a British zombie-themed romantic comedy movie. It was released in 2004. The movie was directed by Edgar Wright, who co-wrote it with Simon Pegg. It stars Simon Pegg and Nick Frost.

Shimon Peres
Shimon Peres (Hebrew: שמעון פרס) born August 2, 1923 is the President of the State of Israel.

Ehud Olmert
Ehud Olmert (born 30 September 1945) is the 12th and former Prime Minister of the State of Israel. He was the head of the Kadima Party until September 2008.

Kadima Party
Kadima is an Israeli political party.

She's So Unusual
She's So Unusual is the first solo album by the famous American 1980s pop singer Cyndi Lauper. It was released in 1983. It included the popular single, "Girls Just Want to Have Fun".

Deval Patrick
Deval Patrick was elected to be the governor of Massachusetts in 2006. He is the first black person to be elected governor of that state, and only the third black person to be elected to that office in the United States. Patrick ran as a Democrat.
He was born in Chicago, Illinois on 31 July 1956, is a lawyer, and holds two degrees from Harvard University.

Louis VI of France
Louis VI (1 December 1081 – 1 August 1137), called the Fat (), was King of France from 1108 until his death (1137).
Marriages and children.
He married in 1104: 1) Lucienne de Rochefort — the marriage was cancelled.
He married in 1115: 2) Adélaide de Maurienne (1092–1154)

Louis VII of France
Louis VII, called the Younger or the Young (; 1120 – 18 September 1180), was King of France from 1137 until his death. He was the son and successor of Louis VI.

Love Street
Love Street is a Scottish football stadium in Paisley, Glasgow. It is owned by St Mirren F.C. who play their home games at the stadium.

Valdas Adamkus
Valdas Adamkus (born on November 3, 1926 in Kaunas, Lithuania,by 1955 Valdemaras Adamkavičius) is the current president of the Republic of Lithuania. First elected in 1998, he ended his term in office in 2003. When Rolandas Paksas, the new elected president, was impeached and removed by the Lithuanian Parliament in 2004, Adamkus was re-elected. He has been the President since 2004 and his term in office shall end in 2009.

Palestine Liberation Organization
The Palestine Liberation Organization (PLO) is a group that works to create a state for Palestinians. The group was created in 1964. From 1993 to 1998 they made agreements with Israel that created the Palestinian National Authority (PNA), which is in charge of leading Gaza and the West Bank. The leader of the PLO used to be Yasser Arafat. He signed a series of Peace Treaties called the Olso Accords with Yitzhak Rabin who the Prime Minister of Israel at the time. Many members of the PLO and Israel didn't agree with the Accords and Yasser was soon killed by his own people. Israel also re-elected another Prime Minister to take Rabin's position after the Accords.

Agha Muhammad Yahya Khan
Agha Muhammad Yahya Khan (February 4, 1917 – August 10, 1980) was the final President of United Pakistan from 1969 to 1971, following the resignation of Ayub Khan. He has one son, Ali Yahya and one daughter, Yasmeen Khan.

Pakistan Peoples Party
The Pakistan Peoples Party (PPP) (Urdu: پاکستان پیپلز پارٹی): is a centre-left Islamic Socialist political party in Pakistan affiliated to the Socialist International. To date, its leader has always been a member of the Bhutto family. The Pakistan Peoples Party Parliamentarians (PPPP) is a party formed in 2002 by the PPP for the purpose of complying with electoral rules governing Pakistani parties.
The party was founded on November 30 1967 by Zulfiqar Ali Bhutto who was also its first chairman. The party creed is: "Islam is our faith; democracy is our politics; socialism is our economy; all power to the people."
Although its center lies in the southern province of Sindh, it also has considerable support in the more densely populated province of Punjab and even Azad Kashmir.

Toronto Raptors
The Toronto Raptors are the National Basketball Association team in Toronto. They were started in 1995.

Toronto Argonauts
The Toronto Argonauts are the Canadian Football League team in Toronto.

Feodor III of Russia
Feodor (Theodore) III Alexeevich of Russia was born on June 9, 1661, and died on May 7, 1682. He was the Tsar of all Russia between 1676 and 1682.

Otto Abetz
Otto Abetz (March 3, 1903 in Schwetzingen / Germany – May 5, 1958) was a German diplomat. In 1931, he became a member of the NSDAP and worked until 1934 as "Reichsjugendführer". Starting in 1935, he worked for Joachim von Ribbentrop as expert for French. He get the German ambassador for the Vichy-Government in 1940.
After the War he went to prison for 20 years. He was reaseased from prison in 1954. He died on May 5, 1958 in an auto accident near Langenfeld bei Dortmund on the Cologne-Ruhr autobahn.

Ingrid Betancourt
Íngrid Betancourt Pulecio (born December 25 1961) is a Colombian-French politician. She ran for President of Colombia in 2002. While campaigning in the jungle she was kidnapped and taken by armed rebels named FARC-EP. In July of 2008, she and 14 other hostages were rescued by the Colombian military. Her kidnapping got the worlds attention because of her French citizenship.

Ride the Lightning
"Ride The Lightning" is the second album released by the heavy metal band Metallica. It was released on 19 November 1984.

Brandon Wheat Kings
The Brandon Wheat Kings are a Canadian junior ice hockey team based in Brandon, Manitoba. They compete in the Western Hockey League, and joined the league in the 1967–68 season. Before that they played in the Manitoba Junior Hockey League and were called the Brandon Elks for a short time in the 1940s. They won eight Turnbull Cup Championships as Manitoba Junior Champions, 1939, 1947, 1949, 1950, 1960, 1962, 1963, & 1964 and appeared in the Memorial Cup four times: in 1949 (as an MJHL team), 1979, 1995, and 1996, losing each time. The team plays its home games in Westman Communications Group Place (Keystone Centre). They also played at Wheat City Arena until 1969, and the Manex Arena from 1969 to 1972. Starting in 1973, the Wheat Kings owned and operated a farm team in the MJHL, called the Travellers.
An earlier version of the Wheat Kings played for the Stanley Cup in 1904, but lost to the Ottawa Senators.
The 1949 Brandon Wheat Kings won the Abbott Cup defeating the Calgary Buffalos. They went on to lose the Memorial Cup to the Montreal Royals. The 1949 Brandon Wheat Kings were inducted into the Manitoba Hockey Hall of Fame in the team category.
The Wheat Kings hold the CHL record for most points (125) in a single season, setting the mark in 1978–79.
Season-by-season record.
"Note: GP = Games played, W = Wins, L = Losses, T = Ties OTL = Overtime losses Pts = Points, GF = Goals for, GA = Goals against"

Toy Story 3
"Toy Story 3" is an upcoming computer-animated 3-D movie. It is being made by Pixar Animation Studios. It is supposed to be released on June 18, 2010. It is a sequel to the movies "Toy Story" and "Toy Story 2". Tom Hanks will voice Sheriff Woody, Tim Allen will voice Buzz Lightyear, and Joan Cusack will voice Jessie.

Josip Broz Tito
Josip Broz nicknamed Tito was the leader of Yugoslavia.

David
David, the son of Jesse, was an important King of Israel. He is described in the Old Testament books of 1 Samuel and 2 Samuel. He was the father of King Solomon. Here are the main events in his life.
David’s First Victory.
When David was about twelve, his brothers had to go fight for Israel, under the lead of King Saul. His father was worried about them, and sent David to check on them. When David arrived, a giant Philistine enemy, Goliath, was mocking the Israelites and God,David is a very awesome name. saying, “Who will come and fight me? If he wins, we will be your slaves, but if I win, then you will be our slaves!”. All the Israelites were afraid. When David saw this, he was very angry, and he said, “I will go fight him!”. The King, Saul heard that somebody is brave enough to fight Goliath, so he sent for David.
Saul gave David his amour and weapons, but they were too heavy for him. David told Saul that he would use his slingshot. He then used one stone and hit Goliath in the forehead, then his enemy died. Using Goliath’s own sword, David cut off the head of him.

Milwaukee Bucks
The Milwaukee Bucks are a professional basketball team in Milwaukee, Wisconsin. They play in the National Basketball Association. The current franchise owner is U.S. Senator Herb Kohl.

Load (album)
Load is an album by the heavy metal band Metallica. It was released in 1996.

Michael Collins (Irish leader)
Michael John ("Mick") Collins (; 16 October 1890 – 22 August 1922) was an Irish revolutionary leader. He was Minister for Finance in the First Dáil of 1919, Director of Intelligence for the IRA, and member of the Irish delegation during the Anglo-Irish Treaty negotiations. Later, he was both Chairman of the Provisional Government and Commander-in-chief of the National Army. He was shot and killed in August 1922, during the Irish Civil War.
Most Irish political parties think his contributions were important to make the modern Irish state. Members and supporters of Fine Gael remember him in particular as one of the founders of their movement, or its predecessor Cumann na nGaedhael. That name was adopted in 1923 by the pro-Treaty wing of Sinn Fein.

The Omen
"The Omen" is a 1976 suspense/horror movie directed by Richard Donner. The movie stars Gregory Peck, Lee Remick, David Warner, Harvey Stephens, Billie Whitelaw, Patrick Troughton, Martin Benson, and Leo McKern. A remake, "The Omen," was released on June 6, 2006.

Bhumibol Adulyadej
Bhumibol Adulyadej (;; Royal Institute: Phummiphon Adunyadet;) (born Monday, December 5, 1927), is the current King of Thailand. Most people in Thailand know him as "the Great" (Thai: มหาราช, "Maharaja"), he is also known as Rama IX. Having been the king since June 9, 1946, he is the world's longest-serving current head of state and the longest-serving monarch in Thai history.
A billionare, Bhumibol has used some of his money to pay for over 3,000 development projects, mostly in rural areas. He is very popular in Thailand, and is like a semi-divine figure in a number of thais.
Bhumibol was born in the United States and taught in Switzerland. Bhumibol is also an good musician, artist, and sailor.

Dennis Green
Dennis "Denny" Green (born February 17, 1949 in Harrisburg, Pennsylvania) is a former head coach for the Minnesota Vikings and Arizona Cardinals, in the National Football League.

Tom Coughlin
Thomas Richard Coughlin (born August 31, 1946 in Waterloo, New York) is the head coach for the New York Giants, the 2007 National Football League (NFL) Super Bowl Champions. He was the coach at Boston College before moving to the NFL.

Pet Sounds
Pet Sounds is the tenth music album by the American band The Beach Boys (not counting their Christmas album), which was released in 1966. It was very popular because of its originality; most of The Beach Boys' albums before it had all been about surfing, summer, cars, girls, and fun, and were quite basic musically (mostly rock-n-roll and surf). Pet Sounds was different because of its more complex arrangements; their bass player Brian Wilson, who wrote all of their songs, used a system of recording songs different from the system he had used recording earlier songs. He would record different instrumental pieces for the song separately, then put them together to make the song "whole", meaning that he was able to create sounds that he couldn't create with just the band playing the song. In the recording stringed and wind instruments were used, as well as such unusual for rock music instruments as vibraphone, harp, French horn, harpsichord, electro-theremin and things as bicycle ring, whistles, Coca Cola cans with stones inside of it. Moreover, the lyrics of the songs were more serious and described problems, disappointments and sadness of a young man. Because all the songs are united by similar mood and themes, it is considered to be a concept album.
However, much of the album Brian recorded by himself, with a symphony orchestra and professional studio musicians--people who are hired to play songs for an album--which some of the other Beach Boys didn't like, because they felt like he was ignoring their talents. Mike Love, one of the band's members, thought that it would be too difficult to play these songs on scene, and that their fans would not understand them.
After its release Pet Sounds was not sold very well and reached 10th place in American hit-parade - which was seen as a failure by its main author, but music critics everywhere loved it. The album gained real recognition in 1990s-2000s, when many music magazines listed it in their lists of the best albums in popular music (New Musical Express, Rolling Stone, Melody Maker, Mojo Magazine).
Following its success, Brian decided he wanted to make another album in the same way, which he called "SMiLE." (See the article on SMiLE (album) for more information)

Under My Skin
Under My Skin is a 2004 album by Avril Lavigne.

New York Dragons
The New York Dragons are an Arena Football League team. They were started in 1995 as the Iowa Barnstormers. In 2001, the team moved to New York. They now play in the Eastern Division of the National Conference.

Live Free or Die Hard
"Live Free or Die Hard" (called "Die Hard 4.0" outside of North America) is an action movie starring Bruce Willis and Justin Long.
Plot.
The movie starts with John McClane trying to talk to his daughter Lucy. He pulls her boyfriend out of the car. An angry Lucy goes up to her apartment. Afterwards, the police call McClane and ask him to pick up a kid named Matt Farrell. However, when McClane goes down there, mercenaries attack the two. McClane manages to fight them off and gets Farrell into the car.
Day breaks in Washington D.C. The villain, Thomas Gabriel, launches his plan. He takes control over all of the things that help run the country, like traffic lights and transportation systems. He shuts down the FBI building and calls in an anthrax alert. He makes the lights go green and red very fast so that cars crash into each other. McClane and Farrell get out and walk to the FBI trailer outside. Farrell realizes that this is a "fire sale" – where everything being taken over by these hackers and it is called a fire sale because "everything must go."
McClane and Farrell then head to Middleton, Virginia, because some systems, like electricity, cannot be taken fully over with computers. However, Mai (Gabriel's girlfriend) is already at the plant and has taken over it. McClane attacks her and throws her to the ground and tells Farrell to put the system back up. Mai gets up and kicks him out of the building. McClane uses a car and rams her and they fight inside an elevator shaft. It ends when the car falls with Mai inside.
Farrell and McClane send a picture of Gabriel to the FBI, where they say that Gabriel was hired by them. Gabriel wanted tighter security, but they said no and fired him. Gabriel contacts the Middleton plant to ask what happened. He gets very angry when McClane tells him that Mai is dead and tells his hackers to send all the natural gas they can to the Middleton plant. He also finds Lucy and kidnaps her. The plant blows up and knocks all the power out in the nearby area.
McClane and Farrell take a helicopter to Baltimore, Maryland to meet another computer hacker who calls himself The Warlock. He finds out where Gabriel is – at the Social Security Administration building in Woodlawn. Before the government fired him, Gabriel had made a system; when there was a computer attack, all financial data would be downloaded into the computers there. One of Gabriel's men went down there and starts downloading the data early on in the movie.
Both McClane and Farrell head down there. Gabriel takes Farrell and escapes with the data before McClane can reach him. McClane gets into the truck behind Gabriel's car. Gabriel calls in a jet fighter to attack McClane. During the fight, the highway is destroyed, but McClane manages to jump off and slide to safety, while the pilot ejects from the plane.
He then fights Gabriel inside a warehouse. McClane is shot and he loses his gun. Gabriel puts him in an arm lock and orders his man to shoot Lucy. McClane presses the gun into his shoulder and fires, injuring himself but killing Gabriel. Farrell wildly fires his gun to kill the man that is holding Lucy. The movie ends with the FBI swarming the area and taking Farrell and McClane to the hospital.

Minnesota Timberwolves
The Minnesota Timberwolves are a basketball team in Minneapolis, Minnesota in the United States.

Fred Thompson
Fred Dalton Thompson (born Freddie Dalton Thompson; August 19 1942) is an American politician, actor, attorney, and lobbyist. He starred on "Law & Order" as Arthur Branch, the District Attorney of New York. He quit the show to run as the Republican candidate for the United States presidency in 2008, but he did not become the candidate.

John Glenn
John Herschel Glenn Jr. (born July 18, 1921, in Cambridge, Ohio) is a former United States Senator who was famous for being the first American who orbited the Earth as an astronaut for NASA. 1998 he made his second spaceflight as age of 77 years. He is the oldest man in space.

The Boy with No Name
"The Boy with No Name" is the latest release by Indie pop band Travis and was released in May of 2007. The name of this record came from the fact it took Francis Healy (singer) a long time to name his son.
All songs written by Fran Healy, except where noted.
"3 Times and You Lose" (Healy, Andy Dunlop) – 4:14
This track uses several lyrics and the overall theme from the 1997 B-side "Standing on My Own" (which was included on the single release of "Tied to the 90's").[3]
"Big Chair" (Healy, Dunlop) – 4:07
Backing vocals provided by Julia Stone.
"Under the Moonlight" (Susie Hug) – 4:00
Backing vocals provided by KT Tunstall.
"Colder" (Healy, Dougie Payne) – 4:06
"Sailing Away" (hidden bonus track) – 3:31
Starts at 5:52 into last track (5:38 on UK and Mexican release).
"Perfect Heaven Space" (UK bonus track) – 3:50
"Say Hello" (iTunes bonus track) - 3:33 (Only available on the release date)
Closer was the first single the band released from this album.

Radovan Karadžić
Radovan Karadžić (Serbian Cyrillic: Радован Караџић; born June 19, 1945 in Petnjica, Montenegro, Yugoslavia) is a former Serb politician. He also worked as a poet. He is a psychiatrist. For a long time, he was a fugitive (running from the law), from 1995 until July 21, 2008. The International Criminal Court in The Hague looked for him. They say he might have commited war crimes.
Arrest.
Official sources in Belgrade reported that he had been arrested in Serbia and brought before Belgrade's War Crimes Court. There had been an international arrest warrant against Karadžić for more than a decade. The tribunal looking into war crimes in the Yugoslav war said there were reasons to believe Karadžić had committed war crimes. This includes genocide, mainly directed against Muslims. The United States government had offered a $5 million award for information that led to his arrest, and that of Ratko Mladić. Karadžić was arrested and arraigned at a Serbian court on July 21, 2008.
The film "The Hunting Party" was based on Karadzic's life as a fugitive.

Louis-Napoléon Bonaparte
Napoléon III, also known as Louis-Napoléon Bonaparte(20 April 1808 - 9 January 1873) was the first President of the French Republic and the only emperor of the Second French Empire. Napoleon III is son of Louis Bonaparte and nephew of Napoleon I.

Cleveland Cavaliers
The Cleveland Cavaliers are a team in the National Basketball Association in Cleveland, Ohio.

Indiana Pacers
The Indiana Pacers are a team in the National Basketball Association in Indianapolis, Indiana.

Washington Wizards
The Washington Wizards are a team in the National Basketball Association in Washington, D.C..

Orlando Magic
The Orlando Magic are a team in the National Basketball Association in Orlando, Florida.

Denver Nuggets
The Denver Nuggets are a team in the National Basketball Association in Denver, Colorado.

Memphis Grizzlies
The Memphis Grizzlies are a team in the National Basketball Association in Memphis, Tennessee.

Los Angeles Clippers
The Los Angeles Clippers are a team in the National Basketball Association in Los Angeles, California.

Félix Houphouët-Boigny
Félix Houphouët-Boigny () (18 October 1905 – 7 December 1993) was the first President of Côte d'Ivoire.

Undertow (Tool album)
"Undertow" is Tool's first full-length album, released in 1993. When this album was released, grunge music was at its most popular, and pop punk was slowly beginning to become popular. "Undertow" helped heavy metal music continue as a leading mainstream musical style, and allowed several later bands to break through to the mainstream. Allmusic saw the album's success in the "striking, haunting visuals that complemented the album's nihilistic yet wistful mood." It was eventually certified double platinum by the RIAA on May 14, 2001.
The album was recorded between October and December 1992 at Grand Master Studios, Hollywood, California, and includes songs that the band decided to not release on their previous EP, "Opiate".
CD.
All songs written by Tool unless otherwise noted.
"Disgustipated" is track 69 on most pressings in North America (causing most CD players upon reaching the end of track 9 to advance through tracks 10-68, which contain no data, at a rate of about 2 per second until track 69 is reached). It also appears as track 39, track 10 (mostly in Europe) or as a hidden track following "Flood" on track 9.
On certain Japanese imports, "Disgustipated" is track 70, with a short live version of "Flood" as track 71.

Princess Beatrice of the United Kingdom
The Princess Beatrice (Beatrice Mary Victoria Feodore; later (1885–1917) Princess Henry of Battenberg; April 14, 1857 – October 26, 1944) was a member of the British Royal Family. She was the youngest child of Queen Victoria, and her husband Prince Albert.

Arthur Phillip
Admiral Arthur Phillip RN (11 October 1738 – 31 August 1814) was a British naval officer. Phillip was made Governor of New South Wales, the first European colony in Australia, and was the founder of the site which is now the city of Sydney.
Early Life.
Arthur (Kriddler) Phillip was born in Fulham, London, in 1738. His father was a German-born language teacher, Jacob Phillip. His mother, Elizabeth Breach, was English, and the widow of a navy captain. Phillip went to a school for poor boys at the Greenwich Hospital. At the age of 13 he joined the merchant navy. Phillip joined the Royal Navy at 15. He saw action during the Seven Years' War in the Mediterranean at the Battle of Minorca in 1756. In 1762 he was promoted to Lieutenant. When the war ended in 1763 he was put on half pay. He married and became a farmer in Lyndhurst, Hampshire. He separated from his wife about 6 years later.
In 1774 Phillip joined the Portuguese Navy as a captain. He served in the Spanish-Portuguese War, 1776-1777. Phillip took a group of convict ships from Portugal to Brazil. This trip was a success because not many people died. This may have been the reason Phillip was asked to lead the expedition to Sydney. In 1778 England was at war again, and Phillip was recalled to active service. In 1779 he was given his first command, the ship "Basilisk". He was promoted to captain in 1781, and given command of the "Ariadne". In 1782 he was captain of the "Europe" with his friend Philip Gidley King as his lieutenant. They sailed to India. In 1784 he was back on half pay in England. He spent time in southern France and in 1786 was doing survey work for the Royal Navy.
The First Fleet.
In October 1786, Phillip was made the new Governor of New South Wales. The British government wanted to start a penal colony (prison) on the east coast of Australia. Phillip knew about farming, and had taken prisoners to Brazil for the Portuguese. This made him a good choice to be leader. Phillip had a very hard time getting the ships ready for the 8 month sea voyage to Australia. He had to take everything that the new colony might need. Phillip had no real idea of what he might find when he got there. There wasn't much money to buy things. He wanted people who knew about farming, building and making things, but this was rejected. Most of the 772 convicts (prisoners) were thieves from the city area of London. Phillip also took a group of marines (soldiers) and small group of officers who were to help him run the new colony.
The First Fleet, of 11 ships, sailed on 13 May 1787. The first ship, "HMS Supply", reached Botany Bay on 18 January 1788. Phillip soon decided that this site, picked by Sir Joseph Banks, was not suitable. It had poor soil, no safe place to leave the ships, and no drinking water. Phillip decided to go north to Port Jackson. On 26 January 1788 (this day is now called Australia Day the marines and convicts landed at Sydney Cove. It was a successful trip, as only 40 convicts had died. Phillip named Sydney after Lord Sydney.
Sydney Cove.
Image:Sketch of Sydney Cove.jpg|thumb|Sketch of Sydney Cove, July 1788
The first years of the settlement were very hard. They only had the supplies they brought with them. They had to start growing their own food, but the soil around Sydney was poor. They didn't know about the climate, how much rain or when it would fall for example. Very few of the convicts knew anything about farming or growing food. They did not have enough farming tools. The convicts did not want to be farm workers. The colony was in danger of starvation for long time. The soldiers, who didn't like being given orders in many cases, did not think it was their job to make the convicts work. Phillip had to put some convicts in charge (overseers) to get the other convicts working. This was the start of the process of making some convicts free which led to the reforms of Lachlan Macquarie after 1811. As Governor of the new settlement, Phillip had complete power over the eastern half of Australia.
Phillip had respect from the Aboriginal people because he was missing a front tooth. This tooth was the same tooth that they knocked out as part of their initiation ceremonies.
Phillip soon had problems with the soldiers in the penal colony. Life in Sydney was difficult, without proper houses and not enough food. The officer in charge of the soldiers, Major Robert Ross, wanted to give up the settlement and go back to England. Ross complained about Phillip and wrote letters to the government in England about him. The soldiers thought they should be given land and other benefits. They thought they should be given more food than the convicts, but Phillip believed everyone should have an equal share. Phillip finally sent Ross to be in charge of the colony on Norfolk Island. The British government continued to send out convicts, there were over 4000 in Sydney by 1792. Food still needed to be brought in as the colony could not yet grow enough. Phillip began giving small grants of land to ex-convicts to start farms around Parramatta, New South Wales.
Return to England.
On 11 December 1792 Phillip left to go back to England. He needed medical treatment for a pain in his side. He planned to return, but on medical advice he resigned as Governor and stayed in England. He married Isabella Whitehead in 1794. He eventually got better and in 1796 returned to the navy as a captain. In January 1799 he was made a rear admiral and put in charge of the Sea Fencibles. Their job was to defend England against Napoleon. He retired from active service in 1805. He was made an admiral of the Blue in 1814. He died at Bath, on 31 August, 1814. He is buried at the church of St.Nicholas, Bathampton.
Lost.
In 2007 Geoffrey Robertson QC found that Phillip's remains are no longer in the church. It is not known where they are. Robertson believes that it is a insult to Phillip that he wasn't buried in one of England's cathedrals. He wants the remains of Phillip found and brought back to Australia.

Nimrod (album)
"Nimrod" is the fifth album by the punk rock band Green Day, released on October 14, 1997 on Reprise Records.

Insomniac (album)
"Insomniac" is the fourth studio album from the punk rock band Green Day.

Warning (album)
"Warning" is the sixth full length album by Green Day, released in 2000.

1,000 Hours
"1,000 Hours" is the first release from American punk rock band Green Day and the first of several releases for the independent record label Lookout! Records.

Alexander III of Scotland
Alexander III (Mediaeval Gaelic: "Alaxandair mac Alaxandair"; Modern Gaelic: "Alasdair mac Alasdair"), King of Scots, was born at Roxburgh on 4 September 1241 and died on 19 March, 1286.
He was the only son of Alexander II with his second wife, Marie de Coucy. Alexander's father died on 6 July 1249 and he officially became king at the age of eight. This happened at Scone on 13 July, 1249.

39/Smooth
"39/Smooth" was released as the debut album by Green Day in 1990 on Lookout! Records on vinyl and cassette.

Slappy
"Slappy" is the second EP by Green Day, and was released on Lookout! Records in the summer of 1990 on seven-inch vinyl
Track listing.
All tracks by Green Day, except where noted.

Sweet Children (EP)
"Sweet Children" is the third EP released by punk rock band Green Day.
Track listing.
All songs by Green Day, except where noted.

1,039/Smoothed Out Slappy Hours
"1,039/Smoothed Out Slappy Hours" is a collection of early recordings by American punk rock band, Green Day.
Track listing.
All songs by Billie Joe Armstrong (lyrics) and Green Day (music), except where noted.

Kerplunk (album)
"Kerplunk" (also known as "Kerplunk!") is the second full-length album by punk rock band Green Day. It was released on January 17, 1992 by Lookout! Records.
Track listing.
All songs by Billie Joe Armstrong (lyrics) and Green Day (music), except where noted.
Bonus tracks.
The following tracks are only available on the CD release. They were first released on the "Sweet Children" EP.

Green Party of Pakistan
The Green Party was founded on April 28 2002 and since has been active in local politics. Members of the political party are known as the "Pakistan Greens". It is a member of the Asia-Pacific Green Network. Liaquat Ali heads the legal party.

Raúl Castro
Raúl Modesto Castro Ruz (born June 3, 1931) is the President of the Cuban Council of State and the head of state of Cuba. He is also Second Secretary of the Politburo of the Central Committee of the Communist Party of Cuba (PCC), Commander in Chief (Maximum General) of the Armed Forces (Army, Navy, and Air Force)and he younger brother of Fidel Castro.

Princess Mononoke
is a 1997 anime movie made by Hayao Miyazaki.

Oklahoma City Thunder
The Oklahoma City Thunder is a professional basketball franchise based in Oklahoma City, Oklahoma. The successor to the now-defunct Seattle SuperSonics franchise, the club is set to replace Seattle in the Western Conference's Northwest Division and begin play at Oklahoma City's Ford Center during the 2008–09 NBA season.

Seattle SuperSonics
The Seattle SuperSonics (also called the Seattle Sonics) were an American professional basketball team based in Seattle, Washington that played in the Pacific and Northwest Divisions of the National Basketball Association (NBA) from 1967 until its final season in 2007–2008.

C. Everett Koop
Charles Everett Koop (born October 14, 1916) is an American physician who became well known as a pediatric surgeon at the Children's Hospital of Philadelphia. He was an early name in today's pediatric surgery, and then served as the Surgeon General of the United States and as vice admiral in the Public Health Service Commissioned Corps from 1982 to 1989, under President Ronald Reagan and was thought of as the first "celebrity Surgeon General".
Views.
These four views, along with Koop's personality and use of the media, made the office of Surgeon General more well known than it was before. He is the first Surgeon General to be the subject of a well known song —, by Frank Zappa. Koop was unusual in his style, and well known for his mustache-less beard and colorful bow ties.

Philip Gidley King
Philip Gidley King (April 23, 1758 - September 3, 1808) was a sailor in the British Royal Navy who became the third Governor of New South Wales.
Early life.
King was born in Launceston, Cornwall. His father was a draper, selling cloth and fabrics. He joined the navy in 1770 at the age of 12. He was made the captain's servant on the "HMS Swallow". He served in the West Indies and then fought in the American War of Independence. He became a midshipman and later a lieutenant. He served with Captain Arthur Phillip in "HMS Ariadne". He went to India with Phillip in 1783 in the ship "HMS Europe". Phillip was very pleased with King. He made King a lieutenant on HMS "Sirius" when he took the First Fleet to Australia in 1787 to start the penal colony.
Norfolk Island.
Three weeks after the First Fleet got to Sydney, Governor Phillip sent King to Norfolk Island. His task was to set up a small penal colony that would make use of the timber and flax growing on the island. These would be of use to the British Navy. He arrived at the island on March 3, 1788. There was no safe place to land on the island and this made it a difficult place to have a settlement. King had a group of 23 people including 15 convicts. Over the next 2 years they began clearing land (removing trees) to grow crops and to raise cattle and other animals. King was made Lieutenant-Governor of Norfolk Island. In March 1790, Phillip sent King back to England. He was to go back and tell the British government about the problems of the new settlements in Australia.

Shirley Temple
Shirley Jane Temple (born April 23, 1928) is an Academy Award-winning actress and dancer, most well known for being an American child actress of the 1930s, who also had a notable career as a diplomat as an adult. After becoming famous at the age of six with her role in "Bright Eyes" in 1934, she starred in many films that did very well, which made her well known to the public. She was also in films as a young adult in the 1940s. In later life, she became a United States ambassador and diplomat.

The Black Parade Is Dead!
"The Black Parade is Dead!" is a CD/DVD by My Chemical Romance it was recorded live in Mexico.
Track Listing.
All songs written and composed by My Chemical Romance.
From the Palacio de los Deportes in Mexico City, Mexico on October 7, 2007
From the Palacio de los Deportes in Mexico City, Mexico on October 7, 2007[4]
From Maxwell's in Hoboken, New Jersey, on October 24, 2007[4]

Malik Ghulam Muhammad
Ghulam Muhammad (20 April 1895 - 12 September 1956) (Urdu: ملک غلام محمد) served as third Governor-General of Pakistan from 1951 until 1955, and was also the 1st Finance Minister shortly before his death in 1956.

Ayub Khan
Muhammad Ayub Khan (Urdu/Pashto: محمد ايوب خان), GCMG, MBE, HJ, NPk, (May 14, 1907 – April 19, 1974) was a field marshal during the mid-1960s, and the President of Pakistan from 1958 to 1969. He became Pakistan's first native Commander in Chief in 1951. He was the youngest full-rank general and self-appointed field marshal in Pakistan's military history.
Khan became president in 1958 as part of a non-violent coup. In the 1965 presidential election, people thought that Khan had cheated so he could win against Fatimah Jinnah.

Fazal Ilahi Chaudhry
Fazal Ilahi Chaudhry (Urdu: فضل الہی چودھری) (January 1, 1904 - June 2, 1982) was President of Pakistan from August 14, 1973 until his resignation on September 16, 1978.

Ghulam Ishaq Khan
Ghulam Ishaq Khan (abbreviated as GIK) (Urdu/Pashto: غلام اسحاق خان) (January 20, 1915 – October 27, 2006) was President of Pakistan from August 17, 1988 until July 18, 1993.

Honey to the B
"Honey To The B" is the first album by pop singer Billie Piper, released in 1998 (see 1998 in music). Billie (she was known at the time only by her first name) was the first British female singer to have a first single start at #1 on the UK pop charts.

In the End
"In The End" is a song by Linkin Park. It appeared on their first album, "Hybrid Theory". It was the fourth single from the album.

In Utero
"In Utero" was the third album by the American grunge band Nirvana. It was also the last album that was released before Nirvana's singer, Kurt Cobain, died six months later from a shotgun wound to the head, inflicted by himself.
Before release.
Nirvana performed "Rape Me" on television before "In Utero" was released. Many people thought the song was offensive, and the song was almost not released on the album. When the album was released, the Wal-Mart version called the song "Waif Me."

Incesticide
"Incesticide" is a compilation album by the American grunge band, Nirvana. This album features many of their B-Sides and demos of their songs. On the back of the CD, Kurt Cobain spells his name wrong. He spells it "Kurdt Cobain."

Charles James Napier
General Sir Charles James Napier GCB (August 10, 1782 – August 29, 1853) was a British general and Commander-in-Chief in India, famous for conquering Sindh province in present-day Pakistan.

Wasim Sajjad
Wasim Sajjad (born 30 March 1941) was President of Pakistan two times. He served as interim President prior to elections.

Muhammad Rafiq Tarar
Muhammad Rafiq Tarar (Urdu: محمد رفیق تارڑ) (b. November 2, 1929) was President of Pakistan from January 1, 1998 until June 20, 2001. During Pakistan's independence in 1947, Rafiq Tarar worked as a relief worker in camps set up by Muslim Students Federation for refugees, migrating from British India to Pakistan.

Muhammad Ali Bogra
Muhammad Ali Bogra (1909 - 1963) (Bengali: মোহাম্মদ আলী বগুড়া محمد علی بوگرہ Urdu) was a Pakistani statesman of Bengali origin. He served as Prime Minister of Pakistan from 1953 until 1955.

Chaudhry Muhammad Ali
Chaudhry Muhammad Ali (Urdu: چوہدری محمد علی) (July 15, 1905 - December 2, 1980) was a Pakistani statesman. He served as Prime Minister of Pakistan from 1955 to 1956.

Huseyn Shaheed Suhrawardy
Huseyn Shaheed Suhrawardy (September 8, 1892 - December 5, 1963) was a politician from Bengal in undivided India, and later in East Pakistan. He served as Prime Minister of Pakistan from 1956 until 1957. He is also known for his controversial role in the Direct Action Day of August 16, 1946. Following riots in Bengal during the last days of India's fight for freedom, he was considered a favourite of Muhammad Ali Jinnah. He is also considered to be the first populist leader in Pakistan's history. He is the founder of the Awami League, one of the two major political parties of present day Bangladesh.

Ibrahim Ismail Chundrigar
Ibrahim Ismail Chundrigar (Urdu: ابراہیم اسماعیل چندریگ, April 15, 1898 - March 13, 1968), commonly known as I. I. Chundrigar, was Prime Minister of Pakistan for about 2 months from October 17, 1957 to December 16, 1957.

Nurul Amin
Nurul Amin (Bengali: নূরুল আমীন, Urdu: نورالامین, July 15, 1893 - October 2, 1974) was a Prime Minister and Vice President of Pakistan. He was a well known Bengali leader of the Pakistan's Muslim League, and served as Chief Minister of East Pakistan.

Muhammad Khan Junejo
Muhammad Khan Junejo (Urdu/Sindhi: محمد خان جونیجو) (August 18, 1932 – March 16, 1993) was the eleventh Prime Minister of Pakistan.

Ghulam Mustafa Jatoi
Ghulam Mustafa Jatoi (Urdu: غلام مصطفیٰ جتوئی) (born 14 August 1931) was Prime Minister of Pakistan for 3 months, from August 6, 1990 to November 6, 1990.

Zafarullah Khan Jamali
Mir Zafarullah Khan Jamali (Urdu/Baloch: میر ظفراللہ خان جمالی) (born January 1, 1944) is a former Prime Minister of Pakistan. He is the current chairman of the Pakistan Hockey Federation.

Shaukat Aziz
Shaukat Aziz (Urdu: شوکت عزیز), (born March 6, 1949 in Karachi, Pakistan) was the Prime Minister of Pakistan from 2004 to 2007. He became Finance Minister in November 1999. Aziz was chosen by President Musharraf for the position of Prime Minister after the resignation of Zafarullah Khan Jamali on June 6, 2004. He became Prime Minister on August 28, 2004 and served until November 15, 2007. He became the first Prime Minister of Pakistan to complete a full term in office.

Yousaf Raza Gillani
Syed Makhdoom Yousaf Raza Gillani (Urdu: مخدوم سيد يوسف رضا گیلانى) (born June 9, 1952 in Karachi) is the twenty-sixth and current Prime Minister of Pakistan. He was a former Speaker of the National Assembly of Pakistan (1993-1997) and former Federal Minister (1985-1986).
He was nominated by Pakistan Peoples Party (PPP), with the support of coalition partners, Pakistan Muslim League (N), Awami National Party, Jamiat Ulema-e-Islam (F) and Muttahida Qaumi Movement on 22 March 2008. He took the oath of office from President Pervez Musharraf on 25 March 2008. Gilani is the first elected Prime Minister of Pakistan from the Seraiki-speaking belt.
Gilani is also the present vice chairman of the Pakistan Peoples Party.

Warren Hastings
Warren Hastings (December 6 1732 - August 22 1818) was the first Governor-General of India, from 1773 to 1785. He was born at Churchill, Oxfordshire. He attended Westminster School before joining the British East India Company in 1750 as a clerk. In 1757 he was made the British Resident (administrative in charge) of Murshidabad. He was appointed to the Calcutta council in 1761, but was back in England in 1764. He returned to India in 1769 as a member of the Madras council and was made governor of Bengal in 1772. In 1773, he was appointed the first Governor-General of India.
For ten years Hastings managed to help expand British control across India that had been stated by Robert Clive.
Hastings resigned in 1784 and returned to England, however when he arrived in England he was charged with corruption by Edmund Burke. Burke was encouraged by Sir Philip Francis who had been wounded by Hastings in a duel in India.
He still had supporters though and on August 22, 1806, the Edinburgh East India Club held a party to honour Hastings, asking for "Prosperity to our settlements in India".
Places named after him.
The city of Hastings, New Zealand and the Melbourne outer suburb of Hastings, Victoria, Australia were both named after him.
Hastings is a Senior Wing House at St Paul's School, Darjeeling, India, where all the senior wing houses are named after colonial-age military figures.

Robert Clive
Robert Clive, 1st Baron Clive of Plassey, KB (29 September 1725–22 November 1774), also known as Clive of India, was a British soldier who established British control in Southern India and Bengal. Together with Warren Hastings he was one of the key figures in the creation of British India.
Robert Clive was born at Styche, the family estate, in the parish in Moreton Say, near Market Drayton, Shropshire. Teachers were unable to control the young Clive. He is said to have climbed the tower of St Mary's Parish Church in Market Drayton and sat on a gargoyle, frightening people down below. He also attempted to set up a protection racket enforced by a gang of youths. Faced with the choice of paying up or receiving a visit from Clive and his 'boys', many of Market Drayton's shopkeepers decided to pay. He bad behaviour resulted in him being expelled from three schools, including Market Drayton Grammar School.

Iron Maiden (album)
Iron Maiden is a first album made by British heavy metal band Iron Maiden.
It was released on 11th April 1980. The main musical type of the album is heavy metal but some songs, like Sanctuary or Running Free are like punk rock music. Many fans feel that a song from this album - Phantom Of The Opera is the best song Iron Maiden have ever made.

Bangladesh Awami League
The Bangladesh Awami League (Bengali: বাংলাদেশ আওয়ামী লীগ; also translated Bangladesh People's League) is the mainstream secular political party in Bangladesh. The party is now headed by Sheikh Hasina, the daughter of the late Sheikh Mujibur Rahman. The Awami League has been in government twice, about eight and a half years, since Bangladesh's independence in 1971.

Apna Dal
The Apna Dal is a political party in India. Most of the people who support are from the Kurmi caste. Its main base is in central Uttar Pradesh. Apna Dal is led by Sone Lal Patel.

Ambedkar National Congress
The Ambedkar National Congress is a political party based in India. The party works for the rights of Dalits. Mr. Mohammed Kazam Ali Khan is the founder and President of the ANC.

Albert Rosellini
Albert Dean Rosellini (born January 21, 1910) is a lawyer from the U.S. state of Washington. Rosellini is part of the Democratic Party and was the Governor of Washington (1957–1965) for two terms. He is the oldest living person to have been a governor of a U.S. state, and was the first Italian American Catholic to become a governor of a state west of the Mississippi River. He was called "Taxellini" by people who did not think he was doing a good job as a governor, while he was called "The Gov." by people who did think he was doing a good job.

Walter Mondale
Walter Frederick "Fritz" Mondale (born January 5, 1928) is an American politician who was the forty-second Vice President of the United States (1977–1981) under President Jimmy Carter, a two-term United States Senator from Minnesota, and the Democratic Party nominee for president in 1984, which he lost.
Mondale was the first Vice President to have an office, and made the role of Vice President more important than it once was.

Brisbane Broncos
The Brisbane Broncos are a rugby league team that is based in Brisbane. They play in the National Rugby League premiership. the have won the competition 6 times in the last 20 years thus making them the most successful rugby league team in Australia.

Donald Dewar
Donald Campbell Dewar (21 August 1937 – 11 October 2000) was the first First Minister of Scotland from 1999 until his death in 2000. He was the first person to hold the position of First Minister following the establishment of the Scottish Parliament in 1999.
In Government.
After the 1997 General Election, Dewar was in a position which the late John Smith (leader of the Labour Party and a good friend of Dewar) would never have thought possible. He was able to start the process to split Scotland from the United Kingdom, and worked endlessly on creating the Scotland Act, popularly known as Smith's "unfinished business". When ratified, this was to give Scotland its first Parliament for nearly 300 years.
First Minister of Scotland.
The first elections to the Scottish Parliament were held on 6 May 1999, with Dewar leading the Scottish Labour Party against their main opponents, the SNP under Alex Salmond. He was elected as the MSP for Glasgow Anniesland. Although Scottish Labour won the most seats, they did not have a majority in Parliament to allow them to form an Executive without the help of a smaller party. A deal was agreed with the Scottish Liberal Democrats to work together, with Dewar agreeing to their demand for the abolition of up-front tuition fees for university students.
On 13 May, Dewar was nominated as First Minister, and was officially appointed by the Queen on 17 May at a ceremony in the Palace of Holyroodhouse. He later travelled to the Court of Session to be sworn in by the Lord President and receive the Great Seal of Scotland.
On 16 June, Dewar set out the legislative programme for the Executive which included: an Education bill to improve standards in Scottish schools; land reform to give right of access to the countryside, a bill to abolish the feudal system of land tenure; and a bill to establish National Parks in Scotland.
Death and funeral.
In April 2000, Dewar was admitted to hospital for tests on his heart, following a previous test where a minor irregularity was discovered.. In May 2000, he later had surgery to repair a leaking heart valve, and was forced to take a three month break from Parliament, with Deputy First Minister, Jim Wallace taking over as Acting First Minister.. He returned to work on 14 August 2000.
Dewar dealt with the exams results fiasco and the lorry drivers strike, and attended the Labour party conference in Brighton in September, but at the end of September told the historian Tom Devine in Dublin that if there was no surge of the energy of old, he would have to reappraise the situation within a few months time.
On 10 October 2000 around lunchtime, Dewar sustained a fall. He seemed fine at first but later that day suffered a massive brain hemorrhage which was possibly triggered by the medication he was taking after the heart surgery. Donald Dewar died one day later, at 12.18pm, in Edinburgh's Western General Hospital. He was 63 years old.
Dewar's funeral service was held at Glasgow Cathedral, amid scenes of mourning unknown for a politician in Scotland's largest city. He was cremated on 18 October 2000, and his ashes were scattered at Lochgilphead.
"Although he has become something of a political legend, Donald would have abhorred any attempt to turn him into some kind of secular saint. He would have been horrified at a Diana-style out-pouring of synthetic grief at his untimely death." -- Iain MacWhirter, Sunday Herald, October 15 2000.

Dmitry Medvedev
Dmitry Medvedev is the President of Russia, officially on May 7, 2008. He won the presidential election held on March 2, 2008 with about 70% of the vote.

Songs About Jane
Songs About Jane is the debut album by pop-rock alternative band Maroon 5. The album was released in 2002. Singles include Harder to Breathe, This Love, She Will Be Loved, Sunday Morning, Must Get Out, and Shiver.

It Won't Be Soon Before Long
It Won't Be Soon Before Long is the second studio album by Maroon 5 released in May of 2007. Singles include Makes Me Wonder, Wake Up Call, Won't Go Home Without You, and If I Never See Your Face Again and other songs include Goodnight Goodnight, Not Falling Apart, and Nothing Lasts Forever.
The "Background".
A chorus from the song called Nothing Lasts Forever (the 7th track off "It Won't Be Soon Before Long") was featured in a song by Kanye West. The Kayne West song, featuring the lead singer Adam Levine, was called Heard 'Em Say. It was released in 2005 on the album Late Registration. The first track off the album, called "If I Never See Your Face Again", was released as a remix in May, 2008. This track had been worked on with help from Rihanna. The song turned out to be a music video and ranked #51 on the U.S. "Billboard" Hot 100.

Chariot (album)
"Chariot" is an album by rock singer Gavin Degraw. The album features singles "I Don't Wanna Be", "Chariot", and "Follow Through". The album was released in 2004. "Chariot" also was re-released in 2005 as a live acoustic album.

Kung Fu Panda
"Kung Fu Panda" is a 2008 animated film about a bungling panda who aspires to be a kung fu warrior. "Kung Fu Panda" is directed by John Stevenson and Mark Osborne and produced by Melissa Cobb. Although the concept of a kung fu panda has been around since at least 1993, the idea for the film was conceived by Michael Lachance, a DreamWorks Animation executive. Work on the film did not begin until 2004 with the film premièring at the 61st Cannes Film Festival in May 2008 and seeing general distribution in summer. The film was produced by DreamWorks Animation's studio in Glendale, California, and distributed by Paramount Pictures.
The film stars the voices of Jack Black, Jackie Chan, Dustin Hoffman, Angelina Jolie, Lucy Liu, Seth Rogen, David Cross and Ian McShane.
Dreamworks are currently in talks to make a sequel to Kung Fu Panda.
The Story.
The is about a Panda named Po,(voice Jack Black),who is a sweet,but clumsy and has dreams of fighting with the legendary Furious Five and protecting the city against all threats. The only problem is that Po has no real life experience of kung fu, and his real job is serving noodles at his dad's noodles shop. News of selecting the Dragon Warrior is sent out from the Jade Temple, and the whole city along with Po, go to the celebration. The competition is between the Furious Five: Tigress (voice Angelina Jolie), Viper (voice Lucy Liu), Crane (voice David Cross), Monkey (voice Jackie Chan), and Mantis (voice Seth Rogen). Po accidentally enters the contest and is named the Dragon Warrior. Master Shifu (voice Dustin Hoffman) must find a way to train Po and make him a Kung Fu Master, especially, after they learn that the snow leopard, Tai Lung (voice Ian McShane), is headed their way.

Convention People's Party
The Convention People's Party (CPP) was a political party made by Kwame Nkrumah in 1949. It was formed as a split from the United Gold Coast Convention, which, before the forming of the CPP, Nkrumah became general secretary of in 1947. Nkrumah split from the UGCC because Nkrumah did not agree with the UGCC's beliefs and ways.. The party continues to exist today.

David Paterson
David Alexander Paterson (born May 20, 1954) is an American politician and the current Governor of New York. He is the first black governor of New York and the first legally blind governor of any state. He became governor when Eliot Spitzer resigned. Due to Paterson becoming governor, two black governors are serving at the same time for the first time in more than 100 years; as Governor Deval Patrick of Massachusetts is also African American.

Mulan II
"Mulan II" is a Disney 2005 movie and the sequel to the 1998 animated movie "Mulan". It was directed by Darrell Rooney and Lynne Southerland, and features Mulan, and her new fiancé, Shang, on a special mission: getting the Emperor's three daughters across the country to meet their soon-to-be fiancés. The movie deals with arranged marriages, loyalty, relationships, making choices, trust, and finding true love. The entire cast from the first movie returned, except for Eddie Murphy (Mushu), Miriam Margolyes (The Matchmaker), Chris Sanders (Little Brother) and Matthew Wilder (Ling's singing voice). Murphy and Margolyes were replaced by Mark Moseley and April Winchell, and Gedde Watanabe does his own singing for the sequel.
The Story.
Fa Mulan gets the surprise of her young life when her love, Captain (now General) Li Shang asks for her hand in marriage. Before the two can have their happily ever after, the Emperor assigns them a secret mission, to escort three princesses to Chang'an, China. Mushu is determined to drive a wedge between the couple after he learns that he will lose his guardian job if Mulan marries into the Li family. After the princesses unexpectedly fall in love with the Gang of Three, Mulan decides to help them escape the fate of marrying men they do not love. This contradicts the Emperor's orders and forces him to put Mulan's relationship with Shang into question. They are attacked by Mongolians, and the fate of China hangs in the balance.
Soundtrack.
The soundtrank contains songs from the movie performed by various artists, as well as portions of the movie's score composed by Joel McNeely. It was released on January 25, 2005 by Walt Disney Records.

How to Save a Life
How to Save a Life is a studio album by The Fray. The album was released in September of 2005. Singles include How to Save a Life, Over My Head (Cable Car), All at Once, and Look After You.

Nevermind
"Nevermind" is the second studio album by the American grunge band, Nirvana. While the album before this, "Bleach", was not very popular, "Nevermind" was. It had 4 singles: "Smells Like Teen Spirit," "Come as You Are," "In Bloom," and "Lithium." There was some controversy because of a child's penis which was visible on the front cover.

Tom Coburn
Thomas Allen "Tom" Coburn, M.D. (born March 14, 1948) is an American politician and medical doctor. A member of the Republican Party, he currently serves as the junior U.S. Senator from Oklahoma.

David IV of Georgia
David IV, also known as David II or David III, or David the Builder (Georgian: დავით აღმაშენებელი, "Davit Aghmashenebeli") (1073 – January 24, 1125), from the House of Bagrationi, was King of Georgia from 1089 to 1125.

Skull Ring
"Skull Ring" is a 2003 album by Iggy Pop.

Bullet in a Bible
"Bullet in a Bible" is a live CD, DVD and UMD release by Green Day, which was issued on November 15 2005.

Taro Aso
Taro Aso (1940-) is the President of the ruling Liberal Democratic Party of Japan, and the first Catholic Prime Minister of Japan. He is from Iizuka, Fukuoka Prefecture.

Boys Like Girls (album)
Boys Like Girls is the debut hit album released in 2006 by rock band Boys Like Girls. The album was recorded in 2005-2006. The album contains of 4 singles.
Track listing.
The album was re-released on November 13, 2007 which contains an acoustic version of "Hero/Heroine" plus live performance videos and photo galleries as part of the enhanced portion of the disc.

Everything That Happens Will Happen Today
"Everything That Happens Will Happen Today" is the second album made by David Byrne and Brian Eno, released on August 18, 2008. They also made an album in 1981 called "My Life in the Bush of Ghosts" and Eno helped make songs with Byrne and Talking Heads. Byrne and Eno made this music in 2007 and early 2008. Byrne will tour for this album and play these songs and other music these two have written.
History.
In December 2007, David Byrne announced on the BBC Radio music show, "The Weekender", that he was working with musician/producer and former collaborator Brian Eno on a brand new album of "proper songs", describing it as a "completely different thing" from "My Life in the Bush of Ghosts", which was mostly experimental. While discussing the 2006 remix of that album at a dinner party, Eno suggested finishing some songs that he had written and intended to finish but that did not have lyrics, some of which were eight years old. Byrne visited Eno's studio to listen to the rough mixes of the demos and the two decided to collaborate to finish writing the songs, leaving Eno and Peter Chilvers to convert a variety of digital music formats into Musical Instrument Digital Interface to strip out information and make them suitable for Byrne to embellish. (Chilvers would be thanked in the liner notes as "Digitial Archeologist.") The two continued to write for several months - although Byrne confessed that he was initially "terrified" at writing lyrics for the demos - and agreed that if the project wasn't fun for both of them, they would abandon it.
Composition.
He elaborated, "In a nutshell, Brian wrote most of the music, and I composed most of the vocal melodies and lyrics, and then sang them." If Byrne's vocal harmonies were radical enough, Eno would revise the instrumentation to accompany it. Using a style similar to the Talking Heads album "Speaking in Tongues", Byrne scatted and murmured some lyrics before they were completed and Eno also contributed some vocal harmonization he credits as "inhuman piano."
Both musicians continued to work on their own projects during the composition of "Everything That Happens Will Happen Today" - including Byrne conducting the second season of "Big Love" and composing and recording "Here Lies Love" with Fatboy Slim, Eno producing Coldplay's "Viva la Vida". Chris Martin of Coldplay even wrote a song to the instrumental track for "One Fine Day", but acquiesced when he heard Byrne's song saying that he "couldn't do better than that." Once that song was finished, the two began in earnest writing the rest of the music. As the project progressed, Byrne got to working several hours a day on the project.
The two were inspired by Gospel music while making the album; both have described it as "electronic Gospel", in particular the track "Life Is Long." In addition to subtle Biblical themes in the lyrics, Eno was inspired by Gospel music, which he initially discovered through Talking Heads while working on "More Songs About Buildings and Food" by listening to "Surrender to His Will" by Reverend Maceo Woods and the Christian Tabernacle Choir. While Byrne considers the music "[un]like any contemporary gospel record that you would hear out there," it is "informed by that feeling and those kind of lyrics, which allude to hope in the face of despair." Eno also considers the album "[S]omething that combines something very human and fallible and personal, with something very electronic and mathematical sometimes." The two tried to "make that picture of the human still trying to survive in an increasingly complicated digital world... It's quite easy to make just digital music and it's quite easy to make just human music, but to try and make a combination is sort of, exciting, I think."
Eno's demos were primarily written in major chords, which Byrne considered slightly "ominous." In spite of this, Byrne's lyrics ended up being hopeful and spiritual, with themes of redemption. Byrne has speculated that the hopeful lyrics might be an antidote to being "completely pessimistic and cynical about politics and the state of the world." As he explained, "I was surprised that's what came out... The tracks are very different from what I would have done myself. I lean toward things that are more complicated." Eno also thinks the album is "[m]uch better than the songs [he] imagined."
Eno has also said the album is about "paint[ing] a picture of the human trying to survive in an increasingly digital world." Themes of humanity struggling with technology are apparent on several tracks. The lyrical content includes "a sinister inflection" but "many songs feel fairly uplifting and the overall tone is hopeful." Byrne attempted to write "simple but not corny, basic but heartfelt;" one of his inspirations in writing lyrics was the story of Valentino Achak Deng in Dave Eggers' ' and the two are thanked in the liner notes.
Production.
By March 2008, the duo had recruited multi-instrumentalist and previous Eno collaborator Leo Abrahams to play guitar, percussion instruments, and piano and Seb Rochford to play drums with Byrne in New York City. Abrahams continued to perform in his home studio and only played guitar with Byrne on one occasion. They would continue working on the tracks in Abrahams' studio through May, with all collaborations being carried on via e-mail. In April 2008, speaking at an event in New York, Byrne confirmed the release of a new album, calling it a "record of sung songs" in contrast to the experimental music from "My Life in the Bush of Ghosts" and later told the "New York Daily News" that "Brian had written a lot of music, but needed some words, which I know how to do. What's it sound like? Electronic Gospel. That's all I'm saying." Eno also explained the differences between this album and their previous one saying, "[T]his is quite different from "My Life" in that the intention of that album was to not use our voices at all, but instead to find voices and stick them on to the music. This new one is different – these are songs written and sung by David. They cover quite a range. They go from electronic folk Gospel to quite indefinable areas of music."
Throughout the spring and summer, Abrahams recorded drums at his home studio and Cherif Hashizume recorded more Cafe Music Studios, while Robert Harder at Harder Sound recorded the drums on "My Big Nurse", "Never Thought", "The Painting", and "Life Is Long". Mixing continued through June 2008 in New York by Patrick Dillett at Kampo Studios, who recorded brass and percussion and sent the audio to Greg Calbi at Sterling Sound for mastering. On July 28, 2008, details of the album became of public knowledge when Byrne posted on his blog that he and Eno had finished the new album, titled "Everything That Happens Will Happen Today", and that it would be released on August 18, 2008. The album website was launched on the same day, with an introduction and a promotional video of Byrne announcing the new album.
Release.
The album was self-released on August 18, 2008, only through the official album's website. It is available there free for streaming and for purchase as a download of DRM-free MP3s; they plan to release the album from other online digital music services in September 2008. No record label is involved on the release, and independent distributors will handle the physical product, which will be released in October 2008 as an enhanced CD and a deluxe-packaged CD with graphics and packaging done by Stefan Sagmeister, who received a Best Boxed or Special Limited Edition Package Grammy Award in 2005 for art direction on the Talking Heads' "Once in a Lifetime" box set and designed the cover to Byrne's "Feelings". This design of a domestic scene has been compared to "The Sims".
The next day, Byrne's soundtrack to the television series "Big Love" - ' - was released as a Compact Disc.
Versions.
In addition, customers are entitled to lossless FLAC versions of the album at no extra cost for all versions of the album.
Singles.
The first single off the album, "Strange Overtones", was released on August 4, 2008 as a free digital download only through the album's website. The track has been described as "a song about writing a song." It was downloaded over 40,000 times within the first three days it was available.
Critical reception.
Album reviews have been mostly positive; for instance, with eight reviews, the album has received a 77% on Metacritic. Positive reviews have labeled it "exceedingly pleasant," "maddeningly infectious," and "vibrant."
Promotion.
While Byrne and Eno have done a few interviews for the album, the two are attempting to market it via word-of-mouth and Internet hype rather than a traditional marketing scheme. Eno was convinced in part because of his own preferences for digital music from the iTunes Music Store rather than CDs as well as the success of Radiohead's "In Rainbows" from 2007. Byrne was also impressed by the band's release strategy as a means of valuing music. The duo have carefully avoided Internet leaks by not giving out promotional copies of the album to journalists, but Byrne did preview the song "One Fine Day" prior to the release by performing it with a choir of senior citizens.
Byrne has outlined the relative merits of different distribution models with this one reflecting his "self-distribution model" in which "the artist stands to receive the largest percentage of income from sales per unit — sales of anything. A larger percentage of fewer sales, most likely, but not always. Artists doing it for themselves can actually make more money than the massive pop star, even though the sales numbers may seem minuscule by comparison."
The duo enlisted a music marketing startup company - Topspin Media - to design their site, delivery options for the digital music, and promotional web widgets. The company used viral marketing techniques to collect potential customers' e-mail addresses and encourage them to post the album streaming on their blogs. The approach has been lauded as a way of undermining copyright infringement. Topspin have also created a Flickr pool encouraging users to upload screenshots of the widget posted to web sites.
Songs of David Byrne and Brian Eno Tour.
Byrne has assembled a band to tour for the album, performing music from this collaboration as well as the duo's previous "My Life in the Bush of Ghosts" and songs from the three Eno-produced Talking Heads albums - "More Songs About Buildings and Food", "Fear of Music", and "Remain in Light". (The two also collaborated for several tracks on Byrne's "The Catherine Wheel".) By performing music from all of their collaborations, Byrne hopes to "draw a line linking this new material with what we did 30 years ago, a little bit anyway." Although early reports indicated that Eno would be participating, he will not.
In planning the set lists for the tour, Byrne has assembled songs "from this new record, as well from collaborations Brian and I have done in the past which includes one song from "Bush of Ghosts" [and] three songs from the three Talking Heads records we did together."

The College Dropout
"The College Dropout" is the debut album by rapper and producer Kanye West, released February 10, 2004. It was nominated for Grammy Award for Album of the Year and won Best Rap Album and Best Rap Song for "Jesus Walks" in 2005. It was voted as the best album of the year by "Rolling Stone" magazine and in The Village Voice Pazz & Jop critics poll, was ranked #1 in "Spin" magazine's "40 Best Albums of the Year", and received a near-perfect 4.5 mic rating from "The Source". The album has received great acclaim from critics and mainstream fans alike, for its balance of mainstream commercial appeal and its innovative subject matter.
Info.
"The College Dropout" reached #1 on Billboard's Top R&B/Hip-Hop Albums Chart, and reached #2 on the Billboard 200. In the UK, it peaked at #12 on the album chart and spent several months in the top 20. The album went triple platinum in the United States.
The first single from the album, "Through the Wire", was recorded while West's mouth was wired shut after a near-fatal car accident in October 2002. It features a Chaka Khan sample, peaked at #15 on the Billboard Hot 100 Singles chart while its successor "All Falls Down", which features R&B singer Syleena Johnson, peaked at #7. The third single, "Jesus Walks", peaked at #11 while a fourth extract, "The New Workout Plan", made a minor impression on the R&B/Hip-Hop charts (see list of US Billboard chart positions below). In the UK, "Through The Wire" peaked at #9 on the singles sales chart, "All Falls Down" peaked at #10, and "Jesus Walks" peaked at #11.

Slipknot (album)
"Slipknot" is the first album by Nu metal band Slipknot. The album was released in the year 2000. Singles include "Wait and Bleed", "Spit It Out", and "Eyeless".

All Hope Is Gone
All Hope Is Gone is the 4th studio album by metal band Slipknot. The album was released in 2008 featuring the singles "Psychosocial" and "All Hope Is Gone".

Om Shanti Om
"Om Shanti Om" is a 2007 Bollywood movie directed and choreographed by Farah Khan. It stars Shah Rukh Khan and Deepika Padukone in the lead roles as the protagonists while Shreyas Talpade, Arjun Rampal, and Kirron Kher feature in supporting roles. Arjun Rampal is the antagonist in the movie. More than forty two well-known Bollywood stars from yesteryear and today appear in the course of the movie, including thirty-one of them (not including the stars of the movie) in one song alone.
Plot.
Om Prakash (Shah Rukh Khan) is a junior artist in the 1970s movie industry. He and his friend Pappu (Shreyas Talpade) are trying to succeed in the movie industry. Om's mother, Bela Makhija (Kirron Kher), inspires and encourages her son to become a success. He dreams of becoming a 'hero' one day on the big screen. He is in love with the country's heart throb and movie actress, Shanti (Deepika Padukone), who is very successful and famous. Om goes to the premiere of her upcoming movie "Dreamy Girl" starring Shanti, and sneaks in claiming he is the actor Manoj Kumar. On another occasion, during a shooting of a movie, where Om is acting as a junior artist, he notices Shanti is caught in the middle of a fire scene which goes out of control. Om jumps in and saves her, as no one else does. Shanti is very grateful and they become good friends. Om asks her if she will meet him for one evening and she agrees. Om is ecstatic and plans a wonderful evening for her - using props and a movie set and several backgrounds in a studio to woo her. He tells her that she deserves all the happiness in the world; all she has to do is ask. She tells him that she will and abruptly goes away, leaving Om confused.
The following day, Om tries to talk to Shanti on the sets of a movie but she looks very preoccupied. He follows her into a make up room to talk to her, but ends up listening to her having an argument with top producer Mukesh (Arjun Rampal) about a recent promise of Mukesh's to marry a businessman's daughter in return for funding of a movie. Om is shocked to hear that Shanti is actually secretly married to Mukesh, and both Om and Mukesh are surprised to learn that Shanti is pregnant with Mukesh's child. Mukesh is adamant that his relationship with Shanti be kept a secret, because if the industry finds out she is married, not only will her career be finished, but also his upcoming movie "Om Shanti Om", starring Shanti, that had just been promised to be financed by the businessman mentioned. If it is found out she is married, he is afraid she will become very unpopular and the funding will be cut. Shanti does not care and demands that they get married in public and make their relationship official. Mukesh finally relents and promises her they will make it public soon. Om is heartbroken at this situation and goes back home with a heavy heart. One night, Om notices Mukesh escorting Shanti to the set of "Om Shanti Om". He curiously waits outside, looking from afar but not being able to see inside or hear what was going on. Inside, Mukesh tells Shanti that for her happiness, he is going to cancel the movie, reveal their marriage to the public, and have a grand wedding here in this spectacular set under the chandelier and then destroy the set after they have the marriage ceremony in it. Just as Shanti bursts out with disbelief and happiness, Mukesh shows his true colors. He displays his anger and frustration at Shanti's constant demands to make their relationship public. He holds her responsible for his financial loss, and cancellation of this movie that could have made him a very rich man. Then, Mukesh Mehra pushes Shantipriya and he sets fire to the set of the movie and walks out, leaving Shanti trapped inside. She begs and pleads to him to let him out but he walks away from the burning set. Om has to hurry because Shanti is running out of oxygen. Om witnesses Mukesh drive away and tries to save Shanti, but Mukesh's guards beat him up and try to stop him from reaching her. After they leave, though, Om is able to break into the set, but is unable to reach Shanti because the set explodes. Om, beaten, burned, and half dead, is hit by a car owned by Rajesh Kapoor (Javed Sheikh), a well-known actor who is rushing his pregnant wife (Asawari Joshi) to a hospital. Rajesh takes Om to the hospital as well, but he dies on the operating table. Moments later, Rajesh Kapoor's son is born, and unknowing of who the man he hit with his car was, Kapoor names his son Om. The rest of the movie is accelled 30 years, to the life of Om Kapoor who is the reincarnation of Om Prakash.Om Kapoor is a popular movie star and lives an extravagant life. He suffers from intense pyrophobia, a remnant of his past life as Om Prakash, which is revealed when he is shooting for a song (Dard-e-Disco) in his movie. During a location hunt for Om's next movie, Om and his crew choose the remains of the burnt "Om Shanti Om" set. As soon as he sees the set, Om begins to remember bits of his past life. Not long after, he meets Mukesh, who has been a top Hollywood producer for the past 30 years. Om remembers his past life in full and has emotional reunions with Bela and Pappu. To avenge Shanti's death, Om hatches a plan with Pappu and several others, deciding to remake the movie "Om Shanti Om" with Mukesh (whom he convinces to produce the movie). During the audition for Shanti's role, the crew meets Sandhya (nicknamed Sandy), a big fan of Om's who is a Shantipriya look-alike. Om and the crew train Sandy to play Shanti and then launch their plan: Om plays mind games with Mukesh by taking him to the restored set of "Om Shanti Om" and then having Sandy act like Shanti to make Mukesh think that Shanti has returned as a ghost. However, their plan backfires when Mukesh sees Sandy running away from the set and chases her. While running, Sandy cuts her arm on a lamp, revealing to Mukesh that Shanti has not returned and that Om was deceiving him. Having discovered Om's plan, Mukesh confronts him and they begin to fight. Suddenly, the real ghost Shantipriya appears and tells Om that the night when she died Mukesh came back for her body but she was alive and breathing and he buried her under the chandelier. When Mukesh tries to kill the ghost, whom he still thinks is Sandy, Om takes Mukesh's gun and shoots him in the leg. Mukesh lands right under the chandelier under which he and Shanti were to be married; Om raises his hand to shoot Mukesh once and for all, but Shanti stops him, and then motions upward, where the hanging chandelier is. As he looks up, the chandelier starts falling because the ghost forces the chandelier to fall upon the cursed one, and it crushes Mukesh, killing him. After Mukesh dies,Om looks at the ghost happily and the ghost cries. Om is shocked to see Sandy emerge with Pappu; it is then that he realizes that the "Sandy" that he and Mukesh saw was actually the ghost of Shantipriya. Om snaps his head back to where the ghost was and catches one more glimpse of her tearfully saying a last goodbye before she disappears up the staircase. The movie ends with all the stars of the movie come out of a limo as if they are going to a movie premiere. The last person to come is director Farah Khan. When she comes out, nobody is there and people are cleaning up.

Philadelphia Soul
The Philadelphia Soul is a American football team in the Arena Football League. The team plays in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. They are not to be confused with the Philadelphia Eagles. They are owned by Jon Bon Jovi and Ron Jaworski, a former player for the Philadelphia Eagles. They won the Arena Bowl in 2008.

WWE Women's Championship
The World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE) Women's Championship is an official championship in World Wrestling Entertainment competed for by divas. The title is exclusive to the Raw brand.
History.
The WWE Women's Championship has descended from the National Wrestling Alliance World Women's Championship. The Title became inactive in 1990 when Rockin' Robin Vacated the Title after departing from the WWF. In 1993 Alundra Blayze won the Title after Winning a Tournament. However the Title became Inactive after Alundra Blayze dropped the Title into a Garbage Can live on WCW Monday Nitro this incident forced her to give up the title.
The WWE Women's Championship was then reactivated in September 1998 when Jacqueline Moore won a match against Sable.
Current champion.
The current champion is Beth Phoenix who is in her second reign, along with Santino Marella, defeated Mickie James and WWE Intercontinental Champion Kofi Kingston intergender in an tag team match to win both titles at SummerSlam in Indianapolis, Indiana on August 17, 2008

World Tag Team Championship (WWE)
The World Tag Team Championship is a professional wrestling tag team championship in World Wrestling Entertainment. It is the original world tag team title of WWE. Currently, it is exclusive to the Raw brand.
History.
The championship was first introduced into the then "World Wide Wrestling Federation (WWWF)" in 1971. Following its introduction into the WWF Luke Graham and Tarzan Tyler became the first "WWWF Tag Team Champions" on June 3. In 1979 the title became known as the "World Wrestling Federation (WWF) Tag Team Championship" when the promotion renamed itself World Wrestling Federation
In 2001 at the Survivor Series Pay-per-view during the Invasion Storyline The Hardy Boyz, Matt Hardy and Jeff Hardy who were the current "World Tag Team Champions" and were competing for the "World Wrestling Federation" took on The Dudley Boys, Bubba Ray Dudley and D-Von Dudley who were the current WCW World Tag Team Champions and were competing for "The Alliance" in a title unification match inside a Steel Cage, The Dudley Boys defeated The Hardy Boyz and were named the last WCW Tag Team Champions while also becoming the "WWF Tag Team Champions"
After the WWE name change in 2002, the championship was referred to as the "World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE) Tag Team Championship". After a period where the championship was to be freely defended on either WWE Monday Night Raw or WWE Thursday Night Smackdown the championship became exclusive to the Raw Brand. The current General Manager at this time Stephanie McMahon created new WWE Tag Team Titles which were to be exclusive to the Smackdown Brand.
Current Champions.
The current champions are John Morrison and The Miz, who are in their first reign as a team. They defeated CM Punk and Kofi Kingston at a House show on December 13, 2008.

Arthur Mutambara
Arthur Guseni Oliver Mutambara (born May 25, 1966) is a Zimbabwean politician. He became the President of a faction of the Movement for Democratic Change (MDC) in February 2006. He has worked as the Managing Director and CEO of Africa Technology and Business Institute since September 2003.

Kill 'Em All
"Kill 'Em All" is thrash metal band Metallica's first album. It was released on July 29, 1983.

Good Morning (Kanye West song)
"Good Morning" is a single on Kanye West's 3rd studio album "Graduation". The song was released in late August 2007 on iTunes. "Good Morning" is the 1st track on the album.

All the Greatest Hits
All the Greatest Hits is an album from the band McFly. They released it on November 5, 2007 and it features all of McFly's UK singles. The album also includes 3 new songs: "The Heart Never Lies", "The Way You Make Me Feel" and "Don't Wake Me Up".

Death Magnetic
"Death Magnetic" is the ninth hit studio album by thrash metal band Metallica. The album was released September 12, 2008 with the hits "The Day That Never Comes", "Cyanide", "My Apocalypse", "The Unforgiven III", and "The Judas Kiss". "St. Anger" was the previous rock album released in 2003 of April with the singles "Frantic", "St. Anger", and "The Unnamed Feeling".

ReLoad
ReLoad is an album by Metallica. It was released on November 18, 1997.

Harry Kipke
Harry G. Kipke (March 26, 1899 - September 14, 1972) was the head football coach at the University of Michigan from 1929-1937. He is one of only three coaches in school history to direct teams to four consecutive conference championships.

Ted Petoskey
Frederick Lee "Ted" Petoskey (born January 5, 1911 in, died November 30, 1996 in) was a three-sport athlete at the University of Michigan.

Californication (album)
"Californication" is the seventh studio album by American alternative rock band Red Hot Chili Peppers. It was released on June 8, 1999 on record label Warner Bros. Records. The producer was Rick Rubin. On "Californication", John Frusciante returned to Red Hot Chili Peppers. He had appeared on "Mother's Milk" and "Blood Sugar Sex Magik", but Dave Navarro was the guitarist on the band's last album, "One Hot Minute". The band's sound was very different because of Frusciante's return.

By the Way
"By the Way" is the eighth studio album by American alternative rock band Red Hot Chili Peppers. It was released on July 9, 2002 by record label Warner Bros. Records. It sold over 282,000 copies in the first week, and reached the number two position on the "Billboard" 200 chart. The singles from the album were "By the Way", "The Zephyr Song", "Can't Stop", "Dosed" and "Universally Speaking". The lyrics on the album were about different things to past Red Hot Chili Peppers albums. However, some critics thought it was similar to the previous album, "Californication", but more a bit more serious.

Stadium Arcadium
"Stadium Arcadium" is the ninth studio album by American alternative rock band Red Hot Chili Peppers. It was released on May 9, 2006 by record label Warner Bros. Records. It sold 442,000 copies in the U.S. in the first week. It also appeared in the number one position on the "Billboard" 200 chart. According to Anthony Kiedis, "Stadium Arcadium" was going to be three different albums that the band would release; one every six months. However, they changed their mind and made one big double album. Critics said in reviews of "Stadium Arcadium" that the music on it was not very original, and was similar to the band's older work. However, they said it was still very good music. "Stadium Arcadium" won a Grammy Award, and so did "Dani California", the first single.

Brother Bear 2
Brother Bear 2 is a Disney animated movie, made in 2006 and a sequel to Disney's other animated feature film, Brother Bear.

One Hot Minute
"One Hot Minute" is the sixth studio album by American alternative rock band Red Hot Chili Peppers. It was released on September 12, 1995 by record label Warner Bros. Records. John Frusciante had left the band after their previous album, "Blood Sugar Sex Magik", so Dave Navarro joined as the new guitarist.
Red Hot Chili Peppers' music was very different because of Navarro. "One Hot Minute" is less about sex and love than the band's previous work, but is instead about themes like drugs and depression. It also had some heavy metal guitar riffs. Anthony Kiedis had become addicted to cocaine and heroin in 1994, so some of the lyrics he wrote were about the effects of drugs.
"One Hot Minute" did not sell many copies, even though it reached number four on the "Billboard" 200 chart. "Blood Sugar Sex Magik" sold twice as many copies as "One Hot Minute". In 1998, Navarro was asked to leave the band. Red Hot Chili Peppers told the media it was because they and Navarro liked to make different kinds of music. Stephen Thomas Erlewine of Allmusic said that "One Hot Minute" is as musically ambitious as "Blood Sugar Sex Magik", but is even more unfocused, which means it provides the fewest thrills of any of the group's albums."

Jacob Zuma
Jacob Gedleyihlekisa Zuma (born April 12, 1942) is a South African politician.

Chase This Light
"Chase This Light" is an album by Alternative rock band Jimmy Eat World. It was released on October 23 2007.
Several singles came from this album including "Big Casino", "Always Be" and "Let It Happen".

Good Girl Gone Bad
"Good Girl Gone Bad" is the third studio album by Rihanna. The album has 2 versions. One version called "Good Girl Gone Bad:Reloaded" was released June 2008. It features newer singles including "Take a Bow", "Disturbia", and "If I Never See Your Face Again" which is a remix single from rock-pop band "Maroon 5". The singles from the album include (from the original version of the album) "Umbrella", "Breakin' Dishes", "Shut Up and Drive", "Don't Stop the Music", and "Hate That I Love You".
The Good Girl Gone Bad Tour.
Rihanna did a worldwide concert tour on September 15, three months after the release of the album. The tour had three parts with sixty-one shows. It ended on April 5, 2008. The first part of the tour began in Canada. It included eleven shows across the country with Akon. The tour later went through United States and Europe without Akon.
Supporting acts for the tour were Akon, Ciara and David Jordan.
"Good Girl Gone Bad: Reloaded".
The album was released a second time as a two disc special version named "Good Girl Gone Bad: Reloaded" in June 2008. The set includes twelve original tracks, three new tracks—the lead U.S. number-one single "Take a Bow", a remix of "If I Never See Your Face Again" with Maroon 5, and the U.S. number-one single "Disturbia"—and a DVD containing behind the scenes footage and four live performances from her tours. It came with new album art, which features a green toned background instead of the original's grey toned background. In the UK, the background is a white-gray toned background instead of the green. The new version of the album was released in most countries on June 17, but the CD version was released on June 2 in the UK (with the DVD version following on June 16) and on June 21 in Australia. "Disturbia" was released online in May 2008. The song "Cry" was released on international versions of the album and is a UK and Australian bonus track on the re-release. The re-release made the album soar from 124 to 7 on the Billboard 200, selling 63,000 copies and having a 930% sales increases. iTunes has now removed the standard version of "Good Girl Gone Bad" and replaced it with the new reloaded version. In France the album soared from 141 to forty-three having the greatest gainer of the week. In the UK it soared from number fifty-nine to number twelve having the "Greatest Gainer" certification, before rising to number five later on in its chart run. By September 14 2008 the album has still been charting strongly in the UK, dipping in and out of the top 10 for many weeks. Good Girl Gone Bad: Reloaded reached a new peak of #3 on the UK Albums Chart.

Music of the Sun
Music of the Sun is the first album by pop and R&B singer Rihanna. The album was released August of 2005 with the single "Pon de Replay".

Golda Meir
Golda Meir "(pronounced, Gol-da My-ear)", (, born Golda Mabovitch, May 3 1898 - December 8 1978, known as Golda Myerson from 1917-1956) was the fourth prime minister of the State of Israel.
Golda Meir became Prime Minister of Israel on March 17 1969 after serving as Minister of Labour and Foreign Minister. She was said to be the "Iron Lady" "(a strong minded woman)" of Israel's politics years before that name became said about the British prime minister, Margaret Thatcher. Meir was Israel's first and so far only female prime minister. She was the world's third female prime minister. The two biggest events of her time as prime minister were the murder of eleven Israeli athletes at the 1972 Summer Olympic Games and the 1973 Yom Pippur War. After questions about her handling of the war, Meir resigned from her job even though she had been found to be not to blame for problems with the war.
Before she became prime minister.
Her name at birth was Golda Mabovitch () in Kiev in the former Russian Empire (today Ukraine), to Blume Naidich and Moshe Mabovitch, a carpenter. The family moved to Milwaukee, Wisconsin, USA. Her father found a job as a carpenter, and her mother ran a grocery store. At the age of eight, she was already put in charge of watching the store when her mother went to the market for supplies. At age 14, Golda went to North Division High School and worked part-time. Her mother wanted her to leave school and marry, but she did not. She ran away from home and bought a train ticket to Denver, Colorado, and went to live with her married sister, Sheyna Korngold. The Korngolds held evening meetings at their home where Meir learned about the Jew's desire for a country of their own, literature, women's rights, trade unions and more. In Denver, she also met Morris Meyerson, a sign painter, whom she later married at the age of 19.
During time as prime minister.
The two biggest things to happen during her time as prime minister were; the murder of eleven Israeli athletes at the 1972 Summer Olympic Games by the terrorist group Black September, and the twenty day warcalled the Yom Kippur War between Israel and the Arab states led by Egypt and Syria in October 1973.
End of time in office.
The Yom Kippur War was from October 6 to October 26, 1973 and was between a group of Arab countries led by Syria and Egypt against Israel. Israel was surprised by the attack and after the Yom Kippur War, the government was asked questions about Israel's not being ready for the war. A group of people who were asked to look into the war cleared her of direct blame, and her party won the elections in December 1973, but she left on April 11 1974, because of what she felt the people of Israel wanted. Yitzhak Rabin became prime minister after her on June 3 1974.
In 1975, Meir was awarded the Israel Prize for her services to the State of Israel.
Death.
On December 8 1978, Golda Meir died of cancer in Jerusalem at the age of 80. She was buried on Mount Herzl in Jerusalem on December 12, 1978.

Tha Carter III
"The Carter III" is the 6th official studio album by rapper "Lil Wayne". The album contains singles like Lollipop, Got Money, A Milli, "Mrs. Officer", and "Mr. Carter". in the first two months after it's release, it became 2x platinum.

Ted Strickland
Ted Strickland (born August 4, 1941) is the Governor of the U.S. state of Ohio.

Critically Ashamed
Critically Ashamed is the sophomore effort by Fm static, a canadian pop punk band, like I've said before LOL.
Below are a few songs I'd like to mention
Waste of time.
Waste of time was a main single from this album. It's about how God has pushed trevor mcnevan through the shadows of his life (trevor explained this on one of his myspace blogs for fm static)
Tonight.
Tonight is the acoustic (well, sort of) ballad that you find on pop punk albums. It was written about trevors brother who died at an early age. He remembers the times they had and is thinking about what would be happening, had his brother still been alive.
Hope the rock show goes good.
The above title is a short song, an intro to the album, where trevors nephew is wishing him look for his concert.
The next big thing.
The next big thing is this fun-sounding song with a huge warning. To convince people you are good, you almost have to tell yourself your the best. New artists buy into that, and its unfortunate.

A-Sides
"A-Sides" is a best-of album by Soundgarden with songs spanning the band's thirteen year career. It was released on November 4, 1997 through A&M Records.

Down on the Upside
"Down on the Upside" is the fifth and final studio album by Soundgarden.

Louder Than Love
"Louder Than Love" is the second full-length album by the American grunge band Soundgarden. It was released on September 5, 1989 through A&M Records. After touring in support of its first full-length studio album, "Ultramega OK", released in 1988, the band signed with A&M and began work on its first album for a major label. The songs on the album featured a heavy rock sound with some songs featuring unusual or unorthodox time signatures.
Because of some of the song lyrics the band faced various retail and distribution problems upon the album's release, including the addition of a Parental Advisory sticker on the album packaging. "Louder Than Love" would become the band's first album to chart on the "Billboard" 200. The band supported the album with tours of North America and Europe. It was the last Soundgarden album to feature the band's original bassist, Hiro Yamamoto.

Ultramega OK
"Ultramega OK" is the debut album by the American grunge band Soundgarden. It was released on October 31, 1988 through SST Records. Following the release of the EPs "Screaming Life", released in 1987, and "Fopp", released in 1988, for the Sub Pop record label, the band signed with the independent record label SST and went to work on its first full-length studio album.
The resulting album contained elements of psychedelic rock, classic rock, and hardcore punk. The band supported the album with a tour of the United States as well as its first overseas tour. In 1990, the album earned a Grammy Award nomination for Best Metal Performance.

Fopp (EP)
"Fopp" is the second EP by the grunge band Soundgarden, released in August 1988 on Sub Pop Records. In 1990 it was combined with the band's first EP "Screaming Life" (1987) and released as "Fopp".

Screaming Life
"Screaming Life" is the debut EP by the Seattle grunge band Soundgarden, released in October 1987 on Sub Pop Records. "Screaming Life" was later combined with the band's next EP, "Fopp" (1988) and released as "Fopp" in 1990.
Recording.
The EP was recorded in 1987 in Seattle's Reciprocal Studios with producer Jack Endino, who also produced albums for Nirvana and Mudhoney.
Music and lyrics.
Drummer Matt Cameron described the sound on the EP as "pretty raw." "Hunted Down", Soundgarden's first single, is representative of the early "grunge" sound — with its dirty guitar, dissonant atmosphere and lyrics concerning entrapment and escape. "Nothing to Say" features drop D tuning, which would become a signature of Soundgarden's sound on later albums. Guitarist Kim Thayil said he learned about the tuning from the Melvins's Buzz Osborne. The original version of "Tears to Forget" appeared on the 1985 "Deep Six" compilation album, which featured some of the first recordings by the earliest Seattle grunge bands, including Soundgarden. That version was recorded with drummer Scott Sundquist, but the version on "Screaming Life" was recorded with Cameron.
Some time prior to recording, producer Jack Endino found old rolls of quarter-inch tape at a garage sale, and some contained recordings of a Christian preacher giving sermons in the early 1950s. Soundgarden vocalist Chris Cornell had the idea to have the preacher's voice on "Hand of God". The recording was synched with the eight-track machine, copied to an empty track and by coincidence (or because, as Endino says, "God smiled upon us") the tape rolls matched perfectly with the song. Cornell also added his own sarcastic preacher-style vocals, with the lines "let it be known today that if you've got two hands you're supposed to pray!". However, according to Endino, the labels on the rolls of tape were near-illegible and thus the name of the preacher remains unknown.
Release and reception.
Cornell said that the EP was met with rave reviews and that "everybody loved it." "Hunted Down" was Soundgarden's first single and also the first song on Sub Pop's "hold music" tape. According to Thayil, "you would call them up, and when they put you on hold you heard 'Hunted Down'". It was the only single released from the EP. "Nothing to Say" was Soundgarden's first B-side, released on the "Hunted Down" single. The song also appeared on the KCMU compilation tape "Bands That Will Make Money", which was distributed to record companies. Upon hearing the song, record labels began contacting the band, which eventually led to the band signing with A&M Records.
Imagery and design.
The cover of "Screaming Life" was taken by grunge photographer Charles Peterson, and features Cornell singing and Thayil playing guitar in the background. The album cover was an attempt by Sub Pop to capitalize on Cornell's image. The first 500 copies of the EP were pressed on orange vinyl; after that, they were released on standard black vinyl.
The title of the EP inspired the title of a book of photography by Peterson, named "Screaming Life: A Chronicle of the Seattle Music Scene". Published in 1995, it is composed mainly of live photos taken by Peterson from the mid 1980s though the mid 1990s. Many of Peterson's photographs were used as album artwork for grunge bands. The book is accompanied by a CD, with 9 songs selected by Peterson from bands of the era – Soundgarden's "Entering" is one of these songs.

Loudest Love
"Loudest Love" is an EP by the grunge band Soundgarden. It was released in October 1990 through A&M Records.
Overview.
The EP was first released in Japan, and later released in the United States. The track listing is the same as that for the "Loud Love" single, but with the addition of "Hands All Over", "Heretic" and "Come Together".

Screaming Life/Fopp
"Screaming Life/Fopp" is a compilation album by the grunge band Soundgarden. It was released on May 11, 1990 through Sub Pop Records.
Overview.
The album combines the band's first two EPs: "Screaming Life" (1987) and "Fopp" (1988). It was released in 1990 (see 1990 in music) by Sub Pop. There are two cover songs on the album; "Swallow My Pride" is a Green River cover and "Fopp" is an Ohio Players cover.
Track listing.
"Recorded for Screaming Life:"
"Recorded for Fopp:"

Louder Than Live
"Louder Than Live" is a home video released by the Seattle grunge band Soundgarden featuring songs performed live at the Whisky a Go Go in Los Angeles, California on December 7, 1989 and December 10, 1989. It was released on May 22, 1990.
Overview.
It features five live tracks filmed during the Louder Than Love tour. The live tracks are "Get on the Snake", "Gun", "I Awake", "Big Dumb Sex", and a medley of Spinal Tap's "Big Bottom" and Cheech & Chong's "Earache My Eye", with footage from both concerts mixed together. It also features footage of the band performing two songs in the studio. The studio clips are "Loud Love" and "Hands All Over". It is on this video that frontman Chris Cornell is seen wearing his infamous silver duct-tape shorts. The bassist for these performances was Jason Everman. "Louder Than Live" was released on VHS only, with no official DVD version available.
In addition to the home video, A&M released a promo 12" (on blue vinyl, July 1990) and CD (May 1990) with the same title, "Louder Than Live". The vinyl includes the 5 live tracks from the video in addition to "Beyond the Wheel". The center label features a close-up picture of guitarist Kim Thayil's face. The CD came wrapped in brown paper, duct-taped closed with a yellow and black sticker that reads "Soundgarden: "Louder Than Live". In addition to the 6 other live tracks, it includes "Hunted Down". This album has been bootlegged on black vinyl; genuine copies can be distinguished by the A&M logo.

Motorvision
"Motorvision" is a home video released by the Seattle grunge band Soundgarden. It was released on November 17, 1992.
Overview.
It features eight songs performed live at the Paramount Theatre in Seattle, Washington on March 5, 1992 and March 6, 1992 during the "Badmotorfinger" tour. "Motorvision" was released on VHS only, with no official DVD version available.
The video features candid footage of the band and people associated with it, including Sub Pop co-founders Bruce Pavitt and Jonathan Poneman. Before the first song begins, the band is introduced on stage by a clown, J. P. Patches.

Songs from the Superunknown
"Songs from the Superunknown" is an EP by the grunge band Soundgarden. It was released on November 21, 1995 through A&M Records. It was released on the same day as the CD-ROM "Alive in the Superunknown".
Overview.
The EP is the audio-only counterpart to "Alive in the Superunknown". "Jerry Garcia's Finger" is featured exclusively on "Songs from the Superunknown".
The CD-ROM "Alive in the Superunknown" contains the first four tracks from "Songs from the Superunknown" plus a multimedia portion featuring photos of the band, a video game, four music videos ("My Wave", "Fell on Black Days", "Black Hole Sun", and "The Day I Tried to Live"), and a live video of "Kickstand", among other things.

Charles Curtis
Charles Curtis (January 25, 1860 – February 8, 1936) was a Representative and a Senator from Kansas as well as the thirty-first Vice President of the United States.

Hubert Humphrey
Hubert Horatio Humphrey, Jr. (May 27, 1911 – January 13, 1978) was the thirty-eighth Vice President of the United States, serving under President Lyndon B. Johnson. Humphrey twice served as a United States Senator from Minnesota, and served as Democratic Majority Whip. He was a founder of the Minnesota Democratic-Farmer-Labor Party and Americans for Democratic Action. He also served as mayor of Minneapolis, Minnesota, 1945–1949. In 1968, Humphrey was the nominee of the Democratic Party in the United States presidential election but narrowly lost to the Republican nominee, Richard Nixon.

Alben W. Barkley
Alben William Barkley (November 24, 1877 – April 30, 1956) was a Democratic member of the U.S. House of Representatives and the United States Senate from Paducah, Kentucky, majority leader of the Senate, and the thirty-fifth Vice President of the United States.

John Nance Garner
John Nance Garner IV nicknamed "Cactus Jack" (November 22, 1868 – November 7, 1967) was the forty-fourth Speaker of the United States House of Representatives (1931-33) and the thirty-second Vice President of the United States (1933-41).

Thomas A. Hendricks
Thomas Andrews Hendricks (September 7 1819 – November 25 1885) was a U.S. Representative and a Senator from Indiana, a Governor of Indiana, and the twenty-first Vice President of the United States (serving with Grover Cleveland).

Levi P. Morton
Levi Parsons Morton (May 16, 1824 – May 16, 1920) was a Representative from New York and the twenty-second Vice President of the United States. He also later served as Governor of New York.

Garret Hobart
Garret Augustus Hobart (June 3 1844 – November 21 1899) was the twenty-fourth Vice President of the United States.

Thomas R. Marshall
Thomas Riley Marshall (March 14, 1854 – June 1, 1925) was an American politician who served as the twenty-eighth Vice President of the United States of America under Woodrow Wilson from 1913 to 1921.

Charles G. Dawes
Charles Gates Dawes (August 27, 1865 – April 23, 1951) was an American banker and politician who was the thirtieth Vice President of the United States. For his work on the Dawes Plan for World War I reparations he was a co-recipient of the Nobel Peace Prize. He served in the First World War, was U.S. Comptroller of the Currency and the first director of the Bureau of the Budget, and in later life the U.S. ambassador to the United Kingdom.

Chris Brown (album)
"Chris Brown" is the first album by Chris Brown. The album was released November of 2005. He had made several songs on the album sound anywhere from rap and hip hop to dance and R&B. He released five popular singles off the album. His first was a pop and hip hop song called "Run It!" featuring Juelz Santana.

Fragile Future
"Fragile Future" is the third album by Hawthorne Heights. It was released in 2008. It was their first album without Casey Calvert, because he died in late 2007.
Hawthorne Heights didn't have a lot of success on the singles, but it was seen as a new start for the band.
While much of the album was inspired by things that had been happening to the band, it never says the words "Casey" or "Victory Records"
The album art includes a picture of Casey Calvert near a lamppost.

Bangladesh Nationalist Party
Bangladesh Nationalist Party (Bengali: বাংলাদেশ জাতীয়তাবাদী দল Bangladesh Jatiotabadi Dôl, BNP) is the immediate past ruling political party of Bangladesh.

Franz von Papen
Franz Joseph Hermann Michael Maria von Papen zu Köningen (29 October 1879 - 2 May 1969) was a German nobleman, Catholic monarchist politician, General Staff officer, and diplomat, who served as Chancellor of Germany in 1932 and as Vice-Chancellor in 1933-1934.

A Little Bit Longer
A Little Bit Longer is the third hit studio album by American teen pop-rock band "The Jonas Brothers". The album was released August 12th of 2008 in the United States. The title of the album, "A Little Bit Longer," comes from their song of the same name, which Nick Jonas wrote about his dealings with having Type One Diabetes. The album artwork was released by Team Jonas, the Jonas Brothers' official fan club, to fan club members via an e-mail newsletter on June 20, 2008. Like their last album, this one also features that includes more than 30 pages of bonus features with exclusive video performance, 60 printable photos, complete album lyrics, downloadable graphics, and hidden links. In addition, the packaging of the album is made from 100% recycled materials.

Take This to Your Grave
"Take This to Your Grave" is the second studio album by rock band Fall Out Boy. The album was released 2003. Credits are Patrick Stump, Pete Wentz, Joe Troham, and Andy Hurley.

Frederick I, Holy Roman Emperor
Frederick I Barbarossa (1122 – 10 June 1190) was elected King of Germany at Frankfurt on 4 March 1152 and crowned in Aachen on 9 March, crowned King of Italy at Pavia in 1154, and finally crowned Holy Roman Emperor by Pope Adrian IV on 18 June 1155. He was crowned King of Burgundy at Arles on 30 June 1178.
Before his royal election, he was by inheritance Duke of Swabia (1147–1152, as Frederick III). He was the son of Duke Frederick II of the Hohenstaufen dynasty. His mother was Judith, daughter of Henry IX, Duke of Bavaria, from the rival House of Welf, and Frederick therefore descended from Germany's two leading families, making him an acceptable choice for the Empire's prince-electors.

Folie à Deux (album)
"Folie à Deux" is Fall Out Boy's next album. It is a follow-up to "Infinity on High". The album is set to be released on November 4, 2008. Its title comes from the French for "a madness shared by two".

Emperor Taishō
Emperor Taishō is the name given to Yoshihito after he died. Emperors of Japan are normally renamed like this, and people start using the new name.
He was the emperor (leader) of Japan during World War I and after. He was born on August 31, 1879 and he died on December 25, 1926. He started ruling Japan in 1912, after the death of his father, Emperor Meiji. And he ruled until he died. He was weak. Democracy was temporarily established in Japan while he was alive. Emperor Showa is his son.

Smiley Smile
"Smiley Smile" is the tenth studio album by The Beach Boys. It was released in 1967.

Vheissu
"Vheissu" is an album by experimental band Thrice. It was released in 2005. The album introduced a new sound to the bands post-hardcore roots. It also used many new elements from music boxes to chain gangs and has much softer, dreamy songs such as "Atlantic"
The album artwork was created by author Dave Eggers and artist Brian McMullen. It includes pictures of various things and quotes lyrics from different Thrice songs found on the album.

The Artist in the Ambulance
"The Artist in the Ambulance" is the third album by the post-hardcore band Thrice. It was released on July 22 2003.
Like previous Thrice albums, some of the money made from selling "The Artist in the Ambulance" was given to a charity. The album's booklet features individual cards that have lyrics from Thrice songs, notes, photographs and comments from the band members and the producer.
"Stare at the Sun" is a main single from the album.

Colin Barnett
Colin James Barnett (born 15 July 1950) is the 29th Premier of Western Australia. He became Premier on 23 September 2008. He is from the Liberal Party.

Nathan Rees
Nathan Rees (born 1968) is the 41st Premier of New South Wales. He became Premier on 5 September 2008. He is from the Labor Party.

Anna Bligh
Anna Maria Bligh (born 14 July 1960) is the 37th Premier of Queensland. She became Premier on 13 September 2007. She is from the Labor Party. She is the first female to be Premier of Queensland.
Early Life.
Anna was born at Warwick, Queensland. She is a descendant of Captain William Bligh. She grew up on the Gold Coastin south east Queensland. She was educated at several Catholic primary schools. Her secondary schooling was at Miami State High School. She completed the last 6 months of her schooling at Nowra State High School. She studied for an Arts degree from the University of Queensland which she finished in 1980. Anna Bligh worked for many community organisations and the Queensland Public Service. She worked in the area of employment, training and industrial relations policy. She was elected to the Queensland Parliament on 15 July 1995.
Parliament.
She was made the Minister for Families, Youth and Community Care and Disability Services in the Beattie Labor Government in June 1998. Ann was Queensland's first female Education Minister. She later became minister for Finance, State Development, Trade and Innovation. In 1995 she was made Deputy Premier of Queensland, and also was the Treasurer and Minister of Infrastructure with a budget of $33 billion dollars.

Mike Rann
Michael David Rann (born 5 January 1953) is the 44th Premier of South Australia. He became Premier on 6 March 2002. He is from the Labor Party.

David Bartlett
David John Bartlett (born 19 January 1968) is the 43rd Premier of Tasmania. He became Premier on 26 May 2008. He is from the Labor Party.

Quentin Bryce
Quentin Alice Louise Bryce (born 23 December 1942) is the current Governor-General of Australia. She became Governor-General on 5 September 2008 and is the first woman to be the Governor-General. Before this she was the Governor of Queensland and she used to be a lawyer.

Alan Carpenter
Alan John Carpenter (born 4 January 1957) was the 28th Premier of Western Australia from 26 January 2006 to 23 September 2008. He is from the Labor Party. He is still in the Western Australian parliament.

Geoff Gallop
Professor Geoffrey Ian Gallop (born 27 September 1951) was the 27th Premier of Western Australia from 10 February 2001 to 16 January 2006. He was from the Labor Party.

Richard Court
Richard Fairfax Court (born 27 September 1947) was the 26th Premier of Western Australia from 16 February 1993 to 10 February 2001. He was from the Liberal Party. His father, Charles Court, was also a Premier of Western Australia.

Carmen Lawrence
Dr Carmen Mary Lawrence (born 2 March 1948) was the 25th Premier of Western Australia from 12 February 1990 to 16 February 1993. She was from the Labor Party. She became Premier after Peter Dowding resigned. She was the first woman to become Premier of an Australian state and she is Western Australia's only woman Premier. After she was Premier she became of member of the Australian parliament.

Peter Dowding
Peter M'Callum Dowding (born 6 October 1943) was the 24th Premier of Western Australia from 25 February 1988 to 12 February 1990. He was from the Labor Party. He became Premier when Brian Burke resigned. He had a difficult time as Premier because some people in his government broke the law. He is now a lawyer.

Brian Burke
Brian Thomas Burke (born 25 February 1947) was the 23rd Premier of Western Australia from 25 February 1983 to 25 February 1988. He was from the Labor Party. He worked as a journalist before becoming a politician. As Premier he was popular at first but later on his government was involved in a number of private companies that failed. He resigned to become an ambassador. During the 1990s he was convicted of committing crimes while he was Premier and spent time in jail.

Ray O'Connor
Raymond James O'Connor (born 6 March 1926) was the 22nd Premier of Western Australia from 25 January 1982 until 25 February 1983. He was from the Liberal Party. He became Premier when Charles Court resigned. Later he was convicted of stealing and spent time in jail.

Charles Court
Sir Charles Walter Michael Court (29 September 1911 – 22 December 2007) was the 21st Premier of Western Australia from 8 April 1974 to 25 January 1982. He was from the Liberal Party. He became a politician in 1953. His son, Richard, was also a Premier.

John Tonkin
John Trezise Tonkin (2 February 1902 - 20 October 1995) was the 20th Premier of Western Australia from 3 March 1971 to 8 April 1974. He was from the Labor Party.

David Brand
Sir David Brand (1 August 1912 – 15 April 1979) was the 19th Premier of Western Australia from 2 April 1959 to 3 March 1971. He was from the Liberal Party.

Albert Hawke
Albert ("Bert") Redvers George Hawke (3 December 1900 - 14 February 1986) was the 18th Premier of Western Australia from 23 February 1953 to 2 April 1959. He was from the Labor Party. His nephew, Bob, became Prime Minister of Australia in the 1980s.

Ross McLarty
Sir Duncan Ross McLarty (17 March 1891 – 22 December 1962) was the 17th Premier of Western Australia from 1 April 1947 to 23 February 1953. He was from the Liberal Party.

Frank Wise
Frank Joseph Scott Wise (30 May 1897 – 29 June 1986) was the 16th Premier of Western Australia from 31 July 1945 to 1 April 1947. He was from the Labor Party.

Boris Johnson
Alexander Boris de Pfeffel Johnson (born 19 June 1964) is a British politician and journalist. The current Mayor of London, he previously served as the Conservative Member of Parliament for Henley and as editor of "The Spectator" magazine.
Johnson was educated at Eton and Balliol College, Oxford, where he read Classics. He began his journalism career with "The Times", and later moved on to "The Daily Telegraph" where he was assistant editor. He was appointed editor of "The Spectator" in 1999. In the 2001 general election he was elected to the House of Commons and became one of the most high profile politicians in the country, partly because of his distinctive appearance and persona. He gained praise for several appearances on the "Have I Got News for You" television programme, but received negative headlines in October 2004 after an editorial column in "The Spectator" criticised the people of Liverpool after the death of Kenneth Bigley. He has also written several books.
Under Michael Howard, Johnson briefly served on the Conservative front bench as the Shadow Minister for the Arts from April 2004 until November 2004 when he was sacked after allegedly lying to Howard when denying he had had an affair with Petronella Wyatt. When contemporary David Cameron was elected leader of the Conservative Party in 2005, Johnson was re-appointed to the front bench as Shadow Minister for Higher Education and resigned as editor of "The Spectator" to concentrate on his new role. In September 2007 he was selected as the Conservative candidate for the 2008 Mayor of London election. Though some questioned his suitability for the role, Johnson defeated Labour incumbent Ken Livingstone and was elected Mayor, after which he resigned as an MP from the House of Commons.
Early life, education and marriages.
Johnson is the eldest of the four children of Stanley Johnson, a former Conservative MEP and employee of the European Commission and World Bank, and his first wife, painter Charlotte Fawcett (later Wahl), the daughter of Sir James Fawcett, a prominent barrister and president of the European Commission of Human Rights. Johnson was born in New York City in the United States of America.
On his father's side Johnson is great-grandson of Ali Kemal Bey, a liberal Turkish journalist and interior minister in the government of Damat Ferid Pasha, Grand Vizier of the Ottoman Empire, who was murdered during the Turkish War of Independence. During World War I, Boris's grandfather and great aunt were recognised as British subjects and took their grandmother's maiden name of Johnson. In reference to his cosmopolitan ancestry, Johnson has described himself as a "one-man melting pot" — with a combination of Muslims, Jews and Christians comprising his great-grandparentage. His father's maternal grandmother, Marie Louise de Pfeffel, was a descendent of Prince Paul of Württemberg through his relationship with a German actress. Through Prince Paul, Johnson is a descendent of King George II of Great Britain and through George's great-great-great grandfather King James I of England, a descendent of all the previous British royal houses.
Johnson was born in New York City, New York, USA, but his family returned to England soon afterwards as his mother had yet to take her Oxford finals. Johnson's sister Rachel was born a year later. As a child, Boris Johnson suffered from severe deafness and had to undergo several operations to have grommets inserted in his ears, and was reportedly rather quiet as a child. He was educated at the European School in Brussels, Ashdown House and then at Eton College, where he was a King's Scholar. He read Classics at Balliol College, Oxford, as a Brackenbury scholar, and was elected President of the Oxford Union, at his second attempt. Frank Luntz and Radek Sikorski have claimed Johnson touted himself as a supporter of the Social Democratic Party, then a dominant current at the university, as a strategy to win the Union presidency, though Johnson denies he was more than the SDP's preferred candidate. Along with David Cameron he was a member of Oxford's Bullingdon Club, a student dining society known for its raucous feasts.
In 1987 he married Allegra Mostyn-Owen but the marriage lasted less than a year, finally being dissolved in 1993. Later that same year he married Marina Wheeler, a barrister, the daughter of journalist and broadcaster Sir Charles Wheeler and his Sikh Indian wife, Dip Singh. The Wheeler and Johnson families have known each other for decades, and Marina Wheeler was at the European School in Brussels at the same time as her future husband. They have two sons—Theodore Apollo (born 1999) and Milo Arthur (born 1995)—and two daughters—Lara Lettice (born 1993) and Cassia Peaches (born 1997). Boris Johnson and his family currently live in Holloway, North London.
Political career.
In 2001, Johnson was elected MP for Henley-on-Thames, succeeding Michael Heseltine, having previously been defeated in Clwyd South in the 1997 general election. In 2004 he was appointed to the front bench as Shadow Minister for the Arts in a small reshuffle resulting from the resignation of the Shadow Home Affairs Spokesman, Nick Hawkins. He was also from November 2003 vice-chairman of the Conservative Party, with an emphasis on campaigning.
Johnson was dismissed from these high-profile posts in November, 2004 over accusations that he lied to Michael Howard about a four-year extramarital affair with Petronella Wyatt, "The Spectators New York correspondent and former deputy editor. Johnson derided these allegations as "an inverted pyramid of piffle", but Howard sacked Johnson because he believed press reports showed Johnson had lied, rather than for the affair itself.
He was appointed Shadow Minister for Higher Education on 9 December 2005 by new Conservative Leader David Cameron, and resigned as editor of "The Spectator" soon afterwards. On 2 April 2006 it was alleged in the "News of the World" that Johnson had had another extramarital affair, this time with "Times Higher Education Supplement" journalist Anna Fazackerley. The video shows him emerging from her flat and waving to her in a taxi. Subsequently, in a speech at the University of Exeter concerning student finance, he allegedly made comical remarks about his gratitude to the audience for not "raising other issues" during the talk, which may have been a reference to the allegations. A report in "The Times" stated that Cameron regarded the possible affair as a private matter, and that Johnson would not lose his job over it.
2008 London Mayoral election.
After several days of speculation, Johnson announced he was a potential Conservative candidate for the London mayoral election in 2008 on 16 July 2007. Reported as saying "the opportunity is too great and the prize too wonderful to miss... the chance to represent London and speak for Londoners", he resigned as Shadow Minister for Higher Education. He was confirmed as the Conservative candidate on 27 September 2007 after gaining 75% of the vote in a public London wide primary.
Alcohol use ban on public transport.
On 7 May 2008, Johnson announced plans to ban the consumption of alcohol on the London transport network, effective from 1 June, a policy described by Jeroen Weimar, Transport for London's director of transport policing and enforcement, as reasonable, saying people should be more considerate on the trains. The ban initially applies on the London Underground, Buses, DLR and Croydon Trams. The London Overground will be added later in June 2008. Press releases said that the ban would apply to "stations across the capital", but did not specify whether this included National Rail stations - especially those stations not served by the TfL lines on which alcohol is banned.
On the final evening on which alcohol was to be permitted on London transport, thousands of drinkers descended on the Underground system to mark the event. Six London Underground stations were closed as trouble began, and a number of staff and police were assaulted. Police made 17 arrests as several trains were damaged and withdrawn from service.
2008 Olympics.
Johnson was present at the closing ceremony of the 2008 Beijing Olympics as London's representative to receive the Olympic flag from Guo Jinlong, the Mayor of Beijing in order to formally announce London as Olympic host city. He was accused by Chinese media of being "rude, arrogant and disrespectful" for accepting the Olympic flag with one hand, putting his hands in his pockets and not buttoning up his jacket. At the subsequent handover party held at London House in Beijing, he gave a speech in which he declared 'ping pong is coming home'.

Years of Refusal
"Years of Refusal" is the forthcoming ninth solo album by Morrissey, the former lead singer of The Smiths. The album, to be distributed by Decca, is set for release on February 2, 2009 in the United Kingdom and February 3, 2009 in the United States.

Ken Livingstone
Kenneth Robert Livingstone (born 17 June 1945) is a British socialist politician. He has twice held the leading political role in London local government: firstly as leader of the Greater London Council from 1981 until the council was abolished in 1986 by the government of Margaret Thatcher, and secondly as the first Mayor of London, a post he held from its creation in 2000 until 2008. He also served as Labour Party Member of Parliament for Brent East between 1987 and 2001.
He was initially elected as Mayor of London as an Independent candidate after the Labour Party chose not to nominate him as their candidate in the first mayoral elections. In January 2004, he was re-admitted to the Labour Party. He stood as the official Labour Party candidate for Mayor in the June 2004 elections, which he won with a total of 828,380 first- and second-preference votes. On 1 May 2008 Livingstone was defeated in his second re-election bid by Conservative candidate Boris Johnson, and his term as Mayor of London ended on 4 May 2008.
He has announced his intention to run again for the post of London mayor in 2012. In the meantime, he has been appointed as an adviser for urban planning to Hugo Chávez.
Early and private life.
Livingstone was born in Lambeth, London, England, the son of Ethel Ada (Kennard), a professional dancer, and Robert Moffat Livingstone, who was of Scottish descent and worked as a ship's master in the Merchant Navy. Livingstone has described his parents as "working class Tories".
Livingstone attended Tulse Hill Comprehensive School. He did not pass the eleven-plus examination in 1956 but still managed to obtain a few O-levels. He worked for eight years as a cancer research technician, between 1962 and 1970. He also trained as a teacher, qualifying in 1973, but was never active in the profession. Livingstone joined the Labour Party in 1968 at a time when party membership was falling and few new young members were joining, and rose rapidly in the local party. He was elected to the Lambeth Borough Council in May 1971 and served as Vice-Chair of the Housing Committee from 1971 to 1973 (succeeding John Major in the job).
At the a> just before the deadline to stand for the council in 1978, and was elected there. Livingstone's performance in Hampstead in the United Kingdom 1979 general election was good, although he did not come close to winning what was at that time a safe Conservative seat.
He married Christine Pamela Chapman in 1973 and the marriage ended in divorce in 1982. Around that time he became involved with Kate Allen (Amnesty International UK), now director of Amnesty International in the UK, but the couple separated in November 2001.
Livingstone and his current partner Emma Beal, also his office manager, have a son, Thomas, born 14 December 2002 at the University College Hospital, London, and a daughter, Mia, born on 20 March 2004 at the Royal Free Hospital in Hampstead. He also has three other children from previous relationships, whose existence was only publicly revealed during the London mayoral election, 2008. Livingstone is a noted "bon vivant", having twice worked as a food critic for London's "Evening Standard" newspaper and various magazines.
He is known for his enthusiasm for keeping and breeding newts.
Livingstone in parliament.
Livingstone again stood for Parliament in the 1987 general election, winning a seat in the north-west London constituency of Brent East. He replaced Labour MP Reg Freeson who was a committed left-winger, but his relatively moderate ("sensible left") views made him vulnerable to the hard left in the early 1980s. Freeson was able to retain his seat at the 1983 general election, but was deselected in 1985 after a bitter struggle, described as "political 'murder'" in his Guardian obituary, and replaced as Labour candidate in Brent East by Livingstone.
In his maiden speech to Parliament in July 1987, Livingstone used Parliamentary privilege to raise a number of allegations made by Fred Holroyd, a former MI6 operative in Northern Ireland. Despite the convention of maiden speeches being non-controversial, Livingstone alleged that Holroyd had been mistreated when he tried to expose MI5 collusion with loyalist paramilitaries in the 1970s and the part Captain Robert Nairac is alleged to have played. He also voiced Colin Wallace's allegations of MI5 dirty tricks levelled at Harold Wilson, part of what became known as the "Wilson plot".
As a Labour backbencher, Livingstone lost the public platform he possessed as head of the GLC; furthermore, his brand of radical socialism was increasingly out of step with the Labour leadership, which had moved sharply towards the centre under the leadership of Neil Kinnock who now blamed left-wingers like Livingstone for Labour's 'unelectability.' Over the long term, though, it was Livingstone rather than Kinnock who was to achieve electoral success. In September 1987 he was elected to the party's National Executive Committee, although he lost this position two years later; he regained it in 1997 beating Peter Mandelson in what some interpreted as a rebuke to Tony Blair. He was re-elected MP in the general election of 1992, with a 6% swing to Labour in his Brent East constituency. Besides serving in the Commons, Livingstone held a number of other 'odd jobs' during this period, including game show contestant and host, after-dinner speaker, and restaurant reviewer for the "Evening Standard". In 1987 he published an autobiography-cum-political tract, "If Voting Changed Anything They'd Abolish It".
As a politician comfortable in light-hearted and satirical situations, in 1990, Livingstone made the first of seven appearances on the topical panel show "Have I Got News For You". For a long time, his first six appearances would stand as the show's record; his current tally of seven - the last being in 2002 - fall one short of the record for guest appearances currently held by Germaine Greer and Will Self.
In 1995, Livingstone appeared on the track "Ernold Same" by the band Blur, taken from the album "The Great Escape". Livingstone provided spoken word vocals and was listed as 'The Right On Ken Livingstone.'
Livingstone appeared in one of a series of advertisements extolling the virtues of cheese in the 1980s, appropriately endorsing red Leicester. On the other side of politics, Edward Heath advertised Danish Blue. Their respective choices are down to the colour red being associated with the Labour Party, and blue with the Conservative Party.
Greater London's first mayor.
Livingstone was again re-elected in the 1997 general election, in which Labour was returned to power under the leadership of Tony Blair. Among Labour's proposals was the establishment of a Greater London Authority which was to be a strategic body: unlike the GLC the Greater London Authority would not provide any services to Londoners directly. The new Greater London Authority would be headed by a directly-elected mayor, who would be watched over by a 25-member Assembly.
Despite having earlier criticised the specific proposals for a new London-wide authority, Livingstone was widely tipped for the new post of Mayor. The mayoral election was scheduled for 2000, and in 1999, Labour began the long and trying process of selecting its candidate. Despite Blair's personal antipathy, Livingstone was included on Labour's shortlist in November 1999, having pledged that he would not run as an independent if he failed to secure the party's nomination. William Hague, then Leader of the Opposition taunted Blair at Prime Minister's Question Time: "Why not split the job in two, with Frank Dobson as your day mayor and Ken Livingstone as your nightmare?"
Labour chose its official candidate on 20 February 2000. Although Livingstone received a healthy majority of the total votes, he nevertheless lost the nomination to former Secretary of State for Health Frank Dobson, under a controversial system in which votes from sitting Labour MPs and MEPs were weighted more heavily than votes from rank-and-file members. On 6 March, Livingstone announced that he would run against Dobson as an independent, confirming speculation that he would renege on his earlier pledge. He was suspended from the Labour Party the same day and expelled on 4 April. Tony Blair said that Livingstone as mayor would be a "disaster" for London; he later said he was wrong in that prediction.
The result of the election — held on 4 May — was a foregone conclusion: Dobson, who it was alleged, had been pressured into running by the party leadership, unsuccessfully based his campaign on claims that Livingstone was an egomaniac, and the Conservatives remained becalmed after their catastrophic national defeat in 1997. Livingstone came out ahead in the first round of balloting with 38% of first-preference votes to Conservative Steven Norris's 27%; Dobson finished third, with 13% of all first-preference votes — just ahead of Liberal Democrat Susan Kramer, with 12%. Under the modified instant-runoff voting system employed for the election, only the votes cast for Livingstone and Norris were considered in the second round, where Livingstone won with 58% of first- and second-preference votes, versus 42% for Norris.
Livingstone continued to sit in parliament, as an independent having had the Labour whip withdrawn, until standing down at the 2001 General Election.
2004 re-election.
Livingstone applied for readmittance to the Labour Party in 2002 but was rejected. In November 2003, however, rumours emerged that the Labour Party would allow Livingstone to rejoin, just ahead of the 2004 London mayoral election. Opinion polls consistently gave a poor showing to Labour's official candidate, Nicky Gavron, and many in the party leadership (including Tony Blair himself) feared that Labour would be humiliated by a fourth-place finish. In mid-December, Gavron announced she would stand down as the Labour candidate in favour of a 'unity campaign,' with Gavron as Livingstone's deputy, with Labour's National Executive Committee voting 25-2 to pave the way for Livingstone's readmittance. The deal hinged on a 'loyalty test' administered by a special five-member NEC panel on 9 January. The panel recommended that Livingstone be allowed back in the party. The move towards readmittance came amid considerable opposition from senior party members, including Chancellor of the Exchequer Gordon Brown, Deputy Prime Minister John Prescott, and former party leader Neil Kinnock. In a ballot of Labour Party members in London, Livingstone was overwhelmingly endorsed as the Labour candidate for the 2004 Mayoral election.
Livingstone was re-elected Mayor of London on 10 June 2004. He won 36% of first preference votes to Conservative Steven Norris's 28% and Liberal Democrat Simon Hughes's 15%. Six other candidates shared the remainder of the votes. When all the candidates except Livingstone and Norris were eliminated and the second preferences of those voters who had picked neither Livingstone or Norris as their first choice were counted, Livingstone won with 55% to Norris's 45%.
2008 Election.
Livingstone sought re-election in 2008, but was defeated by Conservative candidate Boris Johnson on a night that saw the Labour Party suffer its worst electoral defeats for forty years. Once first and second votes were taken into account Johnson had 1,168,738 votes, Livingstone 1,028,966 - a margin of 139, 772 votes or just over 6% of those who voted.
Speaking immediately after the count, Johnson paid public tribute to his defeated rival, praising "the very considerable achievements of the last mayor of London" and describing Livingstone as "a very considerable public servant". Johnson went on to say "You shaped the office of mayor. You gave it national prominence and when London was attacked on 7 July 2005 you spoke for London."
Johnson also spoke of Livingstone's "courage and the sheer exuberant nerve with which you stuck it to your enemies" and expressed a desire that the new Conservative administration could "discover a way in which the mayoralty can continue to benefit from your transparent love of London".
Public transport.
Livingstone's greatest challenge as Mayor of London has been dealing with the city's ageing transportation infrastructure. Despite conflict over appropriate funding schemes and engineering challenges to modernising both the London Underground and the city's bus system, an Association of London Government survey, conducted by MORI towards the end of Livingstone's first term in 2004, suggested growing public satisfaction with public transport, with buses in particular being seen as more frequent and reliable.
In accordance with his pre-election pledge, bus fares were frozen for four years, but then the standard single cash fare on buses more than doubled. Further, and contrary to his pledge during his first election campaign, when he said "only a de-humanised moron would get rid of the Routemaster", Livingstone removed the famous Routemaster buses from routine service on 9 December 2005, claiming it was because the new buses were wheelchair-accessible, although several of the old buses are used on shortened "heritage routes". There was some question over the legality of using the old Routemaster under the Disability Discrimination Act 1995 as the Routemasters effectively banned wheel chair users.
In tandem with the removal of Routemaster buses, Livingstone oversaw the introduction of bending articulated buses. These buses have faced criticism for allegedly being fire-prone, dangerous to cyclists, and unable to navigate some winding streets; see London articulated bus controversy.
Livingstone has been a strong proponent of the Oyster card smartcard ticketing system for London's public transport network introduced in 2003. In late 2005, Livingstone proposed large fare increases for on-the-spot tickets across the Tube and bus network to encourage regular travellers to use the automated Oyster system to reduce queuing at Underground stations and avoid delays in conductorless buses as drivers issue tickets. The plans, although ratified by the GLA and introduced in January 2006 were condemned by those who argued that the increases would increase the cost of travelling in London to tourists and others who do not travel regularly. Civil liberties groups have expressed concern over the way in which Transport for London is able to track the movements of passengers using the Oyster card system. Livingstone moved to make all bus journeys free for passengers under the age of 18 enrolled in full-time education who travel with an Oyster card and introduced initiatives to enable visitors to buy an Oyster card before arriving in London.
One of the key points of conflict between Livingstone and the Labour Party had been the proposed 'Public-Private Partnership' for the London Underground. Livingstone had run in 2000 on a policy of financing the improvements to Tube infrastructure by a public bond issue, which had been done in the case of the New York City Subway. However the Mayor did not have power in this area at the time as the Underground operated independently of Transport for London. The PPP deal went ahead in July 2002, but it did not diminish Livingstone's desire to re-join Labour. Metronet, one of the winners of the contract for PPP, subsequently went into administration in July 2007.
Congestion charge.
Livingstone introduced the London congestion charge with the purpose of reducing traffic congestion in central London. Since being introduced the charge has proved to be controversial, though Transport for London maintains that traffic has fallen by 20% within the charge zone since the scheme began. One reason for the controversy is that whilst the scheme has been lucrative for its private-sector operator, Capita, some critics argue it has failed to raise the promised levels of funding for public transport as costs eat up the revenue.
However, its apparent success in reducing congestion has led to similar schemes being proposed in other major cities such as New York.
In November 2003, Livingstone was named 'Politician of the Year' by the Political Studies Association, which cited his implementation of what the association called a 'bold and imaginative' congestion charge scheme.
The United States Embassy for many years has refused to pay the charge because they argue it is a tax and not a charge on congestion.
Environmental policies.
Ken Livingstone has been called “an environmentalist, a leftist, a lover of newts," and has made a significant effort to reduce London’s impact on the environment. He began by creating the and the in his first term as Mayor of London. The Mayor’s, “green light to clean power,” commits London to reducing its emissions of carbon dioxide by 20%, relative to the 1990 level, by 2010. However, he does support the Thames Gateway Bridge in East London that Friends of the Earth say "would bring few benefits to the local people and lead to more traffic, more noise and air pollution and an increase in climate-changing emissions". In October 2007, London Councils stated Livingstone had gone back on his promise to help chair the developing London Waste and Recycling Board, and to provide £6 million of funding for the project, because "the government had failed to provide him with absolute control of the Board."
In June 2007, Livingstone criticised a planned £200 million desalination plant at Beckton, which would be the United Kingdom's first, calling it "misguided and a retrograde step in UK environmental policy", and that "we should be encouraging people to use less water, not more."
Same-sex civil partnerships.
In 2001 Livingstone set up Britain's first register for same-sex couples; while falling short of legal marriage rights, the register was seen as a "step towards" such rights. Legal status was later passed by the government through the Civil Partnership Act 2004.
Religious and other festivals.
After rejecting the idea for a couple of years, Livingstone hosted a Jewish Hanukkah ceremony at City Hall in December 2005. He said he intended this to be an annual occurrence. On 17 March 2002 Livingstone introduced an annual Saint Patrick's Day festival to London to celebrate the contributions of the Irish to London, with around 250,000 people annually turning out for this. On 28 October 2006 he helped organise the first ever "Eid in the Square" in Trafalgar Square, in commemoration of the Eid ul-Fitr festival which marks the end of Ramadan, the Muslim month of fasting.
Reaction to 7 July 2005 London bombings.
After the 7 July 2005 London bombings Livingstone, from the 117th IOC Session in Singapore, where it had recently been announced London would host the 2012 Olympic Games, delivered a speech.
Finally, I wish to speak directly to those who came to London today to take life. I know that you personally do not fear giving up your own life in order to take others - that is why you are so dangerous. But I know you fear that you may fail in your long-term objective to destroy our free society and I can show you why you will fail. In the days that follow, look at our airports, look at our sea ports and look at our railway stations and, even after your cowardly attack, you will see that people from the rest of Britain, people from around the world will arrive in London to become Londoners and to fulfil their dreams and achieve their potential. They choose to come to London, as so many have come before because they come to be free, they come to live the life they choose, they come to be able to be themselves. They flee you because you tell them how they should live. They do not want that and nothing you do, however many of us you kill, will stop that flight to our city where freedom is strong and where people can live in harmony with one another. Whatever you do, however many you kill, you will fail.
Livingstone defended the police after the mistaken killing of a Brazilian man, Jean Charles de Menezes, who police believed was a suicide bomber.
Racism policies.
In 2001 Livingstone revived the free anti-racism Music festival now called. He believes that this, along with other anti-racist policies, is why London has seen a 35% decrease in racist attacks.
In September 2005 Livingstone came out in support of placing a statue of Nelson Mandela, the former President of South Africa, on the north terrace of Trafalgar Square. Livingstone said "There can be no better place than our greatest square to place a statue of Nelson Mandela so that every generation can remind the next of the fight against racism." He was highly critical of the Planning and City Development Committee of Westminster City Council who refused planning permission.
In 2008 Livingstone's race advisor Lee Jasper resigned after being accused of corruption and inappropriate behaviour. Simon Woolley of Operation Black Vote has said the 2008 Mayoral campaign has seen a "wholly disproportionate" focus on Jasper, Doreen Lawrence (Livingstone supporter and mother of Stephen Lawrence), and others.
Apology for London's role in the transatlantic slave trade.
"It is because it is the anniversary of the biggest slave revolt in history, that UNESCO officially marks this day, the 23 August, the anniversary of that outbreak in Haiti, as slavery's official remembrance day. This is why we, in London, call for it to be the annual slave memorial day. We are therefore here to initiate London's annual slavery memorial day, and call for the establishment of a national, annual memorial day. In 1999, Liverpool became the first major British slaving city to formally apologise. The Church of England soon followed suit. In March I invited representatives of London's institutions to join the City of Liverpool and the Church of England for formally apologising for London's role in this monstrous crime. As Mayor, I offer an apology on behalf of London and its institutions for their role in the transatlantic slave trade."
Rejecting the idea that it is not possible to "meaningfully apologise for something a former generation did," Livingstone emphasised that London and by implication the rest of the developed world still profited enormously from the assets accumulated in the slave era, adding "It was the racial murder of not just those who were transported but generations of enslaved African men, women and children. To justify this murder and torture black people had to be declared inferior or not human. We live with the consequences today."
Cronyism and corruption allegations.
In March 2002, while still independent, Livingstone was accused of "cronyism" by some Labour party members in the London Assembly after he had appointed six officials as special advisers at a salary level which seemed to them excessive, and a manoeuvre to help his chances of being re-elected. Livingstone denied the allegations and stated the appointments were a "necessary efficiency drive."
In December 2007, the "Evening Standard" published news of an investigation into grants worth £2.5 million paid to organisations in which Ken Livingstone's adviser Lee Jasper was involved. It is confirmed that some of these grants were paid directly by the mayor's office.
Following Mr. Livingstone’s defeat in the 2008 Mayoral Elections, "The Daily Mail" reported that “Eight 'cronies' of Ken Livingstone are to receive £1.6 million in pay-offs following his defeat in the London mayoral elections.” Mr. Livingstone changed the rules for political appointees who would otherwise not have been eligible for severance packages, which paved the way for the eight City Hall advisors to receive an average of £200,000. Liberal Democrat Leader Dee Doocey stated that the payments were “completely inexcusable” and added that “It seems like there's one law for the ordinary working person and one law for the political class.” Tony Travers, local government expert at the London School of Economics, said: “I think most people will be shocked. You could do quite a lot about knife crime with £1.6 million. It is odd indeed that the full benefits of labour laws designed to protect the vulnerable are being claimed by courtiers who knew they would lose their jobs if their master lost the election.”
Mr Livinstone refuted the comments by stating that 'It's a question of what the law requires. Either there's a legal responsibility or there isn't.'
Dispute with the "Evening Standard".
The epithet "German war criminal" and Livingstone's subsequent jibes refer to the Standard's owners, the Daily Mail and General Trust, which endorsed Oswald Mosley's Fascists in 1934 and supported Nazism until 1939. Livingstone also claimed the "Standard" was guilty of "harassment of a predominantly lesbian and gay event". Gay rights campaigner Peter Tatchell suggested in the Evening Standard that this explanation "came across as patronising. Gay people don't need the Mayor's protection to fend off a journalist asking simple questions."
After listening to the recording supplied by Finegold, the London Assembly voted unanimously to ask Livingstone to apologise. Livingstone responded by saying "the form of words I have used are right. I have nothing to apologise for." Deputy Mayor Nicky Gavron, herself the daughter of a Holocaust survivor, said of Livingstone: "These were inappropriate words and very offensive, both to the individual and to Jews in London." Some two dozen complaints were referred to the Standards Board for England, the body responsible for English local government standards, which passed it to the Adjudication Panel for England, which has the power to ban individuals from public office for five years.
The Adjudication Panel addressed the case over two days on the 13 & 14 December 2005 and adjourned the hearing for two months. On 24 February 2006, Ken Livingstone was found guilty of bringing his office into disrepute and suspended from office for four weeks, stating that he seemed "to have failed... to have appreciated that his conduct was unacceptable". Livingstone attacked the decision on the grounds that the Adjudication Panel members ought not to suspend a democratically elected official from power, describing their actions as "striking at the heart of democracy". The ban was due to begin on 1 March 2006, but on 28 February, a High Court judge postponed it pending an appeal by Livingstone.
The decision was later quashed by the High Court of Justice when on 5 October, Mr Justice Collins overturned the suspension, regardless of the outcome of Livingstone's appeal concerning the breach of standards. The final judgment upheld Livingstone's appeal and stated that the Adjudication Panel had misdirected itself, although the judge stated that the Mayor should have apologised.
On 7 December 2006, at a City Hall reception marking the launch of the London Jewish Forum, Livingstone apologised for any offence that he had caused the Jewish community.
Criticism of Livingstone by the Evening Standard intensified during the 2008 campaign, with daily front page articles attacking him, under the direction of editor Veronica Wadley who originally urged Johnson to stand and who is closely linked to Tory leadership. According to articles in The Guardian and Time Out London, she is strongly influenced by the need to renew Associated Newspaper's multi-million pound contract to deliver the Metro free paper in London Underground stations in 2010, a decision within the gift of the Mayor.
Remarks over foreign policy.
In 2004 Livingstone said "I just long for the day I wake up and find that the Saudi Royal Family are swinging from lamp-posts and they've got a proper government that represents the people of Saudi Arabia."
In a March 2005 commentary in "The Guardian" he accused Israel's prime minister Ariel Sharon of being a "war criminal", citing his alleged personal responsibility for the Sabra and Shatila massacre in 1982 and accusations of ethnic cleansing. Accusations that Sharon was implicated are frequently made by other organisations and leading politicians including the official Israeli Kahan Commission investigation into the massacres in 1982.
"I think you've just had 80 years of western intervention into predominantly Arab lands because of the western need for oil. We've propped up unsavoury governments, we've overthrown ones we didn't consider sympathetic. And I think the particular problem we have at the moment is that in the 1980s ... the Americans recruited and trained Osama Bin Laden, taught him how to kill, to make bombs, and set him off to kill the Russians and drive them out of Afghanistan. They didn't give any thought to the fact that once he'd done that he might turn on his creators. A lot of young people see the double standards, they see what happens in Guantanamo Bay, and they just think that there isn't a just foreign policy."
"Under foreign occupation and denied the right to vote, denied the right to run your own affairs, often denied the right to work for three generations, I suspect that if it had happened here in England, we would have produced a lot of suicide bombers ourselves."
Commentator Mark Steyn described the interview as Livingstone "artfully" attempting "to draw a distinction between Muslim terrorists blowing up his own public transit (which he didn't approve of) and Muslim terrorists blowing up Israeli public transit (which he was inclined to be sympathetic to)."
In November 2003, Livingstone made headlines for referring to US President George W. Bush as 'the greatest threat to life on this planet,' just before Bush's official visit to the UK. Livingstone also organised an alternative 'Peace Reception' at City Hall 'for everybody who is not George Bush,' with anti-war Vietnam veteran Ron Kovic as the guest of honour. In 2004 he referred to Bush as "the most corrupt American president since Harding in the Twenties". In July 2007 Livingstone suggested that Prime Minister Gordon Brown needed to explain to Bush "that US governments need to return to a realistic view of the world. The US is the world's single most powerful country, but much weaker than the rest of the world put together. The attempt by one country to unilaterally impose itself on the rest of the world is not only undesirable but simply won't work."
Venezuelan oil deal.
In February 2007, Ken Livingstone signed a deal with Venezuela to provide cheaper oil for London buses. In return, the Greater London Authority advises Venezuela on recycling, waste management, traffic and reducing carbon emissions. This deal came under criticism from the London Assembly Conservatives including Richard Barnes, who stated that the "money would be better directed at the poor of Venezuela," and journalist Martin Bright, who said that the deal "effectively takes from the poor of Latin America to give to one of the richest cities in the world." Prices have been slashed by 20%; following this, half-price bus travel became available to Londoners on income support. Livingstone stated the plan "rises on the suggestion of President Hugo Chávez and builds on the work his government is doing around the world in tackling the problems of poverty," and also said, "This will make it cheaper and easier for people to go about their lives and get the most out of London. The agreement... will also benefit the people of Venezuela, by providing expertise in areas of city management in which London is a world leader."
The deal was discontinued by incoming mayor Boris Johnson (effective from September 2008), a decision criticized by Livingstone.
Dispute with embassies over payment of congestion charge.
A dispute with the US Embassy in London over payment of the London Congestion Charge escalated on 27 March 2006 when Livingstone criticised the Embassy's decision not to pay. The Embassy argued that the charge is a form of taxation, not a charge for a service, and diplomats and their staff are therefore exempt under the 1961 Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations. Embassy officials have never paid the charge, which was instituted in 2003. Livingstone, however, alleged that the decision was made by Robert Tuttle, who took up the post of Ambassador in July 2005. Livingstone described Tuttle as "one of George Bush's closest cronies and a big funder of his election campaign" and said he was trying to "skive out of [paying] like some chiselling little crook". The group Liberty and Law reported this remark to the Standards Board for England as a breach of its code, but the board chose not to investigate it.
Germany stopped paying the charge in 2005, Japan followed in 2006, and in 2007 France, Russia, Belgium, and 50 other missions followed suit when the zone extended to their missions' locations (Iran, Sweden and Syria continue to pay the charge). Asked about Japan's refusal to pay in a March 2007 interview on LBC Radio, Livingstone responded, "I think there are several problems with Japan that we could go on about here. Admitting their guilt for all the war crimes would be one thing. So if they've not got round to doing that, I doubt they're too worried about the congestion charge." London's Japanese embassy responded that their government had already apologised for previous war crimes.
Post-mayoral career.
Livingstone acted as a stand-in presenter on London talk radio station LBC 97.3's Jeni Barnett for a week beginning on 30 June 2008. In July 2008 he announced his intention to run again for the office of Mayor of London at the next mayoral elections and signalled his intent to organise a "progressive alliance" of political parties (such as the Labour Party and the Green Party), trade unions and interest groups to defend the progress which was made during his terms as Mayor and to prepare for the next mayoral elections.
On 28 August 2008, it was announced that Livingstone will be an adviser on urban planning to Caracas, Venezuela. He will act as a consultant on the capital's policing, transport and other municipal issues. As a friend of Hugo Chávez, Livingstone was appointed personally by him to advise officials and mayoral candidates in Caracas, in order to help transform the city, which journalist Rory Carroll described as suffering from, "Gridlocked traffic, a crumbling centre, hillside slums, horrific murder rates, corrupt police and inept local government". Livingstone reckoned that in twenty years a "first-world city" can be made out of Caracas, stating, "I have a very extensive network of contacts both domestically and internationally which I will be calling on to assist in this." No decision on a salary for the ex-mayor has been made, although he mentioned that, "The whole cost of this trip has been paid for by the government of Venezuela and as an unemployed citizen I would not be able to pay for my own fare otherwise." The appointment follows on from the controversy surrounding the deal brokered by Livingstone in February 2007 for the Greater London Authority and Transport for London to provide advice to Venezuela in exchange for cheap fuel to help with bus subsidies. The deal was later overturned by new mayor Boris Johnson, and Livingstone offered his services to Chávez so that Venezuela gets the "advice that we promised". Livingstone played down any accusations that his close relationship with the Venezuelan President was controversial, "unless you believe American propaganda", while a spokesperson for Johnson said, "Ken Livingstone is free, as a private individual, to offer his advice and services to whomever he wants." Livingstone is now being touted as a key asset for Chávez in the upcoming November elections in the country.

Discovering the Waterfront
"Discovering the Waterfront" is a song by Silverstein. It is the title track of their second album.
Music video.
The official music video featured the band laying down and singing/talking on the phone. However, there was also a montage video released on victory records, which includes the band playing on stage and some of them standing in the way of closing elevator doors getting hurt.

Mahmud I
Mahmud I (in Arabic محمودالأول) (August 2, 1696 – December 13, 1754) was the Sultan of the Ottoman Empire from 1730 to 1754. He was the son of Mustafa II (1695–1703) and his mother Emetullah Sultan, (born as Evemia) was of Greek ethnic descent. Mahmud I was the older brother of Osman III (1754–57).

Mahmud II
Mahmud II (Ottoman Turkish: محمود ثاني Mahmud-ı sānī) (July 20, 1785 – July 1, 1839) was the 30th Sultan of the Ottoman Empire. He ruled from 1808 until his death. Mahmud was the son of Sultan Abdül Hamid I. His time as sultan is notable mostly for the major legal and military changes he caused.

Mahmud Shah Durrani
Mahmud Shah Durrani was the ruler of the Durrani Empire between 1801 and 1803, again between 1809 and 1818. He was the son of Timur Shah Durrani and half-brother of his predecessor, Zaman Shah. On July 25, 1801, Zaman Shah was deposed, and Mahmud Shah ascended to rulership. He then had a chequered career; he was deposed in 1803, restored in 1809, and finally deposed again in 1818. He died in 1829. Between his two stnts, the country was ruled by Shoja Shah, another of his half-brothers.

Mahmoud Abbas
Mahmoud Abbas (Arabic: محمود عباس‎) (born March 26, 1935), also known by the Kunya Abu Mazen (ابو مازن), was elected President of the Palestinian National Authority (PNA) on January 9, 2005. He took office on January 15, 2005.
Abbas is a leading politician in Fatah. He served as the first Prime Minister of the Palestinian Authority from March to October 2003. He resigned because of a lack of support from Israel and the United States as well as "internal incitement" against his government. Before becoming Prime Minister, Abbas led the Negotiations Affairs Department of the Palestine Liberation Organization (PLO). He has served as Chairman of the PLO Executive Committee since November 11, 2004, after Yasser Arafat's death. Abbas is said to the an example of moderation in Palestine by Israel and the west.

Joseph McCarthy
Joseph Raymond McCarthy (November 14, 1908 – May 2, 1957) was an American politician who served as a Republican U.S. Senator from the state of Wisconsin from 1947 until his death in 1957. Beginning in 1950, McCarthy became the most visible public face of a period of intense anti-communist suspicion inspired by the tensions of the Cold War.
He made claims that there were large numbers of Communists and Soviet spies and sympathizers inside the federal government and elsewhere. The term "McCarthyism," coined in 1950 in reference to McCarthy's practices, was soon applied to similar anti-communist pursuits.

One of the Boys (Katy Perry album)
"One of the Boys" is the first album by pop singer Katy Perry.

1.22.03.Acoustic
1.22.03.Acoustic is an acoustic compilation album released by pop-rock band "Maroon 5". The songs on the album are from the hit pop debut album by "Maroon 5" called "Songs About Jane". There is a song on the compilation album called "If I Fell" which Adam Levine does a cover on by The Beatles. Another song featured in the album is called "Highway to Hell" by DC, in this song Adam Levine is playing drums while "Ryan Dusick" (drums) sings the song, although the album is mostly known as an acoustic album, the AC/DC cover is performed as an "electric" performance.

Benito Juarez
Benito Pablo Juárez García (March 21, 1806 - July 8, 1872) was a Zapotec who served five terms (1858–1861 as interim), (1861–1865), (1865–1867), (1867–1871), and (1871–1872), as President of Mexico. Because during his presidency he outlawed slavery, especially the mistreatment of the Mexican Native Americans.
His philosophy has influenced many Mexicans and Mexican Americans in the United States, who have fought for the human and civil rights of Latinos for almost two centuries.

Madeleine Albright
Madeleine Korbel Albright (born Marie Jana Korbelová on May 15, 1937) was the first woman to become United States Secretary of State. She was appointed by President Bill Clinton on December 5, 1996 and was unanimously confirmed by the United States Senate 99-0. She was sworn in on January 23, 1997. She is currently a professor at Georgetown University.

Colin Powell
Colin Luther Powell, KCB (Honorary), MSC,
(born April 5, 1937) is a retired General in the United States Army. He was the 65th United States Secretary of State (2001-2005), serving under President George W. Bush. He was the first African American appointed to that position. As a General in the United States Army, Powell also served as National Security Advisor (1987–1989) and as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff (1989–1993), holding the latter position during the Gulf War. He was the first and, so far, the only African American to serve on the Joint Chiefs of Staff.

Good (Morphine album)
"Good" is the first album by rock band Morphine. It was released in 1992.

Cure for Pain
"Cure For Pain" was the second album released by the band Morphine. It was put out on the Rykodisc label in 1993. The tracks "Sheila" and "In Spite of Me" were part of the soundtrack of the 1994 independent movie "Spanking the Monkey".

Robert Gates
Robert Michael Gates (born September 25 1943) is currently serving as the 22nd United States Secretary of Defense. He took office on December 18 2006. Prior to this, Gates served for 26 years in the Central Intelligence Agency and the United States National Security Council. Under President George H. W. Bush, Gates served as Director of Central Intelligence.

Donald Rumsfeld
Donald Henry Rumsfeld (born 9 July 1932) is a United States businessman and politician. Rumsfeld was the 13th United States Secretary of Defense under President Gerald Ford from 1975 to 1977, and the 21st Secretary of Defense under President George W. Bush from 2001 to 2006. He is both the youngest (43 years old) and the oldest (74 years old) person to have held the position, as well as the only person to have held the position for two non-consecutive terms. Rumsfeld is also the second longest serving Secretary of Defense, behind Robert McNamara.

Robert McNamara
Robert Strange McNamara (born June 9, 1916, in Oakland, California) is an American business executive and former United States Secretary of Defense. McNamara served as Defense Secretary from 1961 to 1968, during the Vietnam War. After holding that position he served as President of the World Bank from 1968 until 1981.

James Forrestal
James Vincent Forrestal (February 15, 1892 – May 22, 1949) was a United States Secretary of the Navy and the first United States Secretary of Defense.

Breakout (album)
"Breakout" is the second studio album by singer Miley Cyrus. The album was released July 22nd 2008. Singles from the album include "Full Circle", "Fly On The Wall", "7 Things", "Wake Up America", and "Breakout'.
Promotion.
Cyrus performed a free concert at Bryant Park on July 18, as a part of "Good Morning Americas summer concert series. Cyrus also guest hosted "TRL" on two consecutive days, appeared on "Today", and performed as a part of their summer concert series, shutting down 84th street for the first time because of the number of fans who attended.
"See You Again" song.
"See You Again (Rock Mafia Remix)" is the second single from the album, it was released on August 11, 2008, only in the United Kingdom as a promotional single. This song peaked at #11 in the UK Singles Chart, making her first Top 20 in that region.

Edmund Randolph
Edmund Jenings Randolph (August 10, 1753 September 12, 1813) was an American attorney, Governor of Virginia, Secretary of State, and the first United States Attorney General.

James Baker
James Addison Baker, III (born April 28 1930), is a American attorney, politician, political administrator, and political adviser.
He served as the Chief of Staff in President Ronald Reagan's first administration and in the final year of the administration of President George H. W. Bush. Baker also served as Secretary of the Treasury from 1985-1988 in the second Reagan administration, and Secretary of State in the George H. W. Bush administration. He is also the namesake of the James A. Baker III Institute for Public Policy at Rice University in Houston, Texas.

Hal Colebatch
Sir Harry Pateshall Colebatch (29 March 1872 – 12 February 1953) was the 12th Premier of Western Australia from 17 April to 17 May 1919. He was from the Nationalist Party. He was Premier for the shortest time in Western Australian history. This was because he was a member of the upper house of Parliament and it was usual for the Premier to be from the lower house. When he could not find a position in the lower house he resigned.

Henry Lefroy
Sir Henry Bruce Lefroy (24 March 1854 – 19 March 1930) was the 11th Premier of Western Australia from 28 June 1917 to 17 April 1919. He was from the Nationalist Party.

John Scaddan
John Scaddan (4 August 1876 – 21 November 1934) was the 10th Premier of Western Australia from 7 October 1911 to 27 July 1916. He was from the Labor Party.

Newton Moore
Sir Newton James Moore (17 May 1870 – 28 October 1936) was the 8th Premier of Western Australia from 7 May 1906 until 16 September 1910. After he was Premier he became a member of the British House of Commons.

Andrew Card
Andrew Hill "Andy" Card Jr. (born May 10, 1947) is an American politician and lobbyist, former United States Cabinet member, and head of George W. Bush's White House Iraq Group. Card served as U.S. Secretary of Transportation under George H. W. Bush and the White House Chief of Staff under his son. He announced his resignation as Chief of Staff March 28, 2006, effective April 14, 2006.

Theodor Heuss
Theodor Heuss (31th of January 1884 – 12th of December 1963) was a German politician. He was the first person elected to a regular term as President of the Federal Republic of Germany.
Heuss was born in Brackenheim, near Heilbronn.
He studied art history and state studies in Munich and Berlin.
He received his doctorate in 1905 in Munich.
In 1908 he married Elly Heuss-Knapp (1881-1952).
He worked for a political magazine from 1908 to 1912, afterwards for a regional newspaper.
In 1910 he joined the Progressive People's Party and stayed there until 1918.
Between 1923 and 1926 he published the magazine Die Deutsche Nation ("The German Nation")
Heuss became a member of the German Democratic Party (Deutsche Demokratische Partei, DDP) and was a member of parliament for two periods.
In 1933 Heuss voted in favour of the Enabling Act (Ermächtigungsgesetz) against his personal attitude, fellowing his party.
After World War II Heuss was the first Minister of Culture in Baden-Württemberg.
He was one of the founders of the Free Democratic Party of Germany after WW II.
In 1949 he was elected to the first President of the Federal Republic of Germany.

Frank-Walter Steinmeier
Frank-Walter Steinmeier (born 5 January, 1956) is a German politician. He is Foreign Secretary and Vice-Chancellor of Germany.
Steinmeier was born in Detmold in 1956. After his "abitur" (secondary school exam) and his military service, he studied law in Gießen. In 1982, he passed his first exam. His second exam was completed and passed in 1986. Between 1986 to 1991, he worked as assistant to the professor of Public Law and Political Science at the Gießen University. He obtained his Doctorate of Law in 1991.
Up from 1991, he worked in the State Chancellory of Lower Saxony for the governor, Gerhard Schröder. Up from 1998, he was Undersecretary of State in Gerhard Schröder's ChancellorOffice after Schröder became Chancellor of Germany. In 1999 he became Secretary of State.
In 2005, he became the new Foreign Minister of Germany in the coalition cabinet of Angela Merkel. He became Vice Chancellor of Germany in 2007. In 2008 he was elected to be the chancellor of the Social Democratic Party of Germany (SPD) for the election in 2009.

Tipper Gore
Mary Elizabeth Aitcheson Gore (born August 19, 1948) is an author, photographer, former "Second Lady of the United States," and the wife of Al Gore. She is referred to as "Tipper."

Lynne Cheney
Lynne Ann Vincent Cheney (born August 14, 1941) is the current Second Lady of the United States, the wife of United States Vice President Dick Cheney. She is a novelist, conservative scholar, and former talk-show host.

Hans-Dietrich Genscher
Hans-Dietrich Genscher (born March 21, 1927) is a German politician. He was born at Reideburg, near Halle.
Genscher served in World War II from 1943 to 1945. He joined the Nazi Party in the age of 18. After the war, he studied economics and law in Halle and Leipzig. He joined the East German Liberal Democratic Party (LDPD) in 1946.
In 1952, Genscher fled to West Germany. There he joined the Free Democratic Party (FDP). He passed his second state examination in law in Hamburg in 1954. After that, he became a solicitor in Bremen. In 1965, Genscher was elected to the West German parliament for the first time. From 1969 to 1974, he was Home Secretary under Chancellor Willy Brandt.
Gensher was Foreign Minister and Vice Chancellor of Germany from 1974 to 1982 under Helmut Schmidt. Two weeks later, he began to serve in the same positions under Helmut Kohl. He served the second time from 1982 to 1992. He was Germany's longest serving Foreign Minister and Vice Chanellor of Germany|Vice Chancellor.

Franz Müntefering
Franz Müntefering (born January, 16th, 1940) is a German politician. He is Chairman of the Social Democratic Party of Germany (SPD).
Müntefering was born in Neheim-Hüsten near Arnsberg.
After his school time he was taught to became an industrial salesman.
He joined the Social Democratic Party in 1966.
He was member of the Bundestag (Federal Parliament) from 1974 to 1992 and has been member again since 1998.
1998 he was a member of the Landtag (state parliament) of North Rhine-Westphalia.
From 1992 to 1995 he was Secretary of Social affairs in the State of North Rhine-Westphalia.
From 1995 to 2001 Party Chairman in that state.
From 1995 to 1998 he was Bundesgeschäftsführer (federal executive director) of the SPD.
In 1998 he became Secretary for Transport and Infrastructure of Germany under Chancellor Gerhard Schröder.
From 1999 to 2002 he was Secretary General of the Social Democratic Party.
From 2002 to 2005 fraction leader in the Bundestag.
He was Party Chairman of the SPD from 2004 to 2005.
Uo from 2005 to 2007 he was Secretary for Working and Social Affairs and Vice Chancellor of Germany under Angela Merkel in her Grand Coaltion.
In 2007 he gave up all his jobs - excepted the mandate in Federal Parliament - for caring his ill wife.
After the death of his wife he returned.
In 2008 he became Party Chairman of the SPD again.

John Ashcroft
John David Ashcroft (born May 9, 1942) is an American politician who was the 79th United States Attorney General. He served during the first term of President George W. Bush from 2001 until 2005. Ashcroft was previously the Governor of Missouri (1985–1993) and a U.S. Senator from Missouri (1995–2001).

Roger Williams (theologian)
Roger Williams (December 21, 1603–April 1, 1683) was an English theologian. He was widely known as a supporter of religious toleration and separation of church and state. He also supported fair dealings with Native Americans. In 1644, he received a charter creating the colony of Rhode Island, named for the main island in Narragansett Bay. He is believed to have started the first or second Baptist church in the United States. He is known to have left the church soon afterwards, saying, "God is too large to be housed under one roof."

Stephen Hadley
Stephen John Hadley (born February 13, 1947, in Toledo, Ohio) is the current (21st) U.S. Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs (commonly referred as National Security Advisor) for President George W. Bush. He had been Assistant to the President and Deputy National Security Advisor from January 22, 2001. On January 26, 2005, he replaced Condoleezza Rice as National Security Advisor, upon Rice's confirmation as Secretary of State.
Hadley served as a senior foreign and defense policy advisor to then-Governor Bush during the 2000 presidential campaign and worked in the Bush-Cheney Transition on the National Security Council.

George Tenet
George John Tenet (born January 5, 1953) was the Director of Central Intelligence for the United States Central Intelligence Agency and is Distinguished Professor in the Practice of Diplomacy at Georgetown University. Tenet held the position as the DCI from July 1997 to July 2004, making him the second-longest serving director in the agency's history — behind Allen Welsh Dulles — as well as one of the few DCIs to serve under two U.S. presidents of opposing political parties.

Peer Steinbrück
Peer Steinbrück (born 10 January 1947 in Hamburg) is a German politician.
From 1968 to 1969 he made a training as a reserve officer of the Bundeswehr (German army).
From 1970 to 1974 he studied national economy in Kiel.
After that he worked in different ministries.
In 1969 he joined the Social Democratic Party of Germany (SPD).
In 1993 he became Secretary for Economy and Infrastructure in the State of Schleswig-Holstein.
In 1998 he changed to the State of North Rhine-Westphalia and became Secretary for Infrastructure, up from 2000 Secretary of Finance.
In 2000 he was elected into the State Parliament of North Rhine-Westphalia.
He was Minister President (Ministerpräsident) of North Rhine-Westphalia from November 2002 to June 2005.
On the state election on May 22, 2005 Steinbrück failed to be reelected as Minister President of North Rhine-Westphalia. His successor was Jürgen Rüttgers (CDU).
Since November 2005 he has been finance minister of Germany and Vice chief of SPD.

Bleach (album)
"Bleach" was the first album by the American grunge band, Nirvana. It did not become popular when it was released, but when Nirvana's second album "Nevermind" was released in 1991, many Nirvana fans discovered "Bleach".

Robert Cutler
Robert Cutler (1895 – 1974) was a U.S. administrator. He served as National Security Advisor between 1953 and 1955, and again from 1957 to 1958. A graduate of Harvard College and Harvard Law School and attorney and bank executive in Boston, Massachusetts before taking public office, he was the person to serve in the newly created position of National Security Advisor during the Eisenhower Administration.

Oveta Culp Hobby
Oveta Culp Hobby (January 19, 1905–August 16, 1995) was the first secretary of the Department of Health, Education and Welfare, first commanding officer of the Women's Army Corps, and chairman of the board of the "Houston Post".

Patricia Roberts Harris
Patricia Roberts Harris (May 31, 1924 – March 23, 1985) served as United States Secretary of Housing and Urban Development, the last United States Secretary of Health, Education, and Welfare and the first United States Secretary of Health and Human Services in the administration of President Jimmy Carter. She was the first African American woman to serve as a United States Ambassador, representing the U.S. in Luxembourg under President Lyndon B. Johnson, and the first to enter the line of succession to the Presidency.

Henry Paulson
Henry Merritt "Hank" Paulson Jr. (born March 28, 1946) is the United States Treasury Secretary and member of the International Monetary Fund Board of Governors. He previously served as the Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Goldman Sachs.

John W. Snow
John William Snow (born August 2, 1939, in Toledo, Ohio) served as the 73rd United States Secretary of the Treasury. He replaced Secretary Paul O'Neill on February 3, 2003 and was succeeded by Henry Paulson on July 3, 2006, in a move that had been anticipated for several weeks. Snow submitted a letter of resignation on May 30, 2006, effective "after an orderly transition period for my successor." To replace him, U.S. President George W. Bush nominated Henry M. Paulson, Jr.. Snow announced on Thursday, June 29, 2006 that he had completed his last day on the job; Robert Kimmitt served as acting secretary until Paulson was sworn in.

Oliver Wolcott, Jr.
Oliver Wolcott Jr. (January 11, 1760 June 1, 1833) was United States Secretary of the Treasury from 1795 to 1800 and governor of Connecticut from 1817 to 1827.

Samuel Dexter
Samuel Dexter (May 14, 1761 – May 4, 1816) was an early American statesman who served both in Congress and in the Presidential Cabinet.
Born in Boston, Massachusetts, to the Rev. Samuel Dexter, the 4th minister of Dedham, he graduated from Harvard University in 1781 and then studied law at Worcester under Levi Lincoln, Sr., the future Attorney General of the United States. After he passed the bar in 1784, he began practicing in Lunenburg, Massachusetts.

Kenneth Claiborne Royall
Kenneth Claiborne Royall (July 24, 1894–May 25, 1971) was a United States Army general and the last person to hold the office of Secretary of War. That position was abolished in 1947, and Royall served as the first Secretary of the Army (a successory position) from 1947 to 1949.

Pete Geren
Preston M. Geren, III (born January 29, 1952 in Fort Worth, Texas) has served as the 20th and current United States Secretary of the Army since 16 July 2007. He is also a former member of the United States House of Representatives from Texas.

John Marshall
John Marshall (September 24, 1755 – July 6, 1835) was an American statesman and jurist who shaped American constitutional law and made the Supreme Court a center of power. Marshall was Chief Justice of the United States, serving from February 4, 1801, until his death in 1835. He served in the United States House of Representatives from March 4, 1799, to June 7, 1800, and, under President John Adams, was Secretary of State from June 6, 1800, to March 4, 1801. Marshall was from the Commonwealth of Virginia and a leader of the Federalist Party.
The longest serving Chief Justice in Supreme Court history, Marshall dominated the Court for over three decades (a term outliving his own Federalist Party) and played a significant role in the development of the American legal system. Most notably, he established that the courts are entitled to exercise judicial review, the power to strike down laws that violate the Constitution. Thus, Marshall has been credited with cementing the position of the judiciary as an independent and influential branch of government. Furthermore, Marshall made several important decisions relating to Federalism, shaping the balance of power between the federal government and the states during the early years of the republic. In particular, he repeatedly confirmed the supremacy of federal law over state law and supported an expansive reading of the enumerated powers.

William H. Crawford
William Harris Crawford (February 24, 1772 – September 15, 1834) was an important American politician, as well as a judge, during the early 19th century. He served as United States Secretary of War from 1815 to 1816 and United States Secretary of the Treasury from 1816 to 1825, and was a candidate for President of the United States in 1824.
Legacy.
In 1875, Crawford appeared on the 50 cent bill.
The town of Crawfordsville, Indiana, as well as Crawford County, Illinois; Crawford County, Iowa; Crawford County, Missouri; Crawford County, Arkansas; Crawford County, Wisconsin; Crawfordville, Georgia; and Crawford County, Georgia, are named for Crawford.

James McHenry
James McHenry (November 16, 1753 May 3, 1816) was an early American statesman. McHenry was a signer of the United States Constitution from Maryland and the namesake of Fort McHenry, the bombardment of which inspired the American national anthem "Star-Spangled Banner". He was also a delegate to the Continental Congress from Maryland, and the third United States Secretary of War from January 27, 1796 to May 13,1800, under Presidents George Washington and John Adams.

Timothy Pickering
Timothy Pickering (July 17 1745 – January 29 1829) was a politician from Massachusetts who served in a variety of roles, most notably as the third United States Secretary of State, serving in that office from 1795 to 1800 under Presidents George Washington and John Adams.

John Jay
John Jay (December 12, 1745 – May 17, 1829) was an American politician, statesman, revolutionary, diplomat, a Supreme Court Chief Justice, and a Founding Father of the United States. Jay served in the Continental Congress and was elected President of that body. During and after the American Revolution, he was a minister (ambassador) to Spain and France, helping to fashion American foreign policy and to secure favorable peace terms from the British and French. He co-wrote the "Federalist Papers" with Alexander Hamilton and James Madison.
Jay served on the U.S. Supreme Court as the first Chief Justice of the United States from 1789 to 1795. In 1794 he negotiated the Jay Treaty with the British. A leader of the new Federalist party, Jay was governor of New York from 1795 to 1801. He was the leading opponent of slavery and the slave trade in New York. His first attempt to pass emancipation legislation failed in 1777 and failed again in 1785, but he succeeded in 1799, signing the law that eventually emancipated the slaves of New York; the last were freed before his death.

William Rehnquist
William Hubbs Rehnquist (October 1, 1924 – September 3, 2005) was an American lawyer, jurist, and a political figure who served as an Associate Justice on the Supreme Court of the United States and later as the Chief Justice of the United States. Considered a conservative, Rehnquist favored a federalism under which the states meaningfully exercised governmental power. Under this view of federalism, the Supreme Court of the United States, for the first time since the 1930s, struck down an Act of Congress as exceeding federal power under the Commerce Clause.

Samuel Osgood
Samuel Osgood (February 3, 1747 – August 12, 1813) was an American merchant and statesman from Andover, Massachusetts. He served in the Massachusetts and New York state legislatures, represented Massachusetts in the Continental Congress and was the first Postmaster General under the United States Constitution.

William Bradford (Attorney General)
William Bradford (September 14, 1755 – August 23, 1795) was a lawyer and judge from Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, and the second United States Attorney General in 1794-1795.

Charles Lee (Attorney General)
Charles Lee (1758 – June 24 1815) was an American lawyer from Virginia. He served as United States Attorney General from 1795 until 1801.
President Washington appointed Lee the Attorney General after William Bradford died in office. After Senate approval he took office on December 10 1795 and served through the rest of the administration. He was continued in office by John Adams and served through the entire Adams administration until February 19 1801.

Benjamin Stoddert
Benjamin Stoddert (1751 – December 13, 1813) was the first United States Secretary of the Navy from May 1, 1798 to March 31, 1801.

Hongwu Emperor
Hongwu Emperor (October 21, 1328 – June 24, 1398), also known by his given name Zhu Yuanzhang () and by the temple name Taizu of the Ming () was the first emperor of the Ming Dynasty.

Cornthwaite Rason
Sir Cornthwaite Hector William James Rason (18 June 1858 – 15 March 1927) was the 7th Premier of Western Australia from 25 August 1905 until 7 May 1906.

Henry Daglish
Henry Daglish (18 November 1866 – 16 August 1920) was the 6th Premier of Western Australia from 10 August 1904 to 25 August 1905. He was the first Western Australia Premier from the Labor Party and the first from any organised political party.

Alf Morgans
Alfred Edward Morgans (17 February 1850 – 10 August 1933) was the 4th Premier of Western Australia from 21 November to 23 December 1901.

George Leake
George Leake (3 December 1856 – 24 June 1902) was the 3rd Premier of Western Australia from 27 May 1901 to 21 November 1901 and then from 23 December 1901 to24 June 1902.

George Throssell
George Lionel Throssell (23 May 1840 – 30 August 1910) was the 2nd Premier of Western Australia from 15 February 1901 to 27 May 1901.

John Forrest
Sir John Forrest (22 August 1847 – 2 September 1918) was the 1st Premier of Western Australia from 22 December 1890 – 15 February 1901.

Into the Fire (album)
"Into the Fire" is the fifth studio album by the Canadian rock artist Bryan Adams. Released on March 30, 1987 through A&M Records, the album was a huge commercial success selling over 2 million units worldwide, peaking at number 7 on the US "Billboard" 200 chart and reaching high positions in charts worldwide. It was recorded at Adams' home in London, England.
Six singles were released from the album: "Heat of the Night", "Hearts on Fire", "Victim of Love", "Only the Strong Survive", "Into the Fire" and "Another Day".
Into the Fire Tour.
On May, 1987 Adams startet the Into the Fire tour where his first performance was in Shreveport, Louisianna with his backing band. Adams first stop of the UK leg of the tour at the Prince’s Trust charity concert at Wembley Stadium, London. Adams would later heads back to the United States to continue the American leg of the tour, Adams appeared on The David Letterman Show. Adams would later sell out two nights in a row at Madison Square Garden in New York City and was visited backstage by Brian Wilson of the Beach Boys, he would later get a sold out show in Toronto, Ontario. The tour continued through the Western United States. Adams heads back to the UK on October 13 in Newcastle, England. Adams sold out four nights in a row at Wembley Arena in London. Adams starts his tour in mainland Europe and Adams previous album "Reckless" achieves gold status in Sweden and "Into The Fire" achieves gold status in Switzerland and later he travels to Dublin, Ireland. Adams started the Asian leg of the tour and ended up selling out ten concerts, five of which were in Tokyo's Budokan. "Into the Fire" ends up being certified platinum with sales over 100,000 copies sold in Japan. Adams headed back to Europe and played in East Berlin and later West Berlin. The last concert part of the Into the Fire tour was played in Locarno, Switzerland.

Cuts Like a Knife
"Cuts Like a Knife" is the third album by the Canadian rock artist Bryan Adams. Released on January, 1983 through A&M Records, the album became a big hit in Canada when it was released. Outside Canada and the United States the album didn't do so good. After the release of Reckless the album would chart on the British album chart and would later be a Silver Record by the BPI. It was made at Little Mountain Sound, in Vancouver, Canada.
Three singles were released from the album: "Straight from the Heart", "Cuts Like a Knife" and "This Time", the three made Adams very popular.

You Want It You Got It
"You Want It You Got It" is the second album by Bryan Adams, and was released in 1981 (see 1981 in music). The album was to be called "Bryan Adams Hasn't Heard Of You Either" but the record company wanted him to change the title to something safer.
The first single "Lonely Nights" was a big hit in the US, and two other singles 'Coming Home' and 'Fits Ya Good' were top 40 hits in Canada.
Many songs from this album were covered by other artists, they are "Lonely Nights" by Uriah Heep, "Jealousy" by Prism, "Tonight" by Randy Meisner and "Fits Ya Good" by Tove Naess and more others.
After Dave Taylor listened to this album, he decided to become Bryan Adams' bass player.

Bryan Adams (album)
"Bryan Adams" is the first album by Canadian rock singer Bryan Adams. It was released in February 1980 by A&M Records. 'Hidin' From Love' went to #64 on Canada's RPM 100 Singles chart and 'Give Me Your Love' went to #91 on the same chart.
In early 1978, Bryan Adams and Jim Vallance made a song-writing duo together. They made the album in 1979 and released it in February 1980.
The first single was "Hidin' from Love" in 1980 (#43 on the Billboard dance charts) the next one was "Give Me Your Love" and then "Remember".

18 til I Die
"18 til I Die" is a rock album by Canadian songwriter Bryan Adams released in 1996 (see 1996 in music). It is the second album Adams co-produced with Robert Mutt Lange and features a more raw rock style, including some Blues style music.

On a Day Like Today (album)
"On a Day Like Today" is an album by Canadian singer-songwriter Bryan Adams, released in 1998 (see 1998 in music).

11 (Bryan Adams album)
"11" is the eleventh studio album by the Canadian rock artist Bryan Adams. Released on March 7, 2008 through Universal Music Group, the album has been a commercial success peaking at #1 in Canada, Switzerland and India and at #6 in the UK. It was recorded at The Warehouse Studio, Vancouver, Canada, and additionally at hotel rooms and backstage concerts around Europe.
Three singles have been released from the album: "I Thought I'd Seen Everything", "Tonight We Have the Stars" and "She's Got a Way". The album was also released in the US exclusively through Wal-Mart and Sam's Club retail stores on May 13, 2008. To promote the album, Adams toured around Europe on the "11 Days, 11 Cities" acoustic tour, playing new songs and old classics.
11 Tour.
In support of the release of "11", Adams started the ‘11 concerts, 11 cities’ tour, having concerts in 11 different countries in just 11 days. The intimate shows at some spectacular venues will see Adams perform an acoustic set, on stage, with just his guitar and harmonica. The London show was on the 11th March, 2008 at St. James Church in Piccadilly. The last stop of his 11 days concert tour was in Copenhagen, Denmark on the 17th March. After the ‘11 concerts, 11 cities’ Adams went and acoustic tour where he toured with Foreigner and Rod Stewart to support his new album. Zimbio asked Adams: "With the acoustic tour, which of your songs do you feel sound best acoustically?"

Erich Mende
Erich Mende (28th of October 1916 - 6th of May 1998 in Bonn) was a German jurist and politician for the Christian-Democratic Union of Germany and the Free Democratic Party of Germany.
Mende was born in Groß Strehlitz, near Oppolne.
1936 he made his abitur. Afterwards he had to do his working service for the state and then his military service.
Up from 1938 he was an officer. At the end of World War II he was major.
After he was set free as prisoner of war, his hometown was made Polish. He found a new home in the Ruhr area. Then he studied laws in Cologne and Bonn.
In 1949 he finished his doctorade thesis.
In 1946 he joined the FDP.
He was Secretary for Intra-German Relations (Bundesminister für gesamtdeutsche Fragen) from 1963 to 1966.
In the same time he was Vice Chancellor of West Germany.

Josiah Bartlett
Josiah Bartlett (November 21, 1729 May 19, 1795), was an American physician and statesman, delegate to the Continental Congress for New Hampshire, and signatory of the Declaration of Independence. He was later Chief Justice of the New Hampshire Superior Court of Judicature and Governor of the state.

Oliver Wolcott
Oliver Wolcott (December 1, 1726 December 1, 1797), was a signer of the United States Declaration of Independence and also the Articles of Confederation as a representative of Connecticut.
Life.
Oliver Wolcott was born in Windsor, Connecticut as the youngest of fourteen children of the Royal Governor Roger Wolcott. He attended Yale College, graduating in 1747. He was commissioned to raise a militia company to fight in the French and Indian War, and he served the King as Captain in this unit on the northern frontier. At the end of the war, Wolcott studied medicine, then was appointed sheriff of the newly created Litchfield County, Connecticut, serving from about 1751 to 1771.
He participated in the American Revolutionary War as brigadier general and then major general in the Connecticut militia. The Continental Congress appointed him Commissioner of Indian Affairs, and he was elected to the Congress in 1775. He became seriously ill in 1776 and did not sign the Declaration of Independence until some time later. He was engaged in military affairs between 1776-78, and served again in Congress from 1778-1784.
He served again as an Indian Commissioner, and was elected Lieutenant Governor of Connecticut in 1786, assuming the Governorship on the death of Samuel Huntington in 1796, and was reelected to the position, dying in office at the age of seventy-one in Farmington, Connecticut. He is buried in East Cemetery in Litchfield, Connecticut.
Legacy.
The town of Wolcott, Connecticut was named in honor of Oliver and his son, Oliver Jr. His home in Litchfield was declared a National Historic Landmark in 1971.
His son, Oliver Wolcott, Jr., served as Secretary of the Treasury under Presidents George Washington and John Adams and as Governor of Connecticut.

Bilawal Bhutto Zardari
Bilawal Bhutto Zardari (Urdu: بلاول بھٹو زرداری) (born 21 September 1988) is co-chairman of the Pakistan Peoples Party, and the eldest child and only son of the late Pakistani politician and former Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto and her husband Asif Ali Zardari, the President of Pakistan. Chairman Bhutto Zardari is also the grandson of Zulfikar Ali Bhutto, the first popularly elected Prime Minister of Pakistan and father of Benazir Bhutto, who held the distinction of being the first female head of government of any Islamic country.

Hans-Christian Ströbele
Hans-Christian Ströbele (7th of June 1939 in Halle) is a German politician and lawyer.
Ströbele made his school exam in Marl (Westphalia).
Then he studied laws in Heidelberg and Berlin (at the Free University of Berlin).
He has been a lawyer in Berlin (until 1990 West-Berlin) since 1969.
He was involved in the student revolt of 1968.
He was one of the lawyers of the Rote Armee Fraktion (RAF) terrorists in the Stammheim trial.
From 1970 to 1974 he was member of the Social Democratic Party of Germany.
Later he was one of the founders of the "Alternative List for Democracy and Environmental Protection," which later became the Berlin section of the Green Party of Germany.

Albert Gallatin
Abraham Alfonse Albert Gallatin (January 29, 1761 – August 12, 1849) was a Swiss-American ethnologist, linguist, politician, diplomat, Congressman, and the longest-serving United States Secretary of the Treasury. He was also a founder of New York University.

Henry Dearborn
Henry Dearborn (February 23, 1751 – June 6, 1829) was an American physician, statesman and veteran of both the American Revolutionary War and the War of 1812.
He represented this district as a Democratic-Republican in the Third and Fourth Congresses (1793-1797). In 1801, President Thomas Jefferson appointed him Secretary of War, a post he held for eight years until March 7, 1809.
Legacy.
Lewis and Clark, appointed by Thomas Jefferson, named the Dearborn River in west-central Montana after Dearborn in 1803. Dearborn County, Indiana, Dearborn, Michigan and Dearborn, Missouri were also named for him, as was Fort Dearborn in Chicago, Illinois.
His son, Henry A. S. Dearborn, was a Congressman in 1831-1833.

Give 'Em Enough Rope
"Give 'Em Enough Rope" is the second album by The Clash. It was released in 1978. In the United States, this was their first offical album because it was realsed before the U.S. version of "The Clash"). The album was well liked and got to number 2 in the UK chart, and number 128 in the U.S.
Track listing.
All songs were written by Joe Strummer and Mick Jones, except where noted. All songs were arranged by The Clash. All lead vocals were by Strummer, except "Stay Free" by Jones.

St. Anger
St. Anger is the 8th studio album by american thrash metal band Metallica. It was released on June 5, 2003.

Rust in Peace
Rust in Peace is the fourth album by American thrash metal band, Megadeth. It was released on September 24, 1990.

Peace Sells... but Who's Buying?
Peace Sells... but Who's Buying? is the second studio album by thrash metal band Megadeth. It was released in November 1986. Dave Mustaine wrote all of the songs except for I Ain't Superstitious.
Track listing.
All songs written by Dave Mustaine, except where noted.

So Far, So Good... So What!
"So Far, So Good... So What!" is the third studio album by thrash metal band Megadeth. It was released on January 19, 1988.

Flavors of Entanglement
Flavors of Entanglement is the seventh studio album by rock singer Alanis Morissette. This studio album was released June 10, 2008 in the United States, June 9, 2008 in Australia, and on May 30, 2008 in Europe. Singles from this album include "Underneath", "Not As We", and "In Praise of the Valnerable Man".

Cynthia McKinney
Cynthia McKinney (born March 17, 1955 in Atlanta, USA) is an American politician and the 2008 presidential candidate for the Green Party.

Shirley Hufstedler
Shirley Mount Hufstedler (born August 24, 1925 in Denver, Colorado) was United States Secretary of Education under President Jimmy Carter.
In 1966, she was appointed Associate Justice of the California Court of Appeal. President Lyndon Johnson appointed her Judge of the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit in 1968. She served for eleven years before President Jimmy Carter appointed her U.S. Secretary of Education.

Margaret Spellings
Margaret Spellings (born Margaret Dudar on November 30, 1957) is the current Secretary of Education under the administration of U.S. President George W. Bush. She was previously Assistant to the President for Domestic Policy to President Bush.
She was one of the principal authors of the 2001 No Child Left Behind Act.

Now That's What I Call Music! 29 (U.S. series)
"Now That's What I Call Music! 29" is the 29th album in the original Now series. This compilation album will be released November of 2008. Songs include "Thunder" by Boys Like Girls, "Whatever You Like" by T.I., "Got Money" by Lil Wayne, and "Dangerous" by Kardinal Offishall and Akon and 16 other tracks.

Levi Lincoln, Sr.
Levi Lincoln, Sr. (May 15, 1749–April 14, 1820) was an American revolutionary who served as a Minuteman at beginning of the American Revolutionary War, a state legislator in Massachusetts, Governor of Massachusetts, Lieutenant Governor of Massachusetts, a U.S. Representative, Attorney General for President Thomas Jefferson and Acting Secretary of State.

James R. Schlesinger
James Rodney Schlesinger (born February 15, 1929) was United States Secretary of Defense from 1973 to 1975 under presidents Richard Nixon and Gerald Ford. He became America's first Secretary of Energy under Jimmy Carter.

Chuck Baldwin
Charles O. "Chuck" Baldwin (born May 3, 1952) is a founder-pastor of Crossroad Baptist Church in Pensacola, Florida, and 2008 presidential nominee of the Constitution Party. He was also the Constitution Party nominee for Vice President in 2004.

Darrell Castle
Darrell Castle (b 1948) is an American political figure, activist and lawyer from Memphis, Tennessee, and the 2008 vice-presidential candidate of the Constitution Party

George W. Campbell
George Washington Campbell (February 9, 1769–February 17, 1848) was an American statesman. He was elected to the United States House of Representatives as the Representative from Tennessee's at-large congressional district in 1803. He served in the House from 1805-1809, in the 8th, 9th, and 10th Congresses. During the 10th Congress, he was the chairman of the Ways and Means Committee. He was also one of the managers appointed in 1804 to conduct the impeachment hearings for John Pickering, judge of the United States District Court for the District of New Hampshire, and later in the same year, the impeachment hearings against Samuel Chase, Associate Justice of the Supreme Court of the United States.
Life.
Born in Scotland, he immigrated to North Carolina in 1772 with his parents. He graduated from the College of New Jersey (now Princeton University) in 1794 and began studying law. He was admitted to the bar in North Carolina and began practicing in Knoxville, Tennessee.
Political life.
He left Congress in 1809 to become judge of the Tennessee Supreme Court, serving until 1811.
He served as a United States Senator from Tennessee twice, once from 1811 to 1814, having been elected to fill the seat of Jenkin Whiteside, and again from 1815 to 1818. His first service was from October 8, 1811 to February 11, 1814, when he resigned to accept appointment as the United States Secretary of the Treasury. He returned to the Senate on October 10, 1815. He served as the first chairman of the Senate Finance Committee and its predecessor from December 4, 1815, until his resignation from the Senate on April 20, 1818; on this occasion to accept appointment as United States Ambassador to Russia, a position he held from 1818-1821. Campbell served as a member of the French Spoliation Claims Commission in 1831.
Appointed Secretary of the Treasury by James Madison, he faced national financial disorder brought on by the War of 1812. Congress had failed to recharter the First Bank of the United States after its charter expired in 1811, and appropriations for the war were unavailable, so Campbell had to convince Americans to buy government bonds. He was forced to meet to lenders terms, selling government bonds at exorbitant interest rates. In September, 1814 the British occupied Washington, D.C. and the credit of the government was lowered even further. Campbell was unsuccessful in his efforts to raise money through additional bond sales and he resigned that October after only eight months in office, disillusioned and in bad health.
He died in 1848 and is buried at Nashville City Cemetery in Nashville, Tennessee.
Campbell County, Tennessee, is named in his honor.

Rod Paige
Roderick Raynor "Rod" Paige (born June 17, 1933), served as the 7th United States Secretary of Education from 2001 to 2005. He was the first African American to serve as the nation's education chief. He earned a bachelor's degree from Jackson State University in Mississippi and a Master's degree and an Ed.D from Indiana University Bloomington. He also holds an honorary doctoral degree from the University of Houston presented to him in 2000.
Paige was sitting with George W. Bush at the Emma E. Booker Elementary School in Sarasota, Florida, when Bush received the news that a second plane had hit the World Trade Center in the September 11, 2001 attacks.
On November 15, 2004, Paige announced his resignation after overseeing the President's education agenda for four years. White House domestic policy adviser Margaret Spellings was nominated as his successor. The U.S. Senate confirmed her on January 20, 2005 after Bush's inauguration for a second term.

Joshua Bolten
Joshua Brewster Bolten (born August 16, 1954) is the current White House Chief of Staff serving U.S. President George W. Bush. Bolten replaced Andrew Card on April 14 2006.

Alan Stephenson Boyd
Alan Stephenson Boyd (born July 20, 1922) was the first United States Secretary of Transportation, appointed by Lyndon Johnson in November 1966.
He was appointed to the Civil Aeronautics Board in 1959 by Dwight Eisenhower and promoted to chairman by John F. Kennedy.
When the Richard M. Nixon administration took power, Boyd left the government and became the president of the Illinois Central Railroad, a position he held from 1969 to 1972.

Lies for the Liars
"Lies for the Liars" is a full-length album released in 2007 by The Used. It is currently their most recent album.
Hidden track.
"Smother Me" ends at 4:20 but runs to 6:17 due to the addition of a hidden track titled "Queso". "Queso" is a 30 second song that is about a quesadilla. Though it was first released on The Used's MySpace in late 2006, most fans talked about it on message boards and thought of it as a joke - it was not expected to actually be on the album.
The music.
"Lies for the Liars" contains emotive, heartfelt and sometimes sarcastic or Gothic lyrics. It has more swearing than previous The Used albums, but this is used on fewer songs. For example, "Liar Liar (Burn in Hell)" swears 10 times.
The first song "The Ripper" has an ending that makes the CD appear to be stuck, but its only part of the song.

If Only You Were Lonely
If Only You Were Lonely is the second album released by Hawthorne Heights. Many listeners consider the album more on the dark side, than the first Hawthorne Heights album.
The album includes a few songs where screaming is absent, and others where it is only used in a small part of the song, to make it fit better. Previously, they would just scream for the sake.
The band asked fans desperatly to mess up neyos (Pop music singer) album sales and to move copies so that people couldn't find them, but they would still be in stock showing on the computers. The main reason for that was because neyos album was being released on the same day, and hawthorne heights didn't think it was a fair competition.
It brought singles such as "This is Who We Are" and something new for the band with songs like "Decembers"

Hawk Nelson Is My Friend
"Hawk Nelson is my Friend" is the latest album by Christian rock band Hawk Nelson. It was released on April 1, 2008.
The title was taken because they find it funny - some people still think of Hawk Nelson as a person instead of a band. It was also chosen because, Hawk Nelson like to connect with fans, and make friends with them.
Songs.
It also includes a special edition CD/DVDwith extra tracks and a paper board game. Also including a video showing how the music video for "Friend Like That" was made. It has four other videos from the band.
Singles.
"Friend Like That" was the only single from this album. It was first made available on music programmes such as Itunes. It was announced a while before, and was available on ChristmasEve 2007. However, it was taken early on websites such as YouTube.

Pierre de Coubertin
Pierre de Frédy, Baron de Coubertin (1 January 1863 – 2 September 1937) was a French teacher and historian. He is the founder of the International Olympic Committee.

Bleed American
Bleed american is the fourth album released by Jimmy Eat World and was made available in 2001. They had to change the title in stores to "Salt sweat sugar" because they were scared "Bleed american" would be taken the wrong way, possibly in an offensive way.
Trivia.
On the second song, "Praise chorus" they mention old songs such as our house in the middle of the street. Davey Von Bohlen from The promise ring does some of the vocals for the song.
Hear you me is believed to be written for two fans who died, it's also reffering to the weezer song
The authority song makes certain references to the Pop culture - the dj never has it, j.a.m.c automatic, if those were roys headphones, you'd bet he play what goes on.

Jigme Khesar Namgyel Wangchuck
Jigme Khesar Namgyel Wangchuck is the fifth Dragon King of Bhutan. He was born on 21 February 1980. He became king on 14 December 2006, and was officially crowned on 6 November 2008

Late Registration
Late Registration is the second album of American singer Kanye West, released on August 30, 2005 by the label Roc-A-Fella Records. This album debut on #1 on billboard hot 100 albuns (the most popular chart on the world) selling 860 copies. Beyond this, the album also has been very well received by critics, being nominated Album Of The Year for Grammy Awards

I Am... Sasha Fierce
"I Am... Sasha Fierce" - is the third solo studio album by American Rhythm and Blues singer Beyoncé Knowles.
Background.
Knowles worked on the album for almost one year. This is longer than she had spent on her previous solo albums and records with her old group Destiny's Child. She said that she has co-written and co-produced over 70 songs.
I am in a different place right now and I wanted people to see the many sides of me. The music is upbeat for the dance, fun side and it is reflective, passionate and serious for the personal side. I have taken risks here. I am not afraid and my music will explain it all. There is no label or tag on my sound. It's me and I am so excited to share it with the world on November 18.

The Flame in All of Us
The Flame in All of Us is the last album released by Thousand Foot Krutch. It was released on September 18 2007. It has more of a rock sound than earlier albums, but also has some softer songs. The band recorded with producer Ken Andrews in the Spring of 2007. The album began at #58 on The Billboard 200 charts.
Five songs from The Flame in All of Us were put on the internet before the album actually released. One of them, Falls Apart was a single for the band.

Countdown to Extinction
Countdown to Extinction is the fifth studio album by American thrash metal band Megadeth. It is their best-selling album. It was released on July 14, 1992.

Live! Live! Live!
"Live! Live! Live!" is a live album released by Bryan Adams in 1988.

MTV Unplugged (Bryan Adams album)
"MTV Unplugged" is an acoustic live album by Canadian musician Bryan Adams. The album was recorded in September, 1997 at the Hammerstein Ballroom in New York City. Adams was joined by Irish piper Davy Spillane and Michael Kamen who wrote orchestrations for many of the songs and brought students from the Juilliard School to play them.
The album includes only thirteen of the songs recorded at the show. Many more are included on the MTV Unplugged DVD and the song order is also different than the CD.

Anthology (Bryan Adams album)
"Anthology" is a compilation album by Canadian singer-songwriter Bryan Adams which contains songs he recorded from 1978 through 2005. The two disc set includes songs from 1980–2005. A third disc which was a DVD live concert which was recorded in mid 2005 called "Live in Lisbon" was included in North America for a limited time. All the songs are in chronological order of their release, except the last song on the first disc on the North American edition, which was released in 1999. The album's enclosed booklet has notes about the process of the recordings and the credits for each track.
Release and reception.
"Anthology" co-produced by Adams, Robert Lange and Bob Clearmountain, peaked at number 65 on the Billboard 200. The album was released on October 18, 2005 and features songs like "Heat of the Night", and "Summer of '69". Anthology peaked at 4 on the Canadian Album Chart 29 on the UK Albums Chart and was certified two times platinum in Canada and gold in the UK.
Version differences.
On the first disc, the North American edition has "The Best of Me" as the last track, while the International edition moved the song to the 2nd disc, and had "All I Want Is You" instead.
On the second disc, The North American edition has two songs from his Album "Room Service" and a new recorded version of "When You're Gone" with Pamela Anderson, while the International edition has the Chicane song "Don't Give Up" in place of Chicane's remix of Cloud Number Nine, and a new song "I'm Not the Man You Think I Am" (from the movie "Colour Me Kubrick"), and the original version of "When You're Gone" with Mel C. instead.

The Piper at the Gates of Dawn
"The Piper at the Gates of Dawn" is Pink Floyd's debut album and the only one made under Syd Barrett's leadership, although he made some contributions to the follow-up, "A Saucerful of Secrets". It has been regarded as one of the most influential albums ever made, being a tremendous influence on the psychedelic rock scene of the time and much of what followed. The album has whimsical lyrics about space, scarecrows, gnomes, bicycles and fairytales, along with psychedelic instrumental passages. Special limited editions were issued to mark its 30th and 40th anniversaries in 1997 and 2007.
Track listing.
All songs written by Syd Barrett, except where noted.
40th Anniversary Edition (2007).
A two-disc 40th anniversary edition was released on 4 September 2007, and a three-disc set was released on 11 September 2007. The packaging, designed by Storm Thorgerson, resembles a cloth-covered book, along with a twelve page reproduction of a Syd Barrett notebook. Discs one and two contain the full 'Piper' album, in mono (disc one) and stereo (disc two) mixes. Both have been newly remastered by James Guthrie, and the mono mix is a substantial improvement over the poor-sounding 30th Anniversary CD.
The third disc includes several Piper-era outtakes from the Abbey Road vaults, along with the band's first three mono singles. Unreleased material includes an alternate shorter take of "Interstellar Overdrive" that was previously thought lost, the pre-overdubbed abridged mix of "Interstellar Overdrive" previously only available on an EP in France, an alternative mix of "Matilda Mother" as it appeared early in the sessions, and also the 1967 stereo mix of "Apples and Oranges", which features extra untrimmed material at the beginning and end.

Wish You Were Here (album)
"Wish You Were Here" is a concept album by Pink Floyd. Recorded at Abbey Road Studios between January and July 1975 and released on 15 September 1975 (see 1975 in music), the album would later be regarded as one of Pink Floyd's greatest albums and was ranked 209 on Rolling Stone's 500 Greatest Albums of All Time list. Its lyrics, written by Roger Waters, concerned the music industry, and questioned the market-oriented record companies' lack of understanding and interest for musicians. The album also pays tribute to Syd Barrett, Pink Floyd's former guitarist and chief songwriter, especially with "Shine On You Crazy Diamond" and the title track itself. The album sold 10 million copies worldwide.

Animals (album)
"Animals" is a concept album by English progressive rock band Pink Floyd, released on 23 January 1977 in the United Kingdom and on 2 February 1977 in the United States. The album proved to be a success in the UK, where it reached #2 in the era of punk music. It was also a success in the U.S., reaching #3 on the Billboard album charts (#1 and #2 were "Hotel California" by The Eagles, and the soundtrack to the Barbra Streisand film "A Star Is Born"). However, it was on the American charts for only six months even though it has continued to sell solidly, to the extent of its having gone quadruple platinum, according to the RIAA.
In the UK, the British Phonographic Industry awarded the album Gold (100,000 units) in 1977. It has yet to achieve Platinum.
Track listing.
All songs written by Roger Waters except where noted.All lead vocals performed by Roger Waters, except "Dogs" with lead vocals by David Gilmour and Roger Waters.

The Wall
"The Wall" is a rock opera presented as a double album by the English progressive rock band Pink Floyd, released in late 1979. It was subsequently performed live, with elaborate theatrical effects, and made into a film.
Following in the footsteps of their previous albums, "The Wall" is a concept album - specifically, it deals largely with the theme of isolation from one's peers. The concept was largely inspired by the band's 1977 tour promoting the album "Animals", with regards to an incident where Roger Waters' frustration with the audience reached a point where Waters spat in the face of a fan who was attempting to climb on stage; this, in turn, led him to lament that such a wall exists. With its significantly darker theme, "The Wall" featured a notably harsher and more theatrical sound than their previous releases.
"The Wall" is a rock opera that centers on the character "Pink". Largely based on Waters' personal life, Pink struggles in life from an early age, having lost his father in war ("Another Brick in the Wall (Part 1)"), abused by teachers ("The Happiest Days of Our Lives"), nurtured by an overprotective mother ("Mother"), and deserted by his wife later on ("Don't Leave Me Now") - all of which factored into Pink's mental isolation from society, figuratively referred to as "The Wall".
In 2003, Rolling Stone magazine listed "The Wall" as #87 in "Rolling Stone's 500 Greatest Albums of All Time".
Track listing.
All songs by Roger Waters except as noted.

The Final Cut (album)
"The Final Cut" is a rock album by Pink Floyd recorded at various studios in the UK from July to December 1982. It is the final Pink Floyd studio album to feature the band's bassist and primary songwriter Roger Waters. The album is predominantly the work of Waters, this being the only Pink Floyd album on which the composers' credit on every track is given to Waters alone. Keyboardist Rick Wright played no part in the recording of "The Final Cut" having been sacked by Waters during recording of "The Wall", meaning that this is the only Pink Floyd album on which Wright does not feature at all. David Gilmour meanwhile sings lead vocals on only one of the album's twelve songs, the rest being sung entirely by Waters. The recording of "The Final Cut" was marred by tension between Waters and his bandmates, particularly Gilmour, who has since expressed his dislike for much of the album. For these and other reasons, it is sometimes regarded as a Roger Waters solo album rather than a true Pink Floyd album. None of the album's songs has ever been performed live by Pink Floyd, though some have been performed live by Waters during solo tours. Waters' dominance on the album is most clearly seen on the back cover, which reads: "The Final Cut: A Requiem for the Post-War Dream - by Roger Waters, performed by Pink Floyd".
Track listing.
All songs composed by Roger Waters. All lead vocals performed by Roger Waters unless otherwise stated.

A Momentary Lapse of Reason
"A Momentary Lapse of Reason" is Pink Floyd's 1987 album, the band's first release after the departure of Roger Waters from the band in 1985. The album reached #3 on both the U.S. and UK charts. It was released in the UK and the rest of Europe on EMI and on Columbia Records for the rest of the world.
Track listing.
All lead vocals performed by David Gilmour except where noted.

Mmhmm
Mmhmm is the Fourth album released by Relient k it has other spellings because it's a strange word it's different to the bands previous albums, because it's heavier but also softer at times with the music.
It marks the time where the band became more serious, using fewer Joke songs than before.
Two things should be noted here: It was their first album on their record label capitol records. It was also the last CD which Brian pitman (Relient k bassist) recorded with the band.
The album was released again, and contained a song which was first found on an EP
In 2005, the album was given gold stats, because it had sold half a million copies in america
The album had a few singles which were played only on Christian radio such as High of 75 and I so hate consequences

Morris Iemma
Morris Iemma (born 21 July 1961) was the 40th Premier of New South Wales from 3 August 2005 to 5 September 2008. He was from the Labor Party.

Chuck (album)
"Chuck" is the third album by Sum 41. It was released on October 12, 2004.

The Prestige (film)
"The Prestige" is a 2006 period film directed by Christopher Nolan. The story follows Robert Angier and Alfred Borden, enemy stage magicians in fin de siècle London. Obsessed with creating the best stage Magic, they take part in a competition with tragic results.

Get Born
Get Born is the debut album by Australian band Jet. It was recorded in 2003 and released on September 14 of 2003. The song Cold Hard Bitch reached the top spot on the Modern Rock charts.
Track Listing.
(*) Bonus track in Limited Edition CD

Simple Plan (album)
"Simple Plan" is the third, self-titled studio album by pop punk band Simple Plan.

Smile, It's the End of the World
Smile, it's the End of the World is the second album by pop punk band Hawk Nelson. It was released on April 4, 2006.

Letters to the President
Letters to the President is the debut album by pop punk band Hawk Nelson. It was released on October 4, 2005.

Blizzard of Ozz
Blizzard of Ozz is a heavy metal album by Ozzy Osbourne, recorded in Surrey, UK and released on September 20, 1980 in the UK and on January 15, 1981 in the U.S..
This is Ozzy's first solo album. The tracks "Crazy Train" and "Mr. Crowley" were released as singles. Crazy Train peaked at #9 on the Mainstream Rock Charts.
"Blizzard of Ozz" remains Osbourne's highest-selling album to date, selling over 4.1 million copies in the U.S. alone.
The album reached #21 on Billboard's Pop Albums chart, and is on the list of the top 100 best-selling albums of the 1980s.
Track listing.
All songs written by Ozzy Osbourne, Randy Rhoads, and Bob Daisley except where noted.

Lyman Hall
Lyman Hall (April 12, 1724 October 19, 1790) was a signer of the United States Declaration of Independence as a representative of Georgia. Hall County is named for him.

Button Gwinnett
Button Gwinnett (baptized: April 10, 1735 – May 19, 1777), was second of the signatories (first signature on the left) on the United States Declaration of Independence as a representative of Georgia. He was also briefly the provisional president of Georgia in 1777, and Gwinnett County (now a major suburb of metro Atlanta) was named after him.

William Ellery
William Ellery (December 22, 1727 – February 15, 1820), was a signer of the United States Declaration of Independence as a representative of Rhode Island.
Some of his descendants were William Ellery Channing, Richard Henry Dana, Edie Sedgwick and actress Kyra Sedgwick. Ellery Avenue in Middletown, Rhode Island is named in his honor.

George Clymer
George Clymer (March 16, 1739 – January 23, 1813) was an American politician and Founding Father. He was one of the first Patriots to advocate complete independence from Britain. As a Pennsylvania representative, Clymer was, along with only five others, a signatory of both the Declaration of Independence and the U.S. Constitution. He attended the Continental Congress and served in political office until the end of his life.
Legacy.
USS "George Clymer" (APA-27) was named in his honor.
Clymer,Indiana County, Pennsylvania was named in his honor
Clymer, Chautaqua County, New York was named in his honor
George Clymer Elementary School, School District of Philadelphia. This school has educated majority children of color following Clymer's legacy of rights for all people.

Samuel Huntington (statesman)
Samuel Huntington (July 16, 1731 - January 5, 1796) was an American jurist, statesman, and revolutionary leader from Connecticut. He served as a delegate to the Continental Congress where he signed the Declaration of Independence, as Governor of Connecticut, and later as the first President of the United States in Congress Assembled, that is, the presiding officer of the Congress of the Confederation, the sole governing body of the first central government of the United States of America. His office was not that of today's President of the United States, which is a federal chief executive position created under the later United States Constitution.

Stephen Hopkins (politician)
Stephen Hopkins (March 7, 1707 – July 13, 1785) was an American political leader from Rhode Island who signed the Declaration of Independence. He served as the Chief Justice and Governor of colonial Rhode Island and was a Delegate to the Colonial Congress in Albany in 1754 and to the Continental Congress from 1774 to 1776.

Benjamin Harrison V
Benjamin Harrison V (April 5, 1726 April 24, 1791) was an American revolutionary leader from Charles City County, Virginia. He was educated at the College of William and Mary. Harrison was a representative for Surry County, Virginia (1756-1758) and Charles City County (1766-1776) to the House of Burgesses. He was a Virginia delegate to the Continental Congress from 1774 to 1777, signed the Declaration of Independence, and was Governor of Virginia from 1781 to 1784.

808s & Heartbreak
808s and Heartbreak is an 2008 album by Kanye West. It has been released on November 24, 2008.

Alan Keyes
Alan Lee Keyes (born August 7, 1950) is a conservative American political activist, author, and former diplomat, and candidate for public office. He ran for President of the United States in 1996, 2000, and 2008, and was a Republican nominee for the U.S. Senate in 1988, 1992, and 2004.

Imran Khan
Imran Ahmad Khan Niazi (Urdu: عمران خان نیازی) (born 25 November 1952) is a retired Pakistani cricketer who played international cricket for two decades in the late 20th century. He became a politician in the mid-1990s. Currently, besides running his own political party, Khan is also a charity worker and cricket commentator.

Half Hour of Power
Half Hour of Power is Sum 41's debut EP. Despite its title, there is only 24 minutes of music on it. It was released on June 27, 2000 on Big Rig Records, a subsidiary of Island Records (US), and Aquarius Records (Canada).

Alex Salmond
Alex Salmond was born on 31 December 1954. He is the current & 4th First Minister of Scotland.
He is leader of the Scottish National Party (SNP), Member of Parliament for the constituency of Banff and Buchan, and the Member of the Scottish Parliament for Gordon. He is currently serving his second term as leader of the SNP, having previously been leader between 1990 and 2000.
The SNP won the 2007 Scottish Parliament election with 47 seats, one seat ahead of their nearest rivals, the Scottish Labour Party. On 16 May 2007, Alex Salmond became First Minister, heading a minority SNP administration.

Jack McConnell
Jack Wilson McConnell (born 30 June 1960 in Irvine, North Ayrshire) is a former First Minister of Scotland, leader of the Scottish Labour Party and current Member of the Scottish Parliament (MSP) for the Motherwell and Wishaw constituency. To date he is the longest serving First Minister in the history of the Scottish Parliament.
McConnell became an MSP in the first elections to the Scottish Parliament in 1999, later holding the positions of Finance Minister, and Education Minister. He became First Minister upon the resignation of his predecessor Henry McLeish, and led the Scottish Labour Party to its second election victory in the 2003 election.
Education and career.
McConnell was born in Irvine and raised on a sheep farm near Lamlash on the Isle of Arran. He attended Arran High School and later went on to study at the University of Stirling, graduating with a BSc Dip Ed. He was also President of the Students' Association.
After graduating in 1983 he began work as a mathematics teacher at Lornshill Academy in Alloa, Clackmannanshire (a position he retained throughout his subsequent council service).
Aged sixteen, he joined the Scottish National Party, but later resigned his membership, becoming a vocal opponent of Scottish independence in later life. He is a member of the GMB Union and Amnesty International.
Early political career.
McConnell's political career began with his election to Stirling District Council. McConnell served on the council for eight years, while retaining his job at Lornshill. He served as Treasurer from 1988 until 1992, and was the Leader of the council from 1990 to 1992.
McConnell became the General Secretary of the Scottish Labour Party in 1992. His major breakthrough was in his handling of the 1997 General Election success, where Labour attained a large overall majority victory over the Conservatives. Together the Scottish Labour Party, the Scottish Liberal Democrats, and the Scottish National Party eliminated every seat the Conservatives held in Scotland. In 1998, he served as a member of the Scottish Constitutional Convention where he pioneered the Scottish devolution referendum success, establishing the Scottish Parliament.
Finance Minister.
McConnell was elected an MSP in the first Scottish Parliament elections in 1999. He was appointed Minister for Finance in the new Scottish Executive by then-First Minister Donald Dewar.
One of his first moves as Finance Minister was to establish the budgeting procedures for the new Scottish Executive, including publishing a consultation document asking the public and MSPs how the budget should be spent. His department also passed the Public Finance and Accountability (Scotland) Act 2000 through Parliament which set out the finance and auditing procedures of the Executive.
He was involved in one of the first scandals to hit the new Parliament when he was called to appear before the standards committee during an investigation into newspaper allegations that the lobbying arm of public relations company Beattie Media had privileged access to ministers. The committee later cleared McConnell of any wrongdoing and declared there was no evidence he had been influenced from lobbying by Beattie Media.
During his time as Finance Minister, McConnell clashed with the Minister of Health and Community Care, Susan Deacon over the budget allocated to health, and the rows soon became public knowledge. Supporters of both camps would conduct secret media briefings against the other, prompting Donald Dewar to threaten to sack any Minister or aide who briefs the media against another member of the Executive.
Education, Europe and External Affairs.
Upon Dewar’s death in 2000, he contested Henry McLeish for the position of First Minister, but lost out in the ballot. McLeish later appointed him Minister for Education, Europe and External Affairs. Some analysts considered this post to be a "poisoned chalice", as he would be required to resolve both a crisis in the Scottish Qualifications Authority over exam marking, and pay disputes with the teaching unions.
Election for First Minister.
McLeish was forced to resign over the Officegate Scandal, regarding the sub-let of his constituency office. In the resulting search for a leader, McConnell was seen by many political analysts as the likely successor.. McConnell quickly emerged as the only candidate, but made a surprising admission that he had cheated on his wife Bridget by having an affair with a party worker in 1994, stating he wished to "clear the air" and avoid any innuendo during his time in office. He announced the affair with his wife by his side at a press conference.
He was elected First Minister by the Parliament on 22 November 2001, and was formally appointed into office by Queen Elizabeth II on 26 November 2001.
First Term.
A few days after his appointment, on 27 November 2001, McConnell carried out a controversial reshuffle of the Cabinet, axing four Ministers: Angus MacKay, Sarah Boyack, Tom McCabe and Jackie Baillie, and demoting Susan Deacon (she later resigned rather than accept the new post offered to her).. The move was considered controversial as the axed ministers were judged to be loyal to McLeish and other figures in the party leading "The Sun" to dub him “Jack The Ripper”.
In February 2002, Scotland joined forces with the Republic of Ireland in a bid to host the 2008 European Football Championship. McConnell was initially unconvinced that it was worth spending around £100 million on the tournament, however he later put his support behind the joint bid with the Irish. Although the bid lost out to Switzerland, McConnell later supported other attempts to land major supporting events including London's successful bid for the 2012 Olympic Games and Glasgow's bid for the 2014 Commonwealth Games.
In May 2002, Wendy Alexander, the Minister for Enterprise, Transport and Lifelong Learning, and the only Minister not to have been sacked in the reshuffle, resigned. Many analysts speculated that Alexander, believed to be a close ally of Gordon Brown, had poor relations with McConnell.
The end of his first term as First Minister was rocked by a scandal known as "Wishawgate"- when auditors discovered accounting irregularities in the accounts of his Motherwell and Wishaw constituency. The Scottish Labour Party later admitted that union cash in excess of £1,000 had been donated to the constituency and not declared, a breach of the Electoral Commission's rules. McConnell and Frank Roy (the MP for the constituency in the House of Commons) were cleared of any wrongdoing after an internal investigation, however the constituency's treasurer admitted embezzling £11,000 from party funds.
Second Term.
Much of the election campaign for the 2003 elections took place during the invasion of Iraq. At the launch of the election campaign, McConnell made a plea that the polls should not be turned into a referendum on the war in Iraq. Despite Labour losing six seats in the election, McConnell was re-elected as First Minister, with another term of coalition with the Scottish Liberal Democrats. In the reshuffle following the 2003 election, McConnell axed two Minister posts, although he increased the size of the Scottish cabinet from 10 to 11.
The 31st G8 summit was held at the Gleneagles Hotel in Auchterarder, Perth and Kinross during July 2005. McConnell formally welcomed all the G8 leaders (with the exception of the then Prime Minister of the United Kingdom, Tony Blair) as they arrived in Scotland at Glasgow Prestwick International Airport. He also hosted a dinner for African leaders and International dignitaries including Secretary General of the United Nations, Kofi Annan.
During the 2006 FIFA World Cup, McConnell was criticised for not supporting the English football team. He defended his stance by stating that he represented Scotland and did not link politics with football.
In November 2006, he celebrated the 5th anniversary as First Minister. An internal document obtained by "The Observer", revealed what McConnell believed to be his major achievements during his 5 years as: the "Fresh Talent" initiative and the reverse of Scotland's population decline; banning smoking in enclosed public spaces in Scotland; taking measures to reduce sectarianism; and continuing aid to Malawi.
McConnell was interviewed by the Metropolitan Police in December 2006 in connection with their 'cash for honours' investigation. Their questioning of McConnell related to his nomination of Colin Boyd for a peerage, although it was believed that McConnell was not personally implicated in the scandal.
2007 election.
In the run-up to the 2007 Scottish Parliamentary Elections, McConnell was criticised by many inside and outside of the Labour party for his role in the party's poor start to the campaign, with Labour solidly behind the Scottish National Party in many opinion polls. He initially refused to debate with the SNP leader, Alex Salmond, and was the only leader of the major Scottish political parties not to appear on the 22 February edition of BBC's Question Time. He later appeared on a televised debate for STV and Sky News on 1 April, clashing with Salmond over issues including council tax and Trident nuclear missiles. McConnell also admitted that the Scottish Labour Party would seek to form a minority government if it emerged as the largest party following the elections.
On 10 April, McConnell unveiled Scottish Labour's election manifesto, which included plans to scrap water bills for pensioners and reform council tax bandings. The manifesto also proposed a large increase in education spending, which would allow the increasing of the school leaving age to 18 and a reduction in average class sizes to 19.
McConnell was re-elected to the Motherwell and Wishaw constituency on 4 May 2007. McConnell polled 12574 votes with a majority 5938 votes, representing 48% of the vote with a turnout of 50.3%. However, in the wider country, McConnell's ruling Labour Party was defeated by the SNP, both in terms of the popular vote and in numbers of seats. The SNP won 47 seats to Labour's 46, giving the SNP a one-seat majority over Labour, but well short of an overall majority in the Parliament.
Alex Salmond declared that his party had the right to form an executive due to their victory in the popular vote. Further, he claimed that Labour lacked the "moral authority" to form a government. McConnell strongly disagreed with this statement, arguing that "There is no moral authority to pursue separation and moral authority in the parliament will only come through parties working together in the majority."
Were the SNP unable to form a coalition, or even to operate as a minority administration, then the Labour Party could have formed an executive. In the event, Alex Salmond defeated Jack McConnell by 49 votes to 46 on Wednesday 16 May 2007 in the vote for First Minister of Scotland. Salmond announced his list of Cabinet nominees to Parliament for approval on 17 May 2007. Parliament subsequently approved the nominees. After the election, there was speculation that due to the election loss, McConnell would not survive long as Scottish Labour Leader.
After First Minister.
On 15 August 2007, McConnell announced his intention to resign as Scottish Labour leader. He will undertake voluntary work on behalf of the Clinton Hunter Development Initiative in Malawi and Rwanda. He was slated to take over as the UK's High Commissioner to Malawi in 2009, but he will now instead become a Special Envoy for Conflict Resolution, working with the United Nations. The "Scotland on Sunday" reported that Labour wished to avoid fighting a potentially difficult by-election in Motherwell and Wishaw, which would have been triggered if McConnell had moved to Malawi. It is now intended for McConnell to become High Commissioner to Malawi in 2011, after the next Scottish Parliament election.

Charles Kennedy
Charles Peter Kennedy MP, PC (born 25 November 1959) is a British politician.
From 9 August 1999 until 7 January 2006, he was the leader of the Liberal Democrats, the third largest political party in the United Kingdom.
In the 1983 General Election he stood for the Ross, Cromarty & Skye constituency, then held by the Conservative MP and Minister, Hamish Gray. In a shock result, Kennedy was elected (for the SDP): at 23, he became the youngest MP in the House of Commons. Ambitious and popular, he quickly emerged as a potential party leader. In 1994, by which time the SDP and the Liberal Party had merged, he became President of the Liberal Democrats - a position he held for four years. In 1999, on the resignation of Paddy Ashdown, Kennedy was elected party leader.
He took the party through two General Elections. However, he faced criticism for his laid-back leadership style, and there was considerable speculation regarding his alcohol consumption. From December 2005, some within the party were questioning his leadership and calling for a leadership election. On 5 January 2006, Kennedy was informed that ITN would be reporting that he had received treatment for a drinking problem. Kennedy decided to pre-empt the broadcast and admit his drinking problem openly. He called a leadership election at the same time, stating that he intended to stand. The admission of a drinking problem seriously damaged his standing within the parliamentary party. As support for him amongst this key group ebbed away, Kennedy resigned as leader on 7 January, saying that he would not be standing in the leadership election. Deputy leader Sir Menzies Campbell took over as interim leader and was elected as leader on 2 March 2006.

MTV Unplugged in New York
"MTV Unplugged in New York" was the first out of two live albums by the American grunge band Nirvana. (The second one was "From the Muddy Banks of the Wishkah".) It was recorded on November 18, 1993 as a part of the "MTV Unplugged" television series, which many artists and bands perform on. It was released on November 1, 1994, six months after the band had broken up because of the death of Kurt Cobain, who was the lead singer and guitarist.
It was unusual compared to other artists on the "MTV Unplugged" series, because Nirvana played mostly their less-famous songs and cover versions of other artists' songs. Most artists on the program played mainly their hits.
Four singles were released from the album. This was unusual because it was a live album. The singles were "About a Girl", "The Man Who Sold the World", "Where Did You Sleep Last Night", and "Lake of Fire". All of these except for "About a Girl" were covers.

Prachanda
h2 He is the current Prime Minister of Nepal. He is also the chairman of the Maoist Party, a communist party. His real name is Pushpa Kamal Dahal.

A Girl like Me (Rihanna album)
"A Girl Like Me" is the second studio album by Pop and R&B singer Rihanna. The album was released April 19, 2006. Singles included "SOS", "Unfaithful", and "Break It Off".

Ur So Gay
"Ur So Gay" is a single released by Katy Perry of the debut EP called "Ur So Gay - EP". The song is featured on the Perry's new debut hit Studio Album "One Of The Boys".
Music Video.
The music video for "Ur So Gay" depicts Perry singing the song with animated clouds and grass surrounding her and her blue guitar. It occasionally cuts to a storyline featuring a Barbie version of Katy.

The Best of Billie
"The Best of Billie" is a album by British pop singer Billie Piper. It was released by EMI on 8 August 2005. The album contained Piper's single releases as well as B-sides.

With the Lights Out
"With the Lights Out" is a box set album by the American grunge band Nirvana. It was released on November 23, 2004 on Geffen Records.
It was the only box set by Nirvana, and it one of several albums by Nirvana after the band broke up because the lead singer and guitarist Kurt Cobain died in 1994.

Virgin Killer
Virgin Killer is the fourth album by the German heavy metal band Scorpions. It was released in 1976, and it helped the Scorpions gain fans outside Europe. The album's cover has caused controversy, as it features a naked young girl. Some of the band members have said that the cover is okay, but others have said that they feel bad about releasing it. Some magazines and websites, such as "Cracked" and Gigwise.com, have called it one of the worst album covers of all time.
In 2008, the English Wikipedia page for "Virgin Killer" was put on a blacklist (a list of bad content) by the Internet Watch Foundation (IWF), a UK organization. Because of this, many major Internet service providers (ISPs) in the UK were banned from seeing the page. The IWF called the cover "indecent".

Live – Friday the 13th
Live - Friday the 13th is a live album released on Sept. 20th, 2006. The album was released as a live CD/DVD album featuring all 12 original songs from Pop band Maroon 5's hit debut called "Songs About Jane". This album has been released with the Copy Control protection system in some regions. The CD has the length of 77:58.
Performance.
Maroon 5 performed in Santa Barbara, California on Friday, May 13th of 2005.
Songs.
The songs from the hit debut album by "Maroon 5" called Songs About Jane were all featured performed live on this album. Two songs are perfomed called "Hello" by rock band Oasis (cover), and "Ain't No Sunshine" (cover).

Harald V of Norway
King Harald the fifth, the present king of Norway, was born in 1937.
His father became a king (Olav the fifth), in 1957.
The mother of King Harald: Crown Princess Märtha.

Live at Wembley '86
Live at Wembley '86 is a set of two discs recorded by English rock band Queen.
It was recorded live on Saturday July 12, 1986 during the "Magic Tour" at Wembley Stadium in London, England and was sold on May 26, 1992.
A DVD was sold in June 2003. The album was re-sold in a new CD with bonus tracks in August 2003 in the United States as Live at Wembley Stadium after the DVD.

Right Now (Leon Jackson album)
"Right Now" is the debut album by X Factor winner Leon Jackson.

Robert II of Scotland
Robert II (early 1316 - 19 April 1390) was King of Scotland from 1371 through 1390. He was the first king of the House of Stewart.

Robert III of Scotland
Robert III (c. 1340 - 4 April 1406) was King of Scotland from 1390 through 1406.

James II of Scotland
James II (16 October 1430– 3 August 1460) was King of Scotland from 1437 through 1460. He was born at Holyrood Palace, Edinburgh.

James III of Scotland
James III (c. 1451/1452 - 1488) was King of Scotland from 1460 through 1488.

James IV of Scotland
James IV ((17 March 1473 – 9 September 1513)) was King of Scotland from 1488 through 1513.

James V of Scotland
James V (1512-1542) was King of Scotland from 1513 through 1542.

Thaksin Shinawatra
Thaksin Shinawatra is a Thai businessman, politician, former Prime Minister of Thailand, and former leader of the populist Thai Rak Thai Party. He was removed from an influence of laws. Now he is currently outside of Thailand.
Profile.
Thaksin Shinawatra was born on 26th July, 1949 at San Kamphaeng,Chiang mai. His nickname is Maew. Thaksin He's the second child of Mr.Bunlerd Shinawatra and Mrs.Yindee Shinawatra. In 1974 Thaksin was maried with Mrs.Podchaman Shinawatra. They have three children are Mr.Panthongthea Shinawatra, Miss Pinthongtaa Shinawatra, and Miss Pheathongtan Shinawatra.
Politics.
Thaksin is very clever. He can solve many problems that the last prime minister can not do. He did many good things like subdue the drugs, set up OTOP, and develop Thailand.
Because Thaksin Shinawatra is too clever. He can found the opening of the law. He use the opening of the law for himself. And a group of Thai people know about his mistakes. Then they set up PAD.

William Eustis
William Eustis (June 21, 1753 – February 6, 1825) Continental Army during the American Revolutionary War. He served as United States Secretary of War from March 7, 1809 to January 13, 1813. He was appointed United States Ambassador to Holland by President James Madison, serving from 1814 to 1818.

We Started Nothing
We Started Nothin is an album recorded by Pop duo The Ting Tings. Singles include "Shut Up and Let Me Go", and "Be The One". The studio album was released May 2008. The album was also released as a limited edition LP on red vinyl limited to 2,000 copies.

John Key
John Phillip Key (born 9 August 1961) is the 38th and current Prime Minister of New Zealand and leader of the New Zealand National Party.
John Key entered the New Zealand Parliament in 2002 representing the north-west Auckland area of Helensville as a National MP, a seat that he still holds. In 2006 he succeeded Don Brash as the National Party leader in 2006. Key led his party to victory in the November 2008 general election.
Personal Life.
Key was born in Auckland, New Zealand, to George Key and Ruth Key. His father, who was from the UK, died of a heart attack in 1967. Key and his two sisters were raised in a state house in Christchurch by his mother.
He attended Burnside High School, and earned a Bachelor of Commerce degree in accounting from the University of Canterbury in 1981. He has attended management studies courses at Harvard University, although he did not receive a degree from this institution.
Key met his wife Bronagh when they were both students at Burnside High School. They married in 1984. She is currently full-time mother of their two children, Stephie and Max.
Before politics.
In 1995, he joined Merrill Lynch as head of Asian foreign exchange in Singapore. That same year he was promoted to Merrill's global head of foreign exchange, based in London, where he may have earned around US$2.25 million a year including bonuses, which is about NZ$5 million at 2001 exchange rates. Some co-workers called him "the smiling assassin" for maintaining his usual cheerfulness while sacking dozens (some say hundreds) of staff after heavy losses from the 1998 Russian financial crisis. He was a member of the Foreign Exchange Committee of the New York Federal Reserve Bank from 1999 to 2001.
Prime Minister.
Key became Prime Minister following the general election on 8 November 2008 which ended the Labour-led government of nine years under Helen Clark. The National Party, promoting a policy of "change", won 45% of the party vote and 59 of the 122 seats in Parliament, a big margin over the Labour Party which won 43 seats.
Key was sworn in as Prime Minister on 19 November 2008 along with his new cabinet. His first international outing as Prime Minister was the 20th APEC meeting in Peru the following day.

Garage, Inc.
"Garage Inc." is a cover album by American heavy metal band Metallica, released in 1998.
It includes recorded cover versions of other artists' songs, all of their b-side covers released up to that point, and the entire ', which had gone out of print since its original release in 1987. The title is a combination of Garage Days Re-Revisited and their song Damage, Inc. Over 5 million copies have been sold in the US as certified by the RIAA.
Disc one.
These tracks were recorded in September-October 1998 for the "Garage Inc." album.
Disc two.
These tracks are a collection of B-sides from artists Metallica were inspired by throughout the early years of the band.

Live from Le Cabaret
Live from Le Cabaret is a hit live studio album by Rock-Pop band "Maroon 5". The album was exclusivly released on iTunes Store on July 8th of 2008.
The Recording of "Live from Le Cabaret".
This hit live album by Maroon 5 was released on July 8th, 08 and was recorded in Montreal, Quebec. The album is originally 1:05:37 long. The album is the third known live album recorded by Maroon 5.
Songs Performed.
The songs performed on "Live from Le Cabaret" are songs from Maroon 5's past studio albums. Songs from their debut studio album called "Songs About Jane" like Harder to Breathe, This Love (Maroon 5 song), She Will Be Loved, Shiver, and Sweetest Goodbye. Songs are also included from Maroon 5's second hit studio album called "It Won't Be Soon Before Long" like Makes Me Wonder, Little of Your Time, If I Never See Your Face Again, and more.

Philip IV of Spain
Philip IV (,), (8 April, 1605 – 17 September, 1665) was King of Spain between 1621 and 1665 He was also sovereign of the Spanish Netherlands and King of Portugal until 1640.

Parachutes (album)
Parachutes is the debut album by Coldplay. The album was released June 10, 2000. "Parachutes holds the hit singles Don't Panic!, Trouble, Yellow, and Shiver.

A Rush of Blood to the Head
A Rush of Blood to the Head eas released August of 2002 by Coldplay. The album includes the singles "In My Place", "The Scientist", "Clocks", and "God Put a Smile Up On Your Face".

Georg Michaelis
Georg Michaelis (September 8, 1857 – July 24, 1936) became the first Chancellor of Germany with a non-noble background.

Don't Panic (song)
"Don't Panic!" is a hit single by rock band (formed in 1996) Coldplay. The single was recorded in 1996. Coldplay released the single off the hit studio album called "Parachutes" which was released July 10, 2000.

In My Place
"In My Place" was released August 2002. The single was released off the hit album "Parachutes" released by rock band Coldplay in 2000. In My Place was well-received by critics. The song was complimented for its music and profound lyrics. "In My Place" won Best Rock Performance by a Duo or Group with Vocal at the 45th Grammy Awards. The music video was nominated for two MuchMusic Video Awards in 2003 in the categories of Best international video–group and People's Choice: Favorite international group.

Bloc Québécois
The Bloc Québécois is a federal political party based in Canada.

James Henry Hammond
James Henry Hammond (November 15, 1807 – November 13, 1864) was from South Carolina. He served as a United States Representative from 1835 to 1836, Governor of South Carolina from 1842 to 1844, and United States Senator from 1857 to 1860. He had a son. He was also a slave owner; his plantation is in Redcliffe Park in South Carolina. The stables at Redcliffe Park were either built by him or his son.

Lachlan Macquarie
Major-General Lachlan Macquarie CB (31 January 1762 – 1 July 1824) was a British military officer who was the 5th Governor of New South Wales from 1810 to 1821. He had a leading role in the social, economic and architectural development of Australia. Historians say he led the change of New South Wales from a penal colony to a free settlement. This was very important in making the future of Australian society.

She Wants You
"She Wants You" is a single by English singer and actress Billie Piper. The single reached #3 in the UK becoming her third top three hit in a row.

Umberto I of Italy
Umberto I was King of Italy from 1878 through 1900.

WWE Tag Team Championship
The WWE Tag Team Championship is a professional wrestling world tag team championship of World Wrestling Entertainment, and it's exclusive of SmackDown brand.
Current Champions.
The current champions are Carlito and Primo Colón, both in their first reign. They defeated Curt Hawkins and Zack Ryder on the September 26, 2008 "SmackDown" edition (taped September 21) in Columbus, Ohio.

BC Lions
The BC Lions are a Canadian Football League team from Vancouver, BC. The Lions play their games at BC Place Stadium. The Lions play in the CFL West Division. The Lions were started in 1954 and used to play at Empire Stadium in East Vancouver. They have won the Grey Cup five times.

Romário
Romário (born 29 January, 1966) is a former Brazilian football player. He has played for Brazil national team.

Gianni Rivera
Gianni Rivera (born 18 August, 1943) is a former Italian football player. He has played for Italy national team.

Spy Kids
"Spy Kids" is the first film of the "Spy Kids" series. It is directed and written by Robert Rodriguez. The movie stars Alexa Vega and Daryl Sabara and was released in United States theaters on March 30, 2001 and on DVD on September 28, 2001.

Stephen III of Moldavia
Stephen III of Moldavia or Stephen III (c. 1433 - July 2, 1504), also known as Stephen the Great (; "Ştefan cel Mare şi Sfânt", "Stephen the Great and Holy" in more modern versions) was Prince of Moldavia between 1457 and 1504 and the most prominent representative of the House of Muşat.

Carol I of Romania
Carol I of Romania, original name Prince Karl Eitel Friedrich Zephyrinus Ludwig of Hohenzollern-Sigmaringen, later simply of Hohenzollern (April 20th, 1839 -), German prince, was elected Domnitor (Prince) of Romania on April 20th, 1866, following the overthrow of Alexandru Ioan Cuza.

Basarab I of Wallachia
Basarab I was an early ruler of the principality of Wallachia from perhaps as early as 1310 until 1352. He is sometimes referred to as "Întemeietorul" ("The Founder"), given his role in the creation of the state, together with his position as common ancestor of rulers in the Basarab dynasty.

Dragoş
Dragoş ("Drágfi of Béltek") was a Maramureş Voivode ruling over the lands of what was to become Moldavia (between 1351 and 1353). He left Maramureş by orders from the Hungarian King Louis I, in order to establish a defense line against the Golden Horde. He was succeeded by his son, Sas ("Szász" or "Sas of Béltek") (ruled 1354-1358).

Carol II of Romania
Carol II of Romania (15 October/16 October 1893 – 4 April 1953) was the king of Romania from June 8, 1930 until September 6, 1940.

Ion Antonescu
Ion Victor Antonescu (June 15, 1882, Piteşti – June 1, 1946 was the prime minister of Romania from September 4, 1940 to August 23, 1944.

Michael I of Romania
Michael, King of the Romanians, Prince of Hohenzollern (born October 25, 1921), reigned as King of the Romanians (, literally "His Majesty Michael I King of the Romanians") from July 20, 1927 to June 8, 1930, and again from September 6, 1940, until forced to abdicate by the communists backed up by orders of Stalin to the Soviet armies of occupation on December 30, 1947. A great-great-grandson of Queen Victoria and a third cousin of Queen Elizabeth II, he is one of the last surviving heads of state from World War II, the others being Simeon II of Bulgaria and King Norodom Sihanouk of Cambodia.

Nicolae Ceauşescu
Nicolae Ceauşescu () (January 26, 1918 – December 25, 1989) was the President of Romania from 1965 until 1989. After the Romanian Revolution of 1989 where he was deposed, tried and publicly executed.

Ion Iliescu
Ion Iliescu (born March 3, 1930) is a Romanian politician. He joined the Communist Party in 1953, and became a member of the Central Committee in 1965, serving in various positions until Nicolae Ceauşescu was overthrown in 1989. Iliescu was the elected President of Romania for eleven years (three terms), from 1990 to 1992, 1992 to 1996, and 2000 to 2004.

Traian Băsescu
Traian Băsescu (born November 4, 1951) is a Romanian politician and former Merchant Navy officer. He is the current President of Romania, inaugurated on December 20, 2004. He won the office in the 2004 presidential election. Prior to becoming President, he was the Mayor of Bucharest from June 2000 until December 2004.

Silent Alarm
"Silent Alarm" is an album by Bloc Party. It was released on the 14th February 2005 in the UK and in the USA, it was released on the 22nd of March.
Track Listing.
The albums tracks were written by lead singer Kele Okereke and guitarist Russell Lissack. The album was produced by Paul Epworth who also produced "A Certain Trigger" by Maximo Park and "Made Of Bricks" by Kate Nash.

A Weekend in the City
"A Weekend in the City" is the second studio album by Bloc Party. It was released on 5 February 2007. The album was produced by Jacknife Lee. The album cover is "A Project" by Rut Blees Luxemburg. This album deals more with original day working life than was on "Silent Alarm". The album has themes from the 7 July 2005 London bombings, immigration, drug abuse, and criticism of youth and casual sex. The album has gotten many high reviews by web-critics and fans.
The album came in at #56 in the United Kingdom end of year album chart. It sold about 266,500 copies in 2007. Over 1 million copies of the album have been sold worldwide.

Bloc Party (EP)
"Bloc Party" is an EP of songs in Bloc Party's first two (UK) singles: "She's Hearing Voices" and "Banquet/Staying Fat". The EP was released on May 24, 2004 through-out Europe. It was Bloc Party's first V2 Records EP. This EP was released later in Japan in August, and then in the United States in September of the same year.

Rudolf II, Holy Roman Emperor
Rudolf II (July 18, 1552 - January 20, 1612) was King of Hungary (as Rudolf, 1572-1608), King of Bohemia (as Rudolf II, 1575-1608/1611), Archduke of Austria (as Rudolf V, 1576-1608), and Holy Roman Emperor (as Rudolf II, 1576-1612). He was a member of the Habsburg family.

